WAYMAR ROYCE: What d’you expect? They’re savages. One lot steals a goat from another lot and before you know it, they’re ripping each other to pieces.
WILL: I’ve never seen wildlings do a thing like this. I’ve never seen a thing like this, not ever in my life.

WAYMAR ROYCE: How close did you get?

WILL: Close as any man would.

GARED: We should head back to the wall.

ROYCE: Do the dead frighten you?

GARED: Our orders were to track the wildlings. We tracked them. They won’t trouble us no more.

ROYCE: You don’t think he’ll ask us how they died? Get back on your horse.

[GARED grumbles.]

WILL: Whatever did it to them could do it to us. They even killed the children.

ROYCE: It’s a good thing we’re not children. You want to run away south, run away. Of course, they will behead you as a deserter … If I don’t catch you first. Get back on your horse. I won’t say it again.

[WILL glares, but obeys. Sometime later, the three Rangers return to the campsite, which is now completely cleared.]

ROYCE: Your dead men seem to have moved camp.

WILL: They were here.

GARED: See where they went.

[The three look around, swords drawn. They hear the wind and eerie calls. GARED finds a red cloth in the snow.]

ROYCE: What is it?

GARED: It’s …

[As he speaks, a CREATURE with glowing blue eyes rises behind ROYCE. ROYCE turns, the CREATURE strikes. The scene shifts to WILL, who hears a man crying out. The three horses stampede past him. He turns and sees someone standing very still in the distance. The figure turns – it’s the child who had been suspended in the tree, now with glowing blue eyes. WILL turns and runs.
GARED is also fleeing, and we hear strange growls and catch glimpses of the CREATURE. Both terrified RANGERS stop, some distance apart, to catch their breath. WILL sees a CREATURE behead GARED. WILL sinks to his knees and the CREATURE tosses GARED’S head to him.]

[Blackout / Opening credits]

[Riders from Winterfell come up behind a dazed WILL. The scene shifts to the castle, where BRAN is practicing archery and getting frustrated, under the eyes of JON SNOW and ROBB STARK. JON pats BRAN’S shoulder.]

JON: Go on. Father’s watching.

[We see NED and CATELYN STARK watching from above.]

JON: And your mother.

[Scene shifts to needlework practice with the girls inside the castle.]

SEPTA MORDANE (to SANSA): Fine work, as always. Well done.

SANSA: Thank you.

SEPTA MORDANE: I love the detail that you’ve managed to get in this corners. … Quite beautiful … the stitching …

[As she murmurs to SANSA about the embroidery, ARYA struggles with her needlework and listens to the arrows hitting and the male laughter outside.]
[Outside, BRAN tries and misses again. Everyone laughs.]

NED: And which one of you was a marksman at ten? Keep practicing, Bran. Go on.

JON: Don’t think too much, Bran.

ROBB: Relax your bow arm.

[BRAN pulls the arrow back. An arrow hits the bullseye. BRAN (still with his arrow), JON, and ROBB turn in surprise to see ARYA, who curtsies after her perfect shot. ROBB and JON laugh as Bran takes out after ARYA.]

JON/ROBB: Quick, Bran, faster!

[RODRICK CASSEL and THEON GREYJOY approach NED and CATELYN on the balcony.]

CASSEL: Lord Stark. My lady. A guardsman just rode in from the hills. They’ve captured a deserter from the Night’s Watch.

[NED grimaces.]

NED: Get the lads to saddle their horses.

[THEON departs.]

CATELYN: Do you have to?

NED: He swore an oath, Cat.

CASSEL: The law is law, my lady.

NED: Tell Bran he’s coming, too.

[CASSEL nods and departs.]

CATELYN: Ned. Ten is too young to see such things.

NED: He won’t be a boy forever. And winter is coming.

[NED departs. In the courtyard, ROBB and JON gather the arrows. CATELYN turns and glares down on JON. He looks at her and walks away.]

ROBB: Lad, go run back and get the rest.

[Scene shifts, and we see WILL being taken to the block.]

WILL (muttering): White Walkers. I saw the White Walkers. White Walkers. The White Walkers, I saw them.

[He and NED face each other.]

WILL: I know I broke my oath. And I know I’m a deserter. I should have gone back to the Wall and warned them. But I saw what I saw. I saw the White Walkers. People need to know. If you can get word to my family, tell them I’m no coward. Tell them I’m sorry.

NED nods yes, and WILL is positioned on the tree limb that serves as a block. [NED draws Ice from a scabbard held by Theon.]

WILL (whispering): Forgive me, lord.

[NED bows his head over ICE.]

NED: In the name of Robert of the House Baratheon, first of his name …

JON (to BRAN): Don’t look away.

NED: King of the Andals and the First Men …

JON: Father will know if you do.

NED: Lord of the Seven Kingdoms and protector of the realm, I, Eddard of the House Stark, Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North, sentence you to die.

[NED swings ICE and beheads WILL. BRAN does not look away.]

JON: You did well.

[He walks away. ROBB turns and puts his arm around BRAN and they go to their horses together. NED approaches BRAN.]

NED: You understand why I did it?

BRAN: Jon said he was a deserter.

NED: But do you understand why I had to kill him?

BRAN: Our way is the old way?

NED: The man who passes the sentence should swing the sword.

BRAN: Is it true he saw the White Walkers?

NED: The White Walkers have been gone for thousands of years.

BRAN: So he was lying?

NED: A madman sees what he sees.

[Scene shifts to a dead stag’s head. The Winterfell men gather on the bridge They see a ravaged deer before them.]

JON: What is it?

THEON: Mountain lion?

NED: There are no mountain lions in these woods.

[With swords out, they begin to search. NED finds a dead direwolf with antlers through her throat. Her pups are whimpering around her.]

THEON: It’s a freak.

NED: It’s a direwolf.

[NED and CASSEL glance at each other.]

NED: Tough old beast.

[He pulls out the antlers.]

ROBB: There are no direwolves south of the Wall.

JON: Now there are five.

[Jon picks up a pup and offers it to BRAN.]

JON: You want to hold it?

BRAN: Where will they go? Their mother’s dead.

CASSEL: They don’t belong down here.

NED: Better a quick death. They won’t last without their mother.

THEON: Right. Give it here.

BRAN: NO!

ROBB (disgustedly to THEON): Put away your blade.

THEON: I take orders from your father, not you.

BRAN: Please, father!

NED: I’m sorry, Bran.

JON: Lord Stark? There are five pups. One for each of the Stark children. The direwolf is the sigil of your House. They were meant to have them.

[Everyone looks at NED, BRAN with great hope.]

NED: You will train them yourselves. You will feed them yourselves. And if they die, you will bury them yourselves.

[BRAN cradles his pup as JON hands more pups to ROBB.]

BRAN (to JON): What about you?

JON: I’m not a Stark. Get on.

[JON walks away, pauses, and hears another whimper.]

ROBB: What is it?

[JON pulls up a white wolf pup.]

THEON: The runt of the litter. That one’s yours, Snow.

[Scene shifts to bells ringing at Kings Landing. In front of the Iron Throne, surrounded by druidical looking celebrants, lies the body of JON ARRYN. Up in the balcony, CERSEI watches the scene below as JAIME approaches.]

JAIME: As your brother, I feel it’s my duty to warn you: You worry too much. It’s starting to show.

CERSEI: And you never worry about anything. When we were seven, you jumped off the cliffs as Casterly Rock. One hundred foot drop into the water. And you were never afraid.

JAIME: There was nothing to be afraid of until you told father. [In a whisper, mimicking] We’re Lannisters. Lannisters don’t act like fools.

CERSEI: What if Jon Arryn told someone?

JAIME: But who would he tell?

CERSEI: My husband.

JAIME: If he told the king, both our heads would be skewered on the city gates by now. Whatever Jon Arryn knew or didn’t know, it died with him. And Robert will choose a new Hand of the king, someone to do his job while he’s off fucking boars and hunting whores. Or is it the other way around? And life will go on.

CERSEI: You should be the Hand of the king.

JAIME: That’s an honor I can do without. Their days are too long, their lives are too short.

Scene shifts to a raven approaching Winterfell. [CATELYN crosses a busy courtyard and finds NED in the godswood.]

CATELYN: All these years and I still feel like an outsider when I come here.

NED: You have five northern children. You’re not an outsider.

CATELYN: I wonder if the old gods agree.

NED: It’s your gods with all the rules.

CATELYN: I am so sorry, my love.

NED: Tell me.

CATELYN: There was a raven from Kings Landing. Jon Arryn is dead. A fever took him. I know he was like a father to you.

NED: Your sister. The boy …

CATELYN: They both have their health. Gods be good. [pause] The raven brought more news. The king rides for Winterfell. With the queen and all the rest of them.

NED: He’s coming this far North, there’s only one thing he’s after.

CATELYN: You can always say no, Ned.

[Scene shifts to the Winterfell great hall where a great banquet is being prepared.]

CATELYN: We need plenty of candles for Lord Tyrion’s chamber. I’m told he reads all night.

MAESTER LUWIN: I’m told he drinks all night.

CATELYN: How much could he possibly drink? A man of his … stature.

LUWIN: We’ve brought up eight barrels of ale from the cellar. Perhaps we’ll find out.

CATELYN: In any case, candles.

[Scene shifts to Robb, Theon, and Jon getting barbered.]

JON: Why’s your mother so dead-set on us getting pretty for the king?

THEON: It’s for the queen, I bet. I hear she’s [sleek as a mink?]

ROBB: I hear the prince is a right royal prick.

THEON: Think of all those southern girls he gets to stab with his right royal prick.

ROBB: Go on, Tommy, shave him good. He’s never met a girl he likes better than his own hair.

[Scene shifts to the royal procession approaching Winterfell. Bran sees them from his perch high atop a castle wall and clambers nimbly down to tell everyone. CATELYN and LUWIN walk to the courtyard, passing BRAN’s wolf pup.]

CATELYN: Gods, but they grow fast. [Seeing BRAN on the wall] Brandon!

BRAN: I saw the king! He’s got hundreds of people!

CATELYN: How many times have I told you: No climbing!

BRAN: But he’s coming right now! Down our road!

CATELYN: I want you to promise me: No more climbing.

BRAN (looking down): I promise.

CATELYN: D’you know what?

BRAN: What?

CATELYN: You always look at your feet before you lie. Run and find your father. Tell him the king is close.

[BRAN runs off, followed by his wolf pup.]

[Scene shifts to grand entry of the king’s horses and men. ARYA, wearing a helm and cloak, pushes her way into a tall wagon for a better look. In rides JOFFREY, followed by the HOUND. The other Starks wait in a greeting line.]

CATELYN: Where’s Arya? Sansa, where’s your sister?

[More riders with banners. ARYA scoots past her parents to get in the receiving line.]

NED: Hey,, hey, hey, hey. What are you doing with that on? [Pulls off ARYA’s helm]

ARYA (pushing BRAN): Move!

[JOFFREY rides up, SANSA smiles at him, ROBB glares at JOFFREY. The HOUND pulls up his helm. The coach carrying CERSEI lumbers in, followed by KING ROBERT. All kneel. ROBERT heaves himself off his horse. NED looks shocked at the sight of his old friend, now fat and red-faced. ROBERT signals for all to rise and looks at NED.]

NED: Your Grace.

ROBERT: You’ve got fat.

[NED gives ROBERT a “What about you?” look. They start laughing.]

ROBERT: Cat!

CATELYN: Your Grace.

ROBERT: Nine years. Why haven’t I seen you? Where the hell have you been?

NED: Guarding the North for you, Your Grace. Winterfell is yours.

[CERSEI and her other children descend from the coach.]

ARYA: Where’s the Imp?

SANSA: Will you shut up?

ROBERT: Who have we here? You must be Robb. (To Sansa) My, you’re a pretty one. (To Arya) Your name is?

ARYA: Arya.

ROBERT (to BRAN) Ooh. Show us your muscles. You’ll be a soldier.

[JAIME removes his helm.]

ARYA: That’s Jaime Lannister. The queen’s twin brother.

SANSA: Would you please shut up.

[CERSEI approaches.]

NED: My queen.

CATELYN: My queen.

ROBERT: Take me to your crypt. I want to pay my respects.

CERSEI: We’ve been riding for a month, my love. Surely the dead can wait.

ROBERT: Ned.

ARYA: Where’s the Imp?

[CERSEI, humiliated in front of all, walks back to JAIME.]

CERSEI: Where is our brother? Go find the little beast.

[Scene changes to the crypt.]

NED: Tell me about Jon Arryn.

ROBERT: One minute he was fine, and then … Burned right through him, whatever it was. I loved that man.

NED: We both did.

ROBERT: He never had to teach you much, but me … You remember me at 16? All I wanted to do was crack skulls and fuck girls. He showed me what was what.

NED: Aye.

ROBERT: Don’t look at me like that. Not his fault I didn’t listen. (They laugh. ROBERT sighs.) I need you, Ned. Down at Kings Landing. Not up here, where you’re no damn use to anybody. Lord Eddard Stark, I would name you the Hand of the king.

[NED kneels.]

NED: I’m not worthy of the honor.

ROBERT: I’m not trying to honor you. I’m trying to get you to run my kingdom while I eat, drink, and whore my way to an early grave. Damn it, Ned, stand up. You helped me win the Iron Throne, now help me keep the damn thing. We were meant to rule together. If your sister had lived, we would have been bound by blood. Well, it’s not too late. I have a son, you have a daughter. We’ll join our Houses.

[Scene changes to JAIME in the Winterfell settlement. We see Tyrion inside a whorehouse, swilling liquor and laughing as a woman pops into view after servicing him.]

TYRION: Mmh. It is true what they say about the Northern girls.

ROS: Did you hear the king’s in Winterfell?

TYRION: I did hear something about that.

ROS: And the queen. And her twin brother. They say that he is the most handsome man in the Seven Kingdoms.

TYRION: And the other brother?

ROS: The queen has two brothers?

TYRION: There’s the pretty one. And there’s the clever one.

ROS: I hear they call him the Imp.

TYRION: I hear he hates that nickname.

ROS: Oh? I hear he’s more than earned it. I hear he’s a drunken little lecher into all manner of perversions.

TYRION: Clever girl.

ROS: We’ve been expecting you, Lord Tyrion.

TYRION: Have you?

TYRION: The gods gave me one blessing.

[She climbs on TYRION. JAIME walks in without knocking.]

JAIME: Don’t get up.

ROS: M’lord.

TYRION: Should I explain to you the meaning of a closed door in a whorehouse, brother?

JAIME: You’ve much to teach me, no doubt. But our sister craves your attention.

TYRION: She has odd cravings, our sister.

JAIME: A family trait. Now, the Starks are feasting us at sundown. Don’t leave me alone with these people.

TYRION: I’m sorry, I’ve begun the feast a bit early. And this is the first of many courses.

JAIME: I thought you might say that. But since we’re short on time, (he opens the door; a bevy of whores enter and descend on TYRION) Come on, girls. See you at sundown.

[JAIME leaves.]

TYRION: Close the door!

[Scene changes to the Winterfell crypt, at Lyanna’s tomb. Robert places a feather in the hand of her statue.]

ROBERT: Did you have to bury her in a place like this? She should be on a hill somewhere with the sun and the clouds above her.

NED: She was my sister. This is where she belongs.

ROBERT: She belonged with me.

[He touches Lyanna’s face.]

ROBERT: In my dreams, I kill him every night.

NED: It’s done, Your Grace. The Targaryens are gone.

ROBERT: Not all of them.

[Scene shifts to Daenerys on a balcony in Pentos, across the Narrow Sea.]

VISERYS (off camera): Daenerys!

[He enters a large chamber.]

VISERYS: Daenerys! There’s our bride to be! Look – a gift from Illyrio. Touch it. Come on. Feel the fabric. Mmmm. Isn’t he a gracious host?

DAENERYS: We’ve been his guests for over a year and he’s never asked us for anything.

VISERYS: Illyrio is no fool. He knows I won’t forget my friends when I come into my throne. You still slouch. Let me see. (He pulls off her gown.) You have a woman’s body now. (She endures it as he strokes her breast.) I need you to be perfect today. Can you do that for me? You don’t want to wake the dragon, do you?

DAENERYS: No.

[VISERYS nods and starts to leave the chamber. He turns.]

VISERYS: When they write the history of my reign, sweet sister, they will say it began today.

[Daenerys turns and steps into a steaming hot bath with a despairing look on her face.]

MAID: It’s too hot, my lady.

[But DAENERYS keeps stepping deeper. The scene shifts to ILLYRIOS, DAENERYS, AND VISERYS outside the mansion, awaiting Khal Drogo.]

VISERYS: Where is he?

ILLYRIO: The Dothraki are not known for their punctuality.

[A host of Dothraki come riding up. Khal Drogo wheels his stallion into the front.]

ILLYRIO: (Greets them in Dothraki.) May I present my honored guests? Viserys of House Targaryen, the third of his name. The rightful King of the Andals and the First Men. And his sister, Daenerys, of the House Targaryen.

VISERYS (to DAENERYS) Do you see how long his hair is? When Dothraki are defeated in combat, they cut off their braid so the whole world can see their shame. Khal Drogo has never been defeated. He’s a savage, of course, but he’s one of the finest killers alive. And you will be his queen.

ILLYRIO: Come forward, my dear.

[KHAL DROGO watches as DAENERYS walks toward him. She does not hesitate and looks straight at him, although there is fear on her face. KHAL DROGO gazes at her and then leads his horsemen on a charge away.]

VISERYS: Where’s he going?

ILLYRIO: The ceremony is over.

VISERYS: But he didn’t say anything. Did he like her?

ILLYRIO: Trust me, Your Grace. If he didn’t like her, we’d know.

[The scene shifts to ILLYRIO, VISERYS, AND DAENERYS ON A GARDEN BALCONY OVERLOOKING THE SEA.]

ILLYRIO: It won’t be long now. Soon you will cross the Narrow Sea and take back your father’s throne. The people drink secret toasts to your health. They cry out for their true king.

VISERYS: When will they be married?

ILLYRIO: Soon. The Dothraki never stay still for long.

VISERYS: Is it true they lie with their horses?

ILLYRIO: I wouldn’t ask Khal Drogo.

VISERYS: Do you take me for a fool?

ILLYRIO: I take you for a king. Kings lack the caution of common men. My apologies if I’ve given offense.

VISERYS: I know how to play a man like Drogo. I give him a queen and he gives me an army.

DAENERYS (pleadingly) I don’t want to be his queen. I want to go home.

VISERYS: So do I. I want us both to go home. But they took it from us. So tell me, sweet sister, how do we go home?

DAENERYS: I don’t know.

VISERYS: We go home with an army. With Khal Drogo’s army. I would let his whole tribe fuck you, all 40,000 men and their horses too, if that’s what it took.

[He gives DAENERYS a brotherly kiss on the forehead and walks away. The scene shifts to a bedroom in Winterfell, where CATELYN is fixing SANSA’S hair.]

SANSA: Do you think Joffrey will like me? What if he thinks I’m ugly?

CATELYN: Then he is the stupidest prince that ever lived.

SANSA: He’s so handsome.

[CATELYN rolls her eyes.]

SANSA: When would we be married? Soon or do we have to wait?

CATELYN: Hush now. Your father hasn’t even said yes.

SANSA: Why would he say no? He’d be the second most powerful man in the kingdoms.

CATELYN: He’d have to leave home. He’d have to leave me. And so would you.

SANSA: You left your home to come here. And I’d be queen someday. Please make father say yes.

CATELYN: Sansa…

SANSA: Please, please. It’s the only thing I ever wanted.

[Scene shifts to the Winterfell banquet. Laughter, music, KING ROBERT getting bawdy with a wench. CATELYN and CERSEI watch, CATELYN embarrassed for CERSEI, who looks disgusted. Out in the courtyard, JON takes out his frustration on a fencing dummy. His uncle BENJEN rides up.]

BENJEN: Is he dead yet?

JON: Uncle Benjen!

[They hug.]

BENJEN: You got bigger. I rode all day. Didn’t want to leave you alone with the Lannisters. Why aren’t you at the feast?

JON: Lady Stark thought it might insult the royal family to seat a bastard in their midst.

BENJEN: Well, you’re always welcome on the wall. No bastard was ever refused a seat there.

JON: So take me with you when you go back.

BENJEN: Jon…

JON: Father will let me if you ask him, I know he will.

BENJEN: The Wall isn’t going anywhere.

JON: I’m ready to swear your oath.

BENJEN: You don’t understand what you’d be giving up. We have no families. None of us will ever father sons.

JON: I don’t care about that.

BENJEN: You might, if you knew what it meant. … I’d better get inside. Rescue your father from his guests. We’ll talk later.

[BENJEN goes to the banquet.]

TYRION: Your uncle’s in the Night’s Watch.

JON: What’re you doing back there?

TYRION (drinking): Preparing for a night with your family. I’ve always wanted to see the Wall.

JON: You’re Tyrion Lannister. The queen’s brother?

TYRION: My greatest accomplishment. You – you’re Ned Stark’s bastard, aren’t you?

[JON looks angry and turns away.]

TYRION: Did I offend you? Sorry. You are the bastard, though.

JON: Lord Eddard Stark is my father.

TYRION: And Lady Stark is not your mother. Making you a bastard. Let me give you some advice, bastard. Never forget what you are. The rest of the world will not. Wear it like armor. Then it can never be used to hurt you.

JON: What the hell do you know about being a bastard?

TYRION: All dwarves are bastards in their fathers’ eyes.

[TYRION departs. JON picks up his sword and attacks the dummy with new ferocity.]

[The scene shifts back to the banquet, in full raucous swing. NED is off to himself; BENJEN comes up to him.]

BENJEN: You at a feast -- It’s like a bear in a trap.

NED: The boy I beheaded. Did you know him?

BENJEN: Of course I did. Just a lad. But he was tough, Ned. A true Ranger.

NED: He was talking madness. Said the Walkers slaughtered his friends.

BENJEN: The two he was with are still missing.

NED: A wildling ambush.

BENJEN: Maybe. Direwolves south of the wall. Talk of the Walkers. My brother might be the next Hand to the king. Winter is coming.

NED: Winter is coming.

[ROBB approaches.]

ROBB: Uncle Benjen.

BENJEN: Robb boy. How are ye?

ROBB: I’m good.

[KING ROBERT gets even more bawdy with a wench.]

CATELYN (in desperation) Is this your first time in the North, Your Grace?

CERSEI: Yes. Lovely country.

[They observe SANSA.]

CATELYN: I’m sure it’s very grim, after Kings Landing. I remember how scared I was when Ned brought me up here for the first time.

[SANSA approaches and smiles shyly at CERSEI.]

CERSEI: Hello, little dove. But you are a beauty. How old are you?

SANSA: Thirteen, Your Grace.

CERSEI: You’re tall. Still growing?

SANSA: I think so, Your Grace.

CERSEI: And have you bled yet?

SANSA (discomfited): No, Your Grace.

CERSEI: And your dress. Did you make it?

[SANSA nods yes.]

CERSEI: Such talent. You must make something for me.

[SANSA departs.]

CERSEI (to CATELYN]: I hear we might share a grandchild someday.

CATELYN: I hear the same.

CERSEI: Your daughter will do well in the capital. Such a beauty shouldn’t stay hidden up here forever.

[SANSA and JOFFREY catch each other’s eye. JOFFREY smiles at her and she turns to her friend.]

[JAIME and NED meet up. JAIME blocks their path.]

NED: Your pardon.

JAIME: I hear we might be neighbors soon. I hope it’s true.

NED: Yes, the king has honored me with his offer.

JAIME: I’m sure we’ll have a tournament to celebrate the new title, if you accept. It would be good to have you in the field. The competition has become a bit stale.

NED: I don’t fight in tournaments.

JAIME: No? Getting a little old for it?

NED: I don’t fight in tournaments because when I fight a man for real, I don’t want him to know what I can do.

JAIME: Well said.

[ARYA flips food onto SANSA’s face.]

SANSA: Arya!

[CATELYN signals a laughing ROBB to deal with the girls. He hoists up ARYA.]

ROBB: Time for bed.

[The scene shifts to after the banquet. NED and CATELYN are in their bed.]

NED: I’m a Northman. I belong here with you, not down south in that rat’s nest they call a capital.

CATELYN: I won’t let him take you.

NED: The king takes what he wants. That’s why he’s king.

CATELYN: I’ll say, ‘Listen, fat man, you are not taking my husband anywhere. He belongs to me now.’

NED: How did he get so fat?

CATELYN: He only stops eating when it’s time for a drink.

[There’s a knock at the door.]

A VOICE: It’s Maester Luwin, my lord.

NED: Send him in.

LUWIN: Pardon, my lord, my lady. A rider in the night from your sister.

[He hands CATELYN a sealed note.]

NED: Stay.

CATELYN: This was sent from the Eyrie. What’s she doing at the Eyrie? She hasn’t been back there since her wedding.

[CATELYN reads the note, looks up in alarm, and then burns it.]

NED: What news?

CATELYN: She’s fled the capital. She says Jon Arryn was murdered. By the Lannisters. She says the king is in danger.

NED: She’s fresh widowed, Cat. She doesn’t know what she’s saying.

CATELYN: Lysa’s head would be on a spike right now if the wrong people had found that letter. Do you think she would risk her life, her son’s life, if she wasn’t certain her husband was murdered?

LUWIN: If this news is true, and the Lannisters conspire against the throne, who but you can protect the king?

CATELYN: They murdered the last Hand. Now you want Ned to take the job.

LUWIN: The king rode for a month to ask Lord Stark’s help. He’s the only one he trusts. You swore the king an oath, my lord.

CATELYN: He spent half his life fighting Robert’s wars. He owes him nothing. (To NED) Your father and brother rode south once on a king’s demand.

LUWIN: A different time. Different king.

[The scene shifts to the wild wedding celebration of KHAL DROGO and DAENERYS. Fighting and fornication. DAENERYS looks stricken at everything around her.]

VISERYS: When do I meet with the Khal? We need to begin planning the invasion.

ILLYRIO: If Khal Drogo has promised you a crown, you shall have it.

VISERYS: When?

ILLYRIO: When their omens favor war.

VISERYS: I piss on Dothraki omens. I waited 17 years to get my throne back.

[The sex and violence intensify. Two men fight to the death over a woman each is trying to rape. KHAL DROGO watches avidly.]

ILLYRIO: A Dothraki wedding without at least three deaths is considered a dull affair.

[A knight in Westerosi garb appears. KHAL DROGO greets him in Dothraki. It is JORAH MORMONT, bearing books.]

JORAH: A small gift for the new Khaleesi. Songs and histories from the Seven Kingdoms.

DAENERYS: Thank you, ser. Are you from my country?

JORAH: Ser Jorah Mormont of Bear Island. I served your father for many years. Gods be good, I hope to always serve the rightful king.

[DANY is presented with a chest with three dragon eggs in it.]

ILLYRIO: Dragons’ eggs, Daenerys. From the Shadow Lands beyond Asshai. The ages have turned them to stone, but they will always be beautiful.

DAENERYS: Thank you, Magister.

[KHAL DROGO rises and strides forward. DAENERYS follows him, looking sick with fear. The Dothraki crowd behind her as she goes. The KHAL leads her to a white mare.]

DAENERYS: She’s beautiful. … Ser Jorah, I don’t know how to say ‘thank you’ in Dothraki.

JORAH: There is no word for ‘thank you’ in Dothraki.

[The KHAL puts DANY on her horse and mounts his.]

VISERYS: Make him happy.

[The scene shifts to the seaside at sunset. The KHAL begins to unwrap DANY’s dress. She is sobbing. He touches the tears on her face.]

KHAL DROGO: No.

DAENERYS: Do you know the Common Tongue?

KHAL DROGO: No.

DAENERYS: Is ‘no’ the only word that you know?

KHAL DROGO: No.

[He takes off her gown and bends her down.]

[The scene shifts to Winterfell. Tyrion and the Hound are seated outside the day after the banquet.]

THE HOUND: Rough night, Imp?

TYRION: If I get through this without squirting from one end or the other, it will be a miracle.

THE HOUND: I didn’t pick you for a hunter.

TYRION: The greatest in the land. My spear never misses.

THE HOUND: It’s not hunting if you pay for it.

[The king and Ned come into view.]

ROBERT: Are you as good with a spear as you used to be?

NED: No, but I’m still better than you.

ROBERT: I know what I’m putting you through. Thank you for saying yes. I only ask you because I need you. You’re a loyal friend. You hear me? A loyal friend. The last one I’ve got.

NED: I hope I’ll serve you well.

ROBERT: You will. And I’ll make sure you don’t look so fucking grim all the time. Come on, boys, let’s go kill some boar!

[The king’s party rides off, NED nodding goodbye to BRAN, whose wolf pup begins sniffing at his feet.]

BRAN: Come on, you.

[BRAN begins climbing, his wolf pup crying at the bottom of the castle wall. As he nears the top, he hears a woman and man moaning. Peering in the window, he sees CERSEI and JAIME having sex. CERSEI sees BRAN.]

CERSEI: Stop. STOP.

[JAIME runs and grabs BRAN at the window.]

JAIME: Are you completely mad?

CERSEI: He saw us.

JAIME: It’s all right. It’s all right.

CERSEI: He saw us!

JAIME: I heard you the first time. (To BRAN) Quite the little climber, aren’t you? How old are you, boy?

BRAN: Ten
.
JAIME: Ten.

[JAIME looks at CERSEI, who gazes back imploringly.]

JAIME: The things I do for love.




TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
4
The Kingsroad
Game of Thrones
Featuring Tim Van Patten
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 1 Scripts
THE KINGSROAD
Daenerys on horseback looking at Drogo and his people.

Jorah Mormont: You need to drink, child... And eat.
Daenerys Targaryen: Isn't there anything else?

Jorah Mormont: The Dothraki have two things in abundance: grass and horses. People can't live on grass... In the Shadow Lands beyond Asshai, they say there are fields of ghost grass with stalks as pale as milk that glow in the night. It murders all other grass. The Dothraki believe that one day it will cover everything. That's the way the world will end… It'll get easier.

Arriving at camp, Daenerys looks exhausted from riding.

Doreah: Khaleesi!
Irri: Your hands.

After Daenerys is escorted away, Jorah and Viserys are alone.

Jorah Mormont: We're still not far from Pentos, your Grace. Magister Illyrio has extended his hospitality. You'd be more comfortable there.
Viserys Targaryen: I have no interest in hospitality or comfort. I'll stay with Drogo until he fulfils his end of the bargain and I have my crown.
Jorah Mormont: As you wish, your Grace.
Viserys Targaryen: Well, Mormont, as brutish as this life is, I suppose it is preferable to beheading. What did Ned Stark want you for? Buying from a slaver?
Jorah Mormont: Selling to one... Some poachers I caught on my land.
Viserys Targaryen: Under my reign, you won't be punished for such nonsense. You can rest assured of that.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Joffrey finding Tyrion asleep in the dog’s pen of Winterfell.

Joffrey Baratheon: Better-looking bitches than you're used to, Uncle. My mother's been looking for you. We ride for King's Landing today.
Tyrion Lannister: Before you go, you will call on Lord and Lady Stark and offer your sympathies.
Joffrey Baratheon: What good will my sympathies do them?
Tyrion Lannister: None. But it is expected of you. Your absence has already been noted.
Joffrey Baratheon: The boy means nothing to me. And I can't stand the wailing of women.
Tyrion Lannister: One word and I'll hit you again.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm telling mother!
Tyrion Lannister: Go! Tell her. But first you will get to Lord and Lady Stark and you will fall on your knees in front of them and tell them how very sorry you are, that you are at their service, and that all your prayers are with them. Do you understand?
Joffrey Baratheon: You can't...
Tyrion Lannister: Do you understand?
Sandor Clegane: The Prince will remember that, little lord.
Tyrion Lannister: I hope so. If he forgets, be a good dog and remind him. Time for breakfast...

Tyrion walks from the courtyard to the dining hall where his family is eating breakfast.

Tyrion Lannister: Bread. And two of those little fish. And a mug of dark beer to wash it down. And bacon, burnt black.
Jaime Lannister: Little brother.
Tyrion Lannister: Beloved siblings.
Myrcella Baratheon: Is Bran going to die?
Tyrion Lannister: Apparently not.
Cersei Baratheon: What do you mean?
Tyrion Lannister: The Maester says the boy may live.
Cersei Baratheon: It's no mercy, letting a child linger in such pain.
Tyrion Lannister: Only the gods know for certain. All the rest of us can do is pray. The charms of the north seem entirely lost on you.
Cersei Baratheon: I still can't believe you're going. It's ridiculous even for you.
Tyrion Lannister: Where's your sense of wonder? The greatest structure ever built, the intrepid men of the Night's Watch, the wintry abode of the White Walkers.
Jaime Lannister: Tell me you're not thinking of taking the black.
Tyrion Lannister: And go celibate? The whores would go begging from Dorne to Casterly Rock. I just want to stand on top of the Wall and piss off the edge of the world.
Cersei Baratheon: The children don't need to hear your filth. Come.
Jaime Lannister: Even if the boy lives, he'll be a cripple, a grotesque. Give me a good clean death any day.
Tyrion Lannister: Speaking for the grotesques, I'd have to disagree. Death is so final, whereas life... Life is full of possibilities. I hope the boy does wake. I'd be very interested to hear what he has to say.
Jaime Lannister: My dear brother, there are times you make me wonder whose side you're on.
Tyrion Lannister: My dear brother, you wound me. You know how much I love my family.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In Bran’s room with Catelyn at his bedside, Cersei coming to console.

Cersei Baratheon: Please.
Catelyn Stark: I would have dressed, your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: This is your home. I'm your guest. Handsome one, isn't he? I lost my first boy, a little black-haired beauty. He was a fighter too... Tried to beat the fever that took him. Forgive me. It's the last thing you need to hear right now.
Catelyn Stark: I never knew.
Cersei Baratheon: It was years ago. Robert was crazed, beat his hands bloody on the wall, all the things men do to show you how much they care... The boy looked just like him. Such a little thing... A bird without feathers. They came to take his body away and Robert held me. I screamed and I battled, but he held me. That little bundle. They took him away and I never saw him again. Never have visited the crypt, never. I pray to the Mother every morning and night that she return your child to you.
Catelyn Stark: I am grateful..
Cersei Baratheon: Perhaps this time she'll listen.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Near the Smith in a courtyard of Winterfell.

Jaime Lannister: A sword for the wall?
Jon Snow: I already have one.
Jaime Lannister: Good man. Have you swung it yet?
Jon Snow: Of course I have.
Jaime Lannister: At someone, I mean. It's a strange thing, the first time you cut a man. You realize we're nothing but sacks of meat and blood and some bone to keep it all standing. Let me thank you ahead of time for guarding us all from the perils beyond the Wall... Wildlings and White Walkers and whatnot. We're grateful to have good, strong men like you protecting us.
Jon Snow: We've guarded the Kingdoms for 8 000 years.
Jaime Lannister: Is it "we" already? Have you taken your vows then?
Jon Snow: Soon enough.
Jaime Lannister: Give my regards to the Night's Watch. I'm sure it will be thrilling to serve in such an elite force. And if not, It's only for life.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Arya’s room, packing things for her trip to King’s Landing, having her direwolf assist her. Jon comes in to say goodbye before he leaves for the Night's Watch.

Arya Stark: Thank you, Nymeria. Septa Mordane says I have to do it again. "My things weren't properly folded", she says. Who cares how they're folded?! They're going to get all messed up anyway.
Jon Snow: It's good you've got help.
Arya Stark: Watch. Nymeria, gloves.
Jon Snow: Impressive.
Arya Stark: Shut up. Nymeria, gloves!
Jon Snow: I have something for you. And it has to be packed very carefully.
Arya Stark: A present?
Jon Snow: Close the door. This is no toy. Be careful you don't cut yourself.
Arya Stark: It's so skinny.
Jon Snow: So are you. I had the blacksmith make it for you special. It won't hack a man's head off, but it can poke him full of holes if you're quick enough.
Arya Stark: I can be quick.
Jon Snow: You'll have to work at it every day. How does it feel? Do you like the balance?
Arya Stark: I think so.
Jon Snow: First lesson: Stick them with the pointy end.
Arya Stark: I know which end to use.
Jon Snow: I'm going to miss you... Careful... All the best swords have names, you know.
Arya Stark: Sansa can keep her sewing needles. I've got a needle of my own.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Jon walks into Bran’s room, where Catelyn is still at his bedside.

Jon Snow: I came to say goodbye to Bran.
Catelyn Stark: You've said it.
Jon Snow: I wish I could be here when you wake up. I'm going north with Uncle Benjen. I'm taking the black. I know we always talked about seeing the Wall together, but you'll be able to come visit me at Castle Black when you're better. I'll know my way around by then. I'll be a sworn brother of the Night's Watch. We can go out walking beyond the Wall, if you're not afraid.
Catelyn Stark: I want you to leave.

Eddard walks into the room, Jon kisses Brandon on the forehead and exits.

Catelyn Stark: 17 years ago you rode off with Robert Baratheon. You came back a year later with another woman's son. And now you're leaving again.
Eddard Stark: I have no choice.
Catelyn Stark: That's what men always say when honor calls. That's what you tell your families, tell yourselves. You do have a choice. And you've made it. I can't do it, Ned. I really can't.
Eddard Stark: You can. You must.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the courtyard, Jon prepping his horse to leave for the Wall.

Robb Stark: You've said goodbye to Bran? He's not going to die. I know it.
Jon Snow: You Starks are hard to kill.
Robb Stark: My mother?
Jon Snow: She was very kind.
Robb Stark: Good. Next time I see you, you'll be all in black.
Jon Snow: It was always my color.
Robb Stark: Farewell, Snow.
Jon Snow: And you, Stark.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
At the split between the Kingsroad and the road that will take Benjen and Jon to the Wall.

Eddard Stark: There's great honor serving in the Night's Watch. The Starks have manned the Wall for thousands of years. And you are a Stark. You might not have my name, but you have my blood.
Jon Snow: Is my mother alive? Does she know about me? Where I am, where I'm going? Does she care?
Eddard Stark: The next time we see each other, we'll talk about your mother. I promise.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Stopping for rest along the Kingsroad. Robert has a mini table set up full of wine and food.

Robert Baratheon: Gods, this is country! I've half a mind to leave them all behind and keep going.
Eddard Stark: I've half a mind to go with you.
Robert Baratheon: What do you say, just you and me on the Kingsroad, swords at our sides, a couple of tavern wenches to warm our beds tonight.
Eddard Stark: You should have asked me 20 years ago.
Robert Baratheon: There were wars to fight, women to marry... We never had the chance to be young.
Eddard Stark: I recall a few chances.
Robert Baratheon: There was that one... Oh, what was her name? That common girl of yours? Becca? With the great big tits you could bury your face in.
Eddard Stark: Bessie. She was one of yours.
Robert Baratheon: Bessie! Thank the gods for Bessie and her tits. Yours was... Aleena? No. You told me once. Meryl? Your bastard's mother?
Eddard Stark: Wylla.
Robert Baratheon: That's it. She must have been a rare wench to make Lord Eddard Stark forget his honor. You never told me what she looked like.
Eddard Stark: Nor will I.
Robert Baratheon: We were at war. None of us knew if we were gonna go back home again. You're too hard on yourself. You always have been. I swear if I weren't your King, you'd have hit me already.
Eddard Stark: The worst thing about your coronation... I'll never get to hit you again.
Robert Baratheon: Trust me, that's not the worst thing. There was a rider in the night.
Eddard Stark: Daenerys Targaryen has wed some Dothraki horselord. What of it? Should we send her a wedding gift?
Robert Baratheon: A knife perhaps, a good sharp one, and a bold man to wield it.
Eddard Stark: She's little more than a child.
Robert Baratheon: Soon enough that child will spread her legs and start breeding.
Eddard Stark: Tell me we're not speaking of this.
Robert Baratheon: Oh, it's unspeakable to you? What her father did to your family... That was unspeakable. What Rhaegar Targaryen did to your sister... the woman I loved. I'll kill every Targaryen I get my hands on.
Eddard Stark: But you can't get your hands on this one, can you?
Robert Baratheon: This Khal Drogo, it's said he has 100,000 men in his horde.
Eddard Stark: Even a million Dothraki are no threat to the realm, as long as they remain on the other side of the Narrow Sea. They have no ships, Robert.
Robert Baratheon: There are still those in the Seven Kingdoms who call me Usurper. If the Targaryen boy crosses with a Dothraki horde at his back, the scum will join him.
Eddard Stark: He will not cross. And if by chance he does, we'll throw him back into the sea.
Robert Baratheon: There's a war coming, Ned. I don't know when, I don't know who we'll be fighting, but it's coming.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Back across the sea, Drogo fornicates with Daenerys, she’s clearly not enjoying it.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
On their way to the Wall, stopping to set up camp for the night.

Benjen Stark: Sit. You'll be fed. Untie them.
Tyrion Lannister: Rapers. They were given a choice no doubt... Castration or the Wall. Most choose the knife. Not impressed by your new brothers? Lovely thing about the Watch... You discard your old family and get a whole new one.
Jon Snow: Why do you read so much?
Tyrion Lannister: Look at me and tell me what you see.
Jon Snow: Is this a trick?
Tyrion Lannister: What you see is a dwarf. If I'd been born a peasant they might've left me out in the woods to die. Alas, I was born a Lannister of Casterly Rock. Things are expected of me. My father was the Hand of the King for 20 years.
Jon Snow: Until your brother killed that King.
Tyrion Lannister: Yes, until my brother killed him. Life is full of these little ironies. My sister married the new King and my repulsive nephew will be King after him. I must do my part for the honor of my house, wouldn't you agree? But how? Well, my brother has his sword and I have my mind. And a mind needs books like a sword needs a whetstone. That's why I read so much. And you? What's your story, bastard?
Jon Snow: Ask me nicely and maybe I'll tell you, dwarf.
Tyrion Lannister: A bastard boy with nothing to inherit, off to join the ancient order of the Night's Watch, alongside his valiant brothers-in-arms.
Jon Snow: The Night's Watch protects the realm from...
Tyrion Lannister: Yes yes, against grumpkins and snarks and all the other monsters your wet nurse warned you about. You're a smart boy. You don't believe that nonsense... Everything's better with some wine in the belly.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Bran’s bedroom, Catelyn still at his bedside, Maester Luwin walks in.

Maester Luwin: It's time we reviewed the accounts, my lady. You'll want to know how much this royal visit has cost us.
Catelyn Stark: Talk to Poole about it.
Maester Luwin: Poole went south with Lord Stark, my lady. We need a new steward, and there are several other appointments that require our immediate attention...
Catelyn Stark: I don't care about appointments!
Robb Stark: I'll make the appointments. We'll talk about it first thing in the morning.
Maester Luwin: Very good, my Lord. My Lady.
Robb Stark: When was the last time you left this room?
Catelyn Stark: I have to take care of him.
Robb Stark: He's not going to die, mother. Maester Luwin says the most dangerous time has passed.
Catelyn Stark: What if he's wrong? Bran needs me.
Robb Stark: Rickon needs you. He's six. He doesn't know what's happening. He follows me around all day, clutching my leg, crying...
Catelyn Stark: Close the windows! I can't stand it! Please make them stop! (Wolf’s howling repeatedly)
Robb Stark: Fire. You stay here. I'll come back.

Assassin: You're not supposed to be here. No one is supposed to be here. It's a mercy. He's dead already.
Catelyn Stark: No!

The man is an assassin, when he draws his blade, Catelyn begins to fend him off. In the process her hands are both sliced. The man walks within inches of Bran and his direwolf comes in and mauls the assassin.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
In Daenerys’ tent across the Narrow Sea.

Daenerys Targaryen: Have you ever seen a dragon?
Irri: Dragon gone, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: Everywhere? Even in the east?
Irri: No dragon. Brave men kill them. It is known.
Jhiqui: It is known.
Doreah: A trader from Garth told me that dragons come from the moon.
Daenerys Targaryen: The moon?
Doreah: He told me the moon was an egg, Khaleesi, that once there were two moons in the sky. But one wandered too close to the sun and it cracked from the heat. Out of it poured a thousand thousand dragons and they drank the sun's fire.
Irri: Moon is no egg. Moon is goddess... wife of sun. It is known.
Jhiqui: It is known.
Daenerys Targaryen: Leave me with her. Why did the trader from Garth tell you these stories?

Irri leaves the tent.

Doreah: Men like to talk when they're happy. Before your brother bought me for you, it was my job to make men happy.
Daenerys Targaryen: How old were you?
Doreah: I was nine when my mother sold me to the pleasure house.
Daenerys Targaryen: Nine?!
Doreah: I did not touch a man for three years, Khaleesi. First you must learn.
Daenerys Targaryen: Can you teach me how to make the Khal happy?
Doreah: Yes.
Daenerys Targaryen: Will it take three years?
Doreah: No.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Jon, Tyrion, Benjen and company arrive at the wall and look at it from afar.

Benjen Stark: Welcome.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Catelyn is on the ground where Bran’s body was discovered, below the tower he fell from. She looks up and sees the window. She now is looking through that same window where Bran fell. She investigates the room, noticing a cleared patch on some flooring, finding a long blonde hair.

Catelyn holds council in the Godswood with Robb, Theon Greyjoy, Rodrick and Maester Luwin.

Catelyn Stark: What I am about to tell you must remain between us. I don't think Bran fell from that tower. I think he was thrown.
Maester Luwin: The boy was always sure-footed before.
Catelyn Stark: Someone tried to kill him twice. Why? Why murder an innocent child? Unless he saw something he wasn't meant to see.
Theon Greyjoy: Saw what, my lady?
Catelyn Stark: I don't know. But I would stake my life the Lannisters are involved. We already have reason to suspect their loyalty to the crown.
Rodrick Cassel: Did you notice the dagger the killer used? It's too fine a weapon for such a man. The blade is Valyrian steel, the handle dragonbone. Someone gave it to him.
Robb Stark: They come into our home and try to murder my brother? If it's war they want...
Theon Greyjoy: If it comes to that, you know I'll stand behind you.
Maester Luwin: What, is there going to be a battle in the Godswood? Too easily words of war become acts of war. We don't know the truth yet. Lord Stark must be told of this.
Catelyn Stark: I don't trust a raven to carry these words.
Robb Stark: I'll ride to King's Landing.
Catelyn Stark: No. There must always be a Stark in Winterfell. I will go myself.
Robb Stark: Mother, you can't.
Catelyn Stark: I must.
Rodrick Cassel: I'll send Hal with a squad of guardsmen to escort you.
Catelyn Stark: Too large a party attracts unwanted attention. I don't want the Lannisters to know I'm coming.
Rodrick Cassel: Let me accompany you at least. The Kingsroad can be a dangerous place for a woman alone.
Robb Stark: What about Bran?
Catelyn Stark: I have prayed to the Seven for more than a month. Bran's life is in their hands now.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Back at Daenerys’ tent, Doreah is on top of her, “teaching” Daenerys how to please Khal Drogo.

Doreah: No, Khaleesi. You must look in his eyes always. Love comes in at the eyes. It is said that Irogenia of Lys could finish a man with nothing but her eyes.
Daenerys Targaryen: Finish a man?
Doreah: Kings traveled across the world for a night with Irogenia. Magisters sold their palaces. Khals burned her enemies just to have her for a few hours. They say a thousand men proposed to her and she refused them all.
Daenerys Targaryen: Well, she sounds like an interesting woman. I don't think that Drogo will like it with me on top.
Doreah: You will make him like it, Khaleesi. Men want what they've never had. And the Dothraki take slaves like a hound takes a bitch. Are you a slave, Khaleesi? Then don't make love like a slave. Very good, Khaleesi. Out there he is the mighty Khal, but in this tent, he belongs to you.
Daenerys Targaryen: I don't think that this is the Dothraki way.
Doreah: If he wanted the Dothraki way, why did he marry you?
Daenerys Targaryen: No. No. Tonight I would look upon your face.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
The Lannisters, traveling Starks and all royal guards have stopped for the evening to rest on their way to King’s Landing.

Sansa Stark: Pardon me, Ser.
Sandor Clegane: Do I frighten you so much, girl? Or is it him there making you shake? He frightens me too. Look at that face.
Sansa Stark: I'm sorry if I offended you, Ser. Why won't he speak to me?
Sandor Clegane: He hasn't been very talkative these last 20 years. Since the mad King had his tongue ripped out with hot pincers.
Joffrey Baratheon: He speaks damn well with his sword though. Ser Ilyn Payne, the King's justice. The royal executioner. What is it, sweet lady? Does the hound frighten you? Away with you, dog. You're scaring my lady. I don't like to see you upset. The sun is finally shining. Come walk with me.
Sansa Stark: Stay, Lady. I probably shouldn't have any more. Father only lets us have one cup at feasts.
Joffrey Baratheon: My princess can drink as much as she wants. Don't worry... You're safe with me.

In a field next to a river, off from where everyone else is.

Mycah: I'll get you!
Sansa Stark: Arya!
Arya Stark: What are you doing here? Go away.
Joffrey Baratheon: Your sister? And who are you, boy?
Mycah: Mycah, my Lord.
Sansa Stark: He the butcher's boy.
Arya Stark: He's my friend.
Joffrey Baratheon: A butcher's boy who wants to be a Knight, eh? Pick up your sword, butcher's boy. Let's see how good you are.
Mycah: She asked me to, my Lord. She asked me to.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm your prince, not your lord, and I said pick up your sword.
Mycah: It's not a sword, my prince. It's only a stick.
Joffrey Baratheon: And you're not a Knight. Only a butcher's boy. That was my lady's sister you were hitting, do you know that?
Arya Stark: Stop it!
Sansa Stark: Arya, stay out of this.
Joffrey Baratheon: I won't hurt him... Much. Filthy little bitch!
Sansa Stark: No no, stop it, stop it, both of you. You're spoiling it. You're spoiling everything!
Joffrey Baratheon: I'll gut you, you little cunt!
Sansa Stark: Arya!

Arya then steps in and fights with Joffrey, disarming him and putting him on his back. Her direwolf sees this as a thread and runs in to defend.

Arya Stark: Nymeria!
Joffrey Baratheon: Please don't.
Sansa Stark: Arya, leave him alone. My prince, my poor prince, look what they did to you. Stay here, I'll go back to the inn and bring help.
Joffrey Baratheon: Then go! Don't touch me.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
A hunt has begun for the direwolf that attacked Joffrey.

Soldier 1: The wolf's not here. Look down by the stream.

Arya hidden from everyone telling her direwolf to leave.

Arya Stark: You've got to go. They'll kill you for what you did to Joffrey. Go on... run. Go! Leave now!

Soldier 2: It's a direwolf.
Soldier 1: I'll check down here.
Soldier 2: I think I heard a noise.

Arya Stark: Go!

Jory comes to tell Ned that his daughter has been found.

Jory Cassel: My lord! My lord! They found her. She's unharmed.
Eddard Stark: Where is she?
Jory Cassel: She's been taken directly before the King.
Eddard Stark: Who took her?
Jory Cassel: The Lannisters found her.
Eddard Stark: Right, get back.
Jory Cassel: The Queen ordered them to bring her straight to him.
Eddard Stark: Back! Back to the inn. All back!

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Now back at the Inn where everyone is staying.

Arya Stark: I'm sorry.
Eddard Stark: Are you hurt?
Arya Stark: No.
Eddard Stark: It's all right. What is the meaning of this? Why was my daughter not brought to me at once?
Cersei Baratheon: How dare you speak to your King in that manner?
Robert Baratheon: Quiet, woman. Sorry, Ned. I never meant to frighten the girl. But we need to get this business done quickly.
Cersei Baratheon: Your girl and that butcher's boy attacked my son. That animal of hers nearly tore his arm off.
Arya Stark: That's not true! She just... Bit him a little. He was hurting Mycah.
Cersei Baratheon: Joffrey told us what happened. You and that boy beat him with clubs while you set your wolf on him.
Arya Stark: That's not what happened!
Joffrey Baratheon: Yes it is! They all attacked me and she threw my sword in the river.
Arya Stark: Liar!
Joffrey Baratheon: Shut up!
Robert Baratheon: Enough! He tells me one thing, she tells me another. Seven hells! What am I to make of this? Where's your other daughter, Ned?
Eddard Stark: In bed asleep.
Cersei Baratheon: She's not. Sansa, come here, darling.
Robert Baratheon: Now, child... Tell me what happened. Tell it all and tell it true. It's a great crime to lie to a King.
Sansa Stark: I don't know. I don't remember. Everything happened so fast. I didn't see.
Arya Stark: Liar! Liar liar liar!
Sansa Stark: Arya!
Eddard Stark: Stop it! That's enough of that.
Arya Stark: Liar liar liar!
Eddard Stark: Stop! Arya!
Cersei Baratheon: She's as wild as that animal of hers. I want her punished.
Robert Baratheon: What would you have me do, whip her through the streets? Damn it, children fight. It's over.
Cersei Baratheon: Joffrey will bear these scars for the rest of his life.
Robert Baratheon: You let that little girl disarm you? See to it that your daughter is disciplined. I'll do the same with my son.
Eddard Stark: Gladly, your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: And what of the direwolf? What of the beast that savaged your son?
Robert Baratheon: I'd forgot the damned wolf.
Soldier: We found no trace of the direwolf, your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: So be it.
Cersei Baratheon: We have another wolf.
Robert Baratheon: As you will.
Eddard Stark: You can't mean it.
Robert Baratheon: A direwolf's no pet. Get her a dog. She'll be happier for it.
Sansa Stark: He doesn't mean Lady, does he? No no, not Lady! Lady didn't bite anyone! She's good!
Arya Stark: Lady wasn't there! You leave her alone!
Sansa Stark: Stop them. Don't let them do it. Please! It wasn't Lady!
Eddard Stark: s this your command... your Grace?
Cersei Baratheon: Where is the beast?
Soldier: Chained up outside, your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: Ser Ilyn, do me the honor.
Eddard Stark: No. Jory... Take the girls to their rooms. If it must be done, then I'll do it myself.
Cersei Baratheon: Is this some trick?
Eddard Stark: The wolf is of the north. She deserves better than a butcher.

Once outside, before Eddard lays to rest the direwolf.

Eddard Stark: The butcher's boy... You rode him down?
Sandor Clegane: He ran... Not very fast.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
2
Lord Snow
Game of Thrones
Featuring Brian Kirk
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 1 Scripts
LORD SNOW
The King, Eddard and the rest of the posse have arrived at King’s Landing.

King’s Landing Guard: Welcome, Lord Stark. Grand Maester Pycelle has called a meeting of the Small Council. The honor of your presence is requested.
Eddard Stark: Get the girls settled in. I'll be back in time for supper. And, Jory, you go with them.
Jory Cassel: Yes, my Lord.
King’s Landing Guard: If you'd like to change into something more appropriate…
Ned Stark gives the guard a blank stare before taking off his gloves, the guard realizes Ned’s disinterest and the two begin walking to the council chamber. First they walk through the Great Hall, where the throne sits. Jaime Lannister is lingering in front of the throne.

Jaime Lannister: Thank the gods you're here, Stark. About time we had some stern northern leadership.
Eddard Stark: Glad to see you're protecting the throne.
Jaime Lannister: Sturdy old thing. How many kings' asses have polished it, I wonder? What's the line? The King shits and the Hand wipes.
Eddard Stark: Very handsome armor. Not a scratch on it.
Jaime Lannister: I know. People have been swinging at me for years, but they always seem to miss.
Eddard Stark: You've chosen your opponents wisely then.
Jaime Lannister: I have a knack for it. It must be strange for you coming into this room. I was standing right here when it happened. He was very brave, your brother. Your father too. They didn't deserve to die like that. Nobody deserves to die like that.
Eddard Stark: But you just stood there and watched.
Jaime Lannister: 500 men just stood there and watched. All the great knights of the Seven Kingdoms. You think anyone said a word, lifted a finger? No, Lord Stark. 500 men and this room was silent as a crypt. Except for the screams, of course, and the Mad King laughing. And later... When I watched the Mad King die, I remembered him laughing as your father burned... It felt like justice.
Eddard Stark: Is that what you tell yourself at night? You're a servant of justice? That you were avenging my father when you shoved your sword in Aerys Targaryen's back?
Jaime Lannister: Tell me... If I'd stabbed the Mad King in the belly instead of the back, would you admire me more?
Eddard Stark: You served him well, when serving was safe.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Ned enters the small council’s chamber where the others are already awaiting him.

Varys: Lord Stark.
Eddard Stark: Lord Varys.
Varys: I was grievously sorry to hear of your troubles on the Kingsroad. We are all praying for Prince Joffrey's full recovery.
Eddard Stark: A shame you didn't say a prayer for the butcher's son. Renly! You're looking well.
Renly Baratheon: And you look tired from the road. I told them this meeting could wait another day, but...
Petyr Baelish: But we have a Kingdom to look after. I've hoped to meet you for some time, Lord Stark. No doubt Lady Catelyn has mentioned me.
Eddard Stark: She has, Lord Baelish. I understand you knew my brother Brandon as well.
Petyr Baelish: All too well. I still carry a token of his esteem from navel to collarbone.
Eddard Stark: Perhaps you chose the wrong man to duel with.
Petyr Baelish: It wasn't the man that I chose, my Lord. It was Catelyn Tully. A woman worth fighting for, I'm sure you'll agree.
Grand Maester Pycelle: I humbly beg your pardon, my Lord Stark.
Eddard Stark: Grand Maester.
Grand Maester Pycelle: How many years has it been? You were a young man.
Eddard Stark: And you served another King.
Grand Maester Pycelle: How forgetful of me. This belongs to you, now. Should we begin?
Eddard Stark: Without the King?
Renly Baratheon: Winter may be coming, but I'm afraid the same cannot be said for my brother.
Varys: His Grace has many cares. He entrusts some small matters to us that we might lighten the load.
Petyr Baelish: We are the lords of small matters here.
Renly Baratheon: My brother instructs us to stage a tournament in honor of Lord Stark's appointment as Hand of the King.
Petyr Baelish: Mmm, how much?
Eddard Stark: 40,000 gold dragons to the champion, 20,000 to the runner-up, 20,000 to the winning archer.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Can the treasury bear such expense?
Petyr Baelish: I'll have to borrow it. The Lannisters will accommodate, I expect. We already owe Lord Tywin 3 million gold. What's another 80,000?
Eddard Stark: Are you telling me the Crown is three million in debt?
Petyr Baelish: I'm telling you the Crown is six million in debt.
Eddard Stark: How could you let this happen?
Petyr Baelish: The Master of Coin finds the money. The King and the Hand spend it.
Eddard Stark: I will not believe Jon Arryn allowed Robert to bankrupt the realm.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Lord Arryn gave wise and prudent advice, but I fear His Grace doesn't always listen.
Renly Baratheon: "Counting coppers," he calls it.
Eddard Stark: I'll speak to him tomorrow. This tournament is an extravagance we cannot afford.
Petyr Baelish: As you will. But still, we'd best make our plans.
Eddard Stark: There will be no plans until I speak to Robert. Forgive me, my Lords. I had a long ride.
Varys: You are the King's Hand, Lord Stark, we serve at your pleasure.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Cersei tending to Joffrey’s “wound”.

Cersei Baratheon: Please, it's nearly healed.
Joffrey Baratheon: It's ugly.
Cersei Baratheon: A King should have scars, you fought off a direwolf. You're a warrior like your father.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm not like him. I didn't fight off anything. It bit me and all I did was scream. And the two Stark girls saw it, both of them.
Cersei Baratheon: That's not true. You killed the beast. You only spared the girl because of the love your father bears her father. When Aerys Targaryen sat on the Iron Throne, your father was a rebel and a traitor. Someday you'll sit on the throne and the truth will be what you make it.
Joffrey Baratheon: Do I have to marry her?
Cersei Baratheon: Yes. She's very beautiful and young. If you don't like her, you only need to see her on formal occasions and when the time comes, to make little princes and princesses. And if you'd rather fuck painted whores, you'll fuck painted whores. And if you'd rather lie with noble virgins, so be it. You are my darling boy and the world will be exactly as you want it to be. Do something nice for the Stark girl.
Joffrey Baratheon: I don't want to.
Cersei Baratheon: No, but you will. The occasional kindness will spare you all sorts of trouble down the road.
Joffrey Baratheon: We allow the northerners too much power. They consider themselves our equals.
Cersei Baratheon: How would you handle them?
Joffrey Baratheon: I'd double their taxes and command them to supply 10,000 men to the royal army.
Cersei Baratheon: A royal army?
Joffrey Baratheon: Why should every lord command his own men? It's primitive, no better than the hill tribes. We should have a standing army of men loyal to the Crown, trained by experienced soldiers... Instead of a mob of peasants who've never held pikes in their lives.
Cersei Baratheon: And if the northerners rebel?
Joffrey Baratheon: I'd crush them. Seize Winterfell and install someone loyal to the realm as Warden of the North. Uncle Kevan, maybe.
Cersei Baratheon: And these 10,000 northern troops, would they fight for you or their lord?
Joffrey Baratheon: For me. I'm their King.
Cersei Baratheon: But you've just invaded their homeland, asked them to kill their brothers.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm not asking.
Cersei Baratheon: The North cannot be held... not by an outsider. It's too big and too wild. When the winter comes, the Seven gods together couldn't save you and your royal army. A good King knows when to save his strength... And when to destroy his enemies.
Joffrey Baratheon: So you agree... The Starks are enemies?
Cersei Baratheon: Everyone who isn't us is an enemy.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Arya, Sansa and their Septa are all around a table eating. Arya is stabbing a knife into the table between her fingers.

Septa Mordane: Enough of that, young lady. Eat your food.
Arya Stark: I'm practicing.
Sansa Stark: Practicing for what?
Arya Stark: The Prince.
Septa Mordane: Arya, stop!
Arya Stark: He's a liar and a coward and he killed my friend.
Sansa Stark: The Hound killed your friend.
Arya Stark: The Hound does whatever the Prince tells him to do.
Sansa Stark: You're an idiot.
Arya Stark: You're a liar. And if you told the truth, Mycah would be alive.
Septa Mordane: Enough!

Septa Mordane begins escorting Arya away from the table as Ned walks in.

Eddard Stark: What's happening here?
Septa Mordane: Arya would rather act like a beast than a lady.
Eddard Stark: Go to your room. We'll speak later. That's for you, love…

Ned places a wrapped package in front of Sansa on the table.

Eddard Stark: The same dollmaker makes all of Princess Myrcella's toys. Don't you like it?
Sansa Stark: I haven't played with dolls since I was eight. May I be excused?
Septa Mordane: You've barely eaten a thing.
Eddard Stark: It's all right. Go on.

Sansa gets up from the table, leaving only Ned and Septa Mordane.

Eddard Stark: War was easier than daughters.

Arya is unsheathing Needle privately in her room as Ned knocks on the door.

Arya Stark: Go away!
Eddard Stark: Arya, open the door. May I come in? Whose sword is that?
Arya Stark: Mine.
Eddard Stark: Give it to me. I know this maker's mark. This is Mikken's work. Where did you get this? This is no toy. Little ladies shouldn't play with swords.
Arya Stark: I wasn't playing. And I don't want to be a lady.
Eddard Stark: Come here. Now what do you want with this?
Arya Stark: It's called Needle.
Eddard Stark: A blade with a name. And who were you hoping to skewer with Needle? Your sister? Do you know the first thing about sword fighting?
Arya Stark: Stick 'em with the pointy end.
Eddard Stark: [laughs] That's the essence of it.
Arya Stark: I was trying to learn. I asked Mycah to practice with me. I asked him. It was my fault.
Eddard Stark: No, sweet girl. You didn't kill the butcher's boy.
Arya Stark: I hate them! I hate all of them. The Hound, the Queen and the King and Joffrey and Sansa.
Eddard Stark: Sansa was dragged before the King and Queen... And asked to call the Prince a liar.
Arya Stark: So was I! He is a liar.
Eddard Stark: Darling, listen to me. Sansa will be married to Joffrey someday. She cannot betray him. She must take his side even when he's wrong.
Arya Stark: But how you can let her marry someone like that?
Eddard Stark: Well… Look at me. You're a Stark of Winterfell. You know our words.
Arya Stark: Winter is coming.
Eddard Stark: You were born in the long summer. You've never known anything else. But now winter is truly coming. And in the winter, we must protect ourselves, look after one another. Sansa is your sister.
Arya Stark: I don't hate her. Not really.
Eddard Stark: I don't want to frighten you, but I won't lie to you either. We've come to a dangerous place. We cannot fight a war amongst ourselves. All right? Go on. It's yours.
Arya Stark: I can keep it?
Eddard Stark: Try not to stab your sister with it. If you're going to own a sword, you'd better know how to use it.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Bran’s bedside in Winterfell. A crow lands on his windowsill.

Old Nan: Don't listen to it. Crows are all liars. I know a story about a crow.
Bran Stark: I hate your stories.
Old Nan: I know a story about a boy who hated stories. I could tell you about Ser Duncan the Tall. Those were always your favorites.
Bran Stark: Those weren't my favorites. My favorites were the scary ones.
Old Nan: Oh, my sweet summer child. What do you know about fear? Fear is for the winter, when the snows fall a hundred feet deep. Fear is for the long night, when the sun hides for years and children are born and live and die all in darkness. That is the time for fear, my little Lord, when the White Walkers move through the woods. Thousands of years ago there came a night that lasted a generation. Kings froze to death in their castles, same as the shepherds in their huts. And women smothered their babies rather than see them starve, and wept and felt the tears freeze on their cheeks. So is this the sort of story that you like? In that darkness, the White Walkers came for the first time. They swept through cities and kingdoms, riding their dead horses, hunting with their packs of pale spiders big as hounds…

Robb walks into the room, interrupting Old Nan’s story.

Robb Stark: What are you telling him now?
Old Nan: Only what the little Lord wants to hear.
Robb Stark: Get your supper. I want some time with him. One time she told me the sky is blue because we live inside the eye of a blue-eyed giant named Macomber.
Bran Stark: Maybe we do.
Robb Stark: How do you feel? You still don't remember anything? I've seen you climb a thousand times. In the wind, in the rain... A thousand times. You never fall.
Bran Stark: I did though. It's true, isn't it... what Maester Luwin says about my legs? I'd rather be dead.
Robb Stark: Don't ever say that.
Bran Stark: I'd rather be dead.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Catelyn and Rodrick arrive at King’s Landing, entering through a back entrance.

Rodrick Cassel: Fewer eyes back here, my Lady. But still too many.
Catelyn Stark: It's nine years since I've set foot in the capital. And no one knew who I was the last time I came either.
Rodrick Cassel: My Lady.

Two guards pull up to her on horseback and hand her a scroll, informing her that she is to follow them.

Guard: Welcome to King's Landing, Lady Stark. Would you mind following us?
Catelyn Stark: I would. We've done nothing wrong.
Guard: We've been instructed to escort you into the city.
Catelyn Stark: Instructed? I don't know who's providing your instructions, but...
Guard: Follow me, Lady Stark.

At Baelish’s brothel.

Petyr Baelish: Cat! Go on. Go upstairs. (to his whores)
Catelyn Stark: You little worm! You take me for some back-alley Sally you can drag into a…

Two naked whores interrupt, Baelish snaps at them to leave.

Petyr Baelish: I meant no disrespect to you of all people.
Catelyn Stark: How dare you bring me here! Have you lost your mind?
Petyr Baelish: No one will come looking for you here. Isn't that what like you wanted? I'm truly sorry... about the locale.
Catelyn Stark: How did you know I was coming to King's Landing?
Petyr Baelish: A dear friend told me.
Varys: Lady Stark.
Catelyn Stark: Lord Varys.
Varys: To see you again after so many years is a blessing. Your poor hands.
Catelyn Stark: How did you know I was coming?
Varys: Knowledge is my trade, my Lady. Did you bring the dagger with you, by any chance? My little birds are everywhere. Even in the north. They whisper to me the strangest stories. Valyrian steel.
Catelyn Stark: Do you know whose dagger this is?
Varys: I must admit I do not.
Petyr Baelish: Well well, this is an historic day. Something you don't know that I do. There's only one dagger like this in all of the Seven Kingdoms. It's mine.
Catelyn Stark: Yours?
Petyr Baelish: At least it was, until the tournament on Prince Joffrey's last nameday. I bet on Ser Jaime in the jousting, as any sane man would. When the Knight of the Flowers unseated him, I lost this dagger.
Catelyn Stark: To whom?
Petyr Baelish: Tyrion Lannister. The Imp.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At Castle Black, in a courtyard. Grenn and Jon are swordfighting, Jon getting the best of him and breaking his nose.

Alliser Thorne: If that were a real sword, you'd be dead. Lord Snow here grew up in a castle spitting down on the likes of you. Pyp. Do you think Ned Stark's bastard bleeds like the rest of us?

Pyp steps forward and with one move Jon has him on his back.

Alliser Thorne: Next!

Jon quickly dispatches of another newcomer, we see Lord Commander Jeor and Tyrion looking on from a balcony.

Alliser Thorne: Next!

Another man starts againt Jon Snow, as another joins, Jon defeats the two of them almost instantly.

Alliser Thorne: Lord Snow, it appears you're the least useless person here. Go clean yourselves up. There's only so much I can stomach in a day.

Tyrion and Lord Commander talking, overlooking the courtyard.

Tyrion Lannister: A charming man.
Jeor Mormont: I don't need him to be charming. I need him to turn this bunch of thieves and runaways into men of the Night's Watch.
Tyrion Lannister: And how's that going, Commander Mormont?
Jeor Mormont: Slowly. A raven came for Ned Stark's son.
Tyrion Lannister: Good news or bad?
Jeor Mormont: Both.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back in the throne room, just outside of the small council chambers.

Grand Maester Pycelle: Lord Stark. I meant to give you this earlier. So forgetful these days. A raven from Winterfell this morning.
Petyr Baelish: Good news? Perhaps you'd like to share it with your wife?
Eddard Stark: My wife is in Winterfell.
Petyr Baelish: Is she?

Baelish leads Ned to the entrance of his brothel. Ned is not so keen on the idea and begins choking Baelish.

Petyr Baelish: I thought that she'd be safest in here. One of several such establishments I own.
Eddard Stark: You're a funny man. A very funny man.
Catelyn Stark: Ned! [poking her head out of a window]
Petyr Baelish: The Starks... Quick tempers, slow minds.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Jon is in the armory of Castle Black, putting away equipment when a gang of the guys jump him.

Grenn: You broke my nose, bastard!
Jon Snow: It's an improvement.
Grenn: If we threw you over the Wall, wonder how long it'd take you to hit.
Pyp: I wonder if they'd find you before the wolves did.
Grenn: What're you looking at, halfman?
Tyrion Lannister: I'm looking at you. You've got an interesting face. Very distinctive faces. All of you.
Rast: What do you care about our faces?
Tyrion Lannister: It's just I think they would look marvelous decorating spikes in King's Landing. Perhaps I'll write my sister, the Queen, about it.
Grenn: We'll talk later, Lord Snow.
Jon Snow: Everybody knew what this place was and no one told me. No one but you. My father knew and left me to rot here at the Wall all the same.
Tyrion Lannister: Grenn's father left him too... Outside a farmhouse when he was three. Pyp was caught stealing a wheel of cheese. His little sister hadn't eaten in three days. He was given a choice: his right hand or the Wall. I've been asking the Lord Commander about them. Fascinating stories.
Jon Snow: They hate me because I'm better than they are.
Tyrion Lannister: It's a lucky thing none of them were trained by a master-at-arms like your Ser Rodrik. I don't imagine any of them have ever held a real sword before they came here. Your brother Bran. He's woken up.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At Baelish’s brothel.

Petyr Baelish: The mere suggestion that the Queen's brother tried to kill your boy would be considered treason.
Catelyn Stark: We have proof. We have the blade.
Petyr Baelish: Which Lord Tyrion will say was stolen from him. The only man who could say otherwise has no throat, thanks to your boy's wolf.
Catelyn Stark: Petyr has promised to help us find the truth. He's like a little brother to me. He would never betray my trust.
Petyr Baelish: I'll try to keep you alive, for her sake. A fool's task, admittedly, but I've never been able to refuse your wife anything.
Catelyn Stark: I won't forget this. You're a true friend.
Petyr Baelish: Don't tell anyone. I have a reputation to maintain.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the Queen’s chambers.

Cersei Baratheon: How could you be so stupid?
Jaime Lannister: Calm down.
Cersei Baratheon: He's a child... 10 years old. What were you thinking?
Jaime Lannister: I was thinking of us. You're a bit late to start complaining about it now. What has the boy told them?
Cersei Baratheon: Nothing. He's said nothing. He remembers nothing.
Jaime Lannister: Then what are you raving about?
Cersei Baratheon: What if it comes back to him? If he tells his father what he saw...
Jaime Lannister: We'll say he was lying. We'll say he was dreaming. We'll say whatever we like. I think we can outfox a 10-year-old.
Cersei Baratheon: And my husband?
Jaime Lannister: I'll go to war with him if I have to. They can write a ballad about us : "The War for Cersei's Cunt."

Cersei hits Jaime, he spins her around and hugs her from behind, whispering into her ear.

Cersei Baratheon: Let me go.
Jaime Lannister: Never.
Cersei Baratheon: Let me go.
Jaime Lannister: The boy won't talk. And if he does, I'll kill him. Him, Ned Stark, the King... the whole bloody lot of them, until you and I are the only people left in this world.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In a back alley before Catelyn leaves King’s Landing.

Catelyn Stark: I wish I could see the girls.
Eddard Stark: It's too dangerous.
Catelyn Stark: Just for a moment.
Eddard Stark: Until we know who our enemies are...
Catelyn Stark: I know they did it, Ned. The Lannisters. In my bones, I know it.
Eddard Stark: Littlefinger's right. I can't do anything without proof.
Cersei Baratheon: And if you find the proof?
Eddard Stark: Then I bring it to Robert... And hope he's still the man I once knew. You watch yourself on the road, huh? That temper of yours is a dangerous thing.
Catelyn Stark: My temper? Gods be good, you nearly killed poor Littlefinger yesterday.
Eddard Stark: He still loves you.
Catelyn Stark: Does he?
Eddard Stark: Off with you.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the King’s chambers, he’s drinking and eating at a table.

Robert Baratheon: It's been a long time. But I still remember every face. You remember your first?
Barristan Selmy: Of course, your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: Who was it?
Barristan Selmy: A Tyroshi. Never learned the name.
Robert Baratheon: How'd you do it?
Barristan Selmy: Lance through the heart.
Robert Baratheon: Quick one. Lucky for you. Mine was some Tarly boy at the Battle of Summerhall. My horse took an arrow so I was on foot, slogging through the mud. He came running at me, this dumb high-born lad, thinking he could end the rebellion with the single swing of his sword. I knocked him down with the hammer. Gods, I was strong then. Caved in his breastplate. Probably shattered every rib he had. Stood over him, hammer in the air. Right before I brought it down he shouted, "Wait! Wait!"... They never tell you how they all shit themselves. They don't put that part in the songs. Stupid boy. Now the Tarlys bend the knee like everyone else. He could have lingered on the edge of the battle with the smart boys and today his wife would be making him miserable, his sons would be ingrates, and he'd be waking three times in the night to piss into a bowl. Wine! Lancel. Gods, what a stupid name. Lancel Lannister. Who named you? Some halfwit with a stutter? What are you doing?
Lancel Lannister: It's empty, your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: What do you mean it's empty?
Lancel Lannister: There's no more wine.
Robert Baratheon: Is that what empty means?! So get more. Tell your cousin to get in here. Kingslayer! Get in here. Surrounded by Lannisters. Every time I close my eyes I see their blond hair and their smug, satisfied faces. It must wound your pride, huh? Standing out there like a glorified sentry. Jaime Lannister, son of the mighty Tywin... Forced to mind the door while your King eats and drinks and shits and fucks. So come on. We're telling war stories. Who was your first kill, not counting old men?
Jaime Lannister: One of the outlaws in the Brotherhood.
Barristan Selmy: I was there that day. You were only a squire, 16 years old.
Jaime Lannister: You killed Simon Toyne with a counter riposte. Best move I ever saw.
Barristan Selmy: A good fighter, Toyne, but he lacked stamina.
Robert Baratheon: Your outlaw... Any last words?
Jaime Lannister: I cut his head off, so no.
Robert Baratheon: What about Aerys Targaryen? What did the Mad King say when you stabbed him in the back? I never asked. Did he call you a traitor? Did he plead for a reprieve?
Jaime Lannister: He said the same thing he'd been saying for hours... "Burn them all." If that's all, your Grace...

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Riding horseback and walking through fields.

Daenerys Targaryen: : Do the Dothrakis buy their slaves?
Jorah Mormont: The Dothraki don't believe in money. Most of their slaves were given to them as gifts.
Daenerys Targaryen: From whom?
Jorah Mormont: If you rule a city and you see the horde approaching, you have two choices : pay tribute or fight. An easy choice for most. Of course, sometimes it's not enough. Sometimes a Khal feels insulted by the number of slaves he's given. He might think the men too weak or the women too ugly. Sometimes a Khal decides his riders haven't had a good fight in months and need the practice.

Daenerys sees one of the Dothraki men strike a slave with a whip for not moving fast enough.

Daenerys Targaryen: Tell them all to stop.
Jorah Mormont: You want the entire horde to stop? For how long?
Daenerys Targaryen: Until I command them otherwise.
Jorah Mormont: You're learning to talk like a Queen.
Daenerys Targaryen: Not a Queen. A Khaleesi.

Daenerys dismounts her horse and walks through the field off of the path. She hears noises coming towards her and grass snapping. Her brother Viserys storms into the clearing on horseback wielding a sword.

Viserys Targaryen: You dare! You give commands to me? To me? You do not command the dragon. I am Lord of the Seven Kingdoms. I don't take orders from savages or their sluts. Do you hear me?

Viserys has his sword to Daenerys’ throat. Rakharo whips Viserys, wrapping it around his neck and yanking him to his back.

Irri: Rakharo ask if you want him dead, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: No!
Irri: Rakharo say you should take ear, to teach respect.
Daenerys Targaryen: Please please, don't hurt him. Tell him I don't want my brother harmed.
Viserys Targaryen: Kill these Dothraki dogs! I am your King!
Jorah Mormont: Shall we return to the Khalasar, Khaleesi?
Rakharo: You walk. [to Viserys]

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Jon and Benjen looking out over the wall. Benjen saying goodbye.

Benjen Stark: I wanted to be here when you saw it for the first time. I'm leaving this morning.
Jon Snow: You're leaving?
Benjen Stark: I'm the First Ranger. My job is out there. There have been disturbing reports.
Jon Snow: What kind of reports?
Benjen Stark: The kind I don't want to believe.
Jon Snow: 'm ready. I won't let you down.
Benjen Stark: You're not going. You're no ranger, Jon.
Jon Snow: But I'm better than every...
Benjen Stark: Better than no one! Here... A man gets what he earns, when he earns it. We'll speak when I return.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Yoren and Tyrion getting drunk on wine in a the mess hall of Castle Black.

Yoren: A bear's balls.
Tyrion Lannister: You're joking?
Yoren: And his brains and his guts, his lungs and his heart all fried in his own fat. When you're a hundred miles north of the Wall and you ate your last meal a week ago, you leave nothing for the wolves.
Tyrion Lannister: And how do a bear's balls taste?
Yoren: A bit chewy. And what about you, my Lord? What's the strangest thing you've eaten?
Tyrion Lannister: Do Dornish girls count? So you roam the Seven Kingdoms, collaring pickpockets and horse thieves and bringing them here as eager recruits?
Yoren: But it's not all of 'em's done bad things. Some of 'em's just poor lads looking for steady feed. Some of 'em's high-born lads looking for glory.
Tyrion Lannister: They have a better chance finding feed than glory.

Benjen enters.

Benjen Stark: The Night's Watch is a joke to you, is it? Is that what we are, Lannister? An army of jesters in black?
Tyrion Lannister: You don't have enough men to be an army and aside from Yoren here, none of you are particularly funny.
Benjen Stark: I hope we've provided you with some good stories to tell when you're back in King's Landing. But something to think about while you're drinking your wine down there, enjoying your brothels... Half the boys you've seen training will die north of the Wall. Might be a wilding's axe that gets them, might be sickness, might just be the cold. They die in pain. And they do it so plump little lords like you can enjoy their summer afternoons in peace and comfort.
Tyrion Lannister: Do you think I'm plump? Listen, Benjen... May I call you Benjen?
Benjen Stark: Call me what you like.
Tyrion Lannister: I'm not sure what I've done to offend you. I have great admiration for the Night's Watch. I've great admiration for you as First Ranger.
Benjen Stark: You know, my brother once told me that nothing someone says before the word "but" really counts.
Tyrion Lannister: But... I don't believe that giants and ghouls and White Walkers are lurking beyond the Wall. I believe that the only difference between us and the wildlings is that when the Wall went up, our ancestors happened to live on the right side of it.
Benjen Stark: You're right. The wildlings are no different from us. A little rougher maybe. But they're made of meat and bone. I know how to track them and I know how to kill them. It's not the wildlings giving me sleepless nights. You've never been north of the Wall, so don't tell me what's out there.
Yoren: Are you going below? Keep well, keep warm.
Benjen Stark: Enjoy the capital, brother.
Yoren: I always do.
Tyrion Lannister: I think he's starting to like me. "Going below"?
Yoren: Into the tunnel and out the other side. He'll be north of the Wall for a month or two.
Tyrion Lannister: So you're heading down to King's Landing too.
Yoren: Day after tomorrow. I get about half of my recruits from their dungeons.
Tyrion Lannister: Let's share the road. I could use some decent company.
Yoren: I travel a bit on the grubby side, my Lord.
Tyrion Lannister: Not this time. We'll be staying at the finest castles and inns. No one turns away a Lannister.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Irri is braiding Daenerys hair and teaching her Dothraki. She feels Daenerys’ breast.

Irri: Yes, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: What are you doing?
Irri: When was last time you bleed, Khaleesi? You change, Khaleesi. It’s a blessing from the Great Stallion.

Jorah and Rakharo around a fire in a tent.

Jorah Mormont: For a man on horseback, the curved blade is a good thing, easier to handle. It's a good weapon for a Dothrakan. But a man in full plate... the arakh won't get through the steel. That's where the broadsword has the advantage. Designed for piercing plate.
Rakharo: Dothraki don’t wear steel dresses.
Jorah Mormont: Armor.
Rakharo: Armor. Armor make a man... Vroz?
Jorah Mormont: Slow.
Rakharo: Slow.
Jorah Mormont: It's true, but it also keeps a man alive.
Rakharo: My father taught me how to fight. He taught me that speed defeats size.
Jorah Mormont: I’ve heard that your father was a famous warrior.
Rakharo: He was bloodrider to Khal Bharbo. And your father, Jorah the Andal? He was a warrior also?
Jorah Mormont: He still is. A man of great honor. And I betrayed him.
Irri: The Khaleesi wants to eat something different tonight. Kill some rabbits.
Rakharo: There are no rabbits.
Irri: Find some ducks, she likes ducks.
Rakharo: Have you seen any ducks, woman? No rabbits, no ducks. Do you have eyes in your head? Do you?
Irri: Dog then. I have seen many dogs.
Jorah Mormont: I don't think she wants to eat dog.
Irri: The Khaleesi have baby inside her. It is true. She does not bleed for two moons. Her belly start to swell.
Rakharo: A blessing from the Great Stallion.
Irri: She does not want to eat horse.
Jorah Mormont: I'll have the boys butcher a goat for supper. I need to ride to Qohor.
Rhakaro: We ride for Vaes Dothrak.
Jorah Mormont: Don't worry. I'll catch you. The horde's easy to find.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back again in the courtyard of Castle Black. Jon is battling his brothers in black as Tyrion overlooks from the balcony. Jon continuing to defeat them, he begins teaching them.

Jon Snow: Don't stand so still. It's harder to hit a moving target. Except for you. You move too much. I could just hold my sword out and let you do the work for me.

Tyrion reenters the hall to speak and drink with Aemon and Lord Commander.

Maester Aemon: How many winters have you seen, Lord Tyrion?
Tyrion Lannister: Eight... no, nine.
Maester Aemon: All of them brief?
Tyrion Lannister: They say the winter of my birth was three years long, Maester Aemon.
Maester Aemon: This summer has lasted nine. But reports from the Citadel tell us the days grow shorter. The Starks are always right eventually : winter is coming. This one will be long and dark things will come with it.
Jeor Mormont: We've been capturing wildlings, more every month. They're fleeing south. The ones who flee... say they've seen the White Walkers.
Tyrion Lannister: Yes, and the fishermen of Lannisport say they see mermaids.
Jeor Mormont: One of our own rangers swore he saw them kill his companions. He swore it right up to the moment Ned Stark chopped his head off.
Maester Aemon: The Night's Watch is the only thing standing between the realm and what lies beyond. And it has become an army of undisciplined boys and tired old men. There are less than a thousand of us now. We can't man the other castles on the Wall. We can't properly patrol the wilderness. We've barely enough resources to keep our lads armed and fed.
Jeor Mormont: Your sister sits by the side the King. Tell her we need help.
Maester Aemon: When winter does come, gods help us all if we're not ready.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

The Khal and Daenerys are intertwined in their tent via candlelight. Daenerys surprises Drogo and speaks Dothraki to him.

Daenerys Targaryen: It’s a boy.
Khal Drogo: How do you know?
Daenerys Targaryen: I know.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Tyrion is pissing off of the wall, when he’s done, Jon and him converse near a fire.

Jon Snow: I'm sorry to see you leave, Lannister.
Tyrion Lannister: It's either me or this cold. And it doesn't appear to be going anywhere.
Jon Snow: Will you stop at Winterfell on your way South?
Tyrion Lannister: I expect I will. Gods know there aren't many feather beds between here and King's Landing.
Jon Snow: If you see my brother Bran, tell him I miss him. Tell him I'd visit if I could.
Tyrion Lannister: Of course.
Jon Snow: He'll never walk again.
Tyrion Lannister: If you're going to be a cripple, it's better to be a rich cripple. Take care, Snow.
Jon Snow: Farewell, My Lord.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Arya arrives to her “dance lesson” in King’s Landing.

Syrio Forel: You are late, boy. Tomorrow you will be here at midday.
Arya Stark: Who are you?
Syrio Forel: Your dancing master, Syrio Forel.

Syrio throws a wooden sword to Arya, she does not catch it, but drops it.

Syrio Forel: Tomorrow you will catch it. Now pick it up. That is not the way, boy. This is not a great sword that is needing two hands to swing it.
Arya Stark: It's too heavy.
Syrio Forel: It is heavy as it needs to be to make you strong. Just so. One hand is all that is needed. Now you are standing all wrong. Turn your body side-face. So. You are skinny. That is good. The target is smaller. Now the grip... Let me see. The grip must be delicate.
Arya Stark: What if I drop it?
Syrio Forel: The steel must be part of your arm. Can you drop part of your arm? No. Nine years Syrio Forel was first sword to the Sealord of Braavos. He knows these things. You must listen to me, boy.
Arya Stark: I'm a girl.
Syrio Forel: Boy, girl... You are a sword, that is all. That is the grip. You are not holding a battle-axe. You are holding...
Arya Stark: A needle.
Syrio Forel: Ahhh… Just so. Now we will begin the dance. Remember, child, this is not the dance of the Westeros we are learning... The knight's dance, hacking and hammering. This is the Bravo's dance... The water dance. It is swift and sudden. All men are made of water, do you know this? If you pierce them, the water leaks out and they die. Now you will try to strike me.

Arya takes several attempts as Syrio turns his back, defending her and disarming her constantly. She begins picking up on a few things, but still needs much work. Ned enters in the doorway and his smile turns to a grimace watching his daughter swordfight.

Syrio Forel: Up! Dead. Dead. Very dead. Come. Again, faster.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things
Game of Thrones
Featuring Brian Kirk
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 1 Scripts
CRIPPLES, BASTARDS AND BROKEN THINGS
Open to Bran Stark dreaming. He is in the courtyard of Winterfell shooting a bow as a raven flies in. As he approaches it, it flies into the crypt, continuously cawing. As Bran enters the crypt he makes direct eye contact with the raven and sees that it has three eyes. He wakes up. Theon enters just as he wakes up.

Old Nan: The little Lord's been dreaming again.
Theon Greyjoy: We have visitors.
Bran Stark: I don't want to see anyone.
Theon Greyjoy: Really? If I was cooped up all day with no one but this old bat for company, I'd go mad. Anyway, you don't have a choice. Robb's waiting.
Bran Stark: I don't want to go.
Theon Greyjoy: Neither do I. But Robb's Lord of Winterfell, which means I do what he says and you do what I say. Hodor! (Hodor enters, hoisting up Bran and carrying him away) Help Bran down the hall.
Tyrion standing in front of Robb and Maester Luwin inside the Winterfell castle.

Tyrion Lannister: I must say I received a slightly warmer welcome on my last visit.
Robb Stark: Any man of the Night's Watch is welcome at Winterfell.
Tyrion Lannister: Any man of the Night's Watch, but not I, eh, boy?
Robb Stark: I'm not your boy, Lannister. I'm Lord of Winterfell while my father is away.
Tyrion Lannister: Then you might learn a lord's courtesy.

Hodor enters carrying Bran.

Tyrion Lannister: So it's true. Hello Bran. Do you remember anything about what happened?
Maester Luwin: He has no memory of that day.
Tyrion Lannister: Curious.
Robb Stark: Why are you here?
Tyrion Lannister: Would your charming companion be so kind as to kneel? My neck is beginning to hurt.
Bran Stark: Kneel, Hodor.
Tyrion Lannister: Do you like to ride, Bran?
Bran Stark: Yes. Well, I mean I did like to.
Maester Luwin: The boy has lost the use of his legs.
Tyrion Lannister: What of it? With the right horse and saddle, even a cripple can ride.
Bran Stark: I'm not a cripple.
Tyrion Lannister: Then I'm not a dwarf. My father will rejoice to hear it. I have a gift for you. Give that to your saddler. He'll provide the rest. You must shape the horse to the rider. Start with a yearling and teach it to respond to the reins and to the boy's voice.
Bran Stark: Will I really be able to ride?
Tyrion Lannister:You will. On horseback you will be as tall as any of them.
Robb Stark: Is this some kind of trick? Why do you want to help him?
Tyrion Lannister: I have a tender spot in my heart for cripples, bastards and broken things.
Robb Stark: You've done my brother a kindness. The hospitality of Winterfell is yours.
Tyrion Lannister: Spare me your false courtesies, Lord Stark. There's a brothel outside your walls. There I'll find a bed and both of us can sleep easier.

Before Tyrion exits Winterfell for the brothel, Theon sees him off in the courtyard.

Theon Greyjoy: Couldn't resist some northern ass? If you like redheads, ask for Ros.
Tyrion Lannister: Come to see me off, Greyjoy? Kind of you. Your master doesn't seem to like Lannisters.
Theon Greyjoy: He's not my master.
Tyrion Lannister: No, of course not. What happened here? Where is lady Stark? Why didn't she receive me?
Theon Greyjoy: She wasn't feeling well.
Tyrion Lannister: She's not in Winterfell, is she? Where did she go?
Theon Greyjoy: My lady's whereabouts...
Tyrion Lannister: My lady? Your loyalty to your captors is touching. Tell me, how do you think Balon Greyjoy would feel if he could see his only surviving son has turned lackey? I still remember seeing my father's fleet burn in Lannisport. I believe your uncles were responsible?
Theon Greyjoy: Must have been a pretty sight.
Tyrion Lannister: Nothing prettier than watching sailors burn alive. Yes, a great victory for your people. Shame how it all turned out.
Theon Greyjoy: We were outnumbered 10 to one.
Tyrion Lannister: A stupid rebellion then. I suppose your father realized that when your brothers died in battle. Now here you are, your enemy's squire.
Theon Greyjoy: Careful, Imp.
Tyrion Lannister: I've offended you. Forgive me, it's been a rough morning. Anyway, don't despair. I'm a constant disappointment to my own father and I've learned to live with it. Your next tumble with Ros is on me. I'll try not to wear her out.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the courtyard of Castle Black, Jon Snow is giving the group lessons in fighting. As Alliser marches in with a new recruit, Samwell Tarly.

Jon Snow: Leg, shoulder, leg. Left foot forward. Good. Now pivot as you deliver the stroke. Put all your weight behind it.
Grenn: What in seven hells is that?
Pyp: They'll need an eighth hell to fit him in.
Alliser Thorne: Tell them your name.
Samwell Tarly: Samwell Tarly, of Horn Hill. I mean, I was of Horn Hill. I've come to take the black.
Rast: Come to take the black pudding.
Alliser Thorne: Well, you couldn't be any worse than you look. See what he can do.
Samwell Tarly: I yield. Please, no more.
Alliser Thorne: On your feet. Pick up your sword. Hit him till he finds his feet. It seems they've run short of poachers and thieves down south. Now they send us squealing bloody pigs. Again, harder.
Jon Snow: Enough! He yielded.
Alliser Thorne: Looks like the bastard's in love. All right then, lord Snow, you wish to defend your lady love, let's make it an exercise. You two. Three of you ought to be sufficient to make lady piggy squeal. All you've got to do is get past the bastard.
Jon Snow: Are you sure you want to do this?

Alliser has the three guys attack Jon, trying to get to Sam, Jon successfully defends them all off.

Grenn: No. Yield yield yield! I yield.
Alliser Thorne: We're done for today. Go clean the armory. That's all you're good for.
Pyp: Well fought!
Grenn: Piss off.
Samwell Tarly: Did he hurt you?
Jon Snow: I've had worse.
Samwell Tarly: You can call me Sam... If you want. My mother calls me Sam.
Jon Snow: It's not going to get any easier, you know? You'll have to defend yourself.
Grenn: Why didn't you get up and fight?
Samwell Tarly: I wanted to. I just couldn't.
Grenn: Why not?
Samwell Tarly: I'm a coward. My father always says so.
Jon Snow: The Wall's no place for cowards.
Samwell Tarly: You're right. I'm sorry. I just... Wanted to thank you.
Grenn: A bloody coward. People saw us talking to him. Now they'll think we're cowards too.
Pyp: You're too stupid to be a coward.
Grenn: You're too stupid to be a...
Pyp: Quick now, before summer's over.
Grenn: Come on here!

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Daenerys and the horde have arrived to the Dothraki homeland.

Jorah Mormont: Vaes Dothrak. The city of the horselords.
Viserys Targaryen: A pile of mud. Mud and shit and twigs - best these savages can do.
Daenerys Targaryen: These are my people now. You shouldn't call them savages.
Viserys Targaryen: I'll call them what I like, because they're my people. This is my army. Khal Drogo is marching the wrong way with my army.
Daenerys Targaryen: If my brother was given an army of Dothraki, could you conquer the Seven Kingdoms?
Jorah Mormont: The Dothraki have never crossed the Narrow Sea. They fear any water their horses can't drink.
Daenerys Targaryen: But if they did?
Jorah Mormont: King Robert is fool enough to meet them in open battle, but the men advising him are different.
Daenerys Targaryen: And you know these men?
Jorah Mormont: I fought beside them once, long ago. Now Ned Stark wants my head. He drove me from my land.
Daenerys Targaryen: You sold slaves.
Jorah Mormont: Aye.
Daenerys Targaryen: Why?
Jorah Mormont: I had no money and an expensive wife.
Daenerys Targaryen: And where is she now?
Jorah Mormont: In another place, with another man.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Viserys is in a tub inside of a tent, being bathed by Doreah.

Doreah: Your Grace?
Viserys Targaryen: Yes, my dear?
Doreah: They call you the last dragon...
Viserys Targaryen: They do.
Doreah: You have dragon's blood in your veins?
Viserys Targaryen: It's entirely possible.
Doreah: What happened to the dragons? I was told that brave men killed them all.
Viserys Targaryen: The brave men didn't kill dragons. The brave men rode them. Rode them from Valyria to build the greatest civilization this world has ever seen. The breath of the greatest dragon forged the Iron Throne, which the Usurper is keeping warm for me. The swords of the vanquished, a thousand of them... melted together like so many candles.
Doreah: I have always wanted to see a dragon. There is nothing in the world that I would rather see.
Viserys Targaryen:Really? Why dragons?
Doreah: They can fly. And wherever they are, just a few flaps of their wings and they're somewhere else... Far away. And they can kill. Anyone or anything that tries to hurt them gets burned away to nothing... melted... like so many candles. Seeing a dragon would make me very happy.
Viserys Targaryen: Well, after 15 years in a pleasure house, I imagine just seeing the sky makes you happy.
Doreah: I was not locked in. I have seen things.
Viserys Targaryen: What have you seen?
Doreah: I've seen... A man from Asshai with a dagger of real dragonglass. I've seen a man who could change his face the way that other men change their clothes. And I've seen a pirate who wore his weight in gold and whose ship had sails of colored silk. So... Have you seen one?
Viserys Targaryen: A pirate ship?
Doreah: A dragon.
Viserys Targaryen: No, the last one died many years before I was born. I'll tell you what I have seen : their skulls. They used to decorate the throne room in the Red Keep. When I was very young, just 3 or 4, my father used to walk me down the rows and I'd recite their names for him. When I got them all right, he'd give me a sweet. The ones closest to the door were the last ones they were able to hatch and they were all stunted and wrong. Skulls no bigger than dog skulls. But as you got closer to the Iron Throne... They got bigger and bigger and bigger. There was Ghiscar and Valryon, Vermithrax, Essovius, Archonel, Meraxes, Vhagar... And Balerion the Dread... whose fire forged the Seven Kingdoms into one.
Doreah: What happened to the skulls?
Viserys Targaryen: I don't know. The Usurper had them smashed to powder, I expect. Scattered to the wind.
Doreah: That's very sad.
Viserys Targaryen: Yes, it is. What did I buy you for? To make me sad?
Doreah: No, your Grace. To teach your sister.
Viserys Targaryen: To teach my sister how to be a better lover? You think I bought you to make Khal Drogo happy? You pretty little idiot. Go on then. Get on with it.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Inside of the throne room at King’s Landing.

Septa Mordane: Someday your husband will sit there and you will sit by his side. And one day, before too long, you will present your son to the court. All the lords of Westeros will gather here to see the little prince...
Sansa Stark: What if I have a girl?
Septa Mordane: Gods be good, you'll have boys and girls and plenty of them.
Sansa Stark: What if I only have girls?
Septa Mordane: I wouldn't worry about that.
Sansa Stark: Jeyne Poole's mother had five children, all of them girls.
Septa Mordane: Yes, but it's highly unlikely.
Sansa Stark: But what if?
Septa Mordane: If you only had girls, I suppose the throne would pass to Prince Joffrey's little brother.
Sansa Stark: And everyone would hate me.
Septa Mordane: Nobody could ever hate you.
Sansa Stark: Joffrey does.
Septa Mordane: Nonsense. Why would you say such a thing? That business with the wolves? I've told you a hundred times... A direwolf is not...
Sansa Stark: Please shut up about it.
Septa Mordane: Do you remember your lessons? Who built the Iron Throne?
Sansa Stark: Aegon the Conqueror.
Septa Mordane: And who built the Red Keep?
Sansa Stark: Maegor the Cruel.
Septa Mordane: And how many years did it take to build...
Sansa Stark: My grandfather and uncle were murdered here, weren't they?
Septa Mordane: They were killed on the orders of King Aerys, yes.
Sansa Stark: The Mad King.
Septa Mordane: Commonly known as the Mad King.
Sansa Stark: Why were they killed?
Septa Mordane: You should speak to your father about these matters.
Sansa Stark: I don't want to speak to my father, ever.
Septa Mordane: You will find it in your heart to forgive your father.
Sansa Stark: No, I won't.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Small council meeting in King’s Landing.

Janos Slynt: It's the Hand's tournament that's causing all this trouble, my Lords.
Eddard Stark: The King's tournament. I assure you the Hand wants no part of it.
Janos Slynt: Call it what you will, Lord Stark Ser, the city is packed with people and more flooding in every day. Last night we had a tavern riot, a brothel fire, three stabbings and a drunken horse race down the Street of Sisters.
Varys: Dreadful.
Renly Baratheon: If you can't keep the King's peace, perhaps the City Watch should be commanded by someone who can.
Janos Slynt: I need more men.
Eddard Stark: You'll get 50. Lord Baelish will see it paid for.
Petyr Baelish: I will?
Eddard Stark: You found money for a champion's purse, you can find money to keep the peace. I'll also give you 20 of my household guards till the crowds have left.
Janos Slynt: Thank you, my Lord Hand Ser. They will be put to good use.
Eddard Stark: The sooner this is over, the better.
Varys: The realm prospers from such events, my Lord. They give the great a chance at glory, and the lowly a respite from their woes.
Petyr Baelish: And every inn in the city is full and the whores are walking bow-legged.
Eddard Stark: I'm sure the tourney puts coins in many a pocket. Now... If there's nothing else, my Lords?

Eddard dismisses the council, as they are all leaving, Ned stops Pycelle.

Grand Maester Pycelle: This heat. On days like this, I envy you northerners your summer snows. Until tomorrow my Lord.
Eddard Stark: I've been hoping to talk to you about Jon Arryn.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Lord Arryn? His death was a great sadness to all of us. I took personal charge of his care, but I could not save him. His sickness struck him very hard and very fast. I saw him in my chambers just the night before he passed. Lord Jon often came to me for counsel.
Eddard Stark: Why?
Grand Maester Pycelle: I have been Grand Maester for many years. Kings and Hands have come to me for advice since...
Eddard Stark: What did Jon want the night before he died?
Grand Maester Pycelle: He came inquiring after a book.
Eddard Stark: A book? What book?
Grand Maester Pycelle: I fear it would be of little interest to you, my Lord. A ponderous tome.
Eddard Stark: I'd like to read it.

Now in Pycelle’s room, he hands a book to Ned.

Grand Maester Pycelle: "The lineages and histories of the great houses of the Seven Kingdoms, with descriptions of many high lords and noble ladies and their children."
Eddard Stark: "Harkon Umber, first of his name, born to lord Hother Umber and lady Amaryllis Umber in the 183rd year after Aegon's landing, at the last hearth. Blue of eye, brown of hair and fair complected, died in his 14th year of a wound sustained
in a bear hunt."
Grand Maester Pycelle: As I said, my Lord, a ponderous read.
Eddard Stark: Did Jon Arryn tell you what he wanted with it?
Grand Maester Pycelle: He did not, my Lord. And I did not presume to ask.
Eddard Stark: Jon's death...
Grand Maester Pycelle: Such a tragedy.
Eddard Stark: Did he say anything to you during his final hours?
Grand Maester Pycelle:Nothing of import, my Lord. There was one phrase he kept repeating: "The seed is strong," I think it was.
Eddard Stark: "The seed is strong"? What does that mean?
Grand Maester Pycelle: The dying mind is a demented mind, Lord Stark. For all the weight they're given, last words are usually as significant as first words.
Eddard Stark: And you're quite certain he died of a natural illness?
Grand Maester Pycelle: What else could it be?
Eddard Stark: Poison.
Grand Maester Pycelle: A disturbing thought. I don't think it likely. The Hand was loved by all. What sort of man would dare...
Eddard Stark: I've heard it said that poison is a woman's weapon.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Yes. Women, cravens... and eunuchs. Did you know that lord Varys is a eunuch?
Eddard Stark: Everybody knows that.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Yes, yes, of course. How that sort of person found himself on the King's Council, I will never know.
Eddard Stark: I've taken enough of your time.
Grand Maester Pycelle: No trouble at all, my Lord. It's a great honor...
Eddard Stark: Thank you. I'll find my own way out.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Ned is walking back to his chambers as he sees Arya balancing on one foot in front of a staircase.

Arya Stark: Syrio says a water dancer can stand on one toe for hours.
Eddard Stark: It's a hard fall down these steps.
Arya Stark: Syrio says every hurt is a lesson and every lesson makes you better. Tomorrow I'm going to be chasing cats.
Eddard Stark: Cats? Syrio says…
Arya Stark: He says every swordsman should study cats. They're quiet as shadows and as light as feathers. You have to be quick to catch them.
Eddard Stark: He's right about that.
Arya Stark: Now that Bran's awake will he come live with us?
Eddard Stark: He needs to get his strength back first.
Arya Stark:He wants to be a knight of the King’s Guard. He can't be one now, can he?
Eddard Stark: No. But someday he could be Lord of a holdfast or sit on the King's Council. Or he might raise castles like Brandon the Builder.
Arya Stark: Can I be Lord of a holdfast?
Eddard Stark: You will marry a high Lord and rule his castle. And your sons shall be knights and princes and lords.
Arya Stark: No. That's not me.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Keeping watch on the wall, Sam joins Jon as his watch partner.

Samwell Tarly: Hello. Ser Alliser said I'm to be your new watch partner. I should warn you, I don't see all that well.
Jon Snow: Come stand by the fire. It's warmer.
Samwell Tarly: No, that's all right. I'm fine.
Jon Snow: You're not. You're freezing.
Samwell Tarly: I don't like high places.
Jon Snow: You can't fight. You can't see. You're afraid of heights and almost everything else probably. What are you doing here, Sam?
Samwell Tarly: On the morning of my 18th nameday, my father came to me. "You're almost a man now," he said, "but you're not worthy of my land and title. Tomorrow, you're going to take the black, forsake all claim to your inheritance and start north. If you do not," he said, "then we'll have a hunt and somewhere in these woods your horse will stumble and you'll be thrown from your saddle to die. Or so I'll tell your mother. Nothing would please me more." Ser Alliser's going to make me fight again tomorrow, isn't he?
Jon Snow: Yes, he is.
Samwell Tarly: I'm not going to get any better, you know?
Jon Snow: Well… You can't get any worse.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Walking through the gardens of King’s Landing.

Petyr Baelish: I hear you're reading a boring book.
Eddard Stark: Pycelle talks too much.
Petyr Baelish: He never stops. Do you know Ser Hugh of the Vale? Not surprising. Until recently, he was only a squire... Jon Arryn's squire. He was knighted almost immediately after his master's untimely death.
Eddard Stark: Knighted for what? Why are you telling me this?
Petyr Baelish: I promised Cat that I'd help you.
Eddard Stark: Where is Ser Hugh? I'll speak to him.
Petyr Baelish: A singularly bad idea. Do you see that boy there? One of Varys's little birds. The Spider has taken a great interest in your comings and goings. Now look there. That one belongs to the Queen. And do you see that Septa pretending to read her book?
Eddard Stark: Varys or the Queen?
Petyr Baelish: No. She's one of mine. Is there someone in your service whom you trust completely?
Eddard Stark: Yes.
Petyr Baelish: The wiser answer was no, my Lord. Get a message to this paragon of yours... Discreetly. Send him to question Ser Hugh. After that, you might want him to visit a certain armorer in the city. He lives in a large house at the top of the street of Steel.
Eddard Stark: Why?
Petyr Baelish: I have my observers, as I said, and it's possible that they saw Lord Arryn visit this armorer several times in the weeks before his death.
Eddard Stark: Lord Baelish, perhaps I was wrong to distrust you.
Petyr Baelish: Distrusting me was the wisest thing you've done since you climbed off your horse.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Preparing for the Hand of the King’s tournament, Ser Hugh is pacing out steps on the joust.

Jory Cassel: Ser Hugh? Ser Hugh!
Hugh of the Vale: As you can see, I'm busy.
Jory Cassel: I'm here on behalf of Lord Eddard Stark, the Hand of the king. I'm the captain of his guard.
Hugh of the Vale: I'm sorry. I didn't catch your name, Ser...
Jory Cassel: No "ser." I'm not a knight.
Hugh of the Vale: I see. Well, it just so happens that I am.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Riding on horseback through King’s Landing, Ned and Jory arrive at the armorer.

Jory Cassel: He said he'd be glad to talk to the Hand himself. He's a knight, you see.
Eddard Stark: A knight. They strut around like roosters down here. Even the ones who've never seen an arrow coming their way.
Jory Cassel: You shouldn't be out here, my Lord. There's no telling who has eyes where.
Eddard Stark: Let them look.
Tobho Mott: The former Hand did call on me, my Lord, several times. I regret to say he did not honor me with his patronage.
Eddard Stark: What did Lord Arryn want?
Tobho Mott: He always came to see the boy.
Eddard Stark: I'd like to see him as well.
Tobho Mott: As you wish, my Lord. Gendry! Here he is. Strong for his age. He works hard. Show the Hand the helmet you made, lad.
Eddard Stark: This is fine work.
Gendry: It's not for sale.
Tobho Mott: Boy, this is the King's Hand! If his lordship wants the helmet...
Gendry: I made it for me.
Tobho Mott: Forgive him, my Lord.
Eddard Stark: There's nothing to forgive. When Lord Arryn came to visit you, what would you talk about?
Gendry: He just asked me questions is all, my Lord.
Eddard Stark: What kind of questions?
Gendry: About my work at first, if I was being treated well, if I liked it here. But then he started asking me about my mother.
Eddard Stark: Your mother?
Gendry: Who she was, what she looked like.
Eddard Stark: What did you tell him?
Gendry: She died when I was little. She had yellow hair. She'd sing to me sometimes.
Eddard Stark: Look at me. Get back to work, lad. If the day ever comes when that boy'd rather wield a sword than forge one, you send him to me.
Jory Cassel: Find anything?
Eddard Stark: King Robert's bastard son.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Jaime is standing guard outside of the king’s chambers. You can hear King Robert with numerous girls inside his room.

Jory Cassel: This is for the King from Lord Stark.
Jaime Lannister: Listen. Do you hear them? How many do you think are in there with him? Guess.
Jory Cassel: Three? Four?
Jaime Lannister: He likes to do this when I'm on duty... He makes me listen as he insults my sister.
Jory Cassel: Forgive me, my Lord...
Jaime Lannister: Why do I have to forgive you? Have you wronged me?
Jory Cassel: We've met before, you know.
Jaime Lannister: Have we? Strange, I've forgotten.
Jory Cassel: The siege of Pyke. We fought side by side one afternoon.
Jaime Lannister: That's where you got your scar?
Jory Cassel: Aye. One of the Greyjoys nearly took my eye.
Jaime Lannister: Vicious sons of whores.
Jory Cassel: They like their bloodshed.
Jaime Lannister: They stopped liking it at the end. That was a proper battle. D'you remember Thoros of Myr charging through the breach?
Jory Cassel: With his burning sword? I'll remember that till the day I die.
Jaime Lannister: I saw the youngest of the Greyjoy lads at Winterfell. It was like seeing a shark on a mountaintop.
Jory Cassel: Theon? He's a good lad.
Jaime Lannister: I doubt it.
Robert Baratheon: I'll bet you smell of blackberry jam! Let me smell it. Come here.
Jory Cassel: Can I leave this with you? The message from Lord Stark.
Jaime Lannister: I don't serve Lord Stark.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the mess hall at Castle Black.

Grenn: Where have you been?
Jon Snow: Watch duty. With Sam.
Pyp: Prince Porkchop. Where is he?
Jon Snow: He wasn't hungry.
Pyp: Impossible!
Jon Snow: That's enough. Sam's no different from the rest of us. There was no place for him in the world, so he's come here. We're not going to hurt him in the training yard anymore. Never again, no matter what Thorne says. He's our brother now and we're going to protect him.
Rast: You are in love, Lord Snow. You girls can do as you please. But if Thorne puts me up against Lady Piggy, I'm gonna slice me off a side of bacon.

All of the new recruits are sleeping. Jon, Ghost (his direwolf), Pyp and Grenn ambush and gag Rast as he sleeps. Jon threatens him.

Jon Snow: No one touches Sam.

Back in the training yard the next morning. Rast is defying Alliser and not attacking Sam.

Alliser Thorne: What are you waiting for? Attack him! You, get in there.
Grenn: Hit me. Go on, hit me! I yield! Yield yield. I yield.
Alliser Thorne: You think this is funny, do you? When you're out there beyond the Wall with the sun going down, do you want a man at your back? Or a sniveling boy?

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

After their bath, Viserys drags Doreah by her hair through the camp and into Daenerys’ tent.

Viserys Targaryen: You send this whore to give me commands? I should have sent you back her head!
Doreah: Forgive me, Khaleesi. I did as you asked.
Daenerys Targaryen: Hush now. It's all right. Irri, take her and leave us.
Irri: Yes, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: Why did you hit her?!
Viserys Targaryen: How many times do I have to tell you? You do not command me.
Daenerys Targaryen: I wasn't commanding you. I just wanted to invite you to supper.
Viserys Targaryen: What's this?
Daenerys Targaryen: It's a gift. I had it made for you.
Viserys Targaryen: Dothraki rags? Are you going to dress me now?
Daenerys Targaryen: Please.
Viserys Targaryen: This stinks of manure. All of it.
Daenerys Targaryen: Stop - stop it.
Viserys Targaryen: You would turn me into one of them, wouldn't you? Next you'll want to braid my hair.
Daenerys Targaryen: You've no right to a braid. You've won no victories yet.
Viserys Targaryen: You do not talk back to me!

Viserys hit Daenerys, as he mounts her to keep hitting her, she fends him off with a chain.

Viserys Targaryen: You are a horselord's slut. And now you've woken the dragon...
Daenerys Targaryen: I am a Khaleesi of the Dothraki! I am the wife of the great Khal and I carry his son inside me. The next time you raise a hand to me will be the last time you have hands.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Inside the Castle Black mess hall, cleaning up.

Samwell Tarly: I know for a fact that some of the officers go to that brothel in Mole's Town.
Jon Snow: I wouldn't doubt it.
Samwell Tarly: Don't you think it's a little bit unfair? Making us take our vows while they sneak off for a little sally on the side?
Jon Snow: Sally on the side?
Samwell Tarly:It's silly, isn't it? What, we can't defend the Wall unless we're celibate? It's absurd.
Jon Snow: I didn't think you'd be so upset about it.
Samwell Tarly:Why not? Because I'm fat? But I like girls just as much as you do. They might not like me as much. I've never... been with one. You've probably had hundreds.
Jon Snow: As a matter of fact, I'm the same as you.
Samwell Tarly: I find that hard to believe.
Jon Snow: I came very close once. I was alone in a room with a naked girl, but...
Samwell Tarly:You didn't know where to put it?
Jon Snow: I know where to put it.
Samwell Tarly:Was she... Old and ugly?
Jon Snow: Young and gorgeous. A whore named Ros.
Samwell Tarly: What color hair?
Jon Snow: Red.
Samwell Tarly: I like red hair. And her... Her...
Jon Snow: You don't want to know.
Samwell Tarly: That good?
Jon Snow: Better.
Samwell Tarly: Oh no. So why exactly did you not make love to Ros with the perfect...
Jon Snow: What's my name?
Samwell Tarly: Jon Snow?
Jon Snow: And why is my surname Snow?
Samwell Tarly: Because... You're a bastard from the north.
Jon Snow: I never met my mother. My father wouldn't even tell me her name. I don't know if she's living or dead. I don't know if she's a noblewoman or a fisherman's wife... Or a whore. So I sat there in the brothel as Ros took off her clothes. But I couldn't do it. Because all I could think was what if I got her pregnant and she had a child, another bastard named Snow? It's not a good life for a child.
Samwell Tarly: So... You didn't know where to put it?
Alliser Thorne: Enjoying yourselves? You look cold, boys.
Samwell Tarly: It is a bit nippy.
Alliser Thorne: A bit nippy, yeah, by the fire, indoors. It's still summer. Do you boys even remember the last winter? How long has it been now? What, 10 years? I remember. Was it uncomfortable at Winterfell? Were there days when you just couldn't get warm, never mind how many fires your servants built?
Jon Snow: I build my own fires.
Alliser Thorne: That's admirable. I spent six months out there, beyond the Wall during the last winter. It was supposed to be a two-week mission. We heard a rumor Mance Rayder was planning to attack Eastwatch. So we went out to look for some of his men... Capture them, gather some knowledge. The Wildlings who fight for Mance Rayder are hard men. Harder than you'll ever be. They know their country better than we do. They knew there was a storm coming in. So they hid in their caves and waited for it to pass. And we got caught in the open. Wind so strong it yanked 100-foot trees straight from the ground, roots and all. If you took your gloves off to find your cock to have a piss, you lost a finger to the frost. And all in darkness. You don't know cold. Neither of you do. The horses died first. We didn't have enough to feed them, to keep them warm. Eating the horses was easy. But later when we started to fall... That wasn't easy. We should have had a couple of boys like you along, shouldn't we? Soft, fat boys like you. We'd have lasted a fortnight on you and still had bones leftover for soup. Soon we'll have new recruits and you lot will be passed along to the Lord Commander for assignment and they will call you men of the Night's Watch, but you'd be fools to believe it. You're boys still. And come the winter you will die... Like flies.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Inside Daenerys’ tent, speaking privately to Jorah.

Daenerys Targaryen: I hit him. I hit the dragon.
Jorah Mormont: Your brother Rhaegar was the last dragon. Viserys is less than the shadow of a snake.
Daenerys Targaryen: He is still the true King.
Jorah Mormont: The truth now: do you want to see your brother sitting on the Iron Throne?
Daenerys Targaryen: No. But the common people are waiting for him. Illyrio said they're sewing dragon banners and praying for his return.
Jorah Mormont: The common people pray for rain, health and a summer that never ends. They don't care what games the high Lords play.
Daenerys Targaryen:What do you pray for, Ser Jorah?
Jorah Mormont: Home.
Daenerys Targaryen: I pray for home too. My brother will never take back the Seven Kingdoms. He couldn't lead an army even if my husband gave him one. He'll never take us home.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At the Hand of the King’s tournament. Baelish sees Sansa looking at Joffrey who hides his face from her.

Petyr Baelish: Lover's quarrel?
Sansa Stark: I'm sorry. Do I...?
Septa Mordane: Sansa dear, this is Lord Baelish. He's known...
Petyr Baelish: An old friend of the family. I've known your mother a long long time.
Arya Stark: Why do they call you Littlefinger?
Sansa Stark: Arya!
Septa Mordane: Don't be rude!
Petyr Baelish: No, it's quite all right. When I was a child I was very small and I come from a little spit of land called The Fingers, so you see, it's an exceedingly clever nickname.
Robert Baratheon: I've been sitting here for days! Start the damn joust before I piss myself!

The competitors step forward on their horses, Baelish introduces them to Sansa.

Sansa Stark: Gods, who is that?
Petyr Baelish: Ser Gregor Clegane. They call him the Mountain. The Hound's older brother.
Sansa Stark: And his opponent?
Petyr Baelish: Ser Hugh of the Vale. He was Jon Arryn's squire. Look how far he's come.
Robert Baratheon: Yes, yes. Enough of the bloody pomp. Have at it!

The joust begins. The first pass takes its course with no contact. On the second pass, the Mountain’s joust strikes Ser Hugh in the neck, causing a massive splinter, and his blood gushing out. This occurs directly in front of where Sansa is sitting.

Petyr Baelish: Not what you were expecting? Has anyone ever told you the story of the Mountain and the Hound? Lovely little tale of brotherly love. The Hound was just a pup, six years old maybe. Gregor a few years older, already a big lad, already getting a bit of a reputation. Some lucky boys just born with a talent for violence. One evening... Gregor found his little brother playing with a toy by the fire... Gregor's toy, a wooden knight. Gregor never said a word, he just grabbed his brother by the scruff of his neck and shoved his face into the burning coals. Held him there while the boy screamed, while his face melted. There aren't very many people who know that story.
Sansa Stark: I won't tell anyone. I promise.
Petyr Baelish: No, please don't. If the Hound so much as heard you mention it, I'm afraid all the knights in King's Landing would not be able to save you.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In Eddard’s quarters, Cersei enters.

Jory Cassel: My Lord, Her Grace the Queen.
Eddard Stark: Your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: You're missing your tournament.
Eddard Stark: Putting my name on it doesn't make it mine.
Cersei Baratheon: I thought we might put what happened on the Kingsroad behind us – the ugliness with the wolves. And forcing you to kill the beast was extreme. Though sometimes we go to extremes where our children are concerned. How is Sansa?
Eddard Stark: She likes it here.
Cersei Baratheon: The only Stark who does. Favors her mother, not much of the north in her.
Eddard Stark: What are you doing here?
Cersei Baratheon: I might ask the same of you. What is it you hope to accomplish?
Eddard Stark: The King called on me to serve him and the realm, and that's what I'll do until he tells me otherwise.
Cersei Baratheon: You can't change him. You can't help him. He'll do what he wants, which is all he's ever done. You'll try your best to pick up the pieces.
Eddard Stark: If that's my job, then so be it.
Cersei Baratheon: You're just a soldier, aren't you? You take your orders and you carry on. I suppose it makes sense. Your older brother was trained to lead and you were trained to follow.
Eddard Stark: I was also trained to kill my enemies, Your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: As was I.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At an inn along the King’s Road. Catelyn is heading back towards Winterfell.

Marillion: Seven blessings to you, goodfolk!
Catelyn Stark: And to you.
Rodrick Cassel: Boy! Bread, meat and beer, quickly.
Marillion: Good idea, grandfather. I'm starving. A song while we wait or?
Rodrick Cassel: I'd rather throw myself down a well.
Marillion: Grandfather, may be your last chance if you're heading north. The only music the northerners know is the howling of wolves!

Tyrion and Yoren of the Night’s Watch enter the inn. Catelyn attempts to hide herself.

Masha Heddle: I'm sorry, my Lord, we're full up. Every room.
Tyrion Lannister: My men can sleep in the stable. As for myself, I don't require a large room.
Masha Heddle: Truly, my lord, we have nothing.
Tyrion Lannister: Is there nothing I can do... to remedy this?
Bronn: You can have my room.
Tyrion Lannister: There's a clever man. You can manage food, I trust? Yoren, dine with me.
Yoren: Aye, my Lord.
Marillion: My Lord of Lannister! Might I entertain you while you eat? I can sing of your father's victory at King's Landing!
Tyrion Lannister: Nothing would more likely ruin my supper. Lady Stark! What an unexpected pleasure. I was sorry to have missed you at Winterfell.
Masha Heddle: Lady Stark.
Catelyn Stark: I was still Catelyn Tully the last time I stayed here. You, Ser... Is that the black bat of Harrenhal I see embroidered on your coat?
Knight of House Whent: It is, my Lady.
Catelyn Stark: And is Lady Whent a true and honest friend to my father... Lord Hoster Tully of Riverrun?
Knight of House Whent: She is.
Catelyn Stark: The red stallion was always a welcome sight at Riverrun. My father counts Jonas Bracken amongst his oldest and most loyal bannermen.
Knight of House Bracken: Our lord is honored by his trust.
Tyrion Lannister: I envy your father all his fine friends, but I don't quite see the purpose of this.
Catelyn Stark:Knight of House Frey: Lord Walder is well, my Lady. He has asked your father for the honor of his presence on his 90th nameday. He plans to take another wife.
Catelyn Stark: This man... Came into my house as a guest and there conspired to murder my son, a boy of 10. In the name of King Robert and the good Lords you serve, I call upon you to seize him and help me return him to Winterfell to await the king's justice.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
5
The Wolf and The Lion
Game of Thrones
Featuring Brian Kirk
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 1 Scripts
THE WOLF AND THE LION
King's Landing, Ned Stark arrives at the grounds where the Tourney of the Hand will take place. He enters a tent where Ser Hugh (deceased) is being tended to, he enters to speak with Barristan.

Eddard Stark: Does Ser Hugh have any family in the capital?
Barristan Selmy: No. I stood vigil for him myself last night. He had no one else.
Eddard Stark: He'd never worn this armor before.
Barristan Selmy: Bad luck for him... Going against the Mountain.
Eddard Stark: Who determines the draw?
Barristan Selmy: All the knights draw straws, Lord Stark.
Eddard Stark: Aye... But who holds the straws? You've done good work, Sisters.
Ned and Barristan both exit the tent and begin walking.

Barristan Selmy: Life is strange. Not so many years ago we fought as enemies at the Trident.
Eddard Stark: I'm glad we never met on the field, Ser Barristan... as is my wife. I don't think the widow's life would suit her.
Barristan Selmy: You're too modest. I've seen you cut down a dozen great knights.
Eddard Stark: My father once told me you were the best he'd ever seen. I never knew the man to be wrong about matters of combat.
Barristan Selmy: He was a fine man, your father. What the Mad King did to him was a terrible crime.
Eddard Stark: And that lad... He was a squire until a few months ago. How could he afford a new suit of armor?
Barristan Selmy: Perhaps Lord Arryn left him some money? I hear the King wants to joust today.
Eddard Stark: Yes. That will never happen.
Barristan Selmy: Robert tends to do what he wants.
Eddard Stark: If the King got what he wanted all the time, we'd still be fighting a damned rebellion.

Ned separates from Barristan and enters King Robert’s tent. Lancel, Robert’s squire, is attempting to dress him in his armor.

Lancel Lannister: It's made too small, Your Grace. It won't go.
Robert Baratheon: Your mother was a dumb whore with a fat arse. Did you know that? Look at this idiot! One ball and no brains. He can't even put a man's armor on him properly.
Eddard Stark: You're too fat for your armor.
Robert Baratheon: Fat? Fat, is it? Is that how you speak to your King? That was funny, is it?

Both Robert and Ned begin laughing. Lancel also starts to laugh.

Robert Baratheon: Oh, it’s funny, is it?
Lancel Lannister: No, Your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: No? You don't like the Hand's joke?
Eddard Stark: You're torturing the poor boy.
Robert Baratheon: You heard the Hand. The King's too fat for his armor! Go find the breastplate stretcher, now!

Lancel runs out of the tent.

Eddard Stark: The breastplate stretcher?
Robert Baratheon: How long before he figures it out?
Eddard Stark: Maybe you should have one invented.
Robert Baratheon: All right, all right. But you watch me out there. I still know how to point a lance.
Eddard Stark: You have no business jousting. Leave that for the young men.
Robert Baratheon: Why? Because I'm king? Piss on that. I want to hit somebody!
Eddard Stark: And who's going to hit you back?
Robert Baratheon: Anybody who can. And the last man in his saddle... will be you!
Eddard Stark:There's not a man in the Seven Kingdoms would risk hurting you.
Robert Baratheon: Are you telling me those cowards would let me win?
Eddard Stark: Aye.
Robert Baratheon: … Drink.
Eddard Stark: I'm not thirsty.
Robert Baratheon: Drink. Your King commands it. Gods! Too fat for my armor.
Eddard Stark: Your squire... A Lannister boy?
Robert Baratheon: Hmm... A bloody idiot... But Cersei insisted. I have Jon Arryn to thank for her. "Cersei Lannister will make a good match", he told me. "You'll need her father on your side." I thought being King meant I could do whatever I wanted. Enough of this! Let's go watch 'em ride. At least I can smell someone else's blood.
Eddard Stark: Robert?
Robert Baratheon: What? Oh! An inspiring sight for the people, eh? Come! Bow before your King! Bow, you shits!

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


Now at the jousting track where there are lots of onlookers, cheering. Ser Gregor bows before the King before he and his horse take off down one lane of the track.

Eddard Stark: Where's Arya
Sansa Stark: At her dancing lessons. The Knight of the Flowers.
Sansa Stark: Thank you, Ser Loras.

After bowing to Sansa, Loras exchanges looks with Renly Baratheon. Loras then rides and bows before the King, also taking off down the opposite track.

Sansa Stark: Don't let Ser Gregor hurt him.
Eddard Stark: Hey.
Sansa Stark: I can't watch.

Behind Ned and Sansa.

Petyr Baelish: 100 gold dragons on the Mountain.
Renly Baratheon: I'll take that bet.
Petyr Baelish: Now what will I buy with 100 gold dragons? A dozen barrels of Dornish wine? Or a girl from the pleasure houses of Lys?
Renly Baratheon: Or you could even buy a friend.
Sansa Stark: He's going to die.
Eddard Stark: Ser Loras rides well.

A trumpet is heard and both competitors race down their lanes. Loras knocks Ser Gregor off of his mount.

Renly Baratheon: Such a shame, Littlefinger. It would have been so nice for you to have a friend.
Petyr Baelish: And tell me, Lord Renly, when will you be having your friend?
Petyr Baelish: Loras knew his mare was in heat. Quite crafty, really.
Sansa Stark: Ser Loras would never do that! There's no honor in tricks.
Petyr Baelish: No honor but quite a bit of gold.

Gregor gets up off of the ground, shouts for his sword. His squire brings it to him and then Gregor severs his horse’s head completely off. The crowd is stunned, Gregor then attacks Loras. Knocking him off of his horse and striking him with his sword. Sandor, the Hound, runs down from the stands and fends off his brother.

Robert Baratheon: Stop this madness in the name of your King!

Sandor takes a bow and Gregor storms off. Loras walks up to Sandor, raising his hand in victory.

Loras Tyrell: I owe you my life, Ser.
Sandor Clegane: I'm no Ser.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Stopping for rest, presumed on the Kingsroad on their way to Winterfell.

Catelyn Stark: Remove his hood.
Marillion: On that eve, the captive Imp down-wards from his horse did limp, no more would he preen and primp, in garb of red and gold. (singing)
Tyrion Lannister: This isn't the Kingsroad. You said we were riding for Winterfell.
Catelyn Stark: I did... often and loudly.
Tyrion Lannister: Very wise. They'll be out in droves, looking for me in the wrong place. Word's probably gotten to my father by now. He'll be offering a handsome reward. Everyone knows a Lannister always pays his debts. Would you be so good as to untie me?
Catelyn Stark: And why would I do that?
Tyrion Lannister: Why not? Am I going to run? The hill tribes would kill me for my boots. Unless a Shadowcat ate me first.
Catelyn Stark: Shadowcats and hill tribes are the least of your concerns.
Tyrion Lannister: Ah... the Eastern Road. We're going to The Vale. You're taking me to your sister's to answer for my imagined crimes. Tell me, Lady Stark. When was the last time you saw your sister?
Catelyn Stark: Five years ago.
Tyrion Lannister: She's changed. She was always a bit touched, but now... you might as well kill me here.
Catelyn Stark: I am not a murderer, Lannister.
Tyrion Lannister: Neither am I! I had nothing to do with the attempt on your son's life!
Catelyn Stark: The dagger found
Tyrion Lannister: What sort of imbecile arms an assassin with his own blade?
Rodrik Cassel: Should I gag him?
Tyrion Lannister: Why? Am I starting to make sense?
Rodrik Cassel: My Lady, this way.

A rock slams into one of Catelyn’s men, a hill tribe begins to attack. Rodrik moves Catelyn behind a rock, out of harms way. The men, mainly Bronn begin successfully defending against the tribe. Tyrion sees Catelyn pull out a small dagger, he runs over to her and convinces her to cut him loose.

Tyrion Lannister: Untie me. If I die, what's the point?

Tyrion, now loose, runs over and picks up a shield. He fends off an attack as another of Lady Stark’s men kills him. Another tribesman is nearing Catelyn, Tyrion rushes over with his shield, knocks him to the ground and begins slamming it into his throat, directly in front of, and in defense of Catelyn. The battle comes to an end with many of their men defeated.

Catelyn Stark: Rodrik?
Rodrik Cassel: I'll be fine, my Lady. There's no need to bloody yourself.
Bronn: Your first? You need a woman. Nothing like a woman after a fight.
Tyrion Lannister: Well, I'm willing if she is.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back at Winterfell, Maester Luwin and Bran are at a small table, Luwin trying to teach Bran. Bran is fixed on watching Theon as he is practicing his archery.

Maester Luwin: Bran...
Bran Stark: The Iron Islands. Sigil - a Kraken. Words - "We do not sow".
Maester Luwin: Lords?
Bran Stark: The Greyjoys.
Theon Greyjoy: Famed for their skills at archery, navigation and lovemaking.
Maester Luwin: And failed rebellions.
Bran Stark: Sigil - a stag. - A crowned stag now that Robert's King.
Maester Luwin: Good.
Bran Stark: Words - "Ours is the fury". Lords - the Baratheons.
Maester Luwin:: Mhmm.
Bran Stark: The Westerlands - sigil - a lion.
Maester Luwin: Hmm...
Bran Stark: Words - "A Lannister always pays his debts."
Maester Luwin: No. A common saying, but not their official motto.
Bran Stark: Lords - the Lannisters.
Maester Luwin: We're still on their words.
Bran Stark: I don't know them.
Maester Luwin: You do know them. Think.
Bran Stark: "Unbowed, unbent, unbroken".
Maester Luwin:That's House Martell.
Bran Stark: "Righteous in wrath".
Maester Luwin: House Hornwood.
Bran Stark: "Family, duty, honor".
Maester Luwin:Those are Tully words... Your mother's. Are we playing a game?
Bran Stark: "Family, duty, honor"... Is that the right order?
Maester Luwin:You know it is.
Bran Stark: Family comes first?
Maester Luwin: Your mother had to leave Winterfell to protect the family.
Bran Stark: How can she protect the family, if she's not with her family?
Maester Luwin: Your mother sat by your bed for three weeks while you slept.
Bran Stark: And then she left!
Maester Luwin: When you were born, I was the one who pulled you from your mother. I placed you in her arms. From that moment until the moment she dies, she will love you. Absolutely. Fiercely.
Bran Stark: Why did she leave?
Maester Luwin: I still can't tell you, but she will be home soon.
Bran Stark: Do you know where she is now? Today?
Maester Luwin:No, I don't.
Bran Stark: Then how can you promise me she'll be home soon?
Maester Luwin: Sometimes I worry you're too smart for your own good.
Bran Stark: I'll never shoot another arrow.
Maester Luwin: And where is that written?
Bran Stark: You need legs to work a bow.
Maester Luwin: Hmm... If the saddle Lord Tyrion designed actually works, you could learn to shoot a bow from horseback.
Bran Stark: Really?
Maester Luwin: Dothraki boys learn when they're four years old. Why shouldn't you?

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Now in Theon’s quarters inside Winterfell, he’s making love to Ros.

Theon Greyjoy: Shh... Keep it down. You're not supposed to be inside the castle walls.

They break.

Ros: I thought you were supposed to be an important person around here.
Theon Greyjoy: Important enough for the likes of you.
Ros: You're not the only nobleman in my life, you know.
Theon Greyjoy: Who? the Imp? I'd call him half a nobleman.
Ros: Jealous?
Theon Greyjoy: Why should I be jealous?
Theon Greyjoy: Anyone with a few coppers in his pocket can own you for the night. What's a dwarf like down below? I've always wondered.
Ros: Might surprise you.
Theon Greyjoy: Hmm?
Ros: He's good with his fingers too. And his tongue.
Theon Greyjoy: Generous tipper. I guess gold is cheap for a Lannister.
Ros: You are jealous.
Theon Greyjoy: I'm a Greyjoy. We've been Lords of the Iron Islands for 300 years. There's not a family in Westeros that can look down on us, not even the Lannisters.
Ros: And what about the Starks?
Theon Greyjoy: I’ve been Lord Stark’s ward since I was eight years old.
Ros: A “ward”, that’s a nice word for it. Your father rebelled against King Robert and if he does it again…

Theon grabs Ros’ neck from behind.

Theon Greyjoy: My father fought for the freedom of his people! What did your father do? Fucked a cook and whelped a whore.
Ros: You’re a very serious boy.
Theon Greyjoy: I’m not a boy.
Ros: Oh, yes you are. A serious boy, with a serious cock.
Theon Greyjoy: I don’t want to pay for it.
Ros: Then get yourself a wife.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


Arya, at King’s Landing is running through the halls chasing a cat. She’s seen running down a hallway.

Arya Stark: Come on. I'm not gonna hurt you.

Ned is in his chambers at his desk, Varys is speaking to him, walking around securing all of the windows before sitting down to talk more seriously.

Varys: How is your son, my Lord?
Eddard Stark: He'll never walk again.
Varys: But his mind is sound?
Eddard Stark: So they say.
Varys:A blessing then. I suffered an early mutilation myself. Some doors close forever... others open in the most unexpected places. May I?
Varys: If the wrong ears heard what I'm about to tell you, off comes my head. And who would mourn poor Varys then? North or South, they sing no songs for spiders. But there are things you must know. You are the King's Hand and the King is a fool... your friend, I know, but a fool... and doomed unless you save him.
Eddard Stark: I've been in the capital a month. Why have you waited so long to tell me this?
Varys: I didn't trust you.
Eddard Stark: So why do you trust me now?
Varys: The Queen is not the only one who has been watching you closely. There are few men of honor in the capital. You are one of them. I would like to believe I am another, strange as that may seem.
Eddard Stark: What sort of doom does the King face?
Varys: The same sort as Jon Arryn. The tears of Lys, they call it. A rare and costly thing, as clear and tasteless as water. It leaves no trace.
Eddard Stark: Who gave it to him?
Varys: Some dear friend, no doubt. But which one? There were many. Lord Arryn was a kind and trusting man. There was one boy... all he was he owed to Jon Arryn.
Eddard Stark: The squire, Ser Hugh?
Varys: Pity what happened to him, just when his life seemed to be going so nicely.
Eddard Stark: If Ser Hugh poisoned him, who paid Ser Hugh?
Varys: Someone who could afford it.
Eddard Stark: Jon was a man of peace. He was Hand for 17 years -- 17 good years. Why kill him?
Varys: He started asking questions.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

We shift to a dark dungeon of King’s Landing. Arya is still chasing the cat. She stops to admire a large dragon’s skull. She hears two men talking, and hides from them, just in earshot. The two men are Lord Varys and Magister Illyrio Mopatis.

Varys: He's found one bastard already. He has the book. The rest will come.
Illyrio Mopatis: And when he knows the truth, what will he do?
Varys: The gods alone know. The fools tried to kill his son. What's worse, they botched it. The wolf and the lion will be at each other's throats. We will be at war soon, my friend.
Illyrio Mopatis: What good is war now? We're not ready. If one Hand can die, why not a second?
Varys: This Hand is not the other.
Illyrio Mopatis: We need time. Khal Drogo will not make his move until his son is born. You know how these savages are.
Varys: "Delay," you say. "Move fast, " I reply. This is no longer a game for two players.
Illyrio Mopatis: It never was.

The two men leave, Varys locks a gate behind them. Arya runs to the gate and can’t get out. She takes off in the other direction, deeper into the dungeon, to find an exit.


- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Varys enters the Throne Room, where Baelish is standing, looking at the throne.

Varys: The first to arrive and the last to leave. I admire your industry.
Petyr Baelish: You do move quietly.
Varys: We all have our qualities.
Petyr Baelish: You look a bit lonely today. You should pay a visit to my brothel this evening. First boy is on the house.
Varys: I think you're mistaking business with pleasure.
Petyr Baelish: Am I? All those birds that whisper in your ear, such pretty little things. Trust me, we accommodate all inclinations.
Varys: Oh, I'm sure. Lord Redwyne likes his boys very young, I hear.
Petyr Baelish: I'm a purveyor of beauty and discretion, both equally important.
Varys: Though I suppose beauty is a subjective quality, no? Is it true that Ser Marlon of Tumblestone prefers amputees?
Petyr Baelish: All desires are valid to a man with a full purse.
Varys: And I heard the most awful rumor about a certain lord with a taste for fresh cadavers. Must be enormously difficult to accommodate that inclination. The logistics alone... to find beautiful corpses before they rot.
Petyr Baelish: Strictly speaking, such a thing would not be in accordance with the King's laws.
Varys: Strictly speaking.
Petyr Baelish: Tell me. Does someone, somewhere, keep your balls in a little box? I've often wondered.
Varys: Do you know, I have no idea where they are? And we had been so close. But enough about me. How have you been since we last saw each other?
Petyr Baelish: Since you last saw me or since I last saw you?
Varys: Now the last time I saw you, you were talking to the Hand of the King.
Petyr Baelish: Saw me with your own eyes?
Varys: Eyes I own.
Petyr Baelish: Council business. We all have so much to discuss with Ned Stark.
Varys: Everyone's well aware of your enduring fondness for Lord Stark's wife. If the Lannisters were behind the attempt on the Stark boy's life and it was discovered that you helped the Starks come to that conclusion... To think... A simple word to the Queen...
Petyr Baelish: One shudders at the thought.
Varys: Oh.
Petyr Baelish: But you know something? I do believe that I have seen you even more recently than you have seen me.
Varys: Have you?
Petyr Baelish: Yes. Earlier today, I distinctly recall seeing you talking to Lord Stark in his chambers.
Varys: Was that you under the bed?
Petyr Baelish: And not long after that when I saw you escorting a certain foreign dignitary... Council business? Of course you would have friends from across The Narrow Sea. You're from there yourself, after all. We're friends, aren't we, Lord Varys? I'd like to think we are. So you can imagine my burden, wondering if the King might question my friend's sympathies… To stand at a crossroads where turning left means loyalty to a friend, turning right, loyalty to the realm.
Varys: Oh, please.
Petyr Baelish: To find myself in a position where a simple word to the King --

Renly enters from a different doorway and cuts both men off.

Renly Baratheon: What are you two conspiring about? Well, whatever it is, you'd best hurry up. My brother is coming.
Petyr Baelish: To a small council meeting?
Varys: Disturbing news from far away. Haven't you heard?

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Arya exits a tunnel outside of King’s Landing, at the beach of Blackwater Bay. She heads to the city’s gate but is stopped by two guards.

Guard 1: Off with you. No begging.
Arya Stark: I'm not a beggar. I live here.
Guard 1: D'you want a smack on your ear to help you with your hearing?
Arya Stark: I want to see my father.
Guard 2: I want to fuck the Queen, for all the good it does me.
Guard 1: You want your father, boy? He's lying on the floor of some tavern, getting pissed on by his friends.
Arya Stark: My father is Hand of the King! I'm not a boy. I'm Arya Stark of Winterfell and if you lay a hand on me, my father will have both your heads on spikes! Now are you going to let me by or do I need to smack you on the ear to help with your hearing?

Quick cut to Arya standing in front of Ned at his desk.

Eddard Stark: You know I had half my guard out searching for you? You promised me this would stop.
Arya Stark: They said they were going to kill you.
Eddard Stark: Who did?
Arya Stark: I didn't see them, but I think one was fat.
Eddard Stark: Oh, Arya.
Arya Stark: I'm not lying! They said you found the bastard and the wolves are fighting the lions and the savage... something about the savage.
Eddard Stark: Where did you hear this?
Arya Stark: In the dungeons, near the dragon skulls.
Eddard Stark: What were you doing in the dungeons?
Arya Stark: Chasing a cat.

A knock at the door, Jory pokes his head in.

Jory Cassel: Pardon, my Lord. There's a Night's Watchman here begging a word. He says it's urgent.
Eddard Stark: Your name, friend?
Yoren: Yoren, if it please. This must be your son. He has the look.
Arya Stark: I'm a girl!
Eddard Stark: Did Benjen send you?
Yoren: No one sent me, my Lord. I'm here to find men for The Wall, see if there's any scum in the dungeons that might be fit for service.
Eddard Stark: Ah, we'll find recruits for you.
Yoren: Thank you, my Lord. But that's not why I disturb you now. Your brother, Benjen... his blood runs black, makes him as much my brother as yours. It's for his sake I rode here so hard I damn near killed my horse! There are others riding too. The whole city will know by tomorrow.
Eddard Stark: Know what?
Yoren: Best said in private, my Lord.
Eddard Stark: Go on. We'll talk more later.
Eddard Stark: Jory, take her safely to her room.
Jory Cassel: Come along, my Lady. You heard your father.

Jory escorts Arya to her room.

Arya Stark: How many guards does my father have?
Jory Cassel: Here in King's Landing? Fifty.
Arya Stark: You wouldn't let anyone kill him, would you?
Jory Cassel: No fear on that count, little Lady.

Ned and Yoren are now alone in Ned’s chambers.

Eddard Stark: Well?
Yoren: It's about your wife, my Lord. She's taken the Imp.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

As Catelyn, Tyrion and her men are arriving to the Vale, they’re met by a group of guards.

Vardis Egen: You're far from home, Lady Stark.
Catelyn Stark: To whom do I speak?
Vardis Egen: Ser Vardis Egen, Knight of The Vale. Is Lady Arryn expecting your visit?
Catelyn Stark: There was no time to send word.
Vardis Egen: May I ask, my Lady, why he is with you?
Catelyn Stark: That's why there was no time. He is my prisoner.
Vardis Egen: He doesn't look like a prisoner.
Catelyn Stark: My sister will decide what he looks like.
Vardis Egen: Yes, my Lady. She will at that.

The guards all turn their horses and escort Catelyn and her men towards the Eyrie.

Tyrion Lannister: The Eyrie. They say it's impregnable.
Bronn: Give me 10 good men and some climbing spikes... I'll impregnate the bitch.
Tyrion Lannister: I like you.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Ned is walking through a courtyard at King’s Landing, heading for the King Robert’s chambers. He is stopped by a royal steward.

Steward: Lord Stark, your presence has been requested in the small council chamber. A meeting has been called.
Eddard Stark: I need to see the King first -- alone.
Steward: The King is at the small council meeting, my Lord. He has summoned you.
Eddard Stark: Is it about my wife?
Steward: No, my Lord. I believe it concerns Daenerys Targaryen.

Now at the small council meeting with everyone on the council, as well as King Robert.

Robert Baratheon: The whore is pregnant.
Eddard Stark: You're speaking of murdering a child.
Robert Baratheon: I warned you this would happen. Back in the North, I warned you, but you didn't care to hear. Well, hear it now. I want 'em dead, mother and child both. And that fool, Viserys as well. Is that plain enough for you? I want them both dead.
Eddard Stark: You will dishonor yourself forever if you do this.
Robert Baratheon: Honor?! I've got Seven Kingdoms to rule! One King, Seven Kingdoms. Do you think honor keeps them in line? Do you think it's honor that's keeping the peace? It's fear! Fear and blood!
Eddard Stark: Then we're no better than the Mad King.
Robert Baratheon: Careful, Ned. Careful now.
Eddard Stark: You want to assassinate a girl... Because the Spider heard a rumor?
Varys: No rumor, my Lord. The princess is with child.
Eddard Stark: Based on whose information?
Varys: Ser Jorah Mormont. He is serving as adviser to the Targaryens.
Eddard Stark: Mormont? You bring us the whispers of a traitor half a world away and call it fact?
Petyr Baelish: Jorah Mormont's a slaver, not a traitor. Small difference, I know, to an honorable man.
Eddard Stark: He broke the law, betrayed his family, fled our land. We commit murder on the word of this man?
Robert Baratheon: And if he's right? If she has a son? A Targaryen at the head of a Dothraki army… What then?
Eddard Stark: The Narrow Sea still lies between us. I'll fear the Dothraki the day they teach their horses to run on water.
Robert Baratheon: Do nothing? That's your wise advice? Do nothing til our enemies are on our shores? You're my council? Counsel! Speak sense to this honorable fool.
Varys: I understand your misgivings, my Lord. Truly, I do. It is a terrible thing we must consider, a vile thing. Yet, we who presume to rule must sometimes do vile things for the good of the realm. Should the gods grant Daenerys a son, the realm will bleed.
Grand Maester Pycelle: I bear this girl no ill will, but should the Dothraki invade, how many innocents will die? How many towns will burn? Is it not wiser, kinder even, that she should die now so that tens of thousands might live?
Renly Baratheon: We should have had them both killed years ago.
Petyr Baelish: When you find yourself in bed with an ugly woman, best close your eyes, get it over with. Cut her throat. Be done with it.
Eddard Stark: I followed you into war - twice, without doubts, without second thoughts. But I will not follow you now. The Robert I grew up with didn't tremble at the shadow of an unborn child.
Robert Baratheon: She dies.
Eddard Stark: I will have no part in it.
Robert Baratheon: You're the King's Hand, Lord Stark. You'll do as I command or I'll find me a Hand who will.

Ned removes his badge and places it on the table in front of Robert.

Eddard Stark: And good luck to him. I thought you were a better man.
Robert Baratheon: Out! Out, damn you! I'm done with you. Go! Run back to Winterfell! I'll have your head on a spike! I'll put it there myself, you fool! You think you're too good for this? Too proud and honorable? This is a war!

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Ned is in his chambers quickly packing his things.

Eddard Stark: I'll go ahead with my daughters. Get them ready. Do it yourself. Don't ask anyone for help.
Jory Cassel: Right away, my Lord. Lord Baelish is here for you.
Petyr Baelish: His Grace went on about you at some length after you took your leave. The word "treason" was mentioned.
Eddard Stark: What can I do for you?
Petyr Baelish: When do you return to Winterfell?
Eddard Stark: Why? What do you care?
Petyr Baelish: If you're still here come nightfall, I'll take you to see the last person Jon Arryn spoke with before falling ill. If that sort of thing still interests you.
Eddard Stark: I don't have the time.
Petyr Baelish: It won't take more than an hour. But as you please.

Baelish exits Ned’s chambers, Ned speaks to Jory briefly and then takes off for Baelish.

Eddard Stark: Round up all the men we have and station them outside the girls' chambers. Who are your best two swords?
Jory Cassel: Heward and Wyl.
Eddard Stark: Find them and meet me at the stables.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At the Eyrie, Catelyn, her men, and Tyrion are all standing in front of Lady Arryn. Her son is sitting on her lap, breastfeeding. He is clearly too old to be doing so.

Lysa Arryn: You bring him here without permission? You pollute my home with his presence? Your aunt has done a bad thing, Robin, a very bad thing. You remember her, don't you? Isn't he beautiful? And strong too. Jon knew it. His last words were, "the seed is strong." He wanted everyone to know what a good, strong boy his son would grow up to be. Look at him, the Lord of all the Vale.
Catelyn Stark: Lysa, you wrote me about the Lannisters, warning me t-
Lysa Arryn: To stay away from them! Not to bring one here!
Robin Arryn: Mommy? Is that the bad man?
Lysa Arryn: It is.
Robin Arryn: He's little.
Lysa Arryn: He's Tyrion the Imp of House Lannister. He killed your father. He murdered the Hand of the King!
Tyrion Lannister: Oh? Did I kill him too? I've been a very busy man.
Lysa Arryn: You will watch your tongue! These men are Knights of the Vale. Every one of the loved Jon Arryn. Every one of them would die for me.
Tyrion Lannister: If any harm comes to me, my brother, Jaime, will see that they do.
Robin Arryn: You can't hurt us! No one can hurt us here! Tell him, mommy! Tell him!
Lysa Arryn: Shh... Shh... Shh, my sweet boy. He's just trying to frighten us. Lannisters are all liars. No one will hurt my baby.
Robin Arryn: Mommy... I want to see the bad man fly.
Lysa Arryn: Perhaps you will, my little love.
Catelyn Stark: This man is my prisoner. I will not have him harmed.
Lysa Arryn: Ser Vardis, my sister's guest is weary. Take him down below so he can rest. Introduce him to Mord.

Mord throws Tyrion into a “skycell.”

Mord: You go sleep, dwarf man. Sleep good, little dwarf. man!

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back at King’s Landing, inside Renly Baratheon’s chambers. He is sitting, shirtless, with Loras Tyrell kneeling beside him shaving his chest. Loras is also shirtless.

Loras Tyrell: Lord Stark's lucky he still has a head.
Renly Baratheon: Robert will rant for a few days, but he won't do anything. He adores the man.
Loras Tyrell: You're jealous.
Renly Baratheon: Are you sure this won't hurt?
Loras Tyrell: Only if I slip.
Renly Baratheon: And you prefer me like this?
Loras Tyrell: Mhmm.
Renly Baratheon: If you want hairless, maybe you should find a little boy.
Loras Tyrell: I want you.
Renly Baratheon: My brother thinks that anyone who hasn't been to war isn't a man. He treats me as if I'm a spoiled child. Oh, and you're not? Loras Tyrell, the Knight of the Flowers? How many wars have you fought in? Oh, and how much did your father spend on that armor of yours?
Loras Tyrell: Hold still.
Renly Baratheon: All I ever hear from Robert and Stannis is how I'm not tough enough, how I squirm at the sight of blood.
Loras Tyrell: You did vomit when that boy's eye was knocked out in the mêlée.
Renly Baratheon:His eye was dangling out of the damn socket!
Loras Tyrell: He shouldn't have entered the mêlée if he didn't know how to fight.
Renly Baratheon: Easy for you to say. Not everyone is such a gifted swordsman.
Loras Tyrell: It's not a gift. No one gave it to me. I'm good because I work at it -- every day of my life since I could hold a stick.
Renly Baratheon: I could work at fighting all day, every day, and still never be as good as you.
Loras Tyrell: Yes well, I guess we'll never know.

Finished with Renly’s chest, Loras raises his arm so he can shave his armpit.

Renly Baratheon: Everywhere?
Loras Tyrell: Everywhere. So how did it end up? The Targaryen girl will die?
Renly Baratheon: It needs to be done, unpleasant as it is. Robert's rather tasteless about it. Every time he talks about killing her, I swear the table rises six inches.
Loras Tyrell: It's a shame he can't muster the same enthusiasm for his wife.
Renly Baratheon: He does have a deep, abiding lust for her money. You have to give it to the Lannisters, they may be the most pompous, ponderous cunts the gods ever suffered to walk the world, but they do have outrageous amounts of money.
Loras Tyrell: I have an outrageous amount of money.
Renly Baratheon: Not as much as the Lannisters.
Loras Tyrell: But a lot more than you.
Renly Baratheon: Robert's threatening to take me hunting with him. Last time we were out there for two weeks, tramping through the trees in the rain, day after day. All so he can stick his spear into something's flesh! Oh. but Robert loves his killing. And he's the King.
Loras Tyrell: Hmm... How did that ever happen?
Renly Baratheon: Because he loves his killing and he used to be good at it.
Loras Tyrell: Do you know who should be King?
Renly Baratheon: Be serious.
Loras Tyrell: I am. My father could be your bank. I've never fought in a war before, but I'd fight for you.
Renly Baratheon: I'm fourth in line.
Loras Tyrell: And where was Robert in the line of royal succession? Joffrey is a monster. Tommen is eight.
Renly Baratheon: Stannis?
Loras Tyrell: Stannis has the personality of a lobster.
Renly Baratheon: He's still my older brother.

Loras cuts Renly under his arm.

Renly Baratheon: What are you doing?!
Loras Tyrell: Look at it.
Renly Baratheon: You cut me!
Loras Tyrell: It's just blood. We've all got it in us. Sometimes a little spills. If you become King, you're going to see a lot of this. You need to get used to it. Go on. Look. People love you. They love to serve you because you're kind to them. They want to be near you.
Loras Tyrell: You're willing to do what needs to be done, but you don't gloat over it. You don't love killing. Where is it written that power is the sole province of the worst? That thrones are only made for the hated and the feared. You would be a wonderful King.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


Cersei enters King Robert’s chambers.

Cersei Baratheon: I'm sorry your marriage to Ned Stark didn't work out. You seemed so good together.
Robert Baratheon: I'm glad I could do something to make you happy.
Cersei Baratheon: Without a Hand, everything will fall to pieces.
Robert Baratheon: I suppose this is where you tell me to give the job to your brother Jaime.
Cersei Baratheon: No. He's not serious enough. I'll say this for Ned Stark - he's serious enough. Was it really worth it? Losing him this way?
Robert Baratheon: I don't know. But I do know this, if the Targaryen girl convinces her horse-lord husband to invade and the Dothraki horde crosses The Narrow Sea... We won't be able to stop them.
Cersei Baratheon: The Dothraki don't sail. Every child knows that. They don't have discipline. They don't have armor. They don't have siege weapons.
Robert Baratheon: It's a neat little trick you do, you move your lips and your father's voice comes out.
Cersei Baratheon: Is my father wrong?
Robert Baratheon: Let's say Viserys Targaryen lands with forty thousand Dothraki screamers at his back. We hole up in our castles, a wise move. Only a fool would meet the Dothraki in an open field. They leave us in our castles. They go from town to town, looting and burning, killing every man who can't hide behind a stone wall, stealing all our crops and livestock, enslaving all our women and children. How long do the people of the Seven Kingdoms stand behind their absentee King, their cowardly King hiding behind high walls? When do the people decide that Viserys Targaryen is the rightful monarch after all.
Cersei Baratheon: We still outnumber them.
Robert Baratheon: Which is the bigger number -- five or one?
Cersei Baratheon: Five.
Robert Baratheon: Five... one. One army, a real army, united behind one leader with one purpose. Our purpose died with the Mad King. Now we've got as many armies as there are men with gold in their purse. And everybody wants something different. Your father wants to own the world. Ned Stark wants to run away and bury his head in the snow.
Cersei Baratheon: What do you want?
Robert Baratheon: We haven't had a real fight in nine years. Back-stabbing doesn't prepare you for a fight. And that's all the realm is now, back-stabbing and scheming and arse-licking and money-grubbing. Sometimes I don't know what holds it together.
Cersei Baratheon: Our marriage.

The two begin laughing.

Robert Baratheon: Ah, so here we sit, seventeen years later, holding it all together. Don't you get tired?
Cersei Baratheon: Every day.
Robert Baratheon: How long can hate hold a thing together?
Cersei Baratheon: Well, seventeen years is quite a long time.
Robert Baratheon: Yes, it is.
Cersei Baratheon: Yes, it tis. What was she like?
Robert Baratheon: You've never asked about her, not once. Why not?
Cersei Baratheon: At first, just saying her name, even in private felt like I was breathing life back into her. I thought if I didn't talk about her, she'd just fade away for you. When I realized that wasn't going to happen, I refused to ask out of spite. I didn't want to give you the satisfaction of thinking I cared enough to ask. And eventually it became clear that my spite didn't mean anything to you, as far as I could tell, you actually enjoyed it.
Robert Baratheon: So why now?
Cersei Baratheon: What harm could Lyanna Stark's ghost do to either of us that we haven't done to each other a hundred times over?
Robert Baratheon: You want to know the horrible truth? I can't even remember what she looked like. I only know she was the one thing I ever wanted... Someone took her away from me, and Seven Kingdoms couldn't fill the hole she left behind.
Cersei Baratheon: I felt something for you once, you know?
Robert Baratheon: I know.
Cersei Baratheon: Even after we lost our first boy -- for quite a while, actually. Was it ever possible for us? Was there ever a time, ever a... moment?
Robert Baratheon: No. Does that make you feel better or worse?
Cersei Baratheon: It doesn't make me feel anything.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Inside one of Baelish’s brothels, Ned is speaking to one of the prostitutes. Jory and Baelish are in the next room.

Mhaegen: She looks like him, don't she, my Lord? She has his nose, his black hair.
Eddard Stark: Aye.
Mhaegen: Tell him when you see him, my Lord. If it please you... Tell him how beautiful she is.
Eddard Stark: I will.
Mhaegen: And tell him I've been with no one else. I swear it, my Lord, by the old gods and new. I don't want no jewels or nothing, just him. The King was always good to me.
Eddard Stark: When Jon Arryn came to visit you, what did he want?
Mhaegen: He wasn't that sort of man, my Lord. He just wanted to know if the child was happy, healthy.
Eddard Stark: She looks healthy enough to me. The girl shall want for nothing.

Ned breaks off from Mhaegen and enters the same room as Baelish and Jory.

Petyr Baelish: Brothels make a much better investment than ship, I've found. Whores rarely sink.
Eddard Stark: What do you know of King Robert's bastards?
Petyr Baelish: Well, he has more than you, for a start.
Eddard Stark: How many?
Petyr Baelish: Does it matter? If you fuck enough women, some of them will give you presents.
Eddard Stark: And Jon Arryn tracked them all down. Why?
Petyr Baelish: He was the King's Hand. Perhaps Robert wanted them looked after. He was overcome with fatherly love.
Eddard Stark: Come.

Jory is staring at one of the whores, who flashes him her breast.

Eddard Stark: Jory!
Jory Cassel: My Lord.

Ned and Jory leave the brothel with a few of Ned’s men. They are suddenly surround by Jaime Lannister and his men.

Jaime Lannister: Such a small pack of wolves.
Jory Cassel: Stay back, Ser! This is the Hand of the King!
Jaime Lannister: Was!... the Hand of the King. Now I'm not sure what he is... Lord of somewhere very far away.
Petyr Baelish: What's the meaning of this, Lannister?
Jaime Lannister: Get back inside where it's safe. I'm looking for my brother. You remember my brother, don't you, Lord Stark? Blond hair, sharp tongue, short man.
Eddard Stark: I remember him well.
Jaime Lannister: It seems he had some trouble on the road. You wouldn't know what happened to him, would you?
Eddard Stark:He was taken at my command to answer for his crimes.

Jaime draws his sword, causing all of them men on both sides to draw their swords, except for Eddard.

Petyr Baelish: My Lords! I'll bring the City Watch!
Jaime Lannister: Come, Stark. I'd rather you die sword in hand.
Jory Cassel: If you threaten my Lord again...
Jaime Lannister: Threaten? As in, "I'm going to open your Lord from balls to brains and see what Starks are made of”?
Eddard Stark: You kill me, your brother's a dead man.
Jaime Lannister: You're right. Take him alive! Kill his men!

A fight erupts, first Jaime’s men throw spears straight into the chests of two of Ned’s men. Ned draws his sword and moves towards Jaime, fending off several guards in the process. Jory gets to Jaime first. Jaime stabs Jory with a dagger straight through his eye. The fighting ceases and Ned moves forward to Jaime, Jaime’s men all stop to watch the fight. The two fend each other off, as they break, one of Jaime’s guards stabs Ned in the back of the leg with a spear, causing him to fall to the ground. Jaime is openly frustrated and knocks the guard out. He mounts his horse.

Jaime Lannister: My brother, Lord Stark... We want him back.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
A Golden Crown
Game of Thrones
Featuring Daniel Minahan
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 1 Scripts
A GOLDEN CROWN
Opens at King’s Landing, assumed to be Ned’s quarters. He opens his eyes to find Cersei and King Robert at his bedside.

Eddard Stark: Your pardon, your Grace.
Cersei Baratheon: Do you know what your wife has done?
Eddard Stark: She did nothing I did not command.
Robert Baratheon: Who’d have thought she had it in her?
Cersei Baratheon: By what right dare you lay hands on my blood?
Eddard Stark: I am the King’s Hand -
Cersei Baratheon: You were the King’s Hand!
Eddard Stark: - trying to keep the peace -
Cersei Baratheon: You shall now be held accountable.
Robert Baratheon: Oh, will both of you shut your mouths? Catelyn will release Tyrion and you’ll make your peace with Jaime.
Eddard Stark: He butchered my men.
Cersei Baratheon: Lord Stark was returning drunk from a brothel when his men attacked Jaime.
Robert Baratheon: Quiet, woman.
Eddard Stark: Jaime has fled the city. Give me leave to bring him back to justice.
Cersei Baratheon: I took you for a king.
Robert Baratheon: Hold your tongue.
Cersei Baratheon: He’s attacked my brother and abducted the other. I should wear the armor and you the gown.
Robert smacks Cersei.

Cersei Baratheon: I shall wear this like a badge of honor.
Robert Baratheon: Wear it in silence or I’ll honor you again.

Cersei exits the room, slamming the door shut behind her.

Robert Baratheon: See what she does to me? My loving wife. I should not have hit her. That was not… That was not kingly.
Eddard Stark: If we don’t act… there will be a war.
Robert Baratheon: So tell your wife to return that little shit of an Imp to King’s Landing. She’s had her fun, now put an end to it. You hear me? Send a raven and put an end to it.
Eddard Stark: And what about Jaime Lannister? What about Jaime?
Robert Baratheon: I’m half a kingdom in debt to his bloody father. I don’t know what happened between you and those yellow-haired shits. I don’t want to know. This is what matters - I can’t rule the kingdoms if the Starks and the Lannisters are at each other’s throats, so enough!
Eddard Stark: As you command your Grace. With your leave, I will return to Winterfell and set matters straight.
Robert Baratheon: Piss on that! Send a raven. I want you to stay. I’m the king, I get what I want… I never loved my brothers. A sad thing for a man to admit, but it’s true. You were the brother I chose. We’ll talk when I return from the hunt.

Robert throws the Hand of the King’s badge onto the bed where Ned is laying.

Eddard Stark: The hunt?
Robert Baratheon: Killing things clears my head. You’ll have to sit on the throne while I’m away. You’ll hate it more than I do.
Eddard Stark: The Targaryen girl -
Robert Baratheon: Seven hells! Don’t start with her again! The girl will die and I’ll hear no more of it. Put on the badge. And if you ever take it off again, I swear to the mother I’ll pin the damn thing on Jaime Lannister.

Robert exits the room, slamming the door shut behind him. Ned picks up the badge and looks at it.

- - - - - - - - - -

Back at Vaes Dothrak across the sea, Daenerys is holding one of her prized dragon eggs. She looks up at a pot of coals inside of her tent. She walks over and places the egg into the coals. Irri walks into the tent.

Irri: Khaleesi?

Daenerys picks up the egg from the coals.

Irri: Oh, Khaleesi!

Irri takes the egg from her hands, dropping it instantly because of the heat. She looks at Daenerys’ hands and there are no burn marks. The two compare hands, Irri’s have burn marks.

Daenerys Targaryen: You’re hurt.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - -

A raven caws. Bran is shooting his bow in the courtyard. The raven flies to the crypts of Winterfell, Bran follows. As he enters, again making eye contact with the bird. The raven flies deeper into the crypts. We then see Bran sleeping in his bed, showing that this was another vision, we hear footsteps running towards his door. His door swings opens and Bran sits up in bed breathing heavily. Hodor is carrying the contraption that Tyrion brought the blueprints for. Bran smiles. We then cut to the woods of Winterfell where Bran is shouting as he’s riding on the back of a horse.

Robb Stark: Not too fast.
Bran Stark: Come on, Dancer. (to his horse)
Theon Greyjoy: When are you gonna tell him?
Robb Stark: Not now.
Theon Greyjoy: Blood for blood. You need to make the Lannisters to pay for Jory and the others.
Robb Stark: You’re talking about war.
Theon Greyjoy: I’m talking about justice.
Robb Stark: Only the Lord of Winterfell can call in the bannermen and raise an army.
Theon Greyjoy: A Lannister put his spear through your father’s leg. The Kingslayer rides to Casterly Rock where no one can touch -
Robb Stark:You want me to march on Casterly Rock?!
Theon Greyjoy: You’re not a boy anymore. They attacked your father. They’ve already started the war. It’s your duty to represent your House when your father can’t.
Robb Stark: And it’s not your duty, because it’s not your House.

It goes silent, Bran can no longer be heard jeering at his horse. Robb looks at Theon and stands up looking through the woods.

Robb Stark: Where’s Bran?
Theon Greyjoy: I don’t know. It’s not my House.

Theon stands up and walks away from Robb, who begins to look around. We cut to Bran riding slowly through the woods. We see someone creeping up behind him as his horse is nickering. As Bran enters a clearing, several Wildlings surround him.

Bran Stark: Robb?
Osha: All alone in the deep dark woods.
Bran Stark: I’m not alone, my brother is with me.
Wildling: I don’t see him. Got him hidden under your cloak?
Osha: Oh, that’s a pretty pin. Silver.
Wildling: We’ll take the pin. And the horse. Get down… Be quick about it.
Bran Stark: I can’t. The saddle, the straps.
Wildling: What’s wrong with you? You some kind of cripple?
Bran Stark: I’m Brandon Stark of Winterfell and if you don’t let me be, I’ll have you all killed!
Wildling 2: Cut his little cock off and stuff it in his mouth.
Osha: the boy’s worth nothing dead. Benjen Stark’s own blood. Think what Mance would give us.

A Wildling is cutting Bran’s straps to his saddle, accidentally slicing into Bran’s leg but he feels no pain.

Wildling: Piss on Mance rayder and piss on the North. We’re going as far south as south goes. There ain’t no white walkers down in Dorne.

Robb comes into view, behind the four Wildlings.

Robb Stark: Drop the knife. Let him go and I’ll let you live.

One of the Wildlings storms at Robb who evades an axe attack. Robb counters, slicing the Wildling’s throat. Osha charges Robb who tosses her spins her around by her hair. He fights off and kills the other Wildling. The Wilding in charge has Bran off of his horse with a knife at his throat, meanwhile Robb has Osha (female Wildling) and a knife to her throat.

Bran Stark: Robb!
Wildling: Shut up! Drop the blade!
Bran Stark: No, don’t.
Wildling: Do it.

Robb looks at Bran and then back up at the Wildling. He then slowly sets his sword on the ground, still gripping Osha by her hair. He looks back up at the Wildling who suddenly gets an arrow through his chest from his back. As he drops to the ground bleeding, we see Theona few yards behind him with a bow. The Wildling falls dead, Theon approaches. Robb releases Osha from his grasp as Theon walks over drawing his bow on her. Robb moves over to Bran.

Robb Stark: Are you all right?
Bran Stark: Yes, it doesn’t hurt.
Theon Greyjoy: Tough little lad. In the Iron Islands, you’re not a man until you’ve killed your first enemy. Well done.
Robb Stark: Have you lost your mind? What if you’d missed?
Theon Greyjoy: He would have killed you and cut Bran’s throat.
Robb Stark: You don’t have the right -
Theon Greyjoy: To what, to save your brother’s life? It was the only thing to do, so I did it.
Robb Stark: What about her?
Osha: Give me my life, my lord, and I’m yours.
Robb Stark: We’ll keep her alive.

Osha gives a sigh of release, Theon releases his bow and Robb, holding Bran, assures that he’s okay.

- - - - - - - - - - - - -

Now at the Eyrie, Tyrion is sleeping and rolls to his side at the very edge of his skycell. He awakes, quickly moving back to the wall. He steps over to the door to his cell and begins pounding on it.

Tyrion Lannister: Mord! Turnkey! Mord! Mord!

The door swings open and Mord rushes in, batting Tyrion to the opposite side of the cell.

Mord: Dwarf man making noise!
Tyrion Lannister: How would you like to be rich?
Mord: Dwarf man still making noise.
Tyrion Lannister: My family is rich. We have gold, lots of gold. I’m prepared to give you lots of gold.

Mord quickly searches Tyrion’s pockets for gold.

Mord: No gold!
Tyrion Lannister: Well, I don’t have it here.
Mord: No gold! Fuck off.

Mord hits Tyrion once more with his club then storms out of the cell, shutting the door behind him.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Now in a hall at King’s Landing. We see Syrio shutting a door and holding two wooden swords. He slowly steps down towards Arya and tosses her one of the swords, she seamlessly catches it as he takes his fighting stance.

Arya Stark: I don’t want to practice today.
Syrio Forel: No?
Arya Stark: They killed Jory. My father is hurt. I don’t care about stupid wooden swords.
Syrio Forel: You are troubled.
Arya Stark: Yes -
Syrio Forel: Good! Trouble is the perfect time for training. When you are dancing in the meadow with your dolls and kittens, this is not when fighting happens.
Arya Stark: I don’t like dolls and k -
Syrio Forel: You’re not here. You’re with your trouble. If you’re with your trouble when fighting happens…

Arya makes a move for Syrio, who quickly counters and puts her on her back.

Syrio Forel: … More trouble for you. Just so… How can you be quick as a snake, or as quiet as a shadow, when you are somewhere else? You are fearing for your father, hmm? That is right. Do you pray to the gods?
Syrio Forel: The old and the new.
Syrio Forel: There is only one god. And his name is death. And there is only one thing we say to death - “Not today.”

Syrio steps back and tosses Arya her sword back, she catches it and assumes the counter position.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back across the sea in Vaes Dothrak, we’re inside a large communal tent. Daenerys is centered around everyone and eating the heart of a horse a the Dothraki and a priest chant around her. Her husband Khal Drogo looks on in anticipation as she continues eating.

Viserys Targaryen: She has to eat a whole heart? I hope that wasn’t my horse.
Jorah Mormont: She’s doing well.
Viserys Targaryen: She’ll never keep it down.

She keeps eating the heart, nearing the end. The Dothraki onlookers all chant in unison, getting louder and louder. The priestess is also chanting, louder and louder. Khal Drogo stares more intently at his wife, she stares back. The chanting grows louder, as does the priestess.

Viserys Targaryen: Tell me what she is saying.
Jorah Mormont: “The prince is riding. I have heard the thunder of the hooves. Swift as the wind he rides. His enemies will cower before him… and their wives will weep tears of blood.”

The eating and chantines intensifies as Viserys looks on in shock.

Jorah Mormont: She’s going to have a boy.
Viserys Targaryen: He won’t be a real Targaryen. He won’t be a true dragon.

As the chanting is at it’s loudest, Daenerys has finished with the heart. Everyone looks on in anticipations, she wretches forward, on the verge of puking. The chanting suddenly halts. Khal Drogo leans in and looks intensly. Daenerys holds everything in and sobs. Her hands bloody, she slowly sits up, keeping everything in as she gulps the final bite. The priestess begins to speak, Jorah translates directly for Viserys.

Jora: “The stallion who mounts the world.” The stallion, is the khal of khals. He shall unite the people into a single khalasar. All the people of the world will be his herd.

Daenerys rises to her feet, speaking in Dothraki to the room.

Daenerys Targaryen: A prince rides inside me! And he shall be called Rhaego!

The room begins chanting, “Rhaego! Rhaego!” As the chanting grows louder and louder, Drogo stands up and walks up to Daenerys.

Viserys Targaryen: They love her.

The room’s chanting gets even louder. Drogo hugs his wife at her thighs and hoists her up, carrying her around the room.

Jorah Mormont: She truly is a queen today.

Jorah looks to his right towards Viserys, who has now slipped out. We cut to Daenerys’ tent. Inside, Viserys opens the container that holds her dragon eggs. He sighs and then puts them into a sack. Jorah walks into the tent behind him, blocking the door.

Jorah Mormont: Don’t let them see you carrying a sword in Vaes Dothrak. You know the law.
Viserys Targaryen: It’s not my law.
Jorah Mormont: They don’t belong to you.
Viserys Targaryen: Whatever is hers is also mine.
Jorah Mormont: Once, perhaps.
Viserys Targaryen: If I sell one egg, I’ll have enough to buy a ship. Two eggs - a ship and an army.
Jorah Mormont: And you have all three.
Viserys Targaryen: I need a large army… I’m the last hope of a dynasty, Mormont. The greatest dynasty this world has ever seen, on my shoulders since I was five years old and no one has ever given me what they gave to her in that tent. Never. Not a piece of it… How can I carry what I need to carry without it? Hmm? Who can rule without wealth, or fear, or love? Oh, you stand there, all nobility and honor. You don’t think I see you looking at my little sister, hmm? Don’t think I know what you want? I don’t care. You can have her. She can be queen of the savages and dine on the finest bloody horseparts, and you can dine on whichever parts of her you like. But let me go.
Jorah Mormont: You can go, but you can’t have the eggs.
Viserys Targaryen: You swore an oath to me. Does loyalty mean nothing to you?
Jorah Mormont: It means everything to me.
Viserys Targaryen: And yet here you stand?
Jorah Mormont: And here I stand.

Viserys and Jorah stare at each other for a moment, before Viserys drops the sack containing the dragon eggs to the floor. Jorah steps aside, unblocking the exit. Viserys leaves.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back at the skycell below the Eyrie. Tyrion is again shouting for Mord.

Tyrion Lannister: Mord! Mord! Mord! Mord! Mord!
Mord: Noise again!
Tyrion Lannister: About the gold -
Mord: No gold!
Tyrion Lannister: Listen to me! Listen to me! Sometimes possession… is an abstract concept. When they captured me they took my purse, but the gold is still mine.
Mord: Where?
Tyrion Lannister: Where? I don’t know where, but when they free me -
Mord: You want free? Go be free. (points out of the skycell)
Tyrion Lannister: Have you ever heard the phrase “Rich as a Lannister”? Of course you have. You’re a smart man. You know who the Lannisters are. I am a Lannister. Tyrion, son of Tywin! And of course, you have also heard the phrase, “a Lannister always pays his debts.” If you deliver a message from me to Lady Arryn, I will be in your debt. I will owe you gold. If you deliver the message and I live, which I very much intend to do.
Mord: What message?
Tyrion Lannister: Tell her I wish to confess my crimes.

We cut to the throne room, where Lady Arryn and her son Robin are sitting on the throne, at the helm of the room. Catelyn is standing next to them, as Robin is tapping a knife against the throne itself very annoyingly.

Lysa Arryn: You wish to confess your crimes?
Tyrion Lannister: Yes, my lady. I do, my lady.
Lysa Arryn: Skycells always break them. Speak, Imp. Meet your gods as an honest man.
Tyrion Lannister: Where do I begin, my lords and ladies? I’m a vile man, I confess it. My crimes and sins are beyond counting. I have lied and cheated, gambled and whored. I’m not particularly good at violence, but I’m good at convincing others to do violence for me. You want specifics, I suppose. When I was seven, I saw a servant girl bathing in the river. I stole her robe. She was forced to return to the castle, naked and in tears. I close my eyes, I can still see her tits bouncing. When I was ten, I stuffed my uncle’s boots with goatshit. When confronted with my crime, I blamed a squire. Poor boy was flogged and… I escaped justice. When I was twelve, I milked my eel into a pot of turtle stew. I flogged the one-eyed snake. I skinned my sausage. I made the bald man cry into the turtle stew, which I do believe my sister ate. At least I hope she did. I once brought a jackass and a honeycomb into a brothel -
Lysa Arryn: Silence!
Robin Arryn:What happened next?!
Lysa Arryn: What do you think you’re doing?
Tyrion Lannister: Confessing my crimes.
Catelyn Stark: Lord Tyrion, you are accused of hiring a man to slay my son Bran in his bed, and of conspiring to murder my sister’s husband; Lord Jon Arryn, the Hand of the King.
Tyrion Lannister: Oh, I’m very sorry. I don’t know anything about all that.
Lysa Arryn: You’ve had your little joke. I trust you enjoyed it. Mord, take him back to the dungeon. But this time find a smaller cell, with a steeper floor.
Tyrion Lannister: Is this how justice is done in the Vale? you accuse me of crimes, I deny them, so you throw me in a cell to freeze and starve? Where is the King’s Justice? I’m accused and demand a trial.
Lysa Arryn: If you’re tried and found guilty, then by the king’s own laws you will pay with your life.
Tyrion Lannister: I understand the law.
Lysa Arryn: We have no executioner in the Eyrie. Life is more elegant here. Open the Moon Door.

Several men begin unwinding a giant crank on one side of the room. In between Tyrion and the raised throne is what looks like a well. The well’s floor begins to open and wind comes howling through. Robin begins giggling and rapidly clapping his hands. Tyrion looks down and sees that it’s a great distance through this Moon Door to the ground, he would inevitably die if he had to go out this “door”.

Lysa Arryn: You want a trial, my Lord Lannister. Very well. My son will listen to whatever you have to say, and you will hear his judgement. Then you will leave, by one door or the other.
Tyrion Lannister: No need to bother Lord Robin. I demand a trial by combat.

Subdued laughter fills the room, Catelyn and Lysa exchange looks.

Lysa Arryn: You have that right.
Knight 1: My lady, I beg the honor. Let me be your champion.
Knight 2: The honor should be mine. For the love I bore your lord husband let me avenge his death.
Knight 3: I’ll fight for you, my Lady.
Knight 4: It’ll be my honor.
Knight 5: The honor should be mine.
Robin Arryn: Make the bad man fly!
Lysa Arryn: Ser Vardis… You’re quiet. Did you want to avenge my husband?
Ser Vardis: With all my heart, my Lady. But the Imp is half my size. It would be shameful to slaughter such a man and call it justice.
Tyrion Lannister: Agreed.
Lysa Arryn: You demanded a trial by combat.
Tyrion Lannister: Now I demand a champion. I have that right, same as you.
Ser Vardis: My Lady, I would gladly fight the Imp’s champion for you.
Tyrion Lannister: I wouldn’t be too glad, ser. I name my brother, Jaime Lannister.

The room shudders.

Lysa Arryn: The Kingslayer is hundreds of miles from here.
Tyrion Lannister: Send a raven for him, I’m happy to wait.
Lysa Arryn: The trial will be today.
Tyrion Lannister: Do I have a volunteer?

Again, the majority of the room laughs quietly.

Tyrion Lannister: Anyone?... Anyone?
Lysa Arryn: I think that we can assume that no one is willing -
Bronn: I’ll stand for the dwarf.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the woods, outside of King’s Landing.

Lancel Lannister: More wine, your Grace?
Robert Baratheon: Oh, what was I saying?
Renly Baratheon: A simpler time.
Robert Baratheon: It was! It was. You’re too young to remember. Wasn’t it, Selmy?
Barriston: It was, your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: The enemy was right there in the open, vicious as you like, all but sending you a bloody invitation. Nothing like today.
Renly Baratheon: Sounds exhilarating.
Robert Baratheon: Exhilarating, yes. Not as exhilarating as those balls and masquerades you like to throw. (laughs) You ever fucked a Riverlands girl?
Renly Baratheon: Once, I think.
Robert Baratheon: You think? I think you’d remember. Back in our day, you weren’t a real man until you fucked a girl from each of the Seven Kingdoms and the Riverlands. We called it “making the eight.”
Renly Baratheon: Those were some lucky girls.
Robert Baratheon: You ever make the eight, Barristan?
Barristan Selmy: I don’t believe so, your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: (laughs) Those were the days!
Renly Baratheon: What days were those? The ones where half of Westeros fought the other half and millions died? Or before that, when the Mad King slaughtered women and babies because the voices in his head told him they deserved it? Or way before that when dragons burned whole cities to the ground?
Robert Baratheon: Easy, boy. You might be my brother, but you’re speaking to the King.
Renly Baratheon: I suppose it was all rather heroic. If you were drunk enough and had some poor Riverlands whore to shove your price inside and “make the eight.”
Lancel Lannister: More wine, your Grace?

Renly walks off in the opposite direction of the group. Robert takes a large swig off of the wine and quickly continue walking.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the throne room of King’s Landing. Ned sits upon the throne as a fill in for Robert, as he is Hand of the King. Baelish is at his right and Grand Maester Pycelle to his left. The room is filled with people.

Man: They burned most everything in the Riverlands, our fields, our granaries, our homes. They took our women and then they took ‘em again. When they was done, they butchered them as if they was animals. They covered our children in pitch and lit them on fire.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Brigands, most likely.
Man: They weren’t thieves, they didn’t steal nothing. They even left something behind, your Grace.
Grand Maester Pycelle: It’s the King’s Hand you’re addressing, not the king. The king is hunting.

A second man walks forward and empties a sack out onto the floor. It’s a pile of fish.

Petyr Baelish: Fish. The sigil of House Tully. (whispers to Ned) Isn’t that your wife’s House - Tully - my Lord Hand?
Eddard Stark: These men, were they flying a sigil? … A banner.
Man: None, your… Hand. The one who was leading them… Taller by a foot than any man I’ve ever met, saw him cut the blacksmith, saw him take the head off a horse with a single swing of his sword.
Petyr Baelish: (whisper) That sounds like someone we know. The Mountain.
Eddard Stark: You’re describing Ser Gregor Clegane.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Why should Ser Gregor turn brigand? The man is an anointed knight.
Petyr Baelish: I’ve heard him called “Tywin Lannister’s mad dog.” I’m sure you have as well. (whispering to Ned) Can you think of any reason the Lannisters might possibly have for being angry with your wife?
Grand Maester Pycelle: If the Lannisters were to order attacks on villages under the king’s protection, it would be -
Petyr Baelish: It would be almost abrasion as attacking the Hand of the King in the streets of the capital.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Wel…
Eddard Stark: I cannot give you back your homes or restore your debt of life. But perhaps I can give you justice in the name of our king, Robert. Lord Beric Dondarrion.

Beric Dondarrion steps from the back of the room forward.

Eddard Stark: You shall have the command. Assemble 100 men and ride to Ser Gregor’s keep.
Beric Dondarrion: As you command.

Ned stands up with the assistance of a cane. He steps forward.

Eddard Stark: In the name of Robert of the House Baratheon, the First of his Name, King of the Andals and the First Men, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms and Protector of the Realm, I charge you to bring the king’s justice to the false knight Gregor Clegane and all those who shared in his crimes. I denounce him and attaint him. I strip him of all ranks and titles of all lands and holdings, and sentence him to death.
Grand Maester Pycelle: My lord… This… This is a drastic action. It would be better to wait for King Robert’s return.
Eddard Stark: Grand Maester Pycelle.
Grand Maester Pycelle: My Lord.
Eddard Stark: Send a raven to Casterly Rock. Inform Tywin Lannister that he has been summoned to court to answer for the crimes of his bannermen. He will arrive within the fortnight, or be branded an enemy of the crown and a traitor to the realm.

The men all bow their heads in acknowledgement. Ned steps down from the throne, Baelish follows him, speaking only to Ned.

Petyr Baelish: A bold move, my Lord, and admirable. But is it wise to yank the lion’s tail? Tywin Lannister is the richest man in all the Seven Kingdoms. Gold wins wars, not soldiers.
Eddard Stark: Then how come Robert is king and not Tywin Lannister?

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back at the Eyrie throne room in the Vale. The men again crank and the Moon Door is opened. Ser Vardis prepares himself with a sword, shield and full body of armor. Bronn refuses a shield and is only wearing leather clothes. Robin Arryn screams “fight” and the two men move forward. Multiple times Vardis swings forward and multiple times Bronn casually steps to the side, causing Vardis to waste his energy. Bronn moves backwards as Vardis continues to swing away, eventually up a staircase. Bronn hops over the staircase railing, again avoiding Vardis’ attacks. Lysa screams “Stand and fight, coward!” Bronn kicks over a candle stand in front of Vardis. Vardis steps over it and is again on the offensive, moving Bronn towards the center of the room, close to the now opened Moon Door. The men hold one another off directly in front of the door, Vardis appearing to have the edge. Robin is giggling as Tyrion looks worried. Bronn muscles Vardis’ blade away from him and steps to the side. Vardis yet again goes excessively offensive and swings for the fences and Bronn keeps stepping away. Vardis moves Bronn again to the middle of the room, as he swings for Bronn’s head, Bronn ducks and stabs Vardis in the belly. The room is in disbelief. Vardis moves forward, muscling through the pain. Bronn side-steps him a few more times and slices through his back. Vardis swings once more, but Bronn shoves his body towards the Moon Door. Bronn is in complete control as Vardis is defenseless against the door. Bronn looks up at Lysa and Robin who have blank faces - faces of shock - so he thrusts his sword into Vardis’ neck, killing him, and pushing him out of the Moon Door.

Robin Arryn: Is it over?
Lysa Arryn: You don’t fight with honor!
Bronn: No. He did.

Tyrion turns to Mord who uncuffs him.

Robin Arryn: Can I make the little man fly now?
Tyrion Lannister: Not this little man. This little man is going home. I believe you have something of mine.

Rodrik Cassel tosses Tyrion his purse. Tyrion bows before Catelyn, begins walking out, Bronn following. He tosses Mord the purse full of coins.

Tyrion Lannister: A Lannister always pays his debts.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At King’s Landing, Sansa Stark and Septa Mordane, both sowing.

Mordane: You wear your hair like a real southern lady now.
Sansa Stark: Well, why shouldn’t I? We’re in the south.
Mordane: It’s important to remember where you come from. I’m not sure your mother would like these new styles.
Sansa Stark: My mother isn’t from the North.
Mordane: I’m aware of that.
Sansa Stark: Why do you care? Do you even have hair under there?
Mordane: Yes. I have hair.
Sansa Stark: I’ve never seen it.
Mordane: Would you like to?
Sansa Stark: No. Where are you from anyway, the north or the south?
Mordane: I come from a very small village in -
Sansa Stark: Oh, wait. I just realized… I don’t care.
Mordane: Sansa -
Sansa Stark: Septa.
Mordane: Now you are being rude.

A door can be heard closing. Prince Joffrey walks in. Sansa’s eyes light up as both women stand up.

Mordane: My prince.
Sansa Stark: My prince.
Joffrey Baratheon: My lady. I fear I have behaved monstrously the past few weeks. With your permission?

Joffrey offers Sansa a necklace. She turns around, for him to put it on her, as acceptance.

Sansa Stark: It’s beautiful. Like the one your mother wears.
Joffrey Baratheon: You’ll be queen one day, it’s only fitting that you should look the part. Will you forgive me for my rudeness?
Sansa Stark: There’s nothing to forgive.
Joffrey Baratheon: You’re my lady. One day we’ll be married in the throne room. Lords and ladies from all over the Seven Kingdoms will come, from the last hearth in the North, to the salt shore of the south. And you will be queen over all of them. I’ll never disrespect you again. I’ll never be cruel to you again. Do you understand me? You’re my lady now, from this day, until my last day.

The two share their first kiss.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

In the woods outside of Winterfell, Theon is riding his horse, alone. He comes to a road and sees a carriage leaving, Ros on the back of it riding south.

Theon Greyjoy: Stop! Stop! What are you doing?!
Ros: Going to King’s Landing.
Theon Greyjoy: In a turnip cart?
Ros: I’ll find a ship heading south in White Harbor.
Theon Greyjoy: And you can afford that?
Ros: Some of my friends are more generous than others.
Theon Greyjoy: There’s a thousand girls like you in King’s Landing.
Ros: I’ll have lots of company…
Theon Greyjoy: Yes, you’ll be very popular until some fat lord comes to visit with a big belly and a little prick and he can’t get it up so he knocks all your teeth out.
Ros: (laughs) And what will happen to me if I stay here? Will I become Lady Greyjoy, Mistress of the Iron Islands?
Theon Greyjoy: Don’t be a fool.
Ros: I hear Jaime Lannister attacked Lord Stark in the streets of King’s Landing. Every man for a hundred mules will be marching off to war soon and most of them will never come back, there’s nothing more for me here. Let’s go, Steffon.
Theon Greyjoy: Let me see it one more time?
Ros: See what?

The carriage is driving away from Theon, he scrambles and flips Ros a coin. She catches it and lifts up her dress one final time for Theon, while laughing.

Theon Greyjoy: I’m going to miss you!
Ros: I know.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

At King’s Landing in Ned’s quarters. Arya and Sansa await as their father limps forward, using his cane for assistance.

Eddard Stark: I’m sending you both back to Winterfell.
Sansa Stark: What?!
Eddard Stark: Listen -
Sansa Stark: What about Joffrey?
Arya Stark: Are you dying because of your leg? Is that why you’re sending us home?
Eddard Stark: What? No.
Sansa Stark: Please, Father. Please don’t.
Arya Stark: You can’t. I’ve got my lessons with Syrio. I’m finally getting good.
Eddard Stark: This isn’t a punishment. I want you back in Winterfell for your own safety.
Arya Stark: Can’t we take Syrio back with us?
Sansa Stark: Who cares about your stupid dancing teacher? I can’t go. I’m supposed to marry Prince Joffrey. I love him and I’m meant to be his queen and have his babies.
Arya Stark: Seven hells.
Eddard Stark: When you’re old enough, I’ll make you a match with someone who’s worthy of you, someone who’s brave and gentle and strong -
Sansa Stark: I don’t want someone brave and gentle and strong. I want him! He’ll be the greatest king that ever was, a golden lion, and I’ll give him sons with beautiful blond hair.
Arya Stark: The lion’s not his sigil, idiot. He’s a stag, like his father.
Sansa Stark: He is not. He’s nothing like that old drunk king.
Eddard Stark: Go on, girls. Get your septa and start packing your things.
Sansa Stark: Wait!
Arya Stark: Come on! (dragging Sansa)
Sansa Stark: It’s not fair!

The two exit Ned’s room and close the door behind them. Ned slowly makes his way over to his desk, opening the book that Grand Maester Pycelle had given him earlier. The book covers the lineages of all the great Houses of Westeros. Ned turns and reviews the Baratheon page, reading out loud.

Eddard Stark: “Lord Orys Baratheon, black of hair.” “Axel Baratheon, black of hair.” “Lyonel Baratheon, black of hair.” “Steffon Baratheon, black of hair.” “Robert Baratheon, black of hair.” “Joffrey Baratheon… golden-haired.”

Ned has a revelation and closes the book.

- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

Back at Vaes Dothrak, in a very large hut. It is a celebration. A pig roasts over a center fire as there are drums being played and people dancing everywhere. Viserys stumbles in, clearly drunk.

Viserys Targaryen: Daenerys! Where’s my sister?

Daenerys and Jorah both look up, noticing her brother on the opposite side of the hut. Drogo, on another side of the hut also sees Viserys. Jorah stands up and begins walking towards Viserys.

Daenerys Targaryen: Stop him.
Viserys Targaryen: Where is she? I’m here for the feast. The whore’s feast.
Jorah Mormont: Come.
Viserys Targaryen: Get your hands off me! No one touches the dragon!

A man sitting next to Drogo says something in Dothraki that makes the Khal laugh. Viserys hears this and spins around.

Viserys Targaryen: Khal Drogo! I’m here for the feast.
Khal Drogo: (speaks Dothraki, motions to the other side of the hut)
Jorah Mormont: Khal Drogo says there is a place for you. Back there.
Viserys Targaryen: That is no place for a king.
Khal Drogo: You are no king.

Viserys draws his sword, Jorah moves forward, Viserys holds his sword at Jorah.

Viserys Targaryen: Keep away from me!

The drums stop and now everyone in the hut is paying attention.

Daenerys Targaryen: Viserys, please.
Viserys Targaryen: There she is.
Jorah Mormont: Put the sword down. They’ll kill us all.
Viserys Targaryen: They can’t kill us. They can’t shed blood in their sacred city. (moving his sword over everyone in the room, stopping on Daenerys’ stomach) But I can. I want what I came for. I want the crown he promised me. He bought you. But he never paid for you.

The Khal is fiercely looking at the situation as Viserys has his blade to Daenerys’ stomach. A woman is translating for Drogo as Viserys speaks.

Viserys Targaryen: Tell him I want what was bargained for or I’m taking you back. He can keep the baby. I’ll cut it out and leave it for him.
Khal Drogo: (speaks Dothraki)
Viserys Targaryen: What’s he saying?
Daenerys Targaryen: He says yes. You shall have a golden crown, that men shall tremble to behold.
Viserys Targaryen: That was all I wanted. W-what was promised.

Viserys takes his blade away from Daenerys’ stomach and steps back, smiling. Drogo stands up and walks to his wife, placing his hand on her belly as they exchange looks. The Khal says something in Dothraki, two men instantly come up behind Viserys, each holding one of his arms. One man breaks Viserys’ right arm as he screams.

Viserys Targaryen: No! You cannot touch me! I am the dragon! I am the dragon! I want my crown! Ahh!

The two men force Viserys to the ground, still holding him by his arms. The Khal moves towards them and mutters something in Dothraki. A woman tips over a kettle that was over the fire, pouring out it’s contents. Drogo throws some golden jewelry into the kettle.

Jorah Mormont: Look away Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: No.
Viserys Targaryen: No. Dany! Dany, tell them, make them! You can’t!

The golden jewelry is now melted down into liquid. Khal Drogo lifts the kettle up and walks over towards the screaming Viserys.

Viserys Targaryen: Dany please!
Khal Drogo: A crown for a king.

Khal Drogo raises the kettle over Viserys’ head and pours out the melted gold onto his skull. He screams as the hot liquid solidifies on his skull, the two men release Viserys, he instantly falls to the ground dead.

Jorah Mormont: Khaleesi…
Daenerys Targaryen: He was no dragon. Fire cannot kill a dragon.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
The Pointy End
Game of Thrones
Album: Season 1 Scripts
THE POINTY END
Entering Kings Landing, we see Syrio Forel dancing with Arya.

Syrio Forel: Yah! Left high, left low.
How ironic it seems, how peacefully Arya and Syrio are dancing, near the Throne room, the Kings Guard fights a few Stark men.
Going back again at Arya's dancing training.
Syrio Forel: Right low, lunge right.

Outside in a courtyard, a few Stark stewards are packing and bringing out the Stark family's belongings.

Steward of House Stark: If you break anything, the Septa will have my head. What is...

The stewards are being slaughtered by the kings guard.
Going back inside the Red Keep, Sansa is walking down a hallway with her Septa.

Septa Mordane: Your sister knew perfectly well we were to leave today.
How she could forget...
Sansa Stark: She didn't forget. She's with her dancing master.
She's with him every morning. She always comes back with scrapes and bruises.
She's so clumsy.
Septa Mordane: Hush! Go back to your room.
Bar the doors and do not open them for anyone you do not know.
Sansa Stark: What is it? What's happening?
Septa Mordane: Do as I told you. Run!

Back at Arya's training.

Syrio Forel: This way! Left, right.
Rah! Now you are dead.
Arya Stark: You said right, but you went left.
Syrio Forel: And now you are a dead girl.
Arya Stark: Only 'cause you lied.
Syrio Forel: My tongue lied.
My eyes shouted the truth.
You were not seeing.
Arya Stark: I was so. I watched, but you...
Syrio Forel: watching is not seeing, dead girl.
The seeing, the true seeing, that is the heart of swordplay.
The Kings guard approaches.
Meryn Trant: Arya Stark, come with us.
Your father wants to see you.
Syrio Forel: And why is it that Lord Eddard is sending Lannister men in place of his own? I am wondering.
Meryn Trant: Mind your place, dancing master.
This is no concern of yours.
Arya Stark: My father wouldn't send you.
As she picks up her wooden stick from the ground, she says.
Arya Stark: And I don't have to go with you if I don't want.
Maryn Trant: Take her.
Syrio Forel: Are you men or snakes, that you would threaten a child?
Kings guard: Get out of my way, little man.
Syrio Forel: I am Syrio Forel.
Kings guard: Foreign bastard.
The Kings guard draws his sword. Before he can strike, Syrio hits him with his wooden stick. Knocking him out.
Syrio Forel: And you will be speaking to me with more respect.
Meryn Trant: Kill the Braavosi. Bring the girl.
Syrio Forel: Arya child, we are done with dancing for the day.
Run to your father.
Syrio Forel fights three Kings guards at once, eventually knocking them all out.
Meryn Trant: Bloody oafs.
Syrio Forel: Be gone now, Arya.
Arya Stark: Come with me. Run.
Syrio Forel: The first sword of Braavos does not run.
Meryn Trant strikes Syrio, a short duel takes place. Eventually Meryn Trant cuts Syrio Forel's wooden sword into pieces.
Syrio Forel: What do we say to the God of death?
Arya Stark: Not today.
Syrio Forel: Go.

Arya Stark runs off and hears a bunch of screams from down the hallway. She looks concerned.
Arya Stark: Not today. Not today.

Back on the other side of the Red Keep, Sansa runs on, but is stopped by a familiar face.

Sansa Stark: Stay away from me.
I'll tell my father. I'll...I'll tell the Queen.
Sandor Clegane: Who do you think sent me?

Back to Arya, we see that she has arrived at the slaughtered stewards. She sees her belongings lying on the ground.

Arya Stark: Needle.
A stable boy appears.
Stable Boy: There she is.
Arya Stark: What do you want?
Stable Boy: I want you, wolf girl. Come here.
Arya Stark: Leave me be. My father's a lord. He'll reward you.
Stable Boy: She'll reward me, the Queen!
Arya Stark: Stay away!
Accidentally, she turns around sliding Needle through the stable boys belly. Her first kill is a fact.
Shook as she is, she runs off.
In the dark dungeon cells of Kings Landing we see Ned Stark. He sees a little light approaches him. After a short while it is clear that it's Varys, whom is holding a torch.
Lord Varys: Lord Stark, you must be thirsty.
Ned Stark: Varys.
Lord Varys: I promise you it isn't poisoned.
Why is it no one ever trusts the eunuch? Not so much, My Lord.
I would save the rest, if I were you.
Hide it. Men have been known to die of thirst in these cells.
Ned Stark: What about my daughters?
Lord Varys: The younger one seems to have escaped the castle.
Even my little birds cannot find her.
Ned Stark: And Sansa?
Lord Varys: Still engaged to Joffrey.
Cersei will keep her close. The rest of your household though, all dead, it grieves me to say.
I do so hate the sight of blood.
Ned Stark: You watched my men being slaughtered and did nothing.
Lord Varys: And would again, My Lord.
I was unarmed, unarmored and surrounded by Lannister swords.
When you look at me do you see a hero?
What madness led you to tell the Queen you had learned the truth about Joffrey's birth?
Ned Stark: The madness of mercy. That she might save her children.
Lord Varys: Ah, the children. It is always the innocents who suffer.
It wasn't the wine that killed Robert, nor the boar.
The wine slowed him down and the boar ripped him open, but it was your mercy that killed the King.
I trust you know you are a dead man, Lord Eddard?
Ned Stark: The Queen can't kill me. Cat holds her brother.
Lord Varys: The wrong brother sadly.
And lost to her. Your wife has let the Imp slip through her fingers.
Ned Stark: If that's true, then slit my throat and be done with it.
Lord Varys: Not today, My Lord.
Varys is about to walk away, while being stopped by Ned one last time.
Ned Stark: Tell me something, Varys.
Who do you truly serve?
Lord Varys: The Realm, My Lord.
Someone must.
Varys leaves the dungeons.

At Castle Black a corpses are being carried inside. Some of the Night's brothers are inspecting the two bodies.

Jeor Mormont: It's Othor, without a doubt.
Othell Yarwyck: The other one is Jafer Flowers, My Lord, less the hand the wolf tore off.
Jeor Mormont: Any sign of Benjen or the rest of his party?
Jon Snow: Just these two, My Lord. Been dead awhile, I'd say.
Jeor Mormont: Mmm.
Samwell Tarly: The smell.
Othell Yarwyck: What smell?
Samwell Tarly: There is none.
If they'd be dead for a long time, wouldn't there be rot?
Jon Snow: We should burn them.
Othell Yarwyck: Snow's not wrong, My Lord.
Fire will do for them. The Wildling way.
Jeor Mormont: I want Maester Aemon to examine them first.
You may be a coward, Tarly, but you're not stupid.
Get them inside.
Othell Yarwyck: You heard him.
Ser Alliser: Lord Commander, Maester Aemon awaits you in his chambers. A raven from King's Landing.
Nights Watch brother: Come on, move 'em out.

Jon Snow is summoned to Jeor Mormont's chambers. While entering the room, a conversation starts.

Jeor Mormont: Bring me a horn of ale, Snow, and pour one for yourself.
The King is dead.
Jon Snow: Is there any word of my father?
Jeor Mormont: Sit.
Lord Stark has been charged with treason.
They say he conspired with Robert's brothers to deny the throne to Prince Joffrey.
Jon points to the letter, as he wants to read it. Jeor Mormont hands it over. When reading the letter, Jon stands up and wants to walk away.
Jeor Mormont: I hope you're not thinking of doing anything stupid.
Your duty lies here now.
Jon Snow: My sisters were in King's Landing too.
Jeor Mormont: I'm sure they'll be treated gently.
Jon walks out.

Deep inside the Red Keep, Sansa is having a conversation with Cersei.
Grand Maester Pycelle, Varys and Littlefinger being in their presence.

Lord Varys: Your father has proved to be an awful traitor, dear.
Grand Maester Pycelle: King Robert's body was still warm when Lord Eddard began plotting to steal Joffrey's rightful throne.
Sansa Stark: He wouldn't do that. He knows how much I love Joffrey.
He wouldn't. Please, Your Grace, there's been a mistake.
Send for my father. He'll tell you, the King was his friend.
Cersei Lannister: Sansa sweetling, you are innocent of any wrong.
We know that.
Yet you are the daughter of a traitor.
How can I allow you to marry my son?
Grand Maester Pycelle: A child born of a traitor's seed is no fit consort for our King.
She is a sweet thing now, Your Grace, but in 10 years who knows what treasons she may hatch?
Sansa Stark: No, I'm not.
I'll be a good wife to him, you'll see.
I'll be a Queen just like you, I promise.
I won't hatch anything.
Petyr Baelish: The girl is innocent, Your Grace.
She should be given a chance to prove her loyalty.
Cersei Lannister: Little dove, you must write to Lady Catelyn and your brother, the eldest.
What's his name?
Sansa Stark: Robb.
Cersei Lannister: Word of your father's arrest will reach him soon, no doubt.
Best it comes from you.
If you would help your father, urge your brother to keep the King's peace.
Tell him to come to King's Landing and swear his fealty to Joffrey.
Sansa Stark: If...if I could see my father, talk to him about...
Cersei Lannister: You disappoint me, child.
We have told you of your father's treason.
Why would you want to speak to a traitor?
Sansa Stark: I only meant that...what will happen to him?
Cersei Lannister: That depends.
Sansa Stark: On...on what?
Cersei Lannister: On your brother. And on you.

Back at Winterfell, Robb reads the letter Sansa sent.
Robb Stark: Treason? Sansa wrote this?
Maester Luwin: It is your sister's hand, but the Queen's words.
You are summoned to King's Landing to swear fealty to the new King.
Robb Stark: Joffrey puts my father in chains, now he wants his ass kissed?
Maester Luwin: This is a royal command, My Lord.
If you should refuse to obey...
Robb Stark: I won't refuse. His Grace summons me to King's Landing, I'll go to King's Landing.
But not alone. Call the banners.
Maester Luwin: All of them, My Lord?
Robb Stark: They've all sworn to defend my father, have they not?
Maester Luwin: They have.
Now we see what their words are worth.
Maester Luwin: Yeah.
Maester Luwin walks off.
Theon Greyjoy: Are you afraid?
Robb Stark: I must be.
Theon Greyjoy: Good.
Robb Stark: Why is that good?
Theon Greyjoy: It means you're not stupid.



At the Eyrie, Catelyn rushes to Lysa's chambers. Upon arrival she angrily speaks.
Catelyn Stark: You've had this since dawn?
Lysa Arryn: He sent it to me, not you.
I've only shown it to you as a courtesy.
Catelyn Stark: A courtesy?! My husband has been taken prisoner.
My son intends to declare war.
Lysa Arryn: A war? Your son against the Lannisters?
You should go to him. Teach him patience.
Catelyn Stark: Ned rots in a dungeon and you speak of patience? He is your brother by law!
Does family mean nothing to you?
Lysa Arryn: Family means everything to me.
And I will not risk Robin's life to get caught up in another of your husband's wars.
Robin Arryn: I'm hungry.
Lysa Arryn: Hush now, darling. You just ate.
Catelyn Stark: You will not support us then? Do I understand you correctly?
Robin Arryn: But I'm hungry!
Lysa Arryn: Soon, love, soon.
You're always welcome here, sister.
But if you're asking me to send men from the Vale to fight...
Catelyn Stark: That is what I ask.
Lysa Arryn: Go on, sweet. Time for your bath. I'll feed you after.
Robin walks out of the room.
Catelyn Stark: If you fear for the safety of your son...
Lysa Arryn: Of course I fear for the safety of my son!
Are you an idiot? They killed my husband.
You say they shoved your boy from a window.
These people will do anything.
Catelyn Stark: And that is why we have to stop them.
Lysa Arryn: The knights of the Vale will stay in the Vale where they belong, to protect their Lord.



Both Tyrion and Bronn are seen walking through the hills of the Vale.
Bronn: Will you shut up? There's hill tribes all around here.
Tyrion Lannister: If I'm going to die, it may as well be with a song in my heart.
Bronn: I should just take your food and leave you here.
Eh? What would you do then?
Tyrion Lannister: Starve, most likely.
Bronn: You don't think I'd do it, do you?
Tyrion Lannister: What do you want, Bronn? Gold? Women? Golden women?
Stick with me and you'll have them all, for as long as I'm around and not for a moment longer.
But you knew that.
That is why you so valiantly took up arms to defend my honor.
Bronn: Fair enough.
But don't go looking for me to bend the knee and "My Lord" you every time you take a shit.
I'm not your toady and I'm not your friend.
Tyrion Lannister: Though I would treasure your friendship.
I'm mainly interested in your facility with murder.
And if the day ever comes when you're tempted to sell me out.
Remember this: Whatever their price, I'll beat it.
I like living.

A while later, Tyrion and Bronn are seen near a campfire.
Bronn hears noises of approaching men and tries to warn Tyrion.

Bronn: Tyrion. Tyrion. Tyrion.
Tyrion Lannister: Come, share our fire.
Help yourselves to our goat.
Shagga: When you meet your Gods, you tell them Shagga Son of Dolf of the Stone Crows sent you.
Tyrion Lannister: I am Tyrion son of Tywin of Clan Lannister.
How would you like to die, Tyrion son of Tywin?
Tyrion Lannister: In my own bed, at the age of 80 with a bellyful of wine and a girl's mouth around my cock.
Take the half man.
He can dance for the children. Kill the other one.
Tyrion Lannister: No no no no no! My, my House is rich and powerful.
If you see us through these mountains, my father will shower you with gold.
Shagga: We have no use for a half man's promises.
Tyrion Lannister: Half a man maybe, but at least I have the courage to face my enemies.
What do the Stone Crows do? Hide behind rocks and shiver when the knights of the Vale ride by?
Are those the best weapons you could steal? Good enough for killing sheep, if the sheep don't fight back.
Lannister smiths shit better steel.
Shagga: You think you can win us over with your trinkets?
Tyrion Lannister: That trinket is worth more than everything your tribe owns.
But if you help us, Shagga Son of Dolf, I will not give you trinkets.
I will give you this.
Tyrion makes a gesture.
Shagga: What is "this"?
Tyrion Lannister: The Vale of Arryn.
The Lords of the Vale have always spat upon the hill tribes.
The Lords of the Vale want me dead.
I believe it is time for new Lords of the Vale.


In Castle Black's kitchen, Jon and Sam are preparing a meal, while Ser Alliser approaches.

Ser Alliser: Now there's a rare sight. Not only a bastard, but a traitor's bastard.
Jon looks Alliser in his eyes. Silence occur for a few seconds. Then, suddenly Jon tries to strike Alliser, but is stopped by Pypar and Grenn.
Samwell Tarly: Jon, no! Jon, stop, put it down!
Ser Alliser: Blood will always tell. You'll hang for this, bastard.
Ser Alliser had his fun and walks away, while Jeor Mormont saw the incident and walk towards Jon.
Jeor Mormont: I told you not to do anything stupid. You're confined to quarters. Go.
Jon obeys and walks off.

Later that night, Ghost alerts Jon. He seems to be uneasy. Jon wakes up and talks to Ghost.

Jon Snow: Ghost, what's wrong? Is something out there?
Jon decides to get out of bed, gear up and opens the door. Ghost runs off towards Jeor Mormants room.
Mounting his door.
Jon Snow: Commander?
Jon Snow: Stay.
Ghost waits at the front door, while Jon walks in.
Jon Snow: Hello?
Who's there?
Lord Commander?
As soon as he walks through the door, the door shuts and the corpse of Othor attacks Jon. Jon tries to stab him with his dagger, but nothing seems to phase him. Jon pulls himself loose, draws his sword and cuts off Othor's other hand. Then Jon stabs Othor through the heart. Othor falls down. Suddenly Jeor Mormont arrives.
Jeor Mormont: Snow!?
Jon Snow: Commander!
Othor gets back on his feet, pulling out Jon's sword out of his chest. Outside of the room, Ghost goes beserk, trying to get in.
Jon grabs Jeor's lantern and throws it at Othor. Othor catches fire.
Jon Snow: Move move!
Jon grabs Jeor by his arm and flees inside a room, shutting the door.



The Khalasar have arrived the lands of Lhazar. Dany and her company walk through the burned area.

Daenarys Stormborn: What did they do?
Rakharo: Lamb men make good slaves. Khal Drogo will make a gift of them to the slavers.
And the slavers will give us gold...and silk and steel.
Daenarys Stormborn: I thought the Dothraki didn't believe in money.
Jorah Mormont: Gold to hire ships, Princess. Ships to sail to Westeros.
While walking a little further, Dany sees Dothraki men looting and holding Lhazareen captive.
Daenarys Stormborn: Jorah, make them stop.
Jorah Mormont: Khaleesi?
Daenarys Stormborn: You heard me.
Jorah Mormont: These men have shed blood for their Khal.
Now they claim their rewards.
Rakharo: She is a lamb girl, Khaleesi. The riders do her honor.
If her wailing offends the Khaleesi, I will bring you her tongue.
Jorah Mormont: Princess, you have a gentle heart, but this is how it's always been.
Daenarys Stormborn: I do not have a gentle heart, Ser. Do as I command or Khal Drogo will know the reason why.
Jorah and Rhakharo both obey and run off, trying to stop the Khalasar, while freeing some Lhazareen.
Rhakharo: Kash qoy qoyi thira disse. Me qorasokh anni!
While Rhakharo argues with a Dothraki man, Jorah brings over a Lhazareen woman.
Jorah Mormont: Come.
Dothraki Man: Anha afichak mae m'arakhoon!
Jorah Mormont: What do you want done with them?
Daenarys Stormborn: Bring her to me. And those women there.
Jorah Mormont: You cannot claim them all, Princess.
Daenarys Stormborn: I can, and I will.

Leaving with a couple of Lhazareen women, Dany arrives at a covered courtyard, where Khal Drogo is having a discussion with Mago.

Mago: Me Fati! Khaleesi vazha anhaan qorasokh anni, ch'anha afichak mae m'arakhoon anni!
Khal Drogo: Me vastoe hatif anni; ahhazaan yer Nemo vacchaki.
Khal Drogo: Moon of my life. Mago says you have taken his spoils.
A daughter of a lamb men, who was his to mount. Tell me the truth of this.
Daenarys Stormborn: Mago speaks the truth, my sun and stars. I have claimed many daughters this day, so they cannot be mounted.
Khal Drogo: This is the way of war. These women are slaves now to do with as we please.
Daenarys Stormborn: It pleases me to keep them safe.
If your riders would mount them, let them take them for wifes.
Qotho: Does the horse mate with the lamb?
Daenarys Stormborn: The dragons feeds on horse and lamb alike.
Mago: You are a foreigner. You do not command me.
Daenarys Stormborn: I am Khaleesi. I do command you.
Khal Drogo: See how fierce she grows?
That is my son inside her, the stallion that will mount the world. Filling her with his fire.
I will hear no more.
Mago, find somewhere else to stick your cock.
Mago spits on the ground and draws his sword.
Mago: A Khal who takes orders from a foreign whore is no Khal.
When Qotho is trying to interfere, Khal Drogo calls him back.
Khal Drogo: Ohosa. Os.
I will not have your body burned. I will not give you that honor.
Mago points out his sword and pushes it to Khal Drogo's chest.
Khal Drogo grins, it doesn't seem to phase him. He continues talking.
Khal Drogo: The beetles will feed on your eyes. The worms will crawl through your lungs.
Mago starts swinging his sword, while Khal Drogo dodges his attack.
When turning his back on Mago, he grabs his daggers and speaks.
Khal Drogo: The rain will fall on your rotting skin...
Khal Drogo turns around facing Mago and drops his daggers to the ground.
Khal Drogo: Until nothing is left of you but bones!
Khal Drogo runs towards Mago, while dodging his attacks. While attacking, Mago screams.
mago: First you have to kill me!
Khal drogo grabs Mago's sword, disarms him and cuts his throat open. He grabs Mago's throat, crushes it and pulls out his tongue.
He shows Mago's tongue to the crowd, walks back to his chair and throws Mago's tongue on a pile of rotting flesh.
While sitting down, Dany runs towards him.
Daenarys Stormborn: My sun and stars is wounded.
Khal Drogo: A scratch, moon of my life.
Daenarys Stormborn: Where are the healers?
Khal Drogo: This is the bite of a fly.
Mirri Maz Duur: I can help the great rider with his cut.
Qotho: The Khal needs no help from slaves who lie with sheep.
Daenarys Stormborn: She is mine let her speak.
Mirri Maz Duur: Thank you, silver lady.
Daenarys Stormborn: Who are you?
When "the witch" is trying to approach Dany, Qotho stops her.
Mirri Maz Duur: I am named Mirri Maz Duur.
I was the Godswife of this Temple.
Qotho: A witch.
And spits on the ground.
Mirri Maz Duur: My mother was Godswife here before me.
She taught me how to make healing smokes and ointments.
All men are of one flock, so my people believe.
The Great Shepherd sent me to Earth to heal his...
Qotho slaps "the witch" and says.
Qotho: Too many words. A witch's words poison the ears.
Mirri Maz Duur: lamb or lion, his wound must be washed and sewn or it will fester.
Daenarys Stormborn: Let her clean your wound, my sun and stars.
It makes me hurt to see you bleed.
Khal Drogo lays eyes upon "the witch". While he's seemingly in thought, "the witch" approaches him.
As Dany steps aside, she looks at Khal Drogo's wound.



Entering Winterfell, gathered Stark banner men are having a feast.
We see Greatjon Umber whom is having a conversation with Robb Stark.

Greatjon Umber: For 30 years I've been making corpses out of men, boy.
I'm the man you want leading the Vanguard.
Robb Stark: Galbart Glover will lead the Van.
Greatjon Umber: The bloody Wall will melt before an Umber marches behind a Glover.
I will lead the Van or I will take my men and march them home.
Robb Stark: You are welcome to do so, Lord Umber.
And when I am done with the Lannisters, I will march back North, root you out of your Keep and hang you for an oathbreaker.
Greatjon Umber: Oathbreaker, is it?!
Greatjon stands up as he is offended
Greatjon Umber: I'll not sit here and swallow insults from a boy so green he pisses grass.
While Greatjon Umber raises his voice to Robb, Grey Wind rushes towards him and attacks, biting off 2 of his fingers.
Robb Stark: My Lord father taught me it was death to bare steel against your Liege Lord.
But doubtless the Greatjon only meant to cut my meat for me.
Greatjon Umber: Your meat...is bloody tough.
Greatjon Umber starts laughing breaking the tension, making everyone laughing along with him.

Later that night, Robb is having a short visit with Brann Stark. Upon entering his room, Brann is stil asleep.
Robb wakes him and a conversation follows.

Brann Stark: What is it? What's happened?
Robb Stark: Shh, it's all right.
Brann Stark: Where are you going?
Robb Stark: South. For father.
Brann Stark: But it's the middle of the night.
Robb Stark: The Lannisters have spies everywhere.
I don't want them to know we're coming.
Brann Stark: They have more men than we do.
Robb Stark: Aye, they do.
Brann Stark: Can't I come with you? I can ride now. You've seen me riding.
And I won't get in the way, I...
Robb Stark: There must always be a Stark at Winterfell.
Until I return that will be you.
You are not to leave the castle walls while we are gone.
Do you understand?
Listen to Maester Luwin. Look after your little brother.
Brann Stark: I will.
Robb Stark: I'll send letters whenever I can, but if you don't hear from me, don't be scared.
Until I return.
Robb leaves the room, but as soon as Robb left, Rickon appears.
Brann Stark: How long have you been hiding out there?
Robb will be looking for you, to say goodbye.
Rickon Stark: They've all gone away.
Brann Stark: They'll be back soon.
Robb will free father and they'll come back with mother.
Rickon Stark: No, they won't.
Rickon turns arond and leaves the room.

The next morning, Brann is sitting affront of the Weirwood tree.
While saying his prayers, Osha approaches him.

Brann Stark: Please watch over Robb.
And watch over all the other men from Winterfell.
And Theon too, I suppose.
Osha: You hear them, boy? The Old Gods are answering you.
Brann Stark: What are you doing here?
Osha: They're my Gods too.
Beyond the Wall, they're the only Gods.
Even slaves are allowed to pray.
Brann Stark: You're not a slave.
Osha points out to her chains and wiggles her foot.
Brann Stark: Well, your friend did put a knife to my throat.
I'm not complaining, Little Lord, just telling truths.
Brann Stark: What did you mean about hearing the Gods?
Osha: You asked them, they're answering you.
Shh. Open your ears.
Brann is trying to listen and looks up the Weirwood tree. He hears the wind blowing through the leaves.
Brann Stark: It's only the wind.
Who do you think sends the wind if not the Gods?
They see you, boy. They hear you.
Your brother will get no help from them where he's going.
The Old Gods have no power in the South.
The Weirwoods there were all cut down a long time ago.
How can they watch when they have no eyes?
Suddenly Hodor appears.
It appears he was bathing nearby, since he is bare naked holding a towel around his neck.
Osha: Well, there's a big man.
He has giants blood in him or I'm the Queen.
Brann Stark: Go back and find your clothes, Hodor.
Go dress.
Hodor: Hodor.
Hodor obeys and runs off.
Brann Stark: Are there really giants beyond the Wall?
Osha: Giants and worse than giants.
I tried telling your brother, he's marching the wrong way.
All these swords, they should be going North, boy.
North, not south!
The cold winds are rising.
Looking back up to the Weirwood tree, Brann hears the wind again.



At castle Black, the Night's Watch decided to burn the corpse of Othor, whom attacked Jeor Mormant.
Sam decided to share some knowledge.

Samwell Tarly: They were touched by White Walkers.
That's why they came back.
That's why their eyes turned blue.
Only fire will stop them.
Jon Snow: How do you know that?
Samwell Tarly: I read about it in a book. A very old book in Maester Aemon's library.
Jon Snow: What else did the book say?
Samwell Tarly: The White Walkers sleep beneath the ice for thousands of years.
And when they wake up...
Pypar: And when they wake up, what?
Sam looks to the top of the Wall.
Samwell Tarly: I hope The Wall is high enough.
Seemingly worried, the rest of the lot also look towards the top of the Wall.







Catelyn Stark and Ser Rodrik both arrive at Robb Starks camp.

Rodrik Cassel: Summer snows, My Lady.
Catelyn Stark: Robb's brought the North with him.
Entering Robbs tent, we see Robb and his banner men discussing tactics.
Robb Stark: The River Lords are falling back with Jaime Lannister at their heels.
And Lord Tywin is bringing around a second Lannister army from the South.
Our scouts confirm it's even larger than the Kingslayer's.
Greatjon Umber: One army or two, the Kings in the North threw back hosts ten times this large.
Robb Stark: Mother!
Catelyn Stark: You look well.
Greatjon Umber: Lady Catelyn, you're a welcome sight in these troubled times.
Theon Greyjoy: We had not thought to meet you here, My Lady.
Catelyn Stark: I had not thought to be here.
I would speak with my son alone. I know you will forgive me, My Lords.
Greatjon Umber: You heard her! Move your asses! Come on, out.
You too, Greyjoy.
Are you bloody deaf? Have no fear, My Lady.
We'll shove our swords up Tywin Lannister's bunghole and then it's on to the Red Keep to free Ned.
You old devil, Rodrik.
Rodrik Cassel: Jon.
Greatjon Umber: You're not wasting away, are you?
As soon as the men left, Catelyn hugs Robb.
Catelyn Stark: I remember the day you came into this world red-faced and squalling.
And now I find you leading a host to war.
Robb Stark: There was no one else.
Catelyn Stark: No one? Who were those men I saw here?
Robb Stark: None of them are Starks.
Catelyn Stark: All of them are seasoned in battle.
Robb Stark: If you think you can send me back to Winterfell...
Catelyn Stark: Oh, would that I could.
Robb Stark: There was a letter. From Sansa.
Catelyn Stark: From the Queen, you mean.
There's no mention of Arya.
Robb Stark: No.
Catelyn Stark: How many men do you have?
Robb Stark: 18,000. If I go to King's Landing and bend my knee to Joffrey...
Catelyn Stark: you would never be allowed to leave. No.
Our best hope, our only hope, is that you can defeat them in the field.
Robb Stark: And if I lose?
Catelyn Stark: Do you know what happened to the Targaryen children, when the Mad King fell?
Robb Stark: They were butchered in their sleep.
Catelyn Stark: On the orders of Tywin Lannister. And the years have not made him kinder.
If you lose, your father dies, your sisters die, we die.
Robb Stark: Well, that makes it simple then.
Catelyn Stark: I suppose it does.






Arriving at the foot of the Lannister camp, Tyrion, Bronn, Shagga and the hill tribe, decide to stop for a short while.
A conversation follows.

Tyrion Lannister: From here it might be best if Bronn and I continue alone.
Shagga: Best for Tyrion son of Tywin. Not best for me.
If the half man betrays us, Shagga son of Dolf will cut off his manhood...
Tyrion Lannister: And feed it to the goats, yes.
All right then. Time to meet my father.
Moving into the Lannister camp, Shagga and the hill tribe follow.
Upon entering the Tywin Lannister's tent, we see Kevan Lannister and Tywin sitting at a table, scheming.
Kevan Lannister Tyrion.
Tyrion Lannister: Uncle. Father.
Tywin Lannister: The rumors of your demise were unfounded.
Tyrion Lannister: Sorry to disappoint you.
Tywin Lannister: And who are these Companions of yours?
Tywin Lannister: This is Shagga Son of Dolf, Chieftain of the Stone Crows.
Timett Son of Timett, ruler of the Burned Men.
This fair maid is Chella daughter of Cheyk, leader of the Black Ears.
And here we have Bronn son of...
Bronn: You wouldn't know him.
Tyrion Lannister: May I present My Lord Father, Tywin son of Tytos of House Lannister.
Lord of Casterly Rock and Warden of the West. Kind of you to go to war for me.
Tywin Lannister: You left us no choice. The honor of the House was at stake.
Your brother would never have submitted to capture so meekly.
Tyrion Lannister: We have our differences, Jaime and I.
He's braver. I'm better looking.
Jamie Lannister: He's been covering himself in glory.
Kevan Lannister: Jaime smashed the River Lords at the Golden Tooth, and now lays siege to Riverrun, Catelyn Stark's homeland.
Tyrion Lannister: And the Starks? Lord Eddard?
Tywin Lannister: Is our hostage.
He will lead no armies from his dungeon cell.
Tyrion Lannister: How did my sweet sister persuade the King to imprison his dear friend Ned?
Tywin Lannister: Robert Baratheon is dead.
Joffrey rules in King's Landing.
Tyrion Lannister: My sister rules, you mean.
Kevan Lannister: Stark's son has called his banners.
He moves south with a strong host.
Tywin Lannister: A green boy.
One taste of battle and he'll run back to Winterfell wi his tail between his legs.
Tyrion Lannister: Maybe. Though the boy does have a certain belligerence.
You'd like him.
While we're on the subject of war, I made promises to my friends here and a Lannister always pays his debts.
We shall require 3,000 helms and shields, plus swords, pikes, gorgets, maces...
Suddenly a messenger appears, interrupting Tyrion's request.
Messenger: If it please My Lord, Ser Addam bids me report that the Northmen have crossed the neck.
Tywin Lannister: The wolf rushes into the lion's jaws.
So be it. Kevan, command the drummers beat assembly.
And send word to Jaime that I am moving against Robb Stark.
Kevan Lannister: At once, My Lord.
Tywin Lannister: It is said that the men of the Mountain clans are great warriors.
Ride with me against my enemies and you shall have all my son promised you and more.
Shagga: Only if the half man fights with us.
Until we hold the steel he pledged us, the little lion's life is ours.
Tywin looks over to Tyrion. Tyrion looks shooked.






Back at Robbs camp, inside his tent we see Robb and his men plotting.

Rodrik Cassal: The scouts report Lord Tywin moves north.
We need to get him on broken ground, put his Knights at a disadvantage.
Greatjon Umber: No, we need to get around him and break Jaime Lannister's siege of Riverrun.
Do that and the River Lords will join us.
Robb Stark: To do either we need to cross the river and the only crossing is at The Twins.
Theon Greyjoy: Lord Frey controls that bridge.
Your father's bannerman.
Catelyn Stark: "The late Lord Frey" my father calls him.
At the Trident, he didn't appear until the battle was done.
Some men takes their oaths more seriously than others.
Meanwhile, outside a few Stark men captured a scout, leading him to Robbs tent.
Theon Greyjoy: Robb's right.
We need that bridge.
Greatjon Umber: So what's it gonna be? Do we move against Jaime or Lord Tywin?
Stark guard: Your pardon, my lords.
We've captured a Lannister scout.
Theon covers the map with pawns
Greatjon Umber: Don't worry, lad.
He won't be leaving this tent with his head.
Robb Stark: Where did you find him?
Stark guard: In the brush above the encampment.
He looked to be counting.
Robb walks towards the Lannister scout.
Robb Stark: How high did you get?
Lannister scout: 20,000. Maybe more.
Rodrik Cassel You don't have to do this yourself.
Your father would understand.
Robb Stark: My father understands mercy, when there is room for it.
And he understands honor and courage.
Let him go.
Catelyn Stark: Robb.
Robb looks over his shoulder with a stare. Catelyn understands and looks down in regret.
Robb Stark: Tell Lord Tywin, Winter is coming for him.
To find out if he really does shit gold.
Lannister scout: Yes, My Lord. Thank you, My Lord.
Greatjon Umber: Are you touched, boy?! Letting him go?
Robb Stark: You call me boy again.
Greatjon Umber wants to taunt Robb.
Robb Stark: Go on.
Greatjon Umber: Oi.
Frustrated, Greatjon Umber walks out of the tent.






In Kings Landing, we see Ned Stark asleep in the dungeons, a guard on patrol kicks his feet waking him up. Then walks on.
Meanwhile, in the Throne room, new roles are being announced by Grand Maester Pycelle.
Grand Maester Pycelle: It is also the wish of His Grace, that his loyal servant Janos Slynt, Commander of the City Watch...
While Grand Maester Pycelle is speaking, Sansa walks by a few familiar faces.
Sansa Stark: Ser Aron.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Be at once raised to the rank of Lord.
Sansa Stark: Lord Gyles.
Grand Maester Pycelle: And granted the ancient seat of Harrenhal, and that his sons and grandsons shall hold this honor after him, until the end of time.
In the place of the traitor Eddard Stark, it is the wish of his Grace that Tywin Lannister, Lord of Casterly Rock and Warden of the West, be appointed Hand of the King.
Lastly, in these times of treason and turmoil, it is the view of the Council that the life and safety of King Joffrey be of paramount importance.
Cersei Lannister: Ser Barristan Selmy.
Barristan Selmy approaches.
Barristan Selmy: Your Grace, I am yours to command.
Cersei Lannister: Rise, Ser Barristan.
You may remove your helm.
You have served the Realm long and faithfully.
Every man and woman in the Seven Kingdoms owes you thanks.
But it is time to put aside your armor and your sword.
It is time to rest and look back with pride on your many years of service.
Barristan Selmy: Your Grace, the Kingsguard is a sworn brotherhood.
Our vows are taken for life. Only death relieves us of our sacred trust.
Cersei Lannister: Whose death, Ser Barristan? Yours or your King's?
King Joffrey: You let my father die.
You're too old to protect anybody.
Barristan Selmy: Your Grace...
Cersei Lannister: The Council has determined that Ser Jaime Lannister will take your place as Lord Commander of the Kingsguard.
Barristan Selmy: The man who profaned his blade with the blood of the King he had sworn to defend!
Cersei Lannister: Careful, Ser.
Lord Varys: We have nothing but gratitude for your long service, good Ser.
You shall be given a stout Keep beside the sea, with servants to look after your every need.
Barristan Selmy: A hall to die in and men to bury me.
I am a Knight. I shall die a Knight.
Petyr Baelish: A naked Knight, apparently.
Barristan Selmy: Even now I could cut through the five of you like carving a cake!
Here, boy! Melt it down and add it to the others.
King's Landing Page: If any man in this hall has other matters to set before His Grace, let him speak now or go forth and hold his silence.
Sansa Stark: Your Grace.
King Joffrey: Come forward, My Lady.
Sansa walk forth.
King's Landing Page: The Lady Sansa of House Stark.
Cersei Lannister: Do you have some business for the King and the Council, Sansa?
Sansa Stark: I do.
Sansa kneels down.
Sansa Stark: As it please Your Grace, I ask mercy for my father, Lord Eddard Stark, who was Hand of the King.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Treason is a noxious weed.
It should be torn out, root...
King Joffrey: Let her speak.
I want to hear what she says.
Sansa Stark: Thank you, Your Grace.
Petyr Baelish: Do you deny your father's crime?
Sansa Stark: No, My Lords. I know he must be punished.
All I ask is mercy. I know My Lord father must regret what he did.
He was King Robert's friend and he loved him.
You all know he loved him.
He never wanted to be Hand until the King asked him.
They must have lied to him. Lord Renly or Lord Stannis or somebody.
They must have lied!
King Joffrey: He said I wasn't the King. Why did he say that?
Sansa Stark: He was badly hurt.
Maester Pycelle was giving him milk of the poppy.
He wasn't himself. Otherwise h never would have said it.
Lord Varys: A child's faith Such sweet innocence.
And yet they say wisdom oft comes from the mouths of babes.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Treason is treason!
King Joffrey: Anything else?
Sansa Stark: If you still have any affection in your heart for me, please do me this kindness, Your Grace.
King Joffrey: Your sweet words have moved me.
But your father has to confess.
He has to confess and say that I'm the King or there'll be no mercy for him.
Sansa Stark: He

EXT. KING’S LANDING
The Hound and another man grunt as they duel. Men and women look on from nearby. The Hound knocks the other man’s shield away, and knocks the man off of a wall. The camera pans up from the man to where Joffrey stands in a tent, watching.

JOFFREY: (Quietly) Well struck… (Louder) Well struck, Dog.

The Hound removes his helmet. Joffrey turns to Sansa.

JOFFREY: Did you like that?

SANSA: It was well struck, Your Grace.

JOFFREY: I already said it was well struck.

SANSA: Yes, Your Grace.

Two men drag the man away, leaving behind a trail of blood. A boy walks over to clean up the blood.

JOFFREY: Who's next?

ANNOUNCER: Lothor Brune, freerider in the service of Lord Baelish.

The announcer gestures to a man, who then walks over.

ANNOUNCER: Ser Dontos the Red of House Hollard.

The announcer gestures in the opposite direction, but no one comes forward.

ANNOUNCER: (Yells) Ser Dontos the Red of House Hollard!

SER DONTOS: Here I am. (Walking down some stairs, awkwardly clutching his helmet and weapon). Here I am. (Drops his helmet). Sorry, Your Grace. (Puts his helmet on backwards). My deepest apologies. (Puts his helmet on correctly).

JOFFREY: Are you drunk?

Ser Dontos takes off his helmet.

SER DONTOS: No. Uh, no, Your Grace. I had - I had two cups of wine.

JOFFREY: Two cups? (Dontos nods). That's not much at all. (Joffrey gestures to some wine). Please, have another cup.

SER DONTOS: Are you sure, Your Grace?

JOFFREY: Yes, to celebrate my name day. (Smiles) Have two, have as much as you like.

SER DONTOS: I would be honored, Your Grace.

Ser Dontos bows to Joffrey. Joffrey looks over to Ser Meryn.

JOFFREY: Ser Meryn, help Ser Dontos celebrate my name day. See that he drinks his fill.

Ser Meryn and two other kingsguard grab Ser Dontos. They bring him into a more open area nearby. Ser Dontos is forced on his knees. One kingsguard keeps Ser Dontos down. Ser Meryn and the other kingsguard get a funnel and a barrel of wine. Ser Meryn forces the funnel into Ser Dontos’s mouth. The kingsguard with the barrel begins pouring the wine down the funnel. Ser Dontos begins gurgling and struggles a little bit.

SANSA: You can't!

JOFFREY: What did you say? Did you say I can't?

SANSA: I only meant… it would be bad luck to kill a man on your name day.

JOFFREY: What kind of stupid peasant's superstition...

THE HOUND: The girl is right. What a man sows on his name day, he reaps all year.

JOFFREY: (Sighs). Take him away. I'll have him killed tomorrow, the fool.

The barrel and funnel are removed, and Ser Dontos is released. He pukes out a mixture of blood and wine onto the ground.

SANSA: He is. A fool - you're so clever to see it. He'll make a much better fool than a knight. He doesn't deserve the mercy of a quick death.

JOFFREY: Did you hear My Lady, Ser Dontos? (Ser Dontos is forced onto his feet). From this day, (Standing up), you'll be my new fool.

SER DONTOS: Thank you, Your Grace. (Bows). And you, My Lady, thank you.

Ser Dontos is taken away by kingsguard.

TYRION: Beloved nephew.

Tyrion, Bronn, and a number of hill tribesman appear from the right. People murmur and look their way.

TYRION: We looked for you on the battlefield. (Joffrey sits down). You were nowhere to be found.

Tyrion begins to pour himself a glass of wine.

JOFFREY: I've been here, ruling the kingdoms.

TYRION: What a fine job you've done. (Turns to Myrcella). Look at you. (Kisses her). More beautiful than ever. (Turns to Tommen). And you! You, you're going to be bigger than the Hound, but much better looking. (Tyrion smiles. He and Myrcella laugh). This one doesn't like me.

Tyrion gestures towards the Hound. Bronn looks over at the Hound and smiles wryly.

BRONN: Can't imagine why.

JOFFREY: We heard you were dead.

MYRCELLA: I'm glad you're not dead.

Tyrion takes a sip of his wine.

TYRION: Me, too, dear. Death is so boring, especially now with so much excitement in the world. (Looks at Sansa). My Lady, I'm sorry for your loss.

Tyrion bows to Sansa. Joffrey looks over at her, and back to Tyrion.

JOFFREY: Her loss? Her father was a confessed traitor!

TYRION: But still her father. Surely having so recently lost your own beloved father you can sympathize.

SANSA: My father was a traitor. My mother and brother are traitors, too. I am loyal to my beloved Joffrey.

TYRION: Of course you are.

Tyrion smirks sympathetically. Sansa looks away.

TYRION: Well, (Gulps down his wine), enjoy your name day, Your Grace. Wish I could stay and celebrate, but there is work to be done.

Tyrion begins walking away from the tent.

JOFFREY: What work? (Bronn and the tribesmen follow Tyrion. Joffrey stands up). Why are you here?

INT. SMALL COUNCIL MEETING CHAMBER

The council members sit at a table. A man walks to the table with a covered bird cage.

PYCELLE: The raven arrived from the Citadel this morning, Your Grace. The conclave has met, (The man sets the cage down and removes the cover), considered reports from Maesters all over the Seven Kingdoms, and declared this great summer done, at last. The longest summer in living memory.

VARYS: The peasants say, a long summer means an even longer winter.

PYCELLE: A common superstition.

BAELISH: We have enough wheat for a five-year winter. If it lasts any longer, (Shrugs indifferently), we'll have fewer peasants.

JANOS: The city's drowning in refugees, Your Grace, fleeing the war. We have nowhere to house them, and with winter coming, it'll only get worse.

Cersei gestures to a servant. The servant comes to take the raven off of the table.

CERSEI: You command the City Watch, do you not, Lord Slynt?

JANOS: I do, Your Grace.

CERSEI: And are you not a Lord at my command?

JANOS: I owe my title and lands to your generosity, Your Grace.

CERSEI: Then do your job. Shut the gates to the peasants. They belong in the field, not our capital.

JANOS: Yes, Your Grace.

Tyrion begins whistling from a distance. Everyone at the table turns to watch him approach.

TYRION: Don't get up. More ravishing than ever, big sister. (Kisses Cersei on the cheek). War agrees with you. Forgive the interruption, carry on.

CERSEI: What are you doing here?

TYRION: (Sits down) It's been a remarkable journey. I, (grabs a glass), pissed off the edge of the Wall, I slept in a sky cell. (Pours himself wine). I fought with the hill tribes. So many adventures, so much to be thankful for.

Tyrion begins drinking his wine.

CERSEI: What are you doing here? This is the small council.

TYRION: Yes., well, I, do believe the Hand of the King is welcome at all small council meetings.

CERSEI: Our father is Hand of the King.

TYRION: Yes, but in his absence…

Tyrion pulls out a letter. He hands it to Varys, who opens it, and begins reading it.

VARYS: Your father has named Lord Tyrion to serve as Hand in his stead while he fights -

CERSEI: Out! All of you out. (The small council members all get up and leave until it is only Cersei and Tyrion. Cersei stands up and approaches Tyrion). I would like to know how you tricked father into this.

TYRION: If I were capable of tricking father, I'd be emperor of the world by now. You brought this on yourself. (Cersei sits down).

CERSEI: I've done nothing.

TYRION: Quite right. You did nothing when your son called for Ned Stark's head. Now the entire North has risen up against us.

CERSEI: I tried to stop it.

TYRION: Did you? You failed. That bit of theater will haunt our family for a generation.

CERSEI: Robb Stark is a child.

TYRION: Who's won every battle he's fought. Do you understand we're losing the war?

CERSEI: What do you know about warfare?

TYRION: Nothing. But I know people. And I know that our enemies hate each other almost as much as they hate us.

There is a long pause. Cersei looks over at Tyrion.

CERSEI: Joffrey is King.

TYRION: Joffrey is King.

CERSEI: You are here to advise him.

TYRION: I'm only here to advise him. And if the King listens to what I say, the King might just get his Uncle Jaime back.

CERSEI: How?

TYRION: You love your children. It's your one redeeming quality. That and your cheekbones. The Starks love their children as well. And we have two of them.

CERSEI: One.

TYRION: One?

CERSEI: Arya, little animal, she disappeared.

TYRION: Disappeared? What, in a puff of smoke? We had three Starks to trade. You chopped one's head off and let another escape. Father will be furious. It must be odd for you to be the disappointing child.

Tyrion smirks, and takes a sip of his wine. Cersei looks away.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

EXT. OUTSIDE WINTERFELL

A knight sits on a horse alone, holding a banner. Winterfell is seen in the background.

LORD: My Lord, may the Old Gods watch over your brother and all our northern sons.

INT. INSIDE WINTERFELL’S KEEP

A long queue of people are waiting to speak with Bran. The man speaking is addressing Bran and Maester Luwin, who are both sitting at a large table.

LORD: The walls of my Holdfast will not stand the winter. The stones were last mortared in the time of King Aerys, and I'm afraid the masons today are not fit to carry their fathers' hammers. When I was a boy, I remember seeing them put up a new tower at Torrhen's Square in a summer. Men worked back then. Today, my Holdfast looks like it was built by drunk children. At night you can hear the wind howling through the gaps. And the Gods forbid it rains. Why, I might as well sleep beneath a waterfall.

LUWIN: Maintenance of a Holdfast generally falls to the lord of that Holdfast.

LORD: Generally, yes, but I've sent all the young men off to fight Robb Stark's war.

BRAN: King Robb. And it's not his war. He didn't choose it.

LORD: Maybe not, My Lord, but he called in his Banners, and took the men.

BRAN: Joffrey killed my father, your liege lord. Do you remember your vows, Ser?

LORD: Of course I remember!

LUWIN: We can spare four masons for a week, My Lord. Will that be sufficient to repair your walls?

LORD: I - I believe it will.

The man walks away. After a moment, Luwin turns to Bran.

LUWIN: We didn't want him here all day, did we?

BRAN: I didn't like the way he was talking about Robb.

LUWIN: Nor did I. But listening to people you'd rather not listen to is one of your responsibilities as Lord of Winterfell. (Bran sighs). Lord Portan.

PORTAN: (Walks forward). My Lord, may the Old Gods watch over your brother and all our northern sons.

EXT. WOODS

The camera changes to first-person. A character is running through the woods, panting. The character looks up to the red comet above the trees, and then back down to the pool in the godswood. The character approaches the pool and looks down at their reflection, revealing themselves to be Summer, Bran’s direwolf.

INT. BRAN’S BEDROOM

Bran lays in his bed, asleep. His eyes suddenly open.

EXT. WOODS - LATER THAT DAY

Hodor walks with Bran on his back, closely following Osha. Osha squats next to some plants. Hodor continues walking.

OSHA: Boil this for an hour and drink the tea. Makes all your pain go away.

Osha pockets some of the plant.

BRAN: Don't have any pain.

OSHA: Lucky for you.

BRAN: That way.

Bran points, and Hodor changes direction, heading for the godswood. Osha turns and begins following them.

OSHA: You've been having those dreams again.

BRAN: I don't dream.

OSHA: Everyone dreams.

BRAN: I don't. Heard some of the men talking about the comet. (Bran looks up at the comet). They say it's an omen. They say it means Robb will win a great victory in the South.

OSHA: Did they? (Hodor is kneeling next to the pool in the godswood. Osha begins unstrapping Bran from Hodor’s back). I heard some other fools say it's Lannister Red. Means the Lannisters will rule all Seven Kingdoms before long. I heard a stable boy say it's the color of blood, to mark the death of your father.

Osha places Bran on the ground. He begins crawling towards the edge of the pool.

OSHA: The stars don't fall for men. The red comet means one thing, boy. Dragons.

Bran looks at his reflection in the pool.

BRAN: The dragons are all dead. They've been dead for centuries.

CUT TO: ESSOS

EXT. DESERT

Some people walk through the desert. The camera pans up to reveal Daenerys, with Drogon on her shoulder, and her Khalasar. Daenerys attempts to feed Drogon some meat, but he refuses.

DOREAH: What did your brother say about them, Khaleesi?

DAENERYS: He said they ate meat.

DOREAH: He didn't tell you what kind of meat?

DAENERYS: My brother didn't know anything about dragons. He didn't know anything about anything.

Doreah looks down dejectedly. Daenerys gets Drogon off of her shoulder and into his cage. At the front of the group, a horse suddenly collapses. Jorah jogs forward to investigate. Daenerys follows after him. Daenerys kneels down to look at the horse. She looks up at Jorah, who shakes his head. Daenerys looks down sadly.

DAENERYS: She was Drogo's first gift to me.

JORAH: I remember.

DAENERYS: I promised to protect them. Promised them their enemies would die screaming. How do I make starvation scream?

JORAH: A trick I never learned, I'm afraid.

DAENERYS: Does it ever end?

JORAH: This is further east than I've ever been. But, yes, Khaleesi, everything ends, even the red waste.

DAENERYS: And you're sure there's no other way?

JORAH: If we go south to the land of the Lazarheen, the Lamb Men will kill us and take your dragons. If we go west to the Dothraki Sea, the first Khalasar we meet will kill us and take your dragons.

DAENERYS: No one will take my dragons.

JORAH: They are too weak to fight, as are your people. You must be their strength.

DAENERYS: (Turns to Jorah) As you are mine.

Daenerys says something in Dothraki, calling Rakharo and some others over. She then stands up, and addresses Rakharo and two others.

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Rakharo, Aggo, Kovarro. Take our remaining horses. You will ride east, you southeast, and you northeast.

RAKHARO: (Speaking Dothraki) What do we seek, Khaleesi?

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Cities, living or dead. Caravans and people. Rivers or lakes or the great salt sea. Find how far the Red Waste extends before us, and what lies on the other side.

Rakharo and the other two riders walk away. Later, as Rakharo is almost ready to leave, Daenerys approaches him.

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Rokharo, you are my last hope, blood of my blood.

RAKHARO: (Speaking Dothraki) I will not fail you, blood of my blood.

DAENERYS: You never have.

RAKHARO: This is… bad time to start.

Rakharo and the other two riders take off. Daenerys stares at the red comet, looking troubled.

CUT TO: BEYOND THE WALL

EXT. WOODS

The large party of Night’s Watchmen continue through the woods on horseback. Sam, Grenn, and Edd surround a sledge trapped in the snow on the side of the road.

JON: Having a rough time of it?

SAM: Nothing's killed me yet.

GRENN: Your ass killed the sledge.

SAM: You offered me a ride!

GRENN: I just wanted you to shut up about your damn blisters.

The party reaches a large camp. Some of them dismount. The camera pans up to view a large wooden house in the center.

EDD: I was born in a place like this. Later, I fell on hard times.

The camera moves through the camp, to show some of the women working.

SAM: Are those girls?

EDD: Craster's daughters.

SAM: I haven't seen a girl in six months.

EDD: I'd keep on not seeing them if I were you.

GRENN: What, he don't like people messing with his daughters?

EDD: (Smirking) He don't like people messing with his wives.

Jon, Sam, and Grenn all look at Edd, surprised.

EDD: He marries his daughters, and they give him more daughters, and on, and on it goes.

SAM: That's foul.

GRENN: It's beyond foul.

EDD: All the other wildlings for a hundred leagues have disappeared. Craster's still here. He must be doing something right.

JON: What happens to the boys?

SAM: Hmm?

JON: He marries his daughters. What does he do with his sons?

INT. CRASTER’S LODGE

Craster, Mormont, and a number of watchmen sit around a fire.

LORD MORMONT: He said he planned to stop here on his way to the Frostfangs.

CRASTER: People make all sorts of plans. I haven't seen Benjen Stark in three years. Haven't missed him. Always treated me like scum. (Sips his wine). Haven't had any good wine for a long time. You Southerners make good wine, I'll give you that.

JON: (Standing off to the side of the room) We're not Southerners.

CRASTER: Who's this little girl? You're prettier than half my daughters. You got a nice wet twat between your legs? What's your name?

JON: Jon Snow.

CRASTER: Snow, eh? Listen to me, bastard. All you lot from south of the Wall, you're Southerners. But now you're in the North, the real North.

LORD MORMONT: The lad meant no harm.

CRASTER: I catch that pretty little bastard talking to my daughters -

LORD MORMONT: No one will talk to your daughters, you have my word. (Turns to Jon) Now, sit down and shut your mouth.

Jon takes a seat at the fire.

CRASTER: You bring any of that good wine with you?

LORD MORMONT: We did. We passed through six villages on the way here. All six were abandoned. Where have all the wildlings gone?

As the conversation continues, Jon looks around at some of Craster’s daughters in the rafters.

CRASTER: I could tell you, but I'm thirsty.

LORD MORMONT: There's a barrel of Dornish wine on the sledge. Bring it in here.

WATCHMAN: Yes, commander.

CRASTER: You want to know where they've all gone? North! To join up with Mance Rayder Your old friend.

LORD MORMONT: He's no friend of mine. He broke his vows, betrayed his brothers!

CRASTER: Oh, aye. But once he was just a poor black crow. And now he's King-Beyond-the-Wall.

LORD MORMONT: He's been calling himself that for years. What’s he king of? A frozen lake somewhere?

Craster looks at the watchman sitting next to Mormont and points.

CRASTER: That's a good-looking axe. Fresh forged?

LORD MORMONT: Give it here.

Mormont beckons to the watchman, who begrudgingly hands Mormont the axe.

LORD MORMONT: You'll have another one made at Castle Black. (Hands the axe to Craster). Here.

CRASTER: (Inspecting the axe). Oh, that's some lovely steel. (Loudly brings the axe down). You want to know what Mance Rayder is doing? Gathering an army. What I hear, he's already got more men than any of your southern kings.

LORD MORMONT: And where does he plan marching this army?

CRASTER: When you're all the way north, there's only one direction to go.

LORD MORMONT: These are bad times to be living alone in the wild. The cold winds are rising.

CRASTER: Let them come. My roots are sunk deep. (Grabs Gilly) Wife, tell the Lord Crow how content we are.

GILLY: This is our place. Our husband keeps us safe. Better to live free than die a slave.

CRASTER: Don't it make you jealous, old man, to see me with all these young wives and you with no one to warm your bed?

LORD MORMONT: We chose different paths.

CRASTER: Oh, aye, and you chose the path with no one but boys on it. (Stands up). You'll be wanting to sleep beneath my roof, I suppose, and eat me out of pigs.

LORD MORMONT: (Stands up) A roof would be welcome. It's been hard riding. We've brought our own food and good steel for you.

CRASTER: (Addressing the group). Any man lays a hand on one of my wives, he loses the hand. And I see this one, (Gestures towards Jon), staring too long, I might just gouge his eyes out.

LORD MORMONT: Your roof, your rules.

The crows all leave the lodge.

EXT. IN THE CAMP

Mormont roughly grabs Jon and pins him against a wooden post.

LORD MORMONT: (Angrily) Who am I? (Jon looks confused) Who am I?

JON: Lord commander.

LORD MORMONT: And who are you?

JON: Jon Snow.

LORD MORMONT: Who are you?

JON: Your steward.

LORD MORMONT: You want to lead one day? (Jon nods). Then learn how to follow.

CUT TO: DRAGONSTONE

EXT. BEACH

The camera pans down from the red comet to Maester Cressen, holding a torch and running. Melisandre can be heard speaking in the distance.

MELISANDRE: Lord of Light, come to us in our darkness. We offer you these false Gods.

Cressen approaches a group gathered on the beach, burning some effigies. Melisandre is speaking to them.

MELISANDRE: Take them and cast your light upon us. For the night is dark and full of terrors.

THE GROUP: (In unison) For the night is dark and full of terrors.

Cressen reaches the group and hands his torch to another man.

MELISANDRE: After the long summer, darkness will fall heavy on the world. Stars will bleed.

CRESSEN: (To Davos) We need to stop her!

MELISANDRE: The cold breath of winter will freeze the seas.

DAVOS: (Looks to Stannis) Not now.

MELISANDRE: And the dead shall rise in the North.

CRESSEN: (Walks forward, interrupting Melisandre). All you men were named in the Light of the Seven! Is this how you treat the Gods of your fathers? Are you so eager to spit on your ancestors?

After a long silence, Melisandre approaches Cressen and caresses his face.

MELISANDRE: You smell of fear, fear and piss and old bones. Do you want to stop me? Stop me.

After a moment, Cressen begrudgingly stands aside.

MELISANDRE: In the ancient books, it's written that a warrior will draw a burning sword from the fire. And that sword shall be Lightbringer. Stannis Baratheon, warrior of light, your sword awaits you.

Stannis approaches one of the burning effigies as everyone else looks on. He pulls a sword out from the base and carries it high, to applause. When he sticks it in the sand, the crowd kneels.

CROWD: Lord, cast your light upon us!

MELISANDRE: For the night is dark and full of terrors.

STANNIS: For the night is dark and full of terror.

Stannis then walks away, almost forgetting to bring his wife with him. The rest of the crowd gets up to leave moments later. Davos and Cressen stay behind a moment to talk.

CRESSEN: This woman will lead him into a war he cannot win.

DAVOS: Stannis is our king. We follow where he leads, even if we don't like the path.

CRESSEN: (Scoffs) King. Since that boar killed his brother, every lord wants a coronation.

DAVOS: I don't serve the others. I serve Stannis.

CRESSEN: As do I, but loyal service means telling hard truths. He's surrounded by fools and fanatics, but he trusts you, Davos. (Davos picks up the sword and inspects it). If you tell him the truth…

DAVOS: What's the truth?

Cressen looks crestfallen. Davos walks away with the sword. Cressen looks up at the burning effigies.

INT. DRAGONSTONE - LATER THAT DAY

Matthos reads out a letter for Stannis to proofread, as they and some other characters sit around a table.

MATTHOS: “And I declare upon the honor of my house that my beloved brother Robert le-”

STANNIS: He wasn't my beloved brother. (Matthos looks up). I didn't love him, he didn't love me.

DAVOS: A harmless courtesy, Your Grace.

STANNIS: A lie. Take it out.

Matthos scratches ‘beloved’ off of the letter, and then continues.

MATTHOS: “That my brother Robert left no trueborn heirs; the boy Joffrey, the boy Tommen, and the girl Myrcella, being born of incest between Cersei Lannister and her brother Jaime Lannister. By right of birth -"

STANNIS: Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. Call him what he is.

Matthos adds in ‘the Kingslayer,’ and continues. Davos notices Cressen slip something into his own glass of wine.

MATTHOS: "And her brother Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. By right of birth and blood, I do this day lay claim -"

STANNIS: Make it Ser Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. Whatever else he is, the man's still a knight.

MATTHOS: (Adding Ser) "Ser Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. By right of birth and blood, I do this day lay claim to the Iron Throne of Westeros. (Stannis nods). Let all true men declare their loyalty.”

STANNIS: When Eddard Stark learned the truth, he told only me. I'll not make the same mistake. Send copies of that letter to every corner of the Realm, from the Arbor to the Wall. The time has come to choose. Let no man claim ignorance as an excuse.

DAVOS: Your Grace, the Lannisters are the true enemy. If, for the time being, you could make peace with your brother -

STANNIS: I'll not make peace with Renly while he calls himself King.

DAVOS: Well, many have already declared for him; Mace Tyrell, Randyll Tarly.

MELISANDRE: Stannis does not need to beg this lord or that lord for support. The Lord of Light stands behind him.

DAVOS: And how many ships has the Lord of Light got in his fleet?

MELISANDRE: He has no need for ships.

DAVOS: I'm sure he doesn't, but we do if we're going to war. If not Renly, Your Grace, join forces with Robb Stark.

STANNIS: Who would steal the northern half of my kingdom. I've always served thieves according to their desserts, as you well know, Ser Davos. Joffrey, Renly, Robb Stark, they're all thieves. They'll bend the knee or I'll destroy them.

CRESSEN: (Stands up). I owe you an apology, my King. My duty is to serve. You have chosen the new God over the Old Gods. May the Lord of Light watch over us all. Shall we drink together?

DAVOS: (Whispers to Cressen) Don't.

Cressen stands up with the drugged glass of wine, and walks over to where Melisandre is sitting.

CRESSEN: A cup of wine to honor the one true God.

Melisandre stands up. Everyone at the table reaches for their own wine glasses. Cressen takes a sip of the drugged wine and offers it to Melisandre. Davos nervously watches her take the glass. Cressen begins to stumble and bleed from his nose. Melisandre drink a large portion of the wine. As he falls to the floor dead, Davos and many others stand up. Melisandre appears unphased by the poison.

MELISANDRE: The night is dark and full of terrors, old man, but the fire burns them all away. Your Grace.

CUT TO: NORTH

EXT. STARK CAMP

The camera pans over a watchtower to a wide shot of the camp. In the camp, Robb stark is led by a man with a torch to where Jaime is being held. Robb enters Jaime’s cage, where he is tied to a wooden pole, a good distance from the walls of the cage.

JAIME: King in the North. I keep expecting you to leave me in one castle or another for safekeeping, but you drag me along from camp to camp. Have you grown fond of me, Stark? Is that it? I've never seen you with a girl.

ROBB: If I left you with one of my bannermen, your father would know within a fortnight, and my bannerman would receive a raven with a message, "Release my son and you'll be rich beyond your dreams. Refuse and your house will be destroyed, root and stem.”

JAIME: You don't trust the loyalty of the men following you into battle?

ROBB: Oh, I trust them with my life. Just not with yours.

JAIME: Smart boy. What's wrong? Don't like being called ‘boy’? Insulted?

Robb looks behind Jaime’s cage. As Jaime nervously strains to look behind him, Grey Wind can be heard heavily walking to the front of the cage.

ROBB: You insult yourself, Kingslayer. You've been defeated by a boy.

With Grey Wind now fully in view, Jaime loses his brave facade.

ROBB: You're held captive by a boy. Perhaps you'll be killed by a boy. (Grey Wind enters the cage. Jaime looks very nervous). Stannis Baratheon sent ravens to all the high lords of Westeros. King Joffrey Baratheon is neither a true king nor a true Baratheon. (Jaime focuses back on Robb). He's your bastard son.

JAIME: If that's true, Stannis is the rightful king. How convenient for him.

ROBB: My father learned the truth. That's why you had him executed.

JAIME: I was your prisoner when Ned Stark lost his head.

ROBB: Your son killed him so the world wouldn't learn who fathered him. And you... you pushed my brother from a window because he saw you with the queen.

JAIME: You have proof? Or do you want to trade gossip like a couple of fishwives?

ROBB: I'm sending one of your cousins down to King's Landing with my peace terms.

JAIME: You think my father's going to negotiate with you? You don't know him very well.

ROBB: No, but he's starting to know me.

JAIME: Three victories don't make you a conqueror.

ROBB: It's better than three defeats.

Robb nudges Grey Wind towards Jaime and leaves the cage. Grey Wind growls in Jaime’s face and comes close to biting him. Jaime closes his eyes in preparation, but when he opens them back up, Grey Wind is gone.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. TYRION’S ROOM

Shae looks out from the balcony in Tyrion’s room.

SHAE: This city stinks Like dead bodies.

TYRION: A bit corpsey, yes.

SHAE: And shit.

Shae hops down from the balcony, and walks back into the room.

TYRION: I thought you wanted to come here.

SHAE: I love it.

TYRION: You love the smell of dead bodies and shit?

SHAE: And cum and garlic and rum.

TYRION: You can smell cum from the balcony?

SHAE: I love the stink. I love the noise. Cities make me want to fuck.

TYRION: And so did the country.

Shae lays back on Tyrion’s bed.

SHAE: This is where I belong.

TYRION: Yes, well, you need to be careful. No one can know you're here.

SHAE: No one will know.

TYRION: You can't trust anyone in King's Landing. They're all liars; good liars, bad liars, one or two great liars.

SHAE: What about you?

TYRION: Me? I'm not from here. I'm a slave to the truth.

SHAE: Truth? (Laughs) You are the biggest little liar I have ever met.

TYRION: Why do you think I am so little? I'm being, (Lays down on the bed with Shae), crushed beneath the weight of all that truth.

TYRION: Ned Stark actually slept on this, as if the poor man didn't suffer enough. One of the many changes we'll have to make around here.

Tyrion and Shae kiss as a bell rings in the distance.

INT. HALLWAY

A servant boy can be seen scrubbing something on the floor, as Baelish walks down a hallway next to a courtyard. Cersei and some kingsguard approach from behind.

CERSEI: Lord Baelish.

BAELISH: Your Grace.

CERSEI: I wonder if I might ask you for a favor.

BAELISH: Of course, Your Grace.

CERSEI: Ned Stark's youngest daughter Arya... we can't seem to locate her.

Baelish begins walking with Cersei and her guards.

BAELISH: If she's escaped the capital, Winterfell seems the logical destination.

CERSEI: And yet my friends in the North report no sign of her.

BAELISH: Curious.

CERSEI: If we choose to negotiate with the Starks, the girl has some value. Whoever finds her, well, you know what they say about Lannisters and debts.

BAELISH: Well, you could ask Varys where she is. He'll have an answer for you. Whether you believe it,,, Myself, I have always had a hard time trusting eunuchs. (Smiles) Who knows what they want?

CERSEI: A mockingbird. (Points to a pin on Baelish’s shirt). You created your own Sigil, didn't you?

BAELISH: Yes.

CERSEI: Appropriate for a self-made man with so many songs to sing.

BAELISH: I'm glad you like it. Some people are fortunate enough to be born into the right family. Others have to find their own way.

CERSEI: I heard a song once about a boy of modest means who found his way into the home of a very prominent family. He loved the eldest daughter. Sadly, she had eyes for another.

BAELISH: When boys and girls live in the same home, awkward situations can arise. Sometimes, I've heard, even brothers and sisters develop certain affections. And when these affections become common knowledge, well, that is an awkward situation, indeed. Especially in a prominent family. But prominent families often forget a simple truth, I've found.

CERSEI: And which truth is that?

BAELISH: Knowledge is power.

CERSEI: Seize him. (Cersei’s guards seize Baelish). Cut his throat. (A guard holds a knife to Baelish’s neck). Stop. Wait. I've changed my mind. Let him go. (The guards let Baelish go). Step back three paces. Turn around. Close your eyes. (The guards do as Cersei says). (To Baelish) Power is power. Do see if you can take some time away from your coins and your whores to locate the Stark girl for me. I would very much appreciate it.

Cersei walks away from Baelish, her guards following close behind. The servant boy scrubbing the floor looks up at Baelish.

CUT TO: NORTH

INT. ROBB’S TENT

ROBB: You're Ser Alton Lannister?

ALTON: I am, Your Grace.

ROBB: I offer your cousins peace if they meet my terms. First, your family must release my sisters. Second, my father's bones must be returned to us so he may rest beside his brother and sister in the crypts beneath Winterfell. And the remains of all those who died in his service must also be returned. Their families can honor them with proper funerals.

ALTON: An honorable request, Your Grace.

ROBB: Third... Joffrey and the Queen Regent must renounce all claim to dominion of the North. From this time, till the end of time, we are a free and independent kingdom.

Alton looks at him wide-eyed.

SER RODRIK: The King in the North.

THE OTHERS AT THE TABLE: King in the North.

ROBB: Neither Joffrey nor any of his men shall set foot in our lands again. If he disregards this command, he shall suffer the same fate as my father, only I don't need a servant to do my beheading for me.

ALTON: These are... Your Grace, these are...

ROBB: These are my terms. If the Queen Regent and her son meet them, I'll give them peace. If not, I will litter the south with Lannister dead.

ALTON: King Joffrey is a Baratheon, Your Grace.

ROBB: Oh, is he? You'll ride at daybreak, Ser Alton. That will be all for tonight.

After everyone else leaves the tent, Theon approaches Robb.

THEON: A word, Your Grace?

ROBB: You don't have to call me ‘Your Grace’ when no one's around.

THEON: It's not so bad once you get used to it.

ROBB: I'm glad someone's gotten used to it.

THEON: The Lannisters are going to reject your terms, you know?

ROBB: Of course they are.

THEON: We can fight them in the fields as long as you like, but we won't beat them until you take King's Landing. And we can't take King's Landing without ships. My father has ships and men who know how to sail them.

ROBB: Men who fought my father.

THEON: Men who fought King Robert to free themselves from the yoke of the South, just like you're doing now. I'm his only living son. He'll listen to me. I know he will. I'm not a Stark. I know that. But your father raised me to be an honorable man. We can avenge him together.

INT. A DIFFERENT TENT - LATER

CATELYN: You don't want Balon Greyjoy for an ally.

ROBB: I need his ships. They say he has 200.

CATELYN: They say a million rats live in the sewers of King's Landing. Shall we rally them to fight for us?

Catelyn is preparing to go somewhere, gathering up various items.

ROBB: I understand you don't trust Lord Greyjoy.

CATELYN: I don't trust Lord Greyjoy because he is not trustworthy. Your father had to go to war to end his rebellion.

ROBB: Yes. And now I'm the one rebelling against the throne. Before me, it was father. You married one rebel and mothered another.

CATELYN: I mothered more than just rebels, a fact you seem to have forgotten.

ROBB: If I trade the Kingslayer for two girls, my bannermen will string me up by my feet.

CATELYN: You want to leave Sansa in the Queen's hands? And Arya, I haven't heard a word about Arya. What are we fighting for if not for them?

ROBB: It's more complicated than that! You know it is.

A long pause follows. Catelyn sits down.

CATELYN: It's time for me to go home. I haven't seen Bran or Rickon in months.

ROBB: You can't go to Winterfell.

CATELYN: I beg your pardon?

ROBB: I'll send Rodrik to watch over the boys, ‘cause tomorrow, you'll ride south to the Stormlands.

CATELYN: Why in the name of all the Gods -

ROBB: Because I need you to negotiate with Renly Baratheon. He's rallied an army of 100,000. You know him. You know his family.

CATELYN: I haven't seen Renly Baratheon since he was a boy. You have a hundred other lords -

ROBB: Which of these lords do I trust more than you? If Renly sides with us, we'll outnumber them two to one. When they feel the jaws beginning to shut, they'll sue for peace. We'll get the girls back. Then we'll all go home for good.

CATELYN: I will ride at first light.

Robb kisses Catelyn’s forehead, and they embrace.

ROBB: We will all be together again soon, I promise.

CATELYN: You've done so well. Your father would be proud.

ROBB: (Pauses) Give Lord Renly my regards.

CATELYN: King Renly. There's a king in every corner now.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. THRONE ROOM

Cersei and her guards enter the throne room. Extensive work is being done, overseen by Joffrey.

CERSEI: What is all this?

JOFFREY: Returning this room to its proper appearance. Say what you will about the Targaryens, they were conquerors. That is a seat for a conqueror. It needs a room to match it, not vines and flowers.

CERSEI: We can't find Arya Stark.

JOFFREY: With luck, she's dead in a ditch somewhere.

CERSEI: Perhaps. But if not, we need her. They'll never give Jaime back to us for Sansa alone.

JOFFREY: I think they might. They're weak. They put too much value on their women. (Walks towards the throne).

CERSEI: We need to set our armies to the task of finding her. Send out as many men as we can. I'm sure if you asked grandfather -

JOFFREY: The King does not ask; He commands. And my grandfather's stupidity in the field of battle is the reason Robb Stark has Uncle Jaime in the first place.

CERSEI: His life is in danger.

JOFFREY: We're at war. All our lives are in danger. I heard a disgusting lie about Uncle Jaime. And you.

CERSEI: Our enemies will say anything to weaken your claim to the throne.

JOFFREY: It's not a claim. The throne is mine.

CERSEI: Of course it is. No one believes this foul gossip -

JOFFREY: Someone believes it. Father had other children? Besides me and Tommen and Myrcella?

CERSEI: What are you asking?

JOFFREY: I'm asking if he fucked other women when he grew tired of you. How many bastards does he have running -

Cersei instinctively slaps Joffrey. It grows quiet as many workers look over at Joffrey and Cersei. Joffre looks up shocked, and then around to the workers in the room. Cersei appears nervous.

JOFFREY: What you just did is punishable by death. You will never do it again. Never. (Joffrey begins to walk away). That will be all, Mother.

INT. BROTHEL

A man and a woman are having sex. The woman is shrieking loudly.

ROZ: No, no, no, no. Do you have any idea how ridiculous you sound? Ease into it. Slowly, with passion.

The man and woman go back to having sex, this time with the woman slowly moaning.

ROZ: Go wash yourselves. Put some clothes on. Both of you are working tonight.

Roz walks Daisy through the brothel.

ROZ: We do things differently here, Daisy. This isn't some five-copper bawdy house in Hayseed Hall.

DAISY: Haystack Hall.

ROZ: Wherever you're from. Our establishment doesn't cater to ploughmen and goat herders. (Nods to a man walking past). Lord Olsen. Taste is everything here.

DAISY: Littlefinger's a fancy man.

ROZ: Don't call him Littlefinger, he doesn't like it. Lord Baelish.

As they enter a new room, a prostitute and two men with her get up to leave.

ROZ: She pretends she doesn't speak the common tongue so that people will think she's exotic. She grew up just down the road in flea bottom.

DAISY: She's beautiful.

ROZ: She's a dumb slut, really, but a lid for every pot. (Janos enters the room). Lord Commander. Good to see you, again.

Janos is followed by a number of gold cloaks, some of whom are dragging along a prisoner. Some leave to search other rooms.

ROZ: You do realize this establishment is owned by Lord Petyr Baelish, the King's Master of Coin. Coin which goes in many pockets.

JANOS: Orders.

ROZ: Whose orders?

JANOS: Someone who doesn't care what Littlefinger thinks.

MHAEGAN: No, you can't!

Some gold cloaks force Mhaegan and her baby, Barra, into the room. She begins crying. The prisoner looks at Barra, and back to Janos. He then nods. A gold cloak lets go of the prisoner and takes the Barra from Mhaegan.

MHAEGAN: No! Please! No! Not my Barra! Please. Please.

The gold cloak holds a knife to the baby’s throat, hesitantly. Throughout the whole ordeal, Mhaegan continues begging for Barra’s life.

JANOS: Enough. Get it done. Kill the bastard.

After a moment, Janos takes out a knife and grabs the baby.

JANOS: Give it here.

Janos kills the baby just off screen, and Mhaegan shrieks. Janos and the other gold cloaks leave the brothel.

EXT. A DOCK

Some gold cloaks walk along a dock. They go up some stairs.

GOLD CLOAK: Spread out! Search every house, every room. Look in every room.

INT. A HOUSE

Some gold cloaks burst into a house and kill the inhabitants.

EXT. A DOCK

Outside again, a gold cloak tosses a young boy into the water and proceeds to drown him.

EXT. STREET

Some gold cloaks hold back a large mob as a baby is carried away. A gold cloak looks on as the baby is presumably killed.

INT. SMITHY

Janos and a number of gold cloaks arrive at the smithy. A gold cloak is holding the blacksmith’s face near some hot coals.

BLACKSMITH: Gendry! His name is Gendry.

JANOS: Where is the bastard?

BLACKSMITH: The Night's Watch! Please, stop!

JANOS: Where?

BLACKSMITH: They took him up the Kingsroad, heading north!

JANOS: How will we know him?

BLACKSMITH: He's got a bull's head helmet. He made it himself.

JANOS: Find him.

CUT TO: YOREN’S PARTY

EXT. A ROAD SURROUNDED BY TREES



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
The Night Lands Script
Game of Thrones
Featuring Alan Taylor
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 2 Scripts
THE NIGHT LANDS SCRIPT
COLD OPEN

INT. SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER
CERSEI: What are you doing here?

VARYS: Your father has named Lord Tyrion to (Cersei scoffs) serve as hand in his stead.

TYRION: You brought this on yourself.

CERSEI: I’ve done nothing.

TYRION: Do you understand we’re losing the war?

EXT. DESERT

DAENERYS: Does it ever end?

JORAH: Everything ends, even the red waste.

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Rakharo, Aggo, Kovarro.. Take our remaining horses. Find out how far the Red Waste extends before us, and what lies on the other side.

INT./EXT. CRASTER’S CAMP

EDD: All the other wildlings for a hundred leagues have disappeared. Craster’s still here.

CRASTER: Any man lays a hand on one of my wives, he loses the hand.

EDD: He marries his daughters, and they give him more daughters.

JON: What happens to the boys? What does he do with his sons?


INT. DRAGONSTONE

MATTHOS: (Reading a letter) My brother Robert left no trueborn heirs, the boy Joffrey being born of incest between Cersei Lannister, and her brother Jaime Lannister. By right of birth, and blood, I do this day lay claim to the Iron Throne of Westeros.

STANNIS: Send copies of that letter to every corner of the realm.

INT. STARK CAMP

ROBB: I’m sending one of your cousins down to King’s Landing with my peace terms.

JAIME: You think my father’s going to negotiate with you? You don’t know him very well.

THEON: We won’t beat them until we take King’s Landing, and we can’t take King’s Landing without ships. My father has ships, and men who know how to sail them.

ROBB: Men who fought my father.

THEON: I’m his only living son. He’ll listen to me.

CATELYN: You don’t want Balon Greyjoy for an ally.

ROBB: I need his ships.

CATELYN: He is not trustworthy!

INT. THRONE ROOM

JOFFREY: I heard a disgusting lie about uncle Jaime… and you. Father had other children?

CERSEI: What are you asking?

INT. BROTHEL

Janos pulls out a knife and kills the infant Barra, as his mother Mhaegen looks on.

JOFFREY: How many bastards does he have running around?

Shots of gold cloaks murdering people.

I

Water can be heard trickling down. The opening shot is of Arya, her back to the camera, sitting by a pool of water in the woods. She turns her head to the left. Then some leaves rustle, and she turns to the right. A horse whinnies, and she walks towards some other people. Many of them are gathering wood, and she joins in. Jaqen H’ghar, Rorge, and Biter watch her as she walks past their cage.

JAQEN: (Whispers) Boy.

Arya looks up at the cage.

JAQEN: (Whispers) Lovely boy.

ARYA: (Stops walking). What do you want?

JAQEN: A man has a thirst. The man does not drink for a day and a night. A boy could make a friend.

ARYA: (Walks toward the cave). I have friends.

RORGE: Give us a beer. Before I skin you.

JAQEN: A man does not choose his companions. These two, they have no courtesy. A man must ask forgiveness. (Pause). You're called Arry. (Arya nods). This man has the honor to be Jaqen H'ghar. Once of the Free City of Lorath.

RORGE: Hey, you little shit. Get us beer!

Arya throws down the wood she was holding and looks at Rorge angrily.

ARYA: You should have asked nicely.

Arya begins hitting the cage with a stick, trying to hit Rorge. Rorge tries to claw back. Jaqen laughs at the exchange. Biter looks on.

RORGE: Come closer. And I'll shove that stick up your bunghole and fuck you bloody.

JAQEN: (Quietly) The boy has more courage than sense.

RORGE: Come here!

Rorge reaches out at Arya. Gendry walks past holding wood. Arya joins him.

GENDRY: Yoren said none of us were should go near of those three.

RORGE: Come here!

ARYA: They don't scare me.

GENDRY: Hmm? Then you're stupid. They scare me.

Two gold cloaks ride in on horseback. Gendry puts down the wood he was carrying.

ARYA: What are gold cloaks doing this far from King's Landing?

Arya attempts to hide under some wood.

GENDRY: What are you doing?

ARYA: They're looking for me.

GOLD CLOAK: You're in command here?

YOREN: You're a long way from home.

GOLD CLOAK: I asked you a question.

YOREN: Aye, you did. You asked without manners. And I chose not to answer.

GOLD CLOAK: (Pulls out rolled up paper and hands it to Yoren). I have a royal warrant. For one of these gutter rats you're transporting.

Gendry looks at Arya. Arya looks back, pursing her lips.

YOREN: Well the thing is, (Hands back the paper), these gutter rats belong to the Night's Watch now. That puts them beyond the reach of kings and queens.

The gold cloak tries to pull out his sword. Yoren quickly pulls out his dagger and puts it to the man’s leg.

YOREN: It's a funny thing. People worry so much about their throats, they forget about what's down low. Now I sharpened this blade before breakfast. I could shave a spider's arse if I wanted to. Or, I could nick this artery in your leg and once it's nicked, there's no one around here who knows how to un-nick it.

Yoren takes the gold cloak’s sword. The other gold cloak pulls his out.

YOREN: We'll just keep that. Good steel is always needed on the wall. Seems you have a choice. You can die here at this crossroads a long way from home. Or you can go back to your city and tell your masters you didn't find what you were looking for.

GOLD CLOAK: We're looking for a boy named Gendry. (Gendry and Arya look shocked). He carries a bull's head helmet. Anyone turning him over will earn the King's reward. We'll be back. With more men. (To Yoren) And I'll be taking your head home along with that bastard boy.

The gold cloaks ride off. Gendry and Arya stands up. Everyone in the party turns to look at Gendry.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. RED KEEP

Tyrion walks through a room and into a hallway, whistling. As he opens the door to his room, Shae laughs, and he stops whistling. Shae and Varys are sitting at a table. Varys stands up, and Tyrion looks at Shae, and closes the door.

VARYS: My lord.

SHAE: You make me wait a long time, but your friend keeps me company.

VARYS: We were just speaking of your bravery in the victory against the Stark auxiliary forces.

TYRION: It was quite a battle.

Tyrion walks over to the window to get some wine.

VARYS: I heard you suffered a terrible head wound. The northerners are such fearsome warriors.

SHAE: And I tell him the story of how we meet.

VARYS: To find so lovely creature working in your father's kitchen. It almost beggars belief.

TYRION: (Begins to pour wine). Strange things do happen. You should taste her fish pie.

SHAE: I don't think Lord Varys likes fish pie.

VARYS: How can you tell?

SHAE: I can always tell.

TYRION: Men like Lord Varys and I can't let our disadvantages get the best of us. We'll make a fisherman of him yet. (Takes a sip).

VARYS: I am glad your new friend was able to accompany you to the capital. Friends are such an important part of life. Unfortunate that your father didn't want her to come. But rest easy my lord, I am very good at keeping secrets for my good friends.

TYRION: Your discretion is legendary, where your friends are concerned.

VARYS: How unspeakable of me to go on and on, when all you want to do is rest. I will leave you. (Kisses Shae’s hand). Welcome to Kings Landing, my dear. The city is made brighter by your presence. We have a council meeting, my lord.

Shae stands up, and walks away. Tyrion puts his hand on the door, blocking it from being opened.

TYRION: I don't like threats.

VARYS: Who threatened you?

TYRION: I'm not Ned Stark. I understand the way this game is played.

VARYS: Ned Stark was a man of honor.

TYRION: And I am not. Threaten me again and I will have you thrown into the sea.

VARYS: You might be disappointed in the results. The storms come and go. The big fish eat the little fish. And I keep on paddling. Come, my lord. We shouldn't keep the queen waiting.

Tyrion opens the door. He and Varys exit. Varys closes the door behind them.

INT. SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER

The small council sits at their table. Alton stands nearby. Cersei is reading a letter aloud.

CERSEI: “From this time until the end of time, we are not part of your realm, but a free and independent Kingdom of the North.” (Rips up the letter). He has more spirit than his father, I'll give him that.

TYRION: You've perfected the art of tearing up papers. Give him his father's bones back, at least, as a gesture of good faith.

CERSEI: You'll give the Starks our reply, cousin?

ALTON: I will, Your Grace.

CERSEI: Did you see my brother when you were the Starks guest?

Varys and Baelish look annoyed.

ALTON: I did. They have not broken his spirit, Your Grace.

CERSEI: If you speak with him, tell him he's not been forgotten.

ALTON: I will, Your Grace.

TYRION: Safe travels, cousin.

Alton leaves the room, followed by two gold cloaks.

TYRION: You have a deft hand with diplomacy.

CERSEI: If that's everything?

PYCELLE: (Holding a letter). A raven flew in this morning from Castle Black.

Pycelle hands the letter to Tyrion, who unfurls it and begins reading.

VARYS: Trouble with the wildlings?

BAELISH: That's why they're called wildlings.

VARYS: Somewhat less wild these days. It seems they've stopped killing each other and started following this King-Beyond-the-Wall.

CERSEI: Another king? How many is that now, Five? I've lost count.

TYRION: Lord Commander asks that we send more men to man The Wall.

CERSEI: Perhaps he's forgotten we're fighting a war. We have no men to spare.

TYRION: Cold winds are rising, and the dead rise with them.

PYCELLE: The northerners are a superstitious people.

Everyone but Tyrion stands up to leave.

TYRION: According to the Commander, one of these dead men attacked him in his chambers. (The other stop leaving). Mormont doesn't lie.

VARYS: How do you kill a dead man?

TYRION: Apparently you burn him.

CERSEI: One trip to The Wall and you come back believing in grumpkins and snarks. (Walks away, followed by Varys).

TYRION: I don't know what I believe, but here's a fact for you. The Night's Watch is the only thing that separates us from what lies beyond the Wall.

CERSEI: I have every confidence the brave men of the Night's Watch will protect us all.

Everyone but Tyrion leaves.

CUT TO: BEYOND THE WALL

INT. CRASTER’S CAMP

Sam, Edd, and Grenn are standing at a table. Edd and Grenn are cutting food.

EDD: Then I said, if the gods wanted us to have dignity, wouldn't make us fart when we died.

GRENN: We fart when we die?

EDD: My blessed mother was holding her own when she left this world. She farted so hard, the whole bed shook.

Edd makes farting noises with his mouth as they continue to cut food. Sam looks up and watches Gilly walk past.

SAM: Seems a bit greedy for one man to have so many wives. Wouldn't two, or three, be enough for him?

EDD: We were having a serious discussion.

Grenn looks up to watch some of the women.

GRENN: Would you look at that.

SAM: Nothing like the sight of a woman walking away.

GRENN: I prefer watching them come towards me.

SAM: I'm sure that's nice too.

GRENN: Well, there was a milkmaid named Violet on the next farm over from where I grew up. And we were wrestling together from the time we were six years old. And then we got older, the wrestling, uh, (laughs), changed.

SAM: You were with her? How many times?

GRENN: Well, as many times as I could.

SAM: Wish I'd grew up on a farm.

EDD: We need more potatoes. And get another sack for the sludge. (Sam begins to walk away). Get the turnips too.

As Sam continues walking, a dog barks. Then a woman screams. Sam turns around to see Gilly backed up against a fence post. Ghost stands in front of her, eyeing the meat she is carrying. Sam begins slowly walking over.

SAME: No. Ghost, no. No. Ghost, away. Shoo. Shoo! (Ghost walks away). (To Gilly) You all right? Did he frighten you?

Sam reaches out to touch Gilly, but she flinches back.

GILLY: You shouldn't touch me.

SAM: Oh, oh. Right. I'm sorry. I just wanted to make sure you weren't hurt. (Long pause).

GILLY: You're very brave.

The camera moves to a shot of Jon sharpening his sword. He stops and looks up as Sam and Gilly approach him.

JON: What’re you doing?

SAM: This is Gilly, she's one of Craster's daughters.

JON: Hello, Gilly. What’re you doing?

GILLY: Sam said you could help.

JON: I'm sorry, Sam knows we're not supposed to -

SAM: She's pregnant. (Gilly encourages Sam to continue). We have to take her with us, when we leave.

JON: What? (Stands up).

SAM: I know it sounds a bit mad.

JON: No it doesn't sound a bit mad, it's impossible.

SAM: The Lord Commander, (Jon tries and fails to interrupt Sam), we are sworn to protect -

JON: Sam we can't take her -

GILLY: Please sir, please. I can still run if I have to.

JON: It's just not possible.

GILLY: I'm going to have a baby, if it's a boy I…

JON: If it's a boy what? (Gilly looks around and then down, not answering). You want us to risk our lives for you, and you won't even tell us why.

Gilly looks taken aback, and then runs off.

SAM: Why did you do that?

JON: Do what, ask her a question?

SAM: You were cruel.

JON: Cruel! Sam are you in such a hurry to lose a hand?

SAM: I didn't touch her!

JON: No you just want to steal her. What do you think Craster cuts off for that?

SAM: I can't steal her, she's a person not a goat.

JON: We're heading deeper and deeper into wildling territory. We can't take a girl with us. Mormont wouldn't have it. And even if he would, what would we do with her? Who's gonna deliver her baby? You?

SAM: I could try. (Jon looks down, annoyed). What? I've read about it. A bit.

JON: I'm sorry Sam, we can't help her.

Jon sits back down, and returns to sharpening his sword. Sam walks away. When Sam is gone, Jon sighs deeply.

CUT TO: ESSOS

EXT. DESERT

The camera pans across Daenerys’s people, many of whom appear tired and weak. Jorah and Daenerys sit near each other. After looking out for a few moments, Jorah takes a sip of his water, and then sighs. Then a horse can be heard approaching. Jorah looks up at it, and it is shown to be riderless.

JORAH: Khaleesi.

Daenerys looks up at the horse. Jorah gets up. The horse is covered in red paint. Jorah walks over to it. A soaking wet sack is attached to it. Some hair can be seen poking out of the top. Flies can be heard buzzing. Jorah feels the hair, and Daenerys gets up from where she was sitting to approach the horse. Jorah pulls the object in the sack out a little bit by the hair, revealing it to be a human head. He then puts it back in the sack. Jorah picks up the ponytail of the head, which has been cut off.

JORAH: You don't need to see this.

DAENERYS: He is blood of my blood.

Daenerys looks in the sack, and then quickly looks away.

DAENERYS: Who did this?

JORAH: Khal Pono perhaps, Khal Jhaqo They don't like the idea of a woman leading a Khalasaar.

DAENERYS: They will like it far less when I'm done with them.

Irri walks over and sees the head. She then falls to her knees, crying.

IRRI: No! (Speaking Dothraki, to Daenerys) They killed his soul!

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Shh. They cannot kill his soul.

IRRI: (Speaking Dothraki) They did! They butchered him like an animal. They did not burn his body. (Daenerys kneels to Irri’s level). He can never join his ancestors in the night lands.

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) Shh. We will build him a funeral pyre.

Daenerys looks up at Jorah. Jorah looks down. Daenerys addresses Irri again, holding her head.

DAENERYS: (Speaking Dothraki) And I promise you, Rakharo will ride with his ancestors tonight.

Daenerys continues to comfort Irri as she cries. Irri wails loudly.

CUT TO: IRON ISLANDS

EXT. BOAT

Theon stands on a boat, looking out at the Iron Islands. He smiles. The camera then cuts to him below deck. A naked woman lies in his bed. He walks towards the windows.

WOMAN: Is it as you remember my lord?

THEON: (Removes his jacket). Looks smaller.

WOMAN: Everything looks bigger when you're a child. I remember my father's cabin, felt like a palace when I was little. Now look at it.

THEON: (Removes more of his clothes). They'll be waiting for me on the docks.

WOMAN: Who will?

THEON: Anyone who matters, (Takes off his shirt), this is a big day for them. They haven't had much to get excited about since I left. It's a hard place the Iron Islands always has been. It's cold and it's wet.

WOMAN: I love the cold and wet.

THEON: They say hard places breed hard men, (Unbuttons his pants), and hard men rule the world.

WOMAN: Then you'll be king before long.

THEON: (Kneels down). Try smiling with your lips closed. (She does). Hmm, better.

Theon stands up and roughly pushes her back onto the bed.

WOMAN: My father doesn't trust you Iron islanders.

THEON: (Taking off his pants). I don't blame him.

WOMAN: He says that you're all reavers and rapers. And that no matter how many women you have, you'll never be satis-

The woman groans as they begin having sex.

THEON: Quit talking about your father. He's right about us. Our wives from the Iron Islands, they're for breeding. That's not enough for us. That's why we take saltwives, from the women we capture.

WOMAN: Capture me! Take me with you when you go ashore. Make me your saltwife.

THEON: Your place is on this ship.

WOMAN: Not after you leave. Father will punish me. He'll call me a whore.

THEON: I haven't paid you.

Theon flips her over, and they continue having sex.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. BROTHEL

A prostitute and a man are having sex. A man is watching them through a small hole, while he himself is getting a blowjob. He holds some keys in his hand, which are jingling as he pushes the prostitute’s head. Baelish, in turn, is watching this man. He hears a noise and turns around, then covers the hole he was watching through. A man emerges from another room. A woman can be heard crying from inside.

MAN: I barely touched her. And you charge twice as much as every other brothel. And this is what I get, crying.

BAELISH: One moment, my friend. A moment.

Baelish snaps his fingers, and a woman emerges from another room, covered only in gold jewelry. Out of sight, Baelish wipes some semen from her face with a cloth, and then turns back to the disgruntled man.

BAELISH: Please accept my sincerest apologies. Ramka will take good care of you.

Upon seeing Ramka, the man smiles. As they begin to kiss passionately, Baelish goes to investigate the crying woman. He enters the room to see Roz, curled up on the bed, crying. He walks over to her, putting a hand on her back, and then sits next to her.

ROZ: I’m sorry, my lord.

BAELISH: Shhh. Did he hurt you?

ROZ: No, my lord… It’s Mhaegen.

BAELISH: Who?

ROZ: She works for you. She's the one, the girl whose, they killed her baby.

BAELISH: Ah, yes, that was poorly handled. Sometimes those with the most power have the least grace.

ROZ: Can't stop thinking about it, I can't sleep. Her poor little baby.

BAELISH: You know, you remind me of another girl. A lovely thing I once acquired from an Elysium pleasure house. Beautiful, like yourself, and intelligent as yourself. But she wasn't happy. She cried, often. I asked her why but, we didn't have the kind of rapport that you and I have. Yes, it was quite sad. Girls from Elysium pleasure houses are expensive. Extremely expensive. And this one wasn't making me any money. I hate bad investments. Really, I do. They haunt me. I had no idea how to make her happy, no idea how to mitigate my losses. A very wealthy patron, he offered me a tremendous amount of money to let him transform this lovely, sad girl. To use her in ways that never occur to most men. And you know what occurs to most men. I would not say he succeeded in making her happy but my losses were definitely mitigated. (Stands up). Take tonight off to mourn Mhaegen’s child. I’ll see you tomorrow. But you’ll be happy? (Roz nods and smiles). That makes me happy.

INT. DINING ROOM

PODRICK: More wine?

The scene begins zoomed in on Podrick pouring Janos a glass of wine. He then spills, and we see Tyrion and Janos sitting at a table.

JANOS: Damn it, boy!

PODRICK: Apologies, my lord.

TYRION: Leave us, Podrick. I believe we know how to pour our own wine.

JANOS: (Podrick leaves). Is that your new squire? Could have found you a proper lad.

TYRION: Myself, I prefer the improper ones.

JANOS: Hmm, that's a good red. Dornish?

TYRION: You know your wines, my lord.

JANOS: That I do. A fine dinner, my lord.

TYRION: Call me Tyrion, please. I'm sure you're getting used to fine dinners, now that you're a lord.

JANOS: Maybe I'll hire this cook of yours.

TYRION:Wars have been started for less.

They both laugh. Janos sips his wine.

TYRION: I heard there was some trouble in Littlefinger's brothel the other night.

JANOS: Hmm. Nasty business, had to be done.

TYRION: Yes, of course. City Watch must keep the peace. Only, I hadn't realized peace depended on killing babies.

JANOS: Orders are orders.

TYRION: Quite right. Especially the queen's orders.

JANOS: I never said they were the queen's orders.

TYRION: No, but who else would want to murder King Robert's bastards? She's always been a jealous woman.

JANOS: You know your sister better than I do.

TYRION: You've heard the awful rumors about my brother and sister.

JANOS: I don't listen to filth.

TYRION: That's good of you, but you have heard them. I suppose people who do believe that filth, consider Robert's bastards to be better claimants to the throne than Cersei's children.

JANOS: Joffrey is my king, the rest doesn't interest me. (Sips his wine).

TYRION: I appreciate your loyalty. Tell me.

When your men slaughtered Ned Stark's men in the throne room, did you give the order?

JANOS: I did. And I would again. The man was a traitor. He tried to buy my loyalty.

TYRION: The fool! He had no idea you were already bought.

JANOS: Are you drunk? I'll not have my honor questioned by an Imp.

TYRION: I'm not questioning your honor, Lord Janos. I'm denying its existence.

JANOS: You think I'll stand here and take this from you, dwarf.

TYRION: Dwarf? You should have stopped at imp. And yes, you will stand here and take it from me, unless you'd like to take it from my friend here.

Tyrion gestures towards Bronn, who has appeared in the room.

TYRION: I intend to serve as Hand of the King until my father returns from the war, and seeing as you betrayed the last Hand of the King, well, I just wouldn't feel safe with you lurking about.

JANOS: What are you ta- My friends at court will not allow this. The queen herself -

TYRION: The queen regent. And you're a fool to believe she's your friend.

JANOS: We shall hear what Joffrey has to say about this.

TYRION: No, we shan't.

Tyrion nods at Bronn, who gestures for some armed men to enter the room.

TYRION: There's a ship leaving for East Watch by the sea tonight. From there, I'm afraid it's rather a long walk to Castle Black. I hope you enjoy the Wall. I found it surprisingly beautiful, in a brutal, horribly uncomfortable sort of way.

BRONN: The lads will escort you. The streets aren't safe at night, my lord.

JANOS: These men are under my command. (Bronn laughs). I command you to arrest this cutthroat.

TYRION: His name is Bronn... and he is the new commander of the City Watch.

BRONN: Boys?

The gold cloaks in the room escort Janos out. Janos begins shouting as they take him.

JANOS: I have friends at court! Powerful friends! The king himself made me a lord!

Janos is escorted out of view. Bronn sits down, and Tyrion pours him a cup of wine.

TYRION: To the new Commander.

Tyrion and Bronn clink their glasses together. Then they both sip.

TYRION: If I told you to murder, an infant girl say, still at her mother's breast, would you do it without question?

BRONN: Without question? No. I'd ask how much.

CUT TO: WOODS

EXT. CAMP NEXT TO A RIVER

Gendry gathers some water in a bucket. Lommy and Hot Pie sit next to the river, washing things. Arya sits away from them, doing the same.

LOMMY: If they come back, I say we yield. Gendry's the one they want. I don't want to get caught in the middle of a battle.

HOT PIE: I'm not afraid of no battles.

ARYA: If you got within a mile of a battle, you'd fill your pants.

HOT PIE: I've seen lots of battles. I saw -

ARYA: Liar.

HOT PIE: I saw a man kill another man just outside a tavern in Flea Bottom. Stabbed him right in the neck.

LOMMY: Two men fighting isn't a battle.

HOT PIE: They had armor on.

ARYA: So?

HOT PIE: So, if they got armor on, it's a battle.

LOMMY: No, it isn't.

HOT PIE: What's a dyer's apprentice know about battles anyway?

ARYA: (Gendry walks over to get more water). Gendry's an armorer's apprentice. Hot Pie, tell Gendry what makes it a battle.

HOT PIE: (Hesitates) It's when they've got armor on.

GENDRY: Now who told you that.

HOT PIE: A knight?

GENDRY: How'd you know he was a knight?

HOT PIE: Well, cause he got armor on.

GENDRY: You don't have to be a knight to have armor. Any idiot can buy armor. (Arya smiles).

HOT PIE: How'd you know?

GENDRY: ‘Cause I sold armor.

Lommy nudges Hot Pie, and they both get up and leave. Arya stops washing and stands up, walking over to Gendry.

ARYA: What do the gold cloaks want with you?

GENDRY: (Turning around) No idea.

ARYA: You're a liar.

GENDRY: (Walking to camp fire). You shouldn't insult people that are bigger than you.

ARYA: Then I wouldn't get to insult anyone. (Follows him).

GENDRY: [?]. No good's ever come of their questions.

ARYA: No good's ever come? Who asked questions before?

GENDRY: How can someone so small be such a huge pain in my ass?

ARYA: Who asked questions?

GENDRY: The Hand of the King. Er, hands of the King. Lord Arryn came first, a few weeks before he died. And then Lord Stark came, a few weeks before he died.

ARYA: Lord Stark.

GENDRY: See? Asking me questions is bad luck. (Walks back to river). You'll probably be dead soon.

ARYA: What did they ask about?

GENDRY: My mom.

ARYA: Who's your mom?

GENDRY: Just my mom. Worked in a tavern. Died when I was little.

ARYA: And who was your father?

GENDRY: He could be one of those gold-hatted bastards, for all I know. What about you, anyway? You thought they were after you, why? Did you kill someone, or is it just because you're a girl?

ARYA: I'm not a girl!

GENDRY: (Walks back to camp fire). Yes you are. You think I'm as stupid as the rest of them?

ARYA: Stupider. Night's Watch doesn't take girls, everyone knows that.

GENDRY: That's true. You're still a girl.

ARYA: I am not!

GENDRY: Well, pull your cock out and take a piss then.

ARYA: I don't need to take a piss… Lommy and Hot Pie can’t know. No one can know.

GENDRY: They won't. Not from me.

ARYA: My name's not Arry. It's Arya. Of House Stark. Yoren is taking me home to Winterfell.

GENDRY: He was your father. The Hand. The traitor.

ARYA: He was never a traitor! Joffrey is a liar.

GENDRY: So you're a highborn, then. You're a lady.

ARYA: No. I mean yes. My mother was a lady, and my sister -

GENDRY: You were a lord's daughter and you lived in a castle. Look, all that about cocks. I should never have said that. I've been pissing in front of you and everything. I should be calling you milady.

ARYA: Do not call me milady.

GENDRY: As milady commands. (Arya pushes him). Well, that was unladylike.

Arya pushes Gendry to the ground. He laughs, and she stomps off.

CUT TO: IRON ISLANDS

EXT. DOCKSThe scene starts with a wide shot of the busy docks. Theon stands in a rowboat as is comes up against the side of a wall. He gets out and walks up some stairs. An old man spots him.

MAN: What you carrying?

THEON: Pears and oranges. Wine from the Arbor. And the heir to Pyke of the Iron Islands. (The man makes no response). The only living son of Balon Greyjoy. (The man continues to make no response). Me.

MAN: Don't like wine. Woman's drink. (Returns to his work).

THEON: I need to get to Pyke.

The man looks up, but makes no move or response. Theon looks annoyed and pulls out some coins.

MAN: I'll find you a horse.

The man takes the coins and walks away. Theon watches as the rowboat that took him there leaves. He looks down.

YARA: I'm heading that way. I can take you there.

THEON: I bet you can.

YARA: You been at sea long? Or were there just no women where you came from?

THEON: None like you.

YARA: You don't know what I'm like.

THEON: You don't know what you're like. You need someone to teach you. Know who I am?

YARA: You think I offer free rides to every man in jewelry. Lord Greyjoy.

Yara and Theon pass the man as they are walking. He is leading a horse. Theon gives him some more coins.

THEON: Have my things sent up to the castle.

EXT. BEACH

Yara and Theon ride on horseback on a beach. Yara is at the reins.

THEON: You should give me the reins, I'm a better rider than you. I've been on horseback for the last nine years.

YARA: Nine years. Do you still know your way around a ship? Have these hands ever touched a rope?

THEON: Don't you worry about my hands. (Theon begins fondling her). The sea's in my blood.

YARA: You'll never be in the sea if I don't watch where I'm going.

THEON: I have a proposal for my father. One that will make him king again. And me after him. You may stay at the castle tonight, if you're lucky.

YARA: Is that an offer from my future king?

THEON: An order, from your future king. You can tell your grandchildren about this night.

YARA: I don't imagine it will be a story fit for children.

As they approach the castle, the camera pans up to view it in its entirety.

INT. INSIDE PYKE

Balon sits in front of a fireplace. Theon enters the room.

THEON: Father.

BALON: Nine years, is it? They took a frightened boy. What have they given back?

THEON: A man. Your blood and your heir.

BALON: We shall see. Stark had you longer than I did.

THEON: Lord Stark is gone.

BALON: And how do you feel about that?

THEON: What's done is done. I've brought you a proposal from Robb Stark.

BALON: Who gave you those clothes? (Stands up). Was it Ned Stark's pleasure to make you his daughter?

THEON: If my clothes offend you, I will change them.

BALON: It will. (Begins walking forward). That bauble around your neck. Did you pay the iron price for it or the gold? (Theon looks down). I asked a question. Did you pull it from the neck of a corpse you made or did you buy it to match your fine clothes? Iron or gold?

THEON: Gold.

Balon reaches out and rips the bauble off. Theon’s cloak falls to the ground.

BALON: I'll not have my son dressed as a whore. (Balon walks towards the fireplace and looks into it). My fears have come true. The Starks have made you theirs.

THEON: (Steps forward). My blood is salt and iron.

BALON: Yet, (Turns around), the Stark boy sends you to me like a trained raven, clutching his message.

THEON: The offer he makes, is one I proposed.

BALON: He heeds your counsel?

THEON: I've lived with him, hunted with him, fought at his side, he thinks of me as a brother.

BALON: No, not here, (Walks forward), not in my hearing, you will not name him brother. This son of the man who put your true brothers to the sword. Or have you forgotten your own blood?

THEON: I forget nothing. I remember my brothers. And I remember when my father was a king.

Theon holds a letter out. Balon takes it and turns around. He then unfurls it and reads it.

BALON: I see. I destroy Robb Stark's enemies for him and he will make me King of the Iron Islands once again.

THEON: I will lead the attack myself.

BALON: Oh, you will?

THEON: I'm your son. Your only living heir. Who else?

Someone enters the room. Balon looks behind Theon, and he turns to look as well.

THEON: I told you to wait outside. (The person who entered is revealed to be Yara). How did you get past the guards?

YARA: Anything with a cock is easy to fool.

BALON: (Puts his arm around her). My dear.

THEON: Yara?

YARA: So good to see you, brother. This is a homecoming I'll tell my grandchildren about.

THEON: She can't lead an attack!

BALON: And why not?

THEON: You're a woman!

YARA: You're the one in skirts.

BALON: This isn't Winterfell, boy. Your sister took over command of your eldest brother's ship after your new father killed him.

ALL THREE: (Theon joins a little late). What's dead may never die.

The only night she's spent off these islands has been spent on the sea. She's commanded men. She's killed men. She knows who she is.

Balon leans down and burns the letter in the fire. Yara smirks at Theon.

BALON: (Watching the letter burn in his hand). No man gives me a crown. I pay the iron price. I will take my crown. (Throws the letter in the fire). That is who I am. That is who we have always been.

Balon walks away. Yara follows him. Theon turns around to watch them leave.

THEON: You won't stand a chance against the Lannisters on your own.

BALON:Who said anything about the Lannisters?

CUT TO: DRAGONSTONE

EXT. BEACH

Davos and Salladhor Saan walk on a beach. Matthos follows closely behind them..

DAVOS: You'll have your gold when we take the treasury at King's Landing.

SAAN: All these kings fighting for the throne, and this Stannis has the smallest army. Why would I bet on the man with the worst chance?

DAVOS: Because you're a smart gambler. Stannis has proved himself in war. Twice. His baby brother has never set foot on a battlefield. Neither has the false king, Joffrey.

SAAN: And yet, they both have larger armies.

DAVOS: Stannis has just begun the fight. His bannermen will rally to his cause. There's no man in the Seven Kingdoms more honorable than Stannis Baratheon. Or more worthy of loyalty.

SAAN: What is the world coming to when smugglers must vouch for the honor of kings.

MATTHOS: Mind your words, pirate. (They all stop walking).

DAVOS: Matthos.

SAAN: You think I'm insulted? I am a pirate. I'm an excellent pirate. I don't sail for promises.

DAVOS: Of course you do. Every time you leave harbor, you're leaving on a promise. A promise that somewhere on the seas, somebody's got some gold and you can take it from them.

SAAN: That's a promise that always comes true.

DAVOS: As is mine. You're not the young man, Salladhor. And correct me if I'm wrong: Most pirates don't grow old.

SAAN: Only the clever ones.

DAVOS: You want to spend your last few years on the sea, stealing from Pentoshi cheesemongers and Midanese silk merchants, then go. They're out there waiting for you. That's easy. What I'm offering you is hard. Come with me and plunder the greatest city in Westeros. You'll be the richest man in Lysene. And the most famous. They'll be singing songs about you as long as men have voices to sing.

SAAN: Salladhor Saan is a good name for songs.

DAVOS: It is. (Matthos rolls his eyes).

SAAN: One thing, I want the queen.

DAVOS: The queen?

SAAN: Cersei, I want her. I'll sail with your fleet, all 30 of my ships, and if we don't drown at the bottom of Blackwater Bay, I will fuck this blonde queen and I will fuck her well.

MATTHOS: This war isn't about you. We're not attacking King's Landing so that you can rape the queen.

SAAN: I'm not going to rape her, I'm going to fuck her.

MATTHOS: As if she would just let you!

SAAN: You don't know how persuasive I am. I never tried to fuck you.

MATTHOS: Stannis is the rightful king, and the Lord of Light. The one true god.

SAAN: I've been all over the world, my boy, and everywhere I go, people tell me about the true god. They all think they found the right one. The one true god is what's between a woman's legs, and better yet a queen's legs.

Matthos walks away angrily. Saan turns back to Davos.

SAAN: I never thought you'd have a true believer for a son.

DAVOS: He's young yet. I promise you the gold. I promise you the glory. I cannot promise you the queen.

MATTHOS: You believe your king can win?

DAVOS: He is the one true king.

SAAN: You Westerosee are funny people. A man chops off your fingers and you fall in love with him. (They laugh). I'll sail with you, Davos Seaworth. You are the most honest smuggler I ever met. Make me rich.

DAVOS: Get me to the gates of King's Landing and I will.

They shake hands. Davos pats Saan on the back as he walks away. Saan and Matthos eye each other as Saan walks past. Matthos walks back over to his father.

MATTHOS: When will the King have a sail?

DAVOS: As soon as his God wills it.

MATTHOS: He's my God too, and yours. But you were too blind to see. (As they walk). Let me teach you how to read.

DAVOS: Oh you and your mother.

MATTHOS: It won't take long. You already know the letters. The holy books are much more persuasive than I can be.

DAVOS: I wish I had a God, truly! I'm not mocking you, but I've seen men pray to every God there is. Pray for wind, pray for rain, pray for home. None of it works!

MATTHOS: But you always came home.

DAVOS: I wasn't praying.

MATTHOS: (They reach their horses). But I was. Every night that you were at sea, I lit a candle and I prayed, for you.

DAVOS: You want me to have a god, fine. King Stannis is my god. He raised me up and blessed me with his trust. He gave you a future I could never have imagined. You know how to read, you'll be a knight someday. You think your fire god commanded all that? It was Stannis. Only Stannis.

MATTHOS: (As Davos is mounting his horse). Stannis is my king, but he's only a man.

DAVOS: Don't tell him that.

Davos rides away and Matthos watches. In the background, Saan’s boat is in the water.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. TYRION’S ROOM

Tyrion sits at a table with a cup of wine. Cersei paces in front of him.

CERSEI: Lord Janos Slynt was Commander of the City Watch. You had no right to exile him.

TYRION: I have every right. I am the King's Hand.

CERSEI: You're serving as the King's Hand until father gets here. I am Queen Regent.

TYRION: Listen to me, Queen Regent, you're losing the people. Do you hear me?

CERSEI: Ha, the people. You think I care?

TYRION: You might find it difficult to rule over millions who want you dead. Half the city will starve when winter comes. The other half will plot to overthrow you. And your gold-plated thugs just gave them the rallying cry, “The Queen slaughters babies.” (Cersei says nothing). You don't even have the decency to deny it.

Cersei looks down and walks toward the window. Tyrion looks down, and then up at her.

TYRION: It wasn't you who gave the order, was it? Joffrey didn't even tell you. Or did he tell you? I imagine that would be even worse.

CERSEI: He did what needed to be done. (Now loudly). You want to be the Hand of the King? You want to rule? This is what ruling is! Lying on a bed of weeds, ripping them out by the root one by one before they strangle you in your sleep.

TYRION: I'm no king, but I think there's more to ruling that that.

CERSEI: I don't care what you think! You've never taken it seriously. You haven't, Jaime hasn't. (Sits down). It's all fallen on me.

TYRION: (Tries not to laugh). As has Jaime repeatedly, according to Stannis Baratheon.

CERSEI: You're funny. (Laughs). You've always been funny. But none of your jokes will ever match the first one, will they? You remember... back when you ripped my mother open on your way out of her and she bled to death.

TYRION: She was my mother too.

CERSEI: Now they're gone, for the sake of you. There's no bigger joke in the world than that. (Storms out).

CUT TO: DRAGONSTONE

INT. DRAGONSTONE KEEP

Davos moves some ships around on a model map of Westeros as Matthos looks on. Stannis enters with Melisandre.

DAVOS: Your Grace.

MATTHOS: Your Grace.

STANNIS: How did it fare with your pirate?

DAVOS: Salladhor Saan will join our fleet. 30 ships. His men know how to fight.

STANNIS: In my experience, pirates prefer fighting unarmed men.

DAVOS: Does seem the wiser choice.

STANNIS: It won't be a choice this time. Do you trust him?

DAVOS: Salladhor Saan is an old friend, I've known him 30 years. I've never trusted him.
But once he gets the smell of gold, he never stops.

STANNIS: Well if he does his job, he'll have his share. Leave us.

DAVOS: At once, Your Grace.

Davos walks away, followed by Matthos. As Matthos passes her, Melisandre stops him.

MELISANDRE: The Lord of Light shines through you, young warrior.

She then whispers something in his ear. When she is done, Matthos and Davos leave the room.

DAVOS: Come.

STANNIS: What did you say to him?

MELISANDRE: I told him death by fire is the purest death.

STANNIS: Why?

MELISANDRE: Because it is true. You're troubled my king.

STANNIS: Yeah.

MELISANDRE: These armies are but toys for the Lord of Light.

STANNIS: Tell your lord to burn them then.

MELISANDRE: I tell him nothing! I pray for his commands and I obey.

STANNIS: My little brother has a hundred thousand men according to the scouts. Men whose allegiance rightly belongs to me.

MELISANDRE: You must have faith.

STANNIS: Faith? In a real war, the side with the greater number wins nine times out of ten.

MELISANDRE: Then we must be the ten.

STANNIS: I cannot defeat my brother in the field, and I can't take King's Landing without the men he stole.

MELISANDRE: I have seen the path to victory in the flames. At first, you must give yourself to the Lord of Light.

STANNIS: I've said the words, damn you! I burnt the idols.

MELISANDRE: You must give... all of yourself.

Melisandre disrobes next to Stannis. He looks over and then looks away.

STANNIS: I have a wife. I took a vow.

MELISANDRE: She's sick. Weak. Shut away in the tower. And she disgusts you. And she's given you nothing. No sons. Only stillborns. Only death. (Whispers in his ear). I will give you a son, my King.

STANNIS: (Gasps). A son?

They begin kissing. Melisandre takes off what remained of her clothes. Stannis lays her on the table and they begin having sex, knocking many of the wooden models off of the table.

CUT TO: BEYOND THE WALL

EXT. CRASTER’S KEEP

Jon is sitting by a fire. He hears a noise and looks behind himself, seeing Craster walking away from the camp with a baby. Jon gets up to follow Craster and investigate, and walks into the woods. He begins hearing strange noises, and hides when he sees Craster walking back, without the baby. When Craster is out of sight, he runs in the direction Craster came from. He sees a figure lean down and pick up the baby. He is then startled by Craster, who puts his hand on Jon’s shoulder, and then knocks Jon out.




TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
2
The Rains of Castamere
Game of Thrones
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 3 Scripts
THE RAINS OF CASTAMERE
[Opening Credits]

[First scene shows the location of Casterly Rock (ancestral seat of House Lannister) on a giant map of Westeros. There are several game pieces representing different House sigils located on different parts of the map. ROBB STARK and CATELYN STARK are at a campsite, within a tent lit up by candles]
CATELYN: Are you sure about this?

ROBB: No.

CATELYN: It's dangerous.

[ROBB nods in agreement]

ROBB: If we take Tywin's castle from him, the lords of Westeros will realize he's not invincible. Take his home, take his gold, take his power.

CATELYN: Why are you telling me?

[ROBB pauses then walks around CATELYN]

ROBB: You begged me not to send Theon to negotiate with his father and I ignored your advice.

[ROBB pours himself something to drink]

ROBB: Now Winterfell is burned to the ground. The North is overrun with Ironborn and Bran and Rickon are gone.

[ROBB pauses]

ROBB: So, Casterly Rock? I'm asking your advice.

[CATELYN pauses, staring at ROBB. She then looks at the map]

CATELYN: We have enough men?

[ROBB grabs a House Frey piece]

ROBB: If Walder Frey cooperates.

CATELYN: If Walder Frey cooperates.

[Close up shots of the map showing the sigils of House Stark, House Frey and House Lannister]

CATELYN: If reinforcements arrive from King's Landing, before we take the castle, we'll be caught between Tywin's army and the sea.

[ROBB moves the House Frey piece to the House Stark side of the map]

ROBB: We'll lose the war and die the way father died. Or worse.

[A flash of anger spreads across CATELYN's face]

CATELYN: Show them how it feels to lose what they love.

The next scene shows ROBB'S direwolf, Grey Wind, as he leads House Stark's army to The Twins castle, the ancestral seat of House Frey. [The scene shifts to the inside of The Twins, as a servant walks around with a plate of bread and salt in observation of the Westerosi tradition of "Guest Right". ROBB, his wife TALISA MAEGYR, his uncle EDMURE TULLY, his great uncle BRYNDEN "BLACKFISH" TULLY, CATELYN and the Stark army are in the presence of WALDER FREY and his family. ROBB takes a piece of bread, dips it into the salt and eats it while looking intently at WALDER]

WALDER: My honored guests, be welcome within my walls and at my table. I extend to you my hospitality and protection in the light of the Seven.

ROBB: We thank you for your hospitality, my lord.

[Servant stops in front of WALDER. He takes a piece of bread from the plate and eats it]

ROBB: I have come to make my apologies, my lord, and to beg your forgiveness.

WALDER: Don't beg my forgiveness, your Grace. It wasn't me you spurned, it was my girls.

[WALDER signals for his female relatives to appear before ROBB]

WALDER: One of them was supposed to be queen, now none of them are.

[As WALDER calls each relative by name, they briefly look up at ROBB]

WALDER: This is Arwyn, my daughter. My daughter Walda, my daughter Derwa, my daughter Waldra.

[WALDER pauses to chew]

WALDER: My eldest granddaughters Ginia and Neila.

[EDMURE intently watches the Frey women]

WALDER: Serra and Sarra, granddaughters, twins. You could have had either. Could have had both for all I care.

[EDMURE closes his eyes after hearing WALDER'S comments about his granddaughters]

WALDER: My granddaughter Marianne. My granddaughter Freya. My granddaughter...W-W-Wertha? Waldra? Waldina?

[WALDER guessing at his granddaughter's name. EDMURE raises his eyebrows]

MERRY: I'm Merry.

WALDER: Fine. And here's my youngest daughter Shirei, though she hasn't bled yet. Clearly you don't have the patience for all that.

[ROBB looks at the Frey women]

ROBB: My ladies. All men should keep their word, kings most of all. I was pledged to marry one of you and I broke that vow. The fault is not with you. Any man would be lucky to have any one of you. I did what I did not to slight you, but because I loved another. I know these words cannot set right the wrong I have done to you and your house. I beg your forgiveness and pledge to do all I can to make amends so the Freys of the Crossing and the Starks of Winterfell may once again be friends.

[WALDER claps to signal the dismissal of the Frey women]

WALDER: Very good.

[WALDER focuses on TALISA]

WALDER: There she is. Come closer, let me have a look at you.

[TALISA takes a couple of steps towards WALDER. WALDER moves forward in his seat and squints]

WALDER: Still can't see you. Old eyes.

[TALISA looks at ROBB who nods. Frey men look on as she takes a couple more steps towards WALDER. She bows her head]

WALDER: Love. That's what the Starks of Winterfell call it, eh? Heh. Very honorable, I call it a pretty face. Mmmm, very pretty. Prettier than this lot, that's for sure. Very shapely as well. Oh, you try to hide her under that dress. If you wanted to hide her, you shouldn't have brought her here in the first place.

[WALDER leans forward with a grin]

WALDER: I can always see what's going on beneath a dress. Been at this a long time. I bet when you take that dress off, everything stays right where it is. Doesn't drop an inch.

[WALDER grins, ROBB visibly uncomfortable]

WALDER: Your king says he betrayed me for love. I say he betrayed me for firm tits and a tight fit.

[ROBB starts to step forward before CATELYN stops him]

WALDER: And I can respect that. When I was your age, I'd have broken fifty oaths to get into that without a second thought. Well, I've enough room in the hall for you lot. We'll set up tents outside with food and ale for the rest of your men.

[ROBB visibly angry]

ROBB: Thank you, my lord.

[WALDER stands up and claps]

WALDER: Well, let's get ready. The wine will flow red and the music will play loud and we'll put this mess behind us.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes to the desert outside of the city of Yunkai on the continent of Essos. An army of Unsullied are standing guard outside of DAENERYS TARGARYEN'S tent. Inside her tent are her closest advisers: DAARIO NAHARIS, BARRISTAN SELMY, JORAH MORMONT and GREY WORM. They are looking at a map of Yunkai]

DAENERYS: Where?

[DAARIO points at a location on the map]

DAARIO: There.

[DAARIO gets closer to DAENERYS, grabs and guides her hand to the location he was referring to. JORAH watches him closely]

DAARIO: There, it's a back gate. My men use it when they visit Yunkai's bed slaves.

JORAH: Your men but not you?

DAARIO: I have no interest in slaves. A man cannot make love to property.

[DAENERYS briefly looks up at DAARIO and JORAH briefly looks at her]

DAARIO: This is where we enter the city. Very few guards, they know me. They let me inside.

BARRISTAN: We're not gonna sneak an army through a back gate.

DAARIO: I kill the guards. I take your two best men and lead them through the back streets, which I know well, and open the front gates.

[DAARIO nods at JORAH and GREY WORM. JORAH looks at GREY WORM who briefly looks back]

DAARIO: Then comes the army. Once the walls are breached, the city will fall in hours.

JORAH: Or perhaps you'll lead Grey Worm and me to the slaughter, cutting the head off our army. The masters of Yunkai will pay you your fee and you won't have to split it three ways cause you've already slaughtered your partners.

DAARIO: You have a very suspicious mind. In my experience, only dishonest people think this way.

[JORAH sighs and looks at Grey Worm]

JORAH: You command the Unsullied. What do you think?

DAENERYS: [Speaking to Grey Worm in Valyrian] Lo jention mirre nūmāzme ēza, iderenna qopsa verdagon issa.

GREY WORM: [In Valyrian] I trust him.

DAENERYS: [Speaking in the Common Tongue (in this case, English) again] You leave tonight.

JORAH: Very good. We'll prepare.

[DAENERYS' advisers start to leave. DAARIO grins at DAENERYS who looks back at him. BARRISTAN walks towards JORAH]

BARRISTAN: Ser Jorah. You can use an extra sword.

JORAH: You're the Queensguard, Ser Barristan. Your place is by the Queen. If we are truly her loyal servants, we'll do whatever needs to be done. No matter the cost, no matter our pride.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene shifts to Beyond The Wall in the North. SAMWELL TARLY, GILLY and her baby are walking south towards Castle Black]

SAMWELL: We're west of Castle Black, but the Nightfort's closest to us. It was the first castle on the Wall. The Watch abandoned it during the reign of King Jaehaerys I. Too big, impossible to maintain. Other than Castle Black itself, the Nightfort's the perfect castle for us. It's got a secret sally port, the Black Gate, as old as the Wall itself. No one's used it for centuries, most likely. It leads through the Wall right down into the Nightfort, if no one knows how to find it, which, it just so happens I do.

[GILLY stops and looks at SAMWELL in a confused manner]

GILLY: How do you know all that?

SAMWELL: I read about it in a very old book.

GILLY: You know all that from staring at marks on paper?

SAMWELL: Yes.

GILLY: You're like a wizard.

[SAMWELL smiles. Next shot, GILLY and SAMWELL gaze up at the Wall]

GILLY: Our father used to tell us that no wildling ever looked upon the Wall and lived. Here we are. Alive.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes to SANDOR "THE HOUND" CLEGANE and ARYA STARK on horseback in the Riverlands, on their way to The Twins, where THE HOUND plans on returning ARYA to her mother and brother in the hopes of receiving some reward. They see a PIG FARMER along the way who's having trouble with the wheel spokes on his cart]

THE HOUND: Remember what happens to children who run. I'm your father and I'll do the talking.

[THE HOUND hands the horse reins to ARYA and walks over to the PIG FARMER]

PIG FARMER: The roads have gone right to hell, haven't they? Cracked three spokes this morning.

THE HOUND: Need a hand?

PIG FARMER: Need about eight hands.

[THE HOUND lifts the cart up]

PIG FARMER: Got to get this salt pork to The Twins in time for the wedding.

[PIG FARMER fixes the wheel, THE HOUND sets the cart down]

PIG FARMER: Many thanks.

[THE HOUND punches the PIG FARMER in the face, knocking him to the ground. THE HOUND then unsheathes his dagger and prepares to kill him, prompting ARYA to intervene]

ARYA: Don't! Don't kill him.

THE HOUND: Dead rats don't squeak.

ARYA: You're so dangerous, aren't you? Saying scary things to little girls. Killing little boys and old people. A real hard man you are.

THE HOUND: More than anyone you know.

ARYA: You're wrong. I know a killer. A real killer.

THE HOUND: That so?

ARYA: You'd be like a kitten to him. He'd kill you with his little finger.

[THE HOUND looks at the PIG FARMER on the ground]

THE HOUND: That him?

[Confused, ARYA turns her head to look down at the PIG FARMER]

ARYA: No.

THE HOUND: Good.

[THE HOUND again tries to approach the PIG FARMER in order to kill him but ARYA again intervenes pushing him back]

ARYA: Don't kill him! Please. Please don't.

[THE HOUND pauses then sheathes his dagger]

THE HOUND: You're very kind. Someday it'll get you killed.

[PIG FARMER starts to regain consciousness. ARYA grabs a piece of wood from the cart and hits him across the face with it, knocking him out again. She then walks back to the horse as THE HOUND looks on surprised]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes to the North, south of the wall. BRAN STARK, RICKON STARK, HODOR, JOJEN REED, MEERA REED and OSHA are walking past a windmill]

OSHA: Where are we?

BRAN: The Gift, I think. Brandon The Builder gave all this land south of the Wall to the Night’s Watch for their sustenance and support. Maester Luwin taught me that.

JOJEN: Doesn’t seem to be supporting anyone at the moment.

MEERA: It’s good land and there’s no war up here. Why leave?

BRAN: Wildlings.

[BRAN looks at OSHA who stares back at him]

BRAN: Sorry. But they come over the Wall and raid, steal, carry off women.

RICKON: Old Nan said they turn your skull into a cup and make you drink your own blood from it.

[OSHA stares at RICKON who looks back at her]

RICKON: That’s what Old Nan said.

JOJEN: There’s a storm coming.

BRAN: I don’t see any.

[Thunder rumbling, everyone looks up at the sky and at the windmill]

MEERA: It’s as good a place to shelter as any.

[They begin walking back towards the windmill. OSHA puts her hand on RICKON’S head]

OSHA: We can drink some blood while we wait. I don’t need much.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes showing ORELL’S eagle circling over an old horse breeder’s home. JON SNOW, TORMUND GIANTSBANE, ORELL, YGRITTE are hiding, waiting for ORELL’S scouting report]

ORELL: Only one old man and eight good horses.

TORMUND: What’s one old man doing with eight horses?

JON: He breeds them for the Watch.

YGRITTE: How’s he keep folks from stealing them?

JON: The Watch protects him.

ORELL: Not today they don’t. He’s selling horses, he’s got some gold in there.

TORMUND: And proper steel.

ORELL: Let’s carve him up.

JON: We just take the horses and go. The old man’s no threat.

[ORELL looks at TORMUND]

ORELL: I keep telling you.

[YGRITTE looks at JON]

YGRITTE: He’s an old man. A spear through the heart’s a better way to die than coughing up your last with no one but your horses to hear.

[JON looks at TORMUND]

JON: The Watch might send a few men looking for a horse thief. They’ll send a lot more to hunt down murderers.

TORMUND: I hope so. Killing crows in their castle is tough. Killing them out here in the open, that’s what we do.

[TORMUND announces to the rest of the wildlings]

TORMUND: Spread out. Surround the hut and move in.

[The wildlings run towards the OLD MAN’S home. JON smacks his sword, Longclaw, against a rock to alert the OLD MAN and his horses. Upon hearing his horses moving about, the OLD MAN steps outside and sees the wildlings running towards his home. He gets on one of the horses and starts riding off. YGRITTE preps her bow and arrow, aiming for the OLD MAN]

JON: Ygritte!

[JON intervenes and YGRITTE hits a tree instead]

TORMUND: Clear the barn!

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes to ARYA looking at The Twins. They’re relatively close. Meanwhile, THE HOUND eats pig feet by the cart. ARYA walks back to THE HOUND]

ARYA: No one’s going to believe you’re a hog farmer if you eat them all.

[THE HOUND waves a pig’s foot at ARYA]

THE HOUND: Best part of the animal.

[THE HOUND continues to eat while ARYA gazes back at the Twins]

THE HOUND: Don’t worry, they’re still there.

[ARYA angrily turns back and looks at THE HOUND]

ARYA: I know they’re still there.

THE HOUND: You check every five minutes like you’re afraid they’re gonna move.

ARYA: I’m not afraid.

THE HOUND: Of course you are. You’re almost there and you’re afraid you won’t make it. The closer you get, the worse the fear gets. No point in trying to hide behind that face. I know fear when I see it. Seen it a lot.

ARYA: I knew fear when I saw it in you. You’re afraid of fire.

[THE HOUND pauses]

ARYA: When Beric’s sword went up in flames, you looked like a scared little girl.

[ARYA moves in closer to THE HOUND]

ARYA: And I know why, too. I heard what your brother did to you. Pressed your face to the fire like you’re a nice juicy mutton chop.

THE HOUND: That give you some ideas?

[ARYA turns her back to THE HOUND]

ARYA: Might do.

THE HOUND: Go ahead then. You might get away. Might even make it there on your own. They’re just over the river. The closest you’ve been to family since Ilyn Payne snipped your daddy’s neck.

[ARYA turns around and angrily stares at THE HOUND]

ARYA: Someday I’m gonna put a sword through your eye and out the back of your skull.

[THE HOUND stares back at ARYA as she walks away to get a closer look at the Twins as thunder rumbles in the sky]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes back to BRAN and company inside of the windmill. The storm has already begun]

BRAN: How are we going to get past the Wall? My uncle said it’s 700 feet high.

[OSHA looks at Bran and he looks at her]

BRAN: How did you get past it?

OSHA: Got in a boat and rowed past the Bay of Seals.

BRAN: It would take us two months to get to the Bay of Seals.

OSHA: Some climb straight up the ice.

[BRAN looks at HODOR]

BRAN: Even Hodor’s not strong enough to climb the Wall with me on his back.

[HODOR visibly scared of the thunder]

HODOR: Hodor!

JOJEN: Nineteen castles guard the Wall. Only three are still manned.

[HODOR still shaken from the thunder]

Hodor: Hodor!

JOJEN: One of those abandoned fortresses will give us a way through.

BRAN: My uncle said the gates were sealed with ice and stone when the castles were deserted.

[MEERA looks at Bran]

MEERA: Well, we’ll have to open them up again.

[MEERA gazes outside and sees the OLD MAN on horseback]

OLD MAN: [From outside] Whoa, whoa, whoa!

MEERA: There’s a rider out there.

JOJEN: Just one?

[Thunder rumbles]

MEERA: There’s more.

HODOR: Hodor!

[Horses neighing outside. OSHA tries to quiet down HODOR]

OSHA: It’s just thunder, sweet giant.

HODOR: Hodor.

OLD MAN: [From outside] I yield. I yield.

JOJEN: Wildlings.

[OSHA starts turning her head then gazes outside]

OSHA: [To BRAN and RICKON] Where’s Shaggydog and Summer?

BRAN: Hunting.

[Thunder rumbles]

HODOR: Hodor!

[HODOR stands up]

JOJEN: Shhh, quiet, Hodor.

HODOR: Hodor!

JOJEN: [To BRAN] Make him shut up. If they hear us…

BRAN: [To Hodor] Hush, Hodor. No, no more Hodoring.

[OSHA tries to hold HODOR back but he pushes her aside and starts yelling and moving around anxiously]

HODOR: Hodor!

[HODOR continues Hodoring]

BRAN: Hodor, calm down.

OSHA: You need to keep quiet.

JOJEN: They’re gonna hear us.

[HODOR continues Hodoring. ORELL hears voices coming out of the windmill. He stops and looks up]

BRAN: Hodor, be quiet.

[HODOR continues Hodoring]

BRAN: Hodor, calm down. Hodor, be quiet!

[BRAN’S eyes roll back as he wargs into HODOR. HODOR stops making noises as he falls to his knees and then falls asleep on the ground. ORELL is still looking up at the windmill from the outside. Inside of the windmill, everybody is in shock at what just happened]

MEERA: [To BRAN] What did you do?

Bran: Nothing. I don’t know.

[The sound of a horse is heard from outside. OSHA gets near the windmill opening]

RICKON: What’s That?

OSHA: That’s a horse dying.

[Scene shifts to the wildlings who are outside of the windmill with the OLD MAN. ORELL is still looking up at the windmill]

WILDLING 1: Bring them over here.

WILDLING 2: That was the last of them. The rest are dead.

ORELL: [To TORMUND] I heard shouting up there.

TORMUND: Thunder.

ORELL: I know the difference between shouting and thunder.

TORMUND: Maybe it's ghosts.

[ORELL’s eagle is seen circling over the windmill. TORMUND approaches the OLD MAN who is sitting on the ground. He pulls a knife out on TORMUND, YGRITTE gets her bow and arrow out and aims for the OLD MAN]

TORMUND: That won’t help you, grandpa.

[TORMUND sticks his hand out, asking for the knife. The OLD MAN gives it to TORMUND, who tosses it aside]

TORMUND: Where you riding?

OLD MAN: Doesn’t matter now, does it?

TORMUND: No, it doesn’t matter now.

ORELL: Cut his throat or he’ll tell the crows we’re here.

[TORMUND unsheathes his sword]

TORMUND: You understand.

OLD MAN: Let me stand at least.

[BRAN and RICKON’S direwolves, Shaggydog and Summer, are seen hiding behind a cart, outside of the windmill]

OLD MAN: Let me go with a bit of dignity.

[TORMUND helps the OLD MAN get up. He then gets in position for the kill]

Orell: [Looks at JON] Make the crow kill him. [Walks towards JON] You’re one of us now. Prove it.

[YGRITTE, TORMUND and the OLD MAN stare back at JON. The scene changes to back inside of the windmill]

Jojen: [Looks at BRAN] The wolves are out there.

BRAN: I can’t do it by choice. I don’t know how. It happens in my dreams.

JOJEN: You’re a warg, Bran. It’s in your blood.

BRAN: I can’t.

JOJEN: You just did, with him.

[JOJEN looks at HODOR who is still resting]

JOJEN: A wolf is nothing compared to that.

[Scene switches back to outside of the windmill. JON unsheathes Longclaw. He places his sword against the OLD MAN’S neck]

OLD MAN: She looks sharp.

[JON nods his head. The OLD MAN closes his eyes and starts praying, JON hesitates]

YGRITTE: [Looks at Jon] Do it. Do it.

[JON looks back at YGRITTE]

ORELL: Told ya. He’s still one of them.

TORMUND: Go on, boy.

[JON glares back at TORMUND]

TORMUND: Go on!

[JON raises his sword but hesitates. YGRITTE shoots the OLD MAN in the chest with an arrow, killing him. This prompts ORELL and TORMUND to reach for their swords]

ORELL: He’s a crow. He’ll always be a crow. And here’s his crow wife guarding him. He’ll stab us in the back first chance he gets.

[JON and YGRITTE are standing side by side in defensive positions]

TORMUND: Kill him!

[YGRITTE prepares to shoot an arrow at either ORELL or TORMUND but JON pushes her to the ground first. JON, ORELL and the other wildlings have a sword fight while TORMUND runs towards YGRITTE. She starts yelling and screaming as TORMUND tries to restrain her]

Tormund: He’s one of them!

YGRITTE: No!

TORMUND: Do you hear me?

[YGRITTE bites TORMUND’S arm which causes him to lose his grip on her. She starts running away but TORMUND grabs her and tackles her to the ground]

TORMUND: You’re not gonna die for one of them.

[Scene switches back to inside of the windmill. Everybody is looking at BRAN]

JOJEN: Do it. They’ll find us if you don’t.

[BRAN’S eyes roll back as he wargs into Summer. Scene goes back outside to JON fighting the wildlings. Suddenly, the direwolves start attacking the wildlings. JON continues fighting ORELL until he impales him with Longclaw]

JON: You were right the whole time.

[JON twists his sword as ORELL wargs into his eagle right before dying. The eagle attacks JON, biting and scratching his face. JON tosses the eagle aside and makes a run for one of the OLD MAN’S horses. He starts riding away as TORMUND and YGRITTE look on]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[The scene changes to Yunkai. DAARIO, JORAH and GREY WORM are outside of the back gate]

DAARIO: When you hear a songbird’s whistle, you come. I’m a great whistler, the greatest in the land.

[DAARIO approaches the back gate, a guard yells at him in Valyrian]

DAARIO: Daario Naharis.

[The guard lets DAARIO in as JORAH and GREY WORM wait. In the distance, DAARIO whistles. JORAH and GREY WORM go through the back gate and into Yunkai. They see two dead guards and DAARIO sitting down]

DAARIO: That one was quick.

[DAARIO wiping blood off his arakh, a Dothraki blade]

JORAH: There may be others.

DAARIO: I doubt it. The Yunkish prefer to let their slaves do their fighting for them.

[Suddenly, they’re surrounded by Yunkai guards. A brief fight ensues. DAARIO throws a knife by JORAH’S head, killing a Yunkai guard who was behind him. The trio defeat the first wave of guards]

JORAH: [Addressing DAARIO] That’s what you call a few guards?

[DAARIO smiles at JORAH as more Yunkish guards appear, surrounding the trio]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[The scene changes to right outside of The Twins, where the Stark army are set up in tents and passing the time with some wrestling. It then switches to inside of The Twins, at the wedding ceremony of EDMURE and WALDER’S daughter, ROSLIN FREY. WALDER walks the bride to the altar, her face is covered with a veil. EDMURE is standing at the altar, looking worried, as ROBB and his family are looking on. ROBB turns his head back towards WALDER and ROSLIN, while ROOSE BOLTON stares at ROBB. As WALDER approaches, he trades glances with ROBB. When WALDER and ROSLIN finally reach the altar, he removes her veil. EDMURE'S fear of an ugly bride are put to rest when he finally sees how beautiful ROSLIN is. ROSLIN gets down on her knees in front of EDMURE]

ROSLIN: Lord Edmure, I hope I’m not a disappointment to you.

[EDMURE helps ROSLIN up]

EDMURE: You’re a delight to me, my lady.

[ROSLIN smiles]

SEPTON: You may now cloak the bride and bring her under your protection.

[EDMURE removes his cloak as he goes behind ROSLIN to drape it over her shoulders. ROSLIN and ROBB trade glances. ROBB then looks at WALDER who gives him a strange look before grinning. EDMURE finishes putting the cloak on ROSLIN, then looks at CATELYN who smiles at him. He walks back to ROSLIN’S side and the SEPTON ties EDMURE and ROSLIN'S hands together]

SEPTON: In the sight of the Seven, I hereby seal these two souls, binding them as one for eternity. Look upon each other and say the words.

[EDMURE and ROSLIN turn to each other]

EDMURE & ROSLIN: Father, Smith, Warrior, Mother, Maiden, Crone, Stranger. I am hers (I am his) and she is mine (he is mine) from this day until the end of my days.

[BLACKFISH looks at the ugly Frey women who smile back at him. He quickly turns around]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene changes to inside of the windmill. It’s nighttime. OSHA lights a candle]

MEERA: Is that safe?

OSHA: They’re long gone.

BRAN: [Looks at JOJEN] You were right. I can get inside Summer’s mind whenever I want.

JOJEN: Of course you can. North of the Wall there are wildlings who can control all sorts of animals. But you did a lot more than that. You got inside Hodor’s mind.

[Shot of HODOR still resting]

BRAN: They can’t do that north of the Wall?

JOJEN: No one can do that. Anywhere.

BRAN: [Looks at RICKON] When I was looking through Summer’s eyes, I saw Jon.

RICKON: Where?

BRAN: He was with the wildlings. They tried to kill him but he got away.

OSHA: He’ll be heading back to Castle Black then. That’s where we should go.

BRAN: For all we know, Castle Black’s already under attack. If this many wildlings got through-

OSHA: I already told you. I’m not going north of the Wall.

BRAN: Everything Jojen told me is true. You saw what I did to Hodor. I have to find the three-eyed raven.

[OSHA grabs BRAN by the hand]

OSHA: Listen to me, little lord.

BRAN: Don’t worry, I’m not asking you to come with me. It won’t be safe for Rickon.

RICKON: [Surprised] Me? I’m coming with you.

BRAN: No. You and Osha and Shaggydog head for the Last Hearth. The Umbers are our bannermen. They’ll protect you.

RICKON: I’m coming with you. I’m your brother. I have to protect you.

BRAN: Right now, I have to protect you.

[RICKON'S eyes start tearing up]

BRAN: Robb’s at war and I’m going beyond the Wall. If something happens to us, you’re the heir to Winterfell.

[RICKON shakes his head with tears in his eyes]

BRAN: [Looks at OSHA] Will you know how to find the last Hearth?

OSHA: You Southerners build your big castles and you never move. You’re easy to find.

[RICKON stands up and looks at OSHA]

RICKON: We’re not Southerners.

[RICKON turns around to look at BRAN]

RICKON: And I don’t want to leave you.

OSHA: Shhh. [She grabs RICKON by the waist and sits him on her lap] Come here, little soldier. You and me, we’re gonna have some adventures.

[RICKON starts crying. BRAN looks at OSHA]

Bran: You don’t have to do any of this.

[RICKON cries as OSHA strokes his hair]

OSHA: Your family took me in and was good to me when they had no cause to be. [To RICKON] Shhh. We’ll be fine, you and me. The Umbers are great warriors. Even I heard about them growing up. They’ll teach you how to swing a sword.

RICKON: [Crying, looks at OSHA] I know how to swing a sword.

[OSHA strokes RICKON’S hair and kisses him on the head. She then gets up and helps RICKON up as well]

BRAN: You’re leaving now? It’s the middle of the night.

OSHA: I learned to walk in darkness.

[OSHA kisses RICKON on the head again]

OSHA: Say your good-byes, little man.

[RICKON walks one step before dropping to his knees to give BRAN a tight hug. The Reeds look at BRAN and RICKON and then switch their gaze to OSHA]

Osha: [Looks at the Reeds] Keep this one safe. [MEERA gives a slight nod] He means the world to me.

[Final shot of BRAN and RICKON hugging followed by a shot of OSHA and RICKON exiting the windmill, with Shaggydog leading the way]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Scene shifts to DAENERYS’ tent outside of the city of Yunkai. It’s nighttime and there are Unsullied soldiers surrounding the tent. The next shot is inside of the tent. BARRISTAN is having a drink, MISSANDEI presents some food to DAENERYS who is sitting down. She suddenly gets up and ignores the food, as she approaches BARRISTAN with impatience]

Daenerys: We’ve been waiting a long time. [BARRISTAN looks at her] Haven’t we? [BARRISTAN shrugs] Well I don’t know, you tell me. How long does it take to sack a city?

[BARRISTAN briefly ponders the question before JORAH, GREY WORM and several Unsullied guards arrive. JORAH and GREY WORM are both tired and covered in blood]

JORAH: [Looks at DAENERYS] It was just as you said. They did not believe until it was too late. Their slave soldiers threw down their spears and surrendered.

[DAENERYS likes the news but her face suddenly shows some worry]

DAENERYS: And Daario Naharis?

[JORAH’S face goes from a smile to a look of shock. Suddenly, DAARIO emerges from behind the Unsullied guards, with a Yunkai flag draped over his shoulder and his face covered in blood. He walks towards DAENERYS and drops to one knee. He drapes the flag over his knee and looks up at DAENERYS]

DAARIO: The city is yours, my queen.

[DAENERYS starts to smile]

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------

[The scene shifts to the wedding celebration inside of The Twins. A band is playing music on the balcony of the hall. WALDER is seated on the high chair at the main table, underneath the balcony where the musicians are playing. Seated to his left are ROSLIN and EDMURE. Seated to his right is his wife, JOYEUSE FREY. Stark men and Frey men and women are celebrating the marriage. TALISA is seated at a table towards the front, near WALDER'S main table. Next to her is LOTHAR FREY, one of WALDER'S many sons]

TALISA: [Looking at the band and talking to LOTHAR] They’re good, aren’t they?

LOTHAR: They ought to be because they cost enough.

[ROBB takes a drink and starts laughing. Next shot is from across the hall, where ROOSE, BLACKFISH and CATELYN are seated, enjoying themselves]

BLACKFISH: Look at the crowd there.

[Seated next to BLACKFISH is WENDEL MANDERLY of House Manderly. Next to him is BLACK WALDER FREY, another one of WALDER'S sons]

CATELYN: [Looking at EDMURE and talking to BLACKFISH] He complained about this marriage the entire ride from Riverrun and now look at him.

[Shot of EDMURE whispering in ROSLIN'S ear as she smiles]

BLACKFISH: The God’s love to reward a fool.

CATELYN: [Laughs] Uncle.

BLACKFISH: What? He’s my nephew, I love him. And he’s a damned fool.

[CATELYN and BLACKFISH both laugh. A servant tries to pour some wine into ROOSE'S cup but he covers it with his hand before she can pour anything. CATELYN looks at ROOSE]

CATELYN: Don’t you drink, Lord Bolton?

ROOSE: Never do, my lady. Dulls the senses.

BLACKFISH: That’s the point. [Still talking to ROOSE while the servant pours him more wine] Didn’t you marry one of these Frey girls?

ROOSE: Aye. Lord Walder let me choose any of his granddaughters and promised me the girl’s weight in silver as a dowry. So I have a fat, young bride.

[ROOSE smiles and BLACKFISH laughs. CATELYN gives ROOSE a serious look]

CATELYN: I hope she makes you very happy.

ROOSE: Well, she’s made me very rich.

BLACKFISH: Pardon, my lord, my lady. I need to find a tree to piss on.

[BLACKFISH gets up from his seat and begins exiting the hall, as ROBB and TALISA look on]

ROBB: My mother’s alone with Roose Bolton. I should rescue her.

TALISA: Your mother is less in need of rescue than any woman I’ve ever met.

ROBB: Be kind. She’s finally starting to like you.

TALISA: And I like her. But if she had her way, I would be back in Volantis, playing my harp and you would be sitting over there [Looks at EDMURE and ROSLIN], eating blackberries out of Roslin Frey’s hand.

ROBB: Perhaps I’ve made a terrible mistake.

[TALISA gasps and tries to strike ROBB but he catches her hand]

ROBB: Striking your king is an act of treason.

[ROBB and TALISA look at each other before ROBB tries to kiss her. TALISA stops him]

TALISA: No, don’t. Don’t insult them.

WALDER: [Addressing ROBB loudly so everybody can hear] Your Grace.

[Everybody starts knocking on the tables. WALDER signals for the music and knocking to stop]

WALDER: The Septon has prayed his prayers, some words were said and Lord Edmure has wrapped my daughter in a cloak. But they are not yet man and wife. A sword needs a sheath [Everybody laughs]. And a wedding needs a bedding [Everybody cheers]. What does my sire say?

EVERYBODY: [Knocking on the tables, chanting] To bed! To bed! To bed!

ROBB: [Gets up from his seat and addresses WALDER] If you think the time is right, Lord Walder, by all means, let us bed them.

[Everybody cheers, the band starts playing celebratory music again. EDMURE smiles, ROSLIN looks concerned. Men start getting up from their seats and approach the main table]

EVERYBODY: [Chanting] To bed! To bed! To bed!

[The men pick up ROSLIN and carry her out of the hall. The women grab EDMURE and start bringing him out as well. TALISA looks worried when she sees ROSLIN being carried away. Everybody is cheering on. The men start removing some of ROSLIN'S clothes while the women start doing the same to EDMURE]

EDMURE: Ho-ho! Careful now, ladies. Once you set that monster free, there’s no caging him again [Laughs].

[ROBB looks on smiling and clapping. TALISA looks at ROBB with a worried look]

EVERYBODY: [Chanting] To bed! To bed! To bed!

[ROOSE and CATELYN look at ROSLIN and EDMURE being carried out of the hall]

CATELYN: Poor girl.

ROOSE: Every bride suffers the same. I’m sure you endured yours with grace.

CATELYN: Oh, Ned forbade it. He said it wouldn’t be right if he broke a man’s jaw on our wedding night.

[ROOSE looks at CATELYN and chuckles before walking away]

[ROBB and TALISA watch as the bedding procession is almost finished]

TALISA: That is a very strange custom.

ROBB: I suppose it does seem strange from a foreigner’s perspective.

TALISA: It seems normal to you?

ROBB: It’s tradition. [TALISA stares at ROBB] Without the bedding ceremony, there’s no real proof the lord and lady consummated their marriage.

[TALISA puts her hand on ROBB'S shoulder, runs it down his arm, before grabbing his hand and placing it on her stomach]

TALISA: No, but there are other ways of providing proof.

ROBB: Boy or girl?

TALISA: I don’t know. But if it’s a boy, I know what we should name him.

ROBB: Oh, do you? It seems to me the father should have some say in his son’s naming.

TALISA: Eddard. [Catches ROBB by surprise] Don’t you want to teach little Ned Stark how to ride horses?

ROBB: I do.

[ROBB and TALISA kiss. CATELYN looks on and smiles as BLACK WALDER walks towards the door of the hall to close it. He walks back and the band starts playing the Lannister song, “The Rains of Castamere.” The band’s expression is very serious and the song isn’t as cheerful as their previous songs. CATELYN looks up at the band with a worried expression. Scene changes to outside of The Twins, Grey Wind is locked up in a kennel, whimpering, sensing something is wrong as Frey soldiers are on the move. The scene then changes again to the main gate of The Twins, where the tents are set up and men are still celebrating. THE HOUND and ARYA approach the gate, riding the pig farmer’s cart]

THE HOUND: Whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa.

[Three Frey guards stop THE HOUND and ARYA from entering The Twins]

FREY GUARD: Where are you going?

THE HOUND: Got salt pork for the feast.

FREY GUARD: The feast is over.

THE HOUND: It doesn’t sound like it’s over.

[ARYA watches as Frey soldiers run into the Twins]

FREY GUARD: If I tell you it’s over, it’s over. [Angrily] Turn this cart around and get the hell out of here.

THE HOUND: Got pig’s feet, too [ARYA looks up].

FREY GUARD: [Infuriated] Are you soft in the head? Turn this cart around!

[THE HOUND gives up. As he looks back, he notices that ARYA is not in the cart. The scene then switches back to the hall inside of The Twins. WALDER signals for everybody to be quiet. He addresses ROBB]

WALDER: Your Grace.

[WALDER stands up with a cup in his hand. Everybody takes a seat except ROBB. ROOSE returns to the hall and sits next to CATELYN]

WALDER: I feel I’ve been remiss in my duties.

[CATELYN looks scared. ROOSE slowly turns his head to look at CATELYN. He's smiling as he looks down at his arm, inviting CATELYN to take a look]

WALDER: I’ve given you meat and wine and music but I haven’t shown you the hospitality you deserve. My king has married and I owe my new queen a wedding gift.

[CATELYN pulls back ROOSE'S sleeve, she sees that he’s wearing chainmail. She starts gasping as ROOSE stares at her. She suddenly gets up from her seat and slaps ROOSE across the face, prompting him to run to the other side of the hall]

CATELYN: Robb!

[LOTHAR pulls a knife out of his sleeve and repeatedly stabs TALISA in the stomach from behind. She starts screaming as ROBB looks on in horror. As ROBB starts to approach her, the band now have crossbows and they shoot arrows at Robb, hitting him. The rest of the Frey men in the hall start slaughtering the Stark men. ROBB is repeatedly shot with arrows and falls to the ground. TALISA falls to the ground in agony. CATELYN in shock over ROBB, gets hit in the shoulder by an arrow, making her fall down. As the massacre continues, WALDER smiles and sips from his cup. The scene then switches to ARYA sneaking into The Twins. She hides behind a barrel and watches some Stark men eating with Frey men in front of the kennel that Grey Wind is in]

MAN 1: [Laughing] You ready to head home to Winterfell, eh? [Men laughing]

[ARYA grins]

MAN 2: Feast over yet, is it?

FREY MAN: Aye, it’s over! [Slit’s the throat of a Stark soldier]

[The Frey men kill the Stark men. They flip over the table and march off as ARYA hides in the shadows of the barrels. ARYA can hear Grey Wind whimpering as he tries to break out of the locked kennel. She goes behind the flipped over table and sees Grey Wind jumping up and down. Suddenly, Frey men appear with crossbows. Grey Wind growls at them before they shoot him to death. ARYA is horrified. She watches as Grey Wind takes his last breath and dies. She then notices more Frey men emerging from a doorway. She starts walking towards the doorway until THE HOUND puts his hand on her shoulder and turns her around]

THE HOUND: It’s too late.

[THE HOUND hits ARYA on the back of the head, knocking her out. He carries her over his shoulder and starts exiting The Twins. The scene then changes to CATELYN crawling underneath the table at the hall with the arrow still lodged in her shoulder. She notices JOYEUSE hiding underneath the main table. ROBB gazes at TALISA laying on the ground with her hand on her bloodied stomach. He starts crawling towards her. WALDER notices and signals for everybody to stop]

WALDER: The King in the North arises, heh heh.

[ROBB places one hand on TALISA'S stomach and lifts her head up with his other hand. She has already died. CATELYN grabs a dagger and emerges from under the table. She grabs JOYEUSE by the hair and drags her out from under the main table. CATELYN presses the dagger against JOYEUSE'S throat as WALDER looks on. The archers fix their sights on CATELYN]

CATELYN: Lord Walder! Lord Walder, enough! Let it end! Please! He is my son! [ROBB is still cradling TALISA on the floor] My first son! Let him go and I swear that we will forget this! I swear it by the Old Gods and New! We will take no vengeance.

WALDER: [Angrily] You already swore me one oath right here in my castle. You swore by all the Gods, your son would marry my daughter!

[ROBB lays TALISA'S head on the ground]

CATELYN: Take me for a hostage but let Robb go! Robb, get up! Get up and walk out! Please! Please!

WALDER: And why I would let him do that?

[CATELYN straightens up and presses the dagger harder against JOYEUSE'S neck]

CATELYN: On my honor as a Tully, on my honor as a Stark, let him go or I will cut your wife’s throat!

[ROBB starts to stand up]

WALDER: I’ll find another.

[ROBB turns to CATELYN]

ROBB: Mother.

[CATELYN turns to ROBB with tears in her eyes as ROOSE suddenly reappears in front of ROBB. He faces ROBB and grabs him by the shoulder]

ROOSE: The Lannisters send their regards.

[ROOSE thrusts a dagger into ROBB'S heart. While still staring at CATELYN, ROBB dies and collapses to the floor next to TALISA. CATELYN wails loudly while WALDER takes a sip from his cup. She slits JOYEUSE'S throat with the dagger, killing her. JOYEUSE falls to the ground with blood spraying from her neck and CATELYN drops the dagger. She looks on hopelessly, in a dreary daze. After a long pause, BLACK WALDER finally emerges behind CATELYN and slits her throat, killing her. She falls to the floor with blood spraying from her neck]

[Cut To Black]



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
1
The Mountain and the Viper
Game of Thrones
Featuring Alex Graves
Produced By D.B. Weiss, David Benioff, Greg Spence & Chris Newman
Album: Season 4 Scripts
THE MOUNTAIN AND THE VIPER
Title: The Mountain and the Viper
[Open to the dark, seedy town of Moles Town. Two men walk toward a brothel with smiles on their faces]

MAN 1: Here we are.
[Inside everyone is happy, drinking, enjoying themselves. One woman is burping a tune]

MAN 2: The Rains of Castamere!

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: You fucking dick! Same wrong guess every fucking time. Listen, ya cunt.

[Everyone laughs and goes “ooooo”. She burps the same tune]

MAN 3: Oh, The Bear and the Maiden Fair!

[Everyone cheers]

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: There's a man with an ear. Too bad you've got a hangnail for a cock. First time I saw you with your britches down, I thought you were a eunuch! You seen it girls. Like a baby snail peekin' out of his shell. *laughs and walks toward Gilly* *to Gilly* Your baby was crying this morning. It waked me up. You hear me?

GILLY: Yes.

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: Well, what are you going to say?

GILLY: I'm sorry it woke you up.

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: I don't care if you're sorry. Keep that baby quiet, or I will.

GILLY: Don't you ever touch him.

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: Hehehe, little Wildling bitch. You should've stayed with your own kind. *an owl hoots in the distance* Are you listening to me?

GILLY: Shut your mouth.

MOLE'S TOWN WHORE: What? It's just an owl you dumb bitch.

GILLY: No it's not.

[The owl hoots again. A man walks toward a well and in the reflection it's seen that Styr sliced the mans throat. Tormund is also seen as the Wildlings walk through the town killing everyone. Ygritte is also there. Styr and the Wildlings break into the brothel, continuing their killing spree. Ygritte kills everyone upstairs, as she's leaving she hears Gilly's baby cry. Ygritte opens a drape in the back and motions them to keep quiet]

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

SAM: I should never have left her there.

JON: You couldn't have known.

SAM: Of course I could've known. They were raiding the villages close by.

GRENN: And we just cower in here while they slaughter our brothers?

ED: Our brothers had orders to stay at Castle Black.

GRENN: Oh, so it's alright then?! Black Jack and Kegs and Mully chopped to pieces 'cause they broke the rules?!

ED: I didn't say it was alright! I'm sayin' they shouldn't have been there.

GRENN: We pledged to guard the realms of men.

SAM: She's dead because of me.

GRENN: We can't even guard Mole's Town.

JON: We can't go after them, you know that. That's what they want.

SAM: Little Same. As if I'd cut their throats myself.

PYP: Maybe she managed to hide herself. I thought one of you was dead, you were not North [?] and no one came back. Not for ages. But then you did.

ED: She survived Craster and he was the worst shit I've ever met. She survived the long march to the wall. She survived a white walker for fuck's sake. She might've got out.

SAM: She might have.

JON: If they hit Mole's Town, then we're next. Mance's army must be close.

ED: A hundred thousand.

GRENN: And there's what, 5 of us left.

ED: If you're counting Black Jack, Kegs, and Mully. A hundred and two.

PYP: How do a hundred and two men stop a thousand?

ED: Whoever dies last, be a good lad and burn the rest of us. Once I'm done with this world, I don't want to come back.

[Everyone takes a drink]

CUT TO: MEEREEN

[Men and women are seen swimming in a lake. They're bathing and washing clothes. Grey Worm looks over at Missandei who is naked. Missandei sees him looking, he looks away ashamed then looks back. She stands up proudly, then covers up. He dunks his head under water]

DANY: You think he was spying on you?

MISSANDEI: No, not spying.

DANY: The Dothraki think outsiders are ridiculous taking shame in the naked body. They make love under the stars for the whole Khalasar to see.

MISSANDEI: Yes your grace.

DANY: But you are not Dothraki.

MISSANDEI: No.

DANY: Well, I don't see why it matters. Grey worm isn't interested, none of the unsullied care what's under our clothes.

MISSANDEI: He was interested.

DANY: What?

MISSANDEI: I believe he was interested.

DANY: When the slavers castrate the boys, do they take all of it?

MISSANDEI: All of it?

DANY: The...the pillar an the stones.

MISSANDEI: I don't know, your grace.

DANY: Haven't you ever wondered?

MISSANDEI: Yes, your grace.

[Missandei is seen walking up toward Dany's throne. Grey Worm enters]

GREY WORM: Missandei. *in Valyrian* I have come to apologize.

MISSANDEI: *in Valyrian* You don't need to apologize.

GREY WORM: *in Valyrian* I hope I didn't frighten you.

MISSANDEI: *in Valyrian* No.

GREY WORM: The lessons you give I [?] on. These are precious to I.

MISSANDEI: To me.

GREY WORM: To me.

MISSANDEI: I don't remember teaching you the word precious.

GREY WORM: Jorah the Andal, he teaches I...he teaches me this word.

MISSANDEI: Do you remember the name you were given at birth?

GREY WORM: I remember nothing. Only unsullied.

MISSANDEI: When they cut you, do you remember that?

[Grey Worm shakes his head no]

MISSANDEI: I'm sorry. I'm sorry they did that to you.

GREY WORM: Why? Why sorry?

MISSANDEI: It's a terrible thing to do to a boy.

GREY WORM: *approaches Missandei* If the masters never cut me, I am never unsullied. I never stand in the Plaza of Pride when Daenerys Stormborn orders us to kill the masters. I never am chosen to lead the unsullied. I never meet Missandei from the Island of Naath. I am sorry I...for today. I am sorry.

[Grey Worm turns around and begins to walk away]

MISSANDEI: *in Valyrian* Grey Worm.

[Grey Worm stops and turns around]

MISSANDEI: *in Valyrian* I'm glad you saw me.

GREY WORM: *in Valyrian* So am I.

[Grey Worm turns and walks out of the throne room]

CUT TO: MOAT CAILIN

RAMSAY: Bracken. Mmm, strong. As long as they're in the see. But when you take them out of the water, no bones. They collapse under their proud weight and slum into a heap of nothing. You'd think they'd know that. Unfortunately they're not very bright. What do you tell them?

THEON: I'm Theon Greyjoy, son of Balon, heir to the Iron Islands.

RAMSAY: And what are you really?

THEON: I'm Reek.

RAMSAY: Are you sure? You do look very much like a lord. Formidable, proud.

THEON: I'm Reek.

RAMSAY: Until when?

THEON: Always. Forever.

RAMSAY: That's right. Until you're rotting in the ground. Remember what you are and what you're not. Bring me Lord Kenning.

[Theon approaches the castle on horseback]

GUARD 1: *to Theon* No closer. Who are you?

[Theon enters the castle walls. Inside a lot of people are sick or dying]

RALF: I'm Kenning, commander of this garrison. And you say you're Theon Greyjoy?

THEON: Yes.

RALF: And why should I believe that?

THEON: I was born on Pike to Balon Greyjoy. His third and last-living son. I am your prince. I swear it by the drowned god. What is dead may never die.

EVERYONE: What is dead may never die.

RALF: And if you were my prince, why are you marching with a Bolton army?

THEON: Lord Bolton took me captive after Winterfell. He sent me to treat with you in good faith as your fellow Ironborn.

RALF: And what does Lord Bolton want?

[Theon hands Kenning a scroll]

THEON: You are fading from sickness. You are badly outnumbered and you're hundreds of miles from the sea. Lord Bolton implores you to protect your men and abandon this fortress you can no longer hold. Do this and he will be just and fair with you as he is being with me. The Boltons will give you safe passage to the stony shore.

RALF: He wants us to surrender?

THEON: My own father, your king, surrendered years ago to Robert Baratheon. I watched him bend the knee. There was no shame there. He fought with honor, as did you.

[Kenning falls to the ground. His men pick him up]

RALF: ...shame fought with honor.

THEON: I'm sorry, I didn't hear...

[Kenning spits blood in Theon's face]

RALF: No shame fought with honor. Only a whipped dog would speak this way. Or a woman. Are you a woman boy?

THEON: *scared* You don't know.

RALF: The Ironborn will not surrender.

THEON: *whispering* Reek. Reek.

RALF: You go tell your master that, Theon Greyjoy. Or whoever the fuck you are. What in the hell are you muttering?

[MAN 4 kills Kenning with an axe]

THEON: Reek.

MAN 4: If we yield, we live? Is that what it says on this paper here?

THEON: Yes. Have your men raise the white flag and open the gates. You're going home.

[Cut to MAN 4's body with no skin and his eye cut out]

RAMSAY: You didn't really think I'd let them go did you? It's falling out of fashion. Fileting. Sad, but true. Traditions are important. Where are we without our history, eh?

THEON: Yes m'lord. Will we go home now?

RAMSAY: I believe we will. To our new home.

CUT TO: THE VALE

You have foreign blood, don't you, Baelish?

PETYR: A great-grandfather from Braavos, yes. I suppose all of our ancestors came from somewhere else originally.

LORD ROYCE: Our forebearers settled the Vale thousands of years ago. We've fought off invaders ever since.

PETYR: The beauty of the Vale is matched only by the nobility of its great families. Lady Arryn often told me that you were her rock, Lord Royce.

LORD ROYCE: She told me nothing about you, Baelish. But I didn't need to hear from her. Moneylender. Whoremonger. You've been licking Tywin Lannister's boots so long, it's a wonder your tongue's not black.

PETYR: My lord...

LORD ROYCE: And when Jon Arryn named you Master of Coin, no one cared. Always been a grubby job. Why not let a grubby man do it? But when I heard you were lurking here, fawning over the Lady Arryn...

PETYR: Lady Arryn invited me. She and I have been close since childhood.

LADY ANYA: Yes, we all know how close you were. Lady Arryn's predilections were her own affair. Her death is our affair.

PETYR: Of course. Her suicide shattered us all.

LADY ANYA: She was an odd fish. Everyone knew that. But suicide? She adored that boy of hers. I don't see her abandoning him. Not by choice.

LORD ROYCE: Strange that within days of your arrival, you've married Lady Arryn and she's fallen through the Moon Door.

PETYR: She was always prone to melancholy. My lady wasn't meant for a world as brutal as ours.

LORD ROYCE: We were told there was a witness. A girl.

LADY ANYA: A niece of yours, I believe.

PETYR: A girl with no learning and scattered wits. I assure you, she would be of no help.

LORD ROYCE: We'd like to speak with her.

PETYR: Let me fetch her.

LADY ANYA: No need. We prefer to hear her testimony unadulterated.

[Sansa Stark enters the room]

LADY ANYA: Come closer, child. You have nothing to fear from us or him. Lord Baelish here is your uncle? Your name is Alayne? Perhaps you would feel more comfortable if Lord Baelish left the room.

PETYR: My lady...

LADY ANYA: I wasn't asking you.

SANSA: He can stay.

LORD ROYCE: Speak up, girl, you're not a damn kitchen mouse. Tell us what you saw.

SANSA: *to Petyr* I'm sorry, Lord Baelish. I have to tell the truth. *to the council* I'll tell you everything.

LADY ANYA: Please, Alayne, leave nothing out.

SANSA: My name is not Alayne. It's Sansa Stark, eldest daughter of Lord Eddard Stark. Lord Royce, we met when you came to Winterfell. You were escorting your son Ser Waymar to the Wall.

LORD ROYCE: Sansa Stark? You tell lies right to my face, you little worm?

SANSA: Lord Baelish has told many lies. All to protect me. Since my father was executed, I have been a hostage in King's Landing. A plaything for Joffrey to torture or Queen Cersei to torment. They beat me, they humiliated me, they married me to the Imp. I had no friends in King's Landing...except one. He saved me. Smuggled me away when he had the chance. He knew I'd be safe here in the Eyrie with my own blood, my Aunt Lysa. The Lannisters have friends everywhere. Even the Vale. He made me swear not to tell anyone my true name.

SER VANCE: Your secret is safe with us, my lady.

LORD ROYCE: Your father grew up right here in these halls. We hunted together many times. He was a fine man.

LADY ANYA: Tell us what happened to your aunt, Sansa.

SANSA: You knew her well, my lords, my lady. You knew she was a troubled woman. She always loved Lord Baelish. She told me herself. From the moment he arrived at the gates of Riverrun, a boy of eight carrying everything he owned in a little sack. She confessed to me she never loved Lord Arryn. She did as her father commanded, as so many of us have. When the gods finally allowed her to be with Lord Baelish, she was so happy. For a time. My aunt was a jealous lady. She was terrified that Lord Baelish didn't love her anymore. That he would abandon her for a younger woman. And then...one day she saw him kiss me.

LORD ROYCE: Lady Sansa.

SANSA: It was a peck on the cheek, Lord Royce, nothing more. Lord Baelish is my uncle now, in truth, by marriage. He's always been so kind to me. I was so happy to be here, to be free. All because of him. But my aunt turned on me. She cursed me. Called me a whore. Promised to throw me through the Moon Door. When Lord Baelish tried to calm her, she struck him. She said she didn't want to live anymore. She stood on the edge of that Moon Door. He tried to reason with her. Promised her she was the only one he had ever loved, but she stepped through those doors and she was...*begins sobbing*

LADY ANYA: Shh. Shh, it's not your fault, sweet girl. It's not your fault.

[Sansa looks up at Petyr]

[Lord Royce, Lady Anya, and Petyr walk down the stairs]

LORD ROYCE: You could see it in the way she raised that boy. Feeding him from her own teats when he was 10 years old.

LADY ANYA: Lord Royce! This is hardly the time.

LORD ROYCE: Apologies, my lady. And to you as well, Baelish. We treated you a bit harshly.

PETYR: You want justice, Lord Royce. I can hardly complain about that. I want the same.

LADY ANYA: Not much justice to be meted out in suicide, is there?

PETYR: For Lysa, no. But for her son? Only 20 years ago, the knights of the Vale rode behind Jon Arryn, Ned Stark, Robert Baratheon. They fought together to overcome the Mad King. And since then, Arryn and Royce, Corbray, Waynwood, all the great houses of the Vale watched from the corner. A timid boy at a tavern brawl.

LORD ROYCE: Are you questioning our courage?

PETYR: I want to know which side you're on. Do you support the Lannisters, the house that executed your friend Ned Stark?

LORD ROYCE: Of course we don't support the damn Lannisters.

PETYR: No? Catelyn Stark begged her sister for support and Lysa refused. By staying out of the fray, you've allowed Tywin Lannister to destroy his rivals on every compass point. Who stands against him now?

LADY ANYA: Who would you have us back, Lord Baelish? Robb Stark is dead.

PETYR: I'd have you back Robin Arryn, Lord of the Vale.

LADY ANYA: Robin Arryn is a sickly little boy.

PETYR: And sickly little boys sometimes become powerful men.

LADY ANYA: More often they die young.

PETYR: I adored Lysa with all my heart. But she loved her son so much, she became overprotective. He needs to learn how to swing a sword. How to ride a horse.

LORD ROYCE: Aye, it's time.

PETYR: Yes, it's time. Time for him to tour the Vale, to visit all the castles in his domain. Time for Robin to leave the nest.

CUT TO: MEEREEN

BOY: Ser Barristan.

SER BARRISTAN: Yes? Who sent you?

[A boy hands a scroll to Ser Barristan. He reads it]

[Ser Jorah is looking at a map by the water alone]

SER JORAH: Ser Barristan.

SER BARRISTAN: Ser Jorah.

SER JORAH: Have I forgotten a council meeting?

SER BARRISTAN: No.

[Ser Barristan hands Ser Jorah the scroll]

SER JORAH: What's this?

SER BARRISTAN: A royal pardon signed by Robert Baratheon. You spied on her.

SER JORAH: Who gave you this?

SER BARRISTAN: Does it matter?

SER JORAH: Have you told her?

SER BARRISTAN: I wanted to tell you first, man-to-man rather than go behind your back.

SER JORAH: Let me speak with her in private.

SER BARRISTAN: You'll never be alone with her again.

[Ser Barristan leaves]

[Ser Jorah enters Dany's throne room, walking toward her]

DANY: Why did the usurper pardon you?

SER JORAH: If we could speak alone.

DANY: No, speak to me here. Explain it to me.

SER JORAH: Who do you think sent this to Meereen? Who profits? This is the work of Tywin Lannister. He wants to divide us. If we're fighting each other, we're not fighting him.

DANY: The pardon was signed the year we met. Why were you pardoned? Unless you're saying this document was forged.

SER JORAH: It is not forged.

DANY: Why, then?

SER JORAH: I sent letters to Varys, the spymaster of King's Landing.

DANY: What was the content of these letters?

SER JORAH: Information.

DANY: What information?

SER JORAH: When you and Viserys arrived in Pentos. His plan to marry you to Khal Drogo. When you were married. When your brother died.

DANY: You told him I was carrying Drogo's child?

SER JORAH: I...

DANY: Yes or no?

SER JORAH: Khaleesi.

DANY: Don't call me that. Did you tell him I was carrying Drogo's child?

SER JORAH: Yes.

DANY: That wine merchant tried to poison me because of your information.

SER JORAH: I stopped you from drinking his wine.

DANY: Because you knew it was poisoned.

SER JORAH: I suspected.

DANY: You betrayed me from the first.

SER JORAH: Forgive me. I never meant...please, Khaleesi, forgive me.

DANY: You sold my secrets to the man who killed my father and stole my brother's throne...

SER JORAH: I have protected you. Fought for you. Killed for you.

DANY: ...and you want me to forgive you?

SER JORAH: I have loved you.

DANY: Love? Love? How can you say that to me? Any other man, and I would have you executed. But you, I do not want you in my city dead or alive. Go back to your masters in King's Landing. Collect your pardon if you can.

SER JORAH: Daenerys, please.

[Ser Jorah goes for Dany's hand]

DANY: Don't ever presume to touch me again or speak my name. You have until dusk to collect your things and leave this city. If you're found in Meereen past break of day, I'll have your head thrown into Slaver's Bay. Go. Now.

[Ser Jorah rides away from Mereen]

CUT TO: MOAT CAILIN

[Ramsay is seen holding a flag out to Lord Bolton]

RAMSAY: Moat Cailin is yours, Father.

LORD BOLTON: Walk with me. Has there been any word from Locke?

RAMSAY: No.

RAMSAY: Unimportant. A cripple, a young boy. None of the northern lords have seen them. Dead most likely. Most of the Ironborn have fled the North. Now more will follow, thanks to you. Tell me what you see.

RAMSAY: Moors, fields, hills.

RAMSAY: Tell me what you see.

RAMSAY: Nothing.

RAMSAY: Not nothing. The North. Ride 700 miles that way, you're still in the North. 400 miles that way. 300 miles that way. The North is larger than the other six kingdoms combined. And I am the Warden of the North. The North is mine. Now tell me, what is your name?

RAMSAY: Ramsay Snow.

RAMSAY: No, not Ramsay Snow. *hands Ramsay a scroll* Open it. From this day until your last day, you are Ramsay Bolton, son of Roose Bolton, Warden of the North.

RAMSAY: You honor me. I swear I will uphold your name and your tradition. I will be worthy of you, Father, I promise.

[The Bolton army rides forward on horseback]

RAMSAY: Come, Reek, I'll be needing a bath.

CUT TO: THE VALE

[Sansa is seen sitting on her bed sewing. Petyr knocks on her door]

SANSA: Yes?

PETYR: First time I saw you, you were just a child. A girl from the North come to the capital for the first time. Not a child any longer. Why did you help me?

SANSA: They would have thrown you through the Moon Door if they found you guilty.

PETYR: That's not an answer.

SANSA: If they'd have executed you, what would they have done with me?

PETYR: I don't know.

SANSA: Neither do I.

PETYR: Better to gamble on the man you know than the strangers you don't? And you think you know me?

SANSA: I know what you want.

PETYR: Do you?

[She looks up at him]

CUT TO: OUTSIDE THE VALE

[Arya and the Hound approach the Vale]

HOUND: I thought it'd make me happy, but it doesn't. Not really. Nothing makes you happy.

ARYA: Lots of things make me happy.

HOUND: Like what?

ARYA: Killing Polliver, killing Rorge.

HOUND: So you're sad because you didn't get to kill Joffrey yourself. Is that it?

ARYA: At least I could have been there to watch. I wanted to see the look in his eyes when he knew it was over.

HOUND: Aye, nothing in the world beats that look.

ARYA: You protected him for most of his life. You think you could have saved him?

HOUND: I wasn't the damn wine taster. Little shit deserved to die, but poison...poison's a woman's weapon. Men kill with steel.

ARYA: That's your stupid pride talking. It's why you'll never be a great killer. I'd have killed Joffrey with a chicken bone if I had to.

HOUND: *laughs* I'd pay good money to see that. *grunts and rubs his neck*

ARYA: You should have let me burn it.

HOUND: It's a fleabite.

ARYA: That fleabite's got you walking a lot slower than you used to.

HOUND: Well, we won't have to walk too much further.

ARYA: You really think my aunt will pay for me?

HOUND: Aye, she'll pay.

ARYA: I've never even met her.

HOUND: Doesn't matter. You're her blood. Family, honor, all that horseshit. It's all you lords and ladies ever talk about.

ARYA: I'm not a lady.

GUARD: Who would pass the Bloody Gate?

HOUND: The bloody Hound, Sandor Clegane. And his...traveling companion Arya Stark, niece of your lady Lysa Arryn.

GUARD: Then I offer my condolences. Lady Arryn died. Three days ago.

[Arya bursts out laughing]

CUT TO: THE VALE

[Petyr is walking down the stairs with Robin]

ROBIN: I've never left home before, Uncle Petyr. I'm afraid to leave.

PETYR: You shouldn't be.

ROBIN: The Lord of the Vale belongs in the Eyrie, Mother said. She said it's not safe outside.

PETYR: It wasn't safe for her inside. People die at their dinner tables. They die in their beds. They die squatting over their chamber pots. Everybody dies sooner or later. Don't worry about your death. Worry about your life. Take charge of your life for as long as it lasts. That is what it means to be Lord of the Vale.

[Sansa enters the scene and walks down the stairs, Petyr looks at her]

SANSA: Shall we go?

CUT TO: KING'S LANDING

[In prison, Tyrion drinks wine from Jaime]

TYRION: Wine always helps. I thank you for it. Trial by combat. Deciding a man's guilt or innocence in the eyes of the gods by having two other men hack each other to pieces. Tells you something about the gods. How much longer?

JAIME: Soon.

TYRION: Do you think Oberyn has a chance? The Red Viper of Dorne. You don't get a name like that unless you're deadly, right?

JAIME: I've never seen him fight.

TYRION: Oh, he's going to die. I'm going to die.

JAIME: Oberyn believes in himself.

TYRION: That's putting it mildly. What's the punishment for regicide? Drawing and quartering? Hanging? Breaking at the wheel?

JAIME: Beheading.

TYRION: Seems rather ordinary. And he was my nephew as well, so what is that? Fratricide is brothers. Filicide is sons. Nepoticide. That's the one. Matricide, patricide, infanticide, suicide. There's no kind of killing that doesn't have its own word.

JAIME: Cousins.

TYRION: Cousins, you're right. There is no word for cousin killing. Well done. Do you remember cousin Orson? Orson Lannister?

JAIME: Of course. Wet-nurse dropped him on his head. Left him simple.

TYRION: Simple? Used to sit all day in the garden. Crushing beetles with a rock.

TOGETHER: Khuu! Khuu! Khuu!

TYRION: Nothing made him happier.

JAIME: Nothing made you happier. You'd think being tormented from birth would have given you some affinity for the afflicted.

TYRION: On the contrary. Laughing at another person's misery was the only thing that made me feel like everyone else.

JAIME: The joke wore thin, though.

TYRION: For you. You drifted away.

JAIME: I had other interests.

TYRION: Yes, other interests. But I stayed with Orson.

JAIME: Why?

TYRION: I was curious. Why was he smashing all those beetles? What did he get out of it? First thing I did was ask him. "Orson, why are you smashing all those beetles?" He gave me an answer. "Smash the beetles. Smash 'em. Khuu! Khuu! Khuu!" I wasn't deterred. I was the smartest person I knew. Certainly I had the wherewithal to unravel the mysteries that lay at the heart of a moron. So I went to Maester Volarik's library.

JAIME: Volarik. Tried to touch me once.

Turns out, far too much has been written about great men and not nearly enough about morons. Doesn't seem right. In any case, I found nothing that illuminated the nature of Orson's affliction or the reason behind his relentless beetle slaughter. So I went back to the source. I may not have been able to speak with Orson, but I could observe him, watch him the way men watch animals to come to a deeper understanding of their behavior. *picks up a beetle* And as I watched, I became more and more sure of it. There was something happening there. His face was like the page of a book written in a language I didn't understand. But he wasn't mindless. He had his reasons. And I became possessed with knowing what they were. I began to spend inordinate amounts of time watching him. I would eat my lunch in the garden, chewing my mutton to the music of "khuu, khuu, khuu". And when I wasn't watching him, I was thinking about him. Father droned on about the family legacy and I thought about Orson's beetles. I read the histories of Targaryen conquests. Did I hear dragon wings? No. I heard "khuu, khuu, khuu" and I still couldn't figure out why he was doing it. And I had to know, because it was horrible that all these beetles should be dying for no reason.

JAIME: Every day around the world, men, women, and children are murdered by the score. Who gives a dusty fuck about a bunch of beetles?

TYRION: I know, I know. But still, it filled me with dread. Piles and piles of them, years and years of them. How many countless living crawling things smashed and dried out and returned to the dirt? In my dreams I found myself standing on a beach made of beetle husks stretching as far as the eye could see. I woke up crying, weeping for their shattered little bodies. I tried to stop Orson once.

JAIME: He was twice your size.

TYRION: He just pushed me aside with a "khuu" and kept on smashing. Every day until that mule kicked him in the chest and killed him. *puts the beetle back on the ground* So what do you think? Why did he do it? What was it all about?

JAIME: I don't know.

[Bells begin chiming in the distance. Jaime goes to leave]

JAIME: Good luck today.

[Tyrion walks out toward the arena. The Lannisters are there, Oberyn is there getting ready for the battle. Tyrion passes him in handcuffs]

TYRION: Looks like very light armor.

OBERYN: I like to move around.

TYRION: You could at least wear a helmet. You shouldn't drink before a fight.

OBERYN: You learn this during your years in the fighting pits? I always drink before a fight.

TYRION: It could get you killed. It could get me killed.

OBERYN: Today is not the day I die.

ELLARIA: You're going to fight that?

OBERYN: I'm going to kill that.

ELLARIA: He is the biggest man I've ever seen.

OBERYN: Size does not matter when you are flat on your back.

TYRION: Thank the gods.

PYCELL: In the sight of gods and men, we gather to ascertain the guilt or innocence of this...man Tyrion Lannister. May the Mother grant them mercy. May the Father give them such justice as they deserve. And may the Warrior guide the hand of our champion...

[Tywin speeds the process along in boredom. Horns sound to start the fight. Oberyn kisses Ellaria]

ELLARIA: Don't leave me alone in this world.

OBERYN: Never.

[Oberyn is tossed his weapon. He's very good with it. The crowd cheers]

OBERYN: Have they told you who I am?

MOUNTAIN: Some dead man.

[The Mountain lunges forward as the battle begins]

OBERYN: I am the brother of Elia Martell. Do you know why I have come all the way to this stinking shit-pile of a city? For you.

OBERYN: I'm going to hear you confess before you die. You raped my sister. You murdered her. You killed her children. Say it now and we can make this quick.

OBERYN: Say it. You raped her. You murdered her. You killed her children.

OBERYN: You raped her! You murdered her! You killed her children!

[Oberyn stabs the Mountain in the gut]

OBERYN: You raped her! You murdered her!

[Oberyn charges at the Mountain to give him one final blow]

OBERYN: You killed her children!

[Everyone looks down, surprised. Oberyn pulls his weapon out of the Mountain and starts walking around his body]

OBERYN: Wait. Are you dying? No, no, no. You can't die yet. You haven't confessed. Say it. Say her name. Elia Martell. You raped her. You killed her children. Elia Martell. Who gave you the order? Who gave you the order?! Say her name! You raped her! You murdered her! You killed her children. Say it. Say her name. Say it!

[The Mountain trips Oberyn and grabs him in his massive hands. He punches out his teeth and gets on top of Oberyn, squeezing his head]

MOUNTAIN: Elia Martell. I killed her children. Then I raped her. Then I smashed her head in like this!

[Ellaria screams in agony. Tyrion looks dead inside]

TYWEN: *standing up* The gods have made their will known. Tyrion Lannister, in the name of King Tommen of the House Baratheon, First of His Name, you are hereby sentenced to death.




TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
15
The Watchers on the Wall
Game of Thrones
Featuring Neil Marshall
Produced By D.B. Weiss, David Benioff, George R. R. Martin, Greg Spence & 1 more
Album: Season 4 Scripts
THE WATCHERS ON THE WALL
Title: The Watchers on the Wall
[Opens on Jon Snow and Samwell Tarly standing on the edge of The Wall. It's night]

SAM: What was she like?

JON: She...she had red hair.

SAM: Oh? How big were her feet?

JON: Well what do you want me to say?

SAM: I want you to tell me what it was like to have someone. To be with someone. To love someone and have them love you back. We're all gonna die a lot sooner than I'd planned. You're the closest I'll ever get to know it.

JON: So you and Gilly never-

SAM: No...she just had a baby! ...and she never offered.

JON: But if she had, you would've? You'd have broken your vows?

SAM: The interesting thing is, our vows never specifically forbid intimate relations with women.

JON: What?

SAM: "I shall take no wife" yes, that's in there, there's no denying that. "I shall father no children" it's very specific. But what our vows have to say about other...activities...is open to interpretation.

JON: I don't think Ser Alliser cares much for interpretation.

SAM: Anyway, there's nothing for him to interpret. We didn't. So what's it like?

JON: It's...there's this person, this whole other person. And you're wrapped up in them and they're wrapped up in you and...you...for a little...for a little while you're more than just you, you're...well I don't know, I'm not a bleedin' poet!

SAM: No, you're really not.

JON: And what did I get for it? An arrow six inches from my heart.

SAM: There'll be arrows for all of us soon I imagine.

JON: There will.

SAM: They've already done the worst thing to me they could ever do.

JON: Go get some sleep, Sam. I'll take this watch.

[Sam gets in the lift back down off the wall. An owl perches on a post. Cut to the Wildlings where Thenn warg is standing with his eyes white. Ygritte, Tormund, and Styr are sitting in the background]

TORMUND: Did I ever tell you about her? My Sheila?

YGRITTE: Yes.

TORMUND: Oh that was a night to remember. Of course, I'd had a good bit to drink *laughs* the fangs were sharp, but she knew how to use them. And she was nice and soft down below. No, she was no ordinary beast. [?]

YGRITTE: I know you never fucked a bear. You know you never fucked a bear. Right now I don't wanna think about the bear you never fucked. Right now all I want to think about is each one of these arrows finding its way into a Crow's heart.

TORMUND: We could be waiting here a while.

YGRITTE: Good. The longer we wait, the more arrows I'll have. When they came up here, to our land, and put up a big wall and said it was their's. Then they started hunting us down. But this time, we're the one's doing the hunting.

STYR: You've got a lot to say about killing. Even more words than arrows.

YGRITTE: Back in those villages I killed just as many of them as you did. More, I reckon.

STYR: Yes. But none of those were your Crow lover.

YGRITTE: I probably killed him already.

STYR: So you've said.

YGRITTE: And if not. The only thing left of him is gonna be his fun-bits hanging around me neck.

STYR: And more words. Know what I think you do when you see him? Serve him up a nice juicy slice of ginger minge.

[Everyone laughs. Ygritte gets up and rushes towards Styr]

YGRITTE: What, you been thinkin' about that ginger minge? Wondering what it tastes like?

STYR: Maybe I have.

YGRITTE: Jon Snow is mine. *shouting* Anyone else tries to kill him, I'll have an arrow for them. *to Styr* And not one of your bald friends is fast enough to stop me.

[Gilly walks along the top of the hill with her baby, looking down at the Wildling camp. She walks away quickly. Cut to Sam in the library reading]

AEMON: And what is it that couldn't wait until morning, Tarly?

SAM: Maester Aemon. How did you know-

AEMON: That it was you? Who else but Samwell Tarly would be wasting candles to read in the middle of the night?

SAM: Let me help you.

AEMON: Oh, no need. I know my way around this library better than any other place in Castle Black. Thousands of books and no eyes to read them. Old age is a wonderful source of irony if nothing else. But you didn't answer my question, what are you reading?

SAM: Maester [?]

AEMON: Ah, the Wildlings. I can assure you that the closest Maester [?] ever got to a Wildling was this very library.

SAM: But what he says about what they do...it's all true. It's exactly what the survivors of [?] report.

AEMON: Yes. Imagine the stories Wildlings tell about us! Love is the death of duty. I told that to your friend Jon Snow once. He didn't listen and neither did you. That's why you abandoned your watch atop the wall to come here and read about the things that may have happened to the girl you love.

SAM: I don't love her.

AEMON: Yes you do.

SAM: No.

AEMON: Yes you do! I heard it in your voice when you first brought her to me. I remember how it sounds! I was in love once.

SAM: You were?

AEMON: You can imagine all manner of horrors befalling that poor girl and her child, is it so difficult to imagine that an old person was once, more or less, like you?

SAM: I'm sorry Maester, I didn't mean it like that.

AEMON: You know who I was before I came here? What I could've been if I'd only said the word? Of course you do. I met many girls when I was Aemon Targaryen. A future king always does. Some of them were quite forward in their attempts to win my affections. One of them succeeded. I was very young.

SAM: Who was she?

AEMON: Ah ha. I could tell you everything about her. Who she was. How we met. The color of her eyes and the shape of her nose. I can see her right in front of me. She's more real than you are. We could spend all night trading tales of lost love. Nothing makes the past a sweeter place to visit than the prospect of imminent death. Go to bed Tarly.

[Aemon gets up and blows out the candle. Sam leaves the room and outside hears Gilly at the gate talking with Pypar]

PYP: I'm sorry, I can't open the gate for nobody. It's orders!

GILLY: They killed everyone! Everyone but me and my baby. And they're out there. I saw them on the way here, they may have seen me, they may have followed me please!

PYP: I'm sorry, I can't.

GILLY: If they find the boy, you don't know what they'll do.

SAM: Pyp! Open the gate.

PYP: I can't.

GILLY: Sam, is that you?!

SAM: Yes!

PYP: The [?] gave me strict orders to not open the gate.

SAM: Oh, Pyp. Open the fucking gate!

[Pyp goes to open the gate]

PYP: I've never heard you curse before.

SAM: Yes, well, best get used to it.

[Gilly runs inside and Sam embraces her]

SAM: Are you alright? Shh, you're alright. Yeah, of course you are my brave little fella.

GILLY: It was horrible.

SAM: I'm so so sorry. I didn't know until I got back.

GILLY: Don't let them send me away, Sam.

SAM: Never.

GILLY: I know there's no women allowed.

SAM: Anyone who tries to throw you out will be having words with me. From now on, wherever you go, I go too.

[A horn sounds in the distance]

ALLISER: Get ready!

[Members of the Night's Watch can be heard shouting frantically. The owl screeches. Cut to Thenn warg whose eyes turn back to normal]

THENN WARG: It's time.

[The Wildlings get up and look at the hill. The owl flies away as the Night's Watch prepare for battle. Jon Snow walks out to the edge of The Wall and looks down upon flames in the distance. The Night's Watch light torches preparing for battle. Barrels are rolled to the edge of The Wall]

JANOS: Pick up the pace!

[The barrels are rolled into place]

JON: There we go, boys. That's one. There's two. Come on, let's get the next lot. That's the last of the oil, Ser Alliser.

ALLISER: A hundred thousand you say?

JON: Yes sir.

ALLISER: You can say it if you like. We should've sealed the tunnel while we had the chance like you suggested.

JON: It was a difficult decision either way, Ser.

ALLISER: Do you know what leadership means, Lord Snow? It means that the person in charge gets second-guessed by every little twat with a mouth. But if he starts second-guessing himself, that's the end. For him. For the clever little twats. For everyone. This is not the end. Not for us. Not if you lot do your duty for however long it takes to beat them back. And then you get to go on hating me and I get to go on wishing your Wildling whore had finished the job.

[Sam and Gilly are walking down a hall. Sam unlocks a door and they both enter. The room is filled with supplies. Gilly lays her baby on a sack of something]

SAM: You'll be safe down here. I'll check on you as soon as I can.

GILLY: You're leaving me again?

SAM: I'm not leaving you!

GILLY: You're going up there and we're staying down here. That's leaving. You said from now on we'd stay together.

SAM: I...I didn't mean in the same room.

GILLY: What are you going to do out there?

SAM: Help my brothers.

GILLY: How?! You going to fight the Free Folk when they come? They'll kill you. In Molestown they killed everyone.

SAM: I can't just hide here with you while they're fighting out there.

GILLY: Why not? You won't matter up there, you will down here.

SAM: Look. I am a man of the Night's Watch, Gilly. I made a promise to defend The Wall and I have to keep it, because that's what men do.

[Sam kisses Gilly]

GILLY: Promise me you won't die.

SAM: I promise you I won't die.

[Sam turns around and leaves the room. Outside the Night's Watch is still getting ready for battle. Pyp sets some arrows up then stands back, scared]

SAM: There's a lot more Wildlings on the other side of the wall than this side. We've got us some weapons and things. This is the perfect place for us to be.

PYP: I've never thrown a spear before. I've never held a sword with a proper edge. There's no place for me to be. You're not afraid?

SAM: Of course I'm afraid, there's a band of Wildlings coming to kill us.

PYP: Well if you're afraid of a band of Wildlings, how in seven hells did you manage to kill a White Walker?

SAM: I didn't know I was going to kill it, but I had to do something I didn't have any choice, he was going to kill Gilly and take the baby. If someone had asked me my name right then, I wouldn't have known. I wasn't Samwell Tarly anymore. I wasn't a Steward in the Night's Watch or son of Randyll Tarly or any of that. I was nothing at all. And when you're nothing at all, there's no more reason to be afraid.

PYP: But you're afraid now?

SAM: Yes, well, I'm not nothing anymore.

[Ygritte looks up at Castle Black. She sees Sam in the tower and she runs down the hill toward the other Wildlings]

YGRITTE: Most of their men are up top. Didn't count more than twenty down there. Leftovers. They've got a little fat one and a little bony one manning the front.

STYR: How high are the walls?

YGRITTE: Well, we'll be up and over before they know what's happened.

TORMUND: Let's kill some Crows!

[Everyone cheers]

TORMUND: *yells* Come on! *puts out the fire*

[The Wildlings head towards Castle Black. Overhead shot pans to show the castle, The Wall, and then the flames in the distance. Mance Rayder's forces are seen stomping and yelling through the woods. A giant rides a giant mammoth. The Night's Watch perched upon the wall look down at them in awe]

ALLISER: Archers knock, everyone else hold.

[The archers get ready to shoot, Grenn accidentally drops a barrel]

ALLISER: I said knock and hold you cunts! Does knock mean draw?!

NIGHT'S WATCH: No Ser!

ALLISER: Does fucking hold mean fucking drop?!

NIGHT'S WATCH: No Ser!

ALLISER: You all plan to die here tonight?

NIGHT'S WATCH: No Ser!

ALLISER: That's very good to hear. Draw!

MEMBER 1: Help, down below.

[Tormund and his men rush Castle Black as archers shoot at them. Ygritte grabs flaming arrows from the ground and shots up at the Night's Watch]

JANOS: They're attacking the southern gates!

ALLISER: Now?

JANOS: Now!

ALLISER: I'm going down then. Brother Slynt, you have The Wall.

JANOS: What?!

ALLISER: What are you fucking waiting for, loose!

JANOS: You heard the man. Loose!

[The archers on The Wall let loose a barrage of arrows downward at Rayder's troops. They back up, then cheer. On the other side, Ygritte continues to let loose flaming arrows]

TORMUND: You, over there.

[Pyp shoots a crossbow down at Tormund's troops]

SAM: Did you get one?

PYP: No. Ah shit, Pyp. Shit. Sam.

SAM: Yeah?

PYP: I think we're gonna die.

SAM: If you keep missing we will.

[Tormund's troops throw rope up at the gate. Alliser steps off the lift and walks towards the Night's Watch]

ALLISER: Brothers! A hundred generations have defended this castle. We've never fallen before. She will not fall tongiht. Those are Things at our walls. They eat the flesh of the men they kill. Do you want to fill the belly of a Thing tonight?

NIGHT'S WATCH: No!

ALLISER: Tonight we fight. And when the sun rises I promise you, Castle Black will stand.

[Night's Watch cheers]

ALLISER: The Night's Watch will stand.

[Night's Watch cheers]

ALLISER: With me now! Now, with me!

[Alliser and the Night's Watch rush at the Wildlings that have scaled the gate. Pyp and Sam leave their position as Tormund scales the gate. On the other side Rayder's troops advance]

JANOS: No discipline. No training. Gang of thieves, that's all this is. I commanded the city watch of King's Landing. Those men obeyed orders.

JON: We can't just let them attack the gate!

JANOS: The bars of those gates are four inches of cold, rolled steel.

JON: Those are giants riding mammoths down there. Do you think your cold, rolled steel's gonna stop them?

JANOS: No such thing as giants. They're stories for the children.

GRENN: Brother Slynt! I've just got word that Ser Alliser needs you below. You're the most experienced man he's got, he said he needs ya.

JANOS: Needed below? Yes. Yes.

[Janos runs away. Jon and Grenn nod at each other]

JON: Archers! Knock your arrows! Draw! Loose!

[The archers let loose a bunch of arrows at Rayder's men as they rush the wall and begin to climb]

JON: They won't summit before dawn.

GRENN: How do you know that?

JON: Because I've made that claim.

ED: I think they're in a bigger hurry than you were.

[Archers of the Night's Watch are lowered perpendicular to The Wall]

JON: Knock! Draw! Loose!

[A Wildling tries to shoot an arrow up at The Wall unsuccessfully. A giant stands next to him and shoots his own arrow up. The first rips through one of the posts. The second clears one of the Night's Watch straight off the wall. At Castle Black the fighting continues. Styr kills a man, the blood splatters on Olly's face. Janos comes down off the lift and Olly returns the lift to the top. Wildlings break into the kitchen. Janos cowardly runs down a hall toward where Gilly and her baby are hiding. He looks at her in shock. Outside Pyp finally hits someone with his crossbow.]

PYP: I got one. Right through the heart, he's dead.

SAM: Oh, is it over?

PYP: Huh?

SAM: Well then. *hands Pyp a loaded crossbow*

[Pyp goes up to shoot a Wildling, but Ygrytte shoots an arrow right through his neck. He falls into Sam's arms]

SAM: You're alright. You're alright. I'll get help. Shh, shh. Maester [?] is coming, he's gonna make it alright.

JON: Now!

ED: Now!

[The Night's Watch drop barrels down toward the Wildlings that approach the gate. Two giants and a mammoth approach the gate and begin pulling at it with long ropes]

JON: *to Grenn* The outer gate won't hold. Take five men, hold the inner gate.

GRENN: Alright.

JON: *grabs Grenn's arm* Hold the gate. If they make it through...

GRENN: They won't. Come on Hill! And you Cooper! You three, on me! Come on you lazy bastards!

JON: Oil!

ED: Oil on the ramp!

ALLISER: Protect the gate!

[Alliser and Tormund start fighting each other like badasses. Tormund slices Alliser in the gut. Alliser falls to the ground and gets dragged underneath]

ALLISER: Hold the fucking gate! Hold it!

[Sam sits with Pyp on his lap, dead. He lays him on the ground and grabs the crossbow. He makes a run for the lift as Thenn warg sees him and chases after him. Sam shoots him in the head with his crossbow. Grenn and the men that came down with him get off the lift]

SAM: *to Grenn* We need more men down here.

GRENN: We have to hold the gate.

SAM: But we need men here.

GRENN: Tell Jon! He's in command. *to the men behind him* Let's go!

[Sam gets in the lift]

SAM: *to Olly* Get me to the top! You hear me?!

[Olly sits on the ground with his hands over his ears in fear]

SAM: Your name's Olly, right? Listen to me Olly, get me to the top and when we give a signal, bring us back down. Do you hear me?

[Olly raises the lift]

SAM: And find a weapon, Olly. Fight them!

[Olly looks down at a bow and arrow. On The Wall, barrels of flaming oil are dropped down on the giants and the mammoth. The mammoth goes running off and one of the giants chases after it. Up top, one of the barrels got stuck and the men of the Night's Watch frantically try to get it off the ramp. A spear is fired down at one of the giants and it hits him right in the back. The other giant shouts in anger and goes to raise the gate with his bare hands. The barrel explodes on the ramp. Sam approaches Jon]

JON: What are you doing up here?

SAM: The Wildlings are over the walls. Ser Alliser has fallen. The castle walls can't stand much longer.

JON: Ed. You have The Wall. If they try the mammoths again, drop fire on them. If the climbers get too high, drop the scythe on them.

[Jon leaves his post and grabs his sword]

JON: Two brothers now fight with me.

ED: Might as well enjoy our last night, right boys? Light the fuckers up. Knock! Draw! Loose!

[Grenn gets to the inner gate with his men as the giant continues to raise the gate]

DONNEL: How are we gonna stop that?

COOPER: We shot twenty-eight arrows in him already.

GRENN: You heard Jon, we hold the gate.

DONNEL: Jon Snow's not Lord Commander.

GRENN: We hold the gate!

[The giant lifts the gate and goes under it]

DONNEL: Mother save me. Father save me.

GRENN: The gods aren't down here. It's the six of us, you hear me?

DONNEL: No, please.

[The giant rushes toward the inner gate as Grenn and his men stand in fear, ready to fight]

GRENN: Night gathers, and now my watch begins. It shall not end until my death. I shall take no wife, hold no lands, father no children. I shall wear no crowns

All TOGETHER: And win no glory. I shall live and die at my post. I am the sword in the darkness. I am the watcher on the walls. I am the shield that guards the realms of men. I pledge my life and honor to the Night's Watch, for this night and all the nights to come!

[Jon, Sam, and the other men ride the lift to the bottom]

JON: *to Sam* I don't want you out there.

SAM: You can't protect me forever. There won't be anywhere to hide if the castle falls.

[Jon hands Sam a key]

JON: I need him more than I need you.

[Sam nods as Jon opens the lift door early and leaps out and begins fighting. So begins the most incredible shot in the series, as the camera pans around the entire battlefield showing us glimpses of this truly epic battle. Sam runs to a door and unlocks it]

SAM: We need you boy.

[Ghost runs out and attacks one of the men that Jon was fighting. Tormund gets his first arrow to the back. Styr sees Jon and rushes to fight him. They go at it for a bit. Ygritte runs out of arrows so she jumps down and steals some from a dead body. Styr and Jon are still fighting as Ygritte finally spots Jon. Styr slams Jon's face against an anvil. Jon kills Styr with a hammer. As he turns around he sees Yrgitte with an arrow aimed right at him. They both stare, Jon smiles. An arrow goes straight through Ygritte's chest. She falls to the ground. It was Olly, that bastard. Jon rushes to catch Ygritte]

YGRITTE: Jon Snow.

JON: No, shh, don't talk.

YGRITTE: Do you remember that cave?

[Jon nods]

YGRITTE: We should've stayed in that cave.

JON: We'll go back there.

YGRITTE: You know nothing, Jon Snow.

[Ygritte dies. The battle rages on as Jon holds Ygritte's dead body. On the other side, Rayder's troops are climbing the wall]

ED: Drop the scythe, boys!

[A massive scythe drops down on the men]

ED: Hoister up!

[Rayder's troops retreat]

ED: They've had enough for one night.

[The Night's Watch cheers in excitement]

ED: Don't cheer too loud. They still outnumber us a thousand to one.

[Inside Castle Black's walls Tormund is still alive, swinging his sword with two arrows in his back]

JON: Tormund. It's over, let it end.

TORMuND: This is how a man ends.

[Jon grabs a crossbow and shoots Tormund in the leg then kicks away his weapon]

JON: Put him in chains. We'll question him later.

TORMUND: I should've thrown you from the top of your wall boy!

JON: Aye, you should've.

[Gilly hears someone entering her room. She grabs a leg of meat as a weapon and rushes the door]

SAM: Woah! It's me. It's me. I promised you, didn't I?

[Sam turns around and sees Janos. Outside the Night's Watch clean up after the battle. Sam and Jon descend the stairs]

SAM: We held them off.

JON: For one night.

SAM: This is a great victory.

JON: Great victory? Mance was testing our defenses. He almost made it through. And he has more giants, he has more mammoths. He has a thousand times as many men. They'll hit us again tonight. Maybe we can hold them off for a day or two, but we can never beat them.

SAM: Where are you going?

JON: I'm going to find Mance.

SAM: To...you can't do that. No one gave you any orders.

JON: Who's left to give orders? The Wildling army is only an army because of Mance. He united a hundred warring tribes. Without Mance they lose their leader. They lose their purpose, they go back to fighting each other, scatter back to their home.

SAM: Without Mance? You're going to kill him?

JON: I'm going to try.

SAM: They'll never let you within a hundred yards of him. And if you did, even if you managed to kill him.

JON: He'll kill me. If I don't go he'll kill me anyway. They'll kill the rest of us too.

SAM: He won't just kill ya. They'll boil you. They'll filet you. They'll make it last days!

JON: You're right. It's a bad plan. What's your plan?

[Jon stands there for a second as he and Sam look at each other, then he walks off, Sam scampering after him. They walk down the tunnel toward the gate. The giant and Grenn and his men are dead on the ground]

JON: They held the gate. Get some brothers down here to help you. You need to burn the bodies. Raise the outer gate, then lower it again as soon as I'm out.

[Sam waves his torch to signal the raising of the gate. Jon removes his sword]

SAM: What are you doing?

JON: I promised Jeor I'd never lose it again. *he hands the sword to Sam* In case I don't come back.

SAM: Jon. Come back.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
71
The Children
Game of Thrones
Featuring Alex Graves
Produced By D.B. Weiss, David Benioff, Greg Spence & Chris Newman
Album: Season 4 Scripts
THE CHILDREN
Title: The Children
[Jon Snow leaves the tunnel and walks out into the snow. Smoking dead bodies lie all around him. As he walks into the forest he becomes surrounded by Wildlings. He has entered the Wildling camp unarmed]

MANCE: You're wearing a black cloak again.
JON: I've been sent to negotiate with you.

[Mance and Jon enter Mance's tent and take a seat]

MANCE: It appears my trusting nature got the better of me. It's happened before. I was hoping your loyalty was real when you pledged yourself to us, Jon Snow, truly I was.

JON: The Halfhand ordered me to join your army and bring back whatever information I could to Castle Black. He made me kill him so you'd trust me. I was loyal, to him and to my Night's Watch vows.

MANCE: All of your vows? She wasn't enough to turn ya, eh? Were you enough to turn her?

JON: She put three arrows in me when I escaped.

MANCE: Did you see her again at Castle Black?

JON: Yes.

MANCE: And?

JON: She's dead.

MANCE: Your doing?

JON: No.

MANCE: We'll drink to her.

[One of the Wildlings gets two cups and fills them with liquid. Jon looks at Mance]

MANCE: Of all the ways I'd kill you, poison would be the last.

[They pick up their cups]

MANCE: Ygritte.

JON: Ygritte.

[They take a sip and Jon begins to cough]

JON: That's not wine.

MANCE: No, it's a proper Northern drink, Jon Snow. You did well. Fought hard. Killed some of our strongest men. One of our giants went into your tunnel and never came out again. Mag the Mighty.

JON: He's dead. He killed my friend Grenn.

MANCE: He was their king. Last of a bloodline that stretches back before the First Men.

JON: Grenn came from a farm.

[They lift their cups]

MANCE: Mag and Grenn.

JON: Grenn and Mag.

MANCE: Kullback, could I trouble you for something to eat? I don't imagine our guest has eaten anything in quite some time. So. You're here to strike a bargain?

JON: Turn your army around and go home.

MANCE: You know I know you're low on arrows. You're low on oil. You're low on men. How many are left? 50?

JON: I told Tormund and Orell. We have more than a thousand men.

MANCE: I showed you everything I had. The whole army, a hundred thousand strong, and what did you do? You fired on us with everything you had. It wasn't much. Soon as I saw that I sent four hundred men to climb the wall. An unmanned stretch five miles west of here. A lot of them will die climbing, but most of them will be over by the end of the day. This is me being honest with you, Jon Snow, which is more than you've ever done for me. My people have bled enough. We're not here to conquer, we're here to hide behind your wall just like you. We need your tunnel. Now we both know that winter is coming and if my people aren't south of the wall when it comes in earnest, we'll all end up worse than dead. Wanna strike a bargain with me? Here's a bargain. You go back, you open the gates to us and I swear to you that no one else will die. Refuse and we'll kill every last man in Castle Black.

[Jon looks over towards the knife. The Wildlings get their weapons ready]

MANCE: Ah! Oh, that's why you're here. I reckon you could do it before any of them could stop ya. They'd kill you of course, they'd kill ya slow, but ya knew that when you came in here. Are you capable of that, Jon Snow? Killing a man in his own tent when he's just offered ya peace? Is that what the Night's Watch is? Is that what you are?

[A horn blows in the distance. Everyone scrambles, Mance draws a knife to Jon's neck]

MANCE: You attacking us?

JON: No, it's like you said, we don't have the men.

[The Wildlings run around frantically. Men on horseback ride toward them]

MANCE: Hold! To me. To me.

[The horsemen continue toward the Wildlings, killing all in their path. The Wildlings fight back, clearly outnumbered]

MANCE: Stand down! I said my people have bled enough and I meant it.

[Stannis Baratheon and Davos Seaworth ride up toward Mance Rayder. They get off their horses. Mance disarms himself]

STANNIS: You're the king beyond the wall?

[Mance nods]

STANNIS: You know who I am?

MANCE: Never had the pleasure.

DAVOS: This is Stannis Baratheon, the one true king of the seven kingdoms.

MANCE: We're not in the seven kingdoms and you're not dressed for this weather.

STANNIS: It is customary to kneel when surrendering to a king.

MANCE: We do not kneel.

STANNIS: I'll have thousands of your men in chains by nightfall, I'll have nowhere to put them and nothing to feed them. I'm not here to slaughter beat dogs. Their fate depends on their king.

MANCE: All the same, we do not kneel.

STANNIS: Take these men away.

DAVOS: What are men of the Night's Watch doing in a Wildling camp?

JON: I was sent to discuss terms with the king beyond the wall.

DAVOS: You're speaking to the one true king boy. You'll address him as your grace.

JON: I know he's the king. My father died for him. My name is Jon Snow, your grace. I'm Ned Stark's son.

STANNIS: Your father was an honorable man.

JON: He was, your grace.

STANNIS: What do you think he'd have done with him?

JON: I was this man's prisoner once. He could've tortured me, he could've killed me, but he spared my life. I think my father would've taken him prisoner, listened to what he had to say.

STANNIS: Very well. *to Davos* Take him.

JON: Your grace. If my father'd seen the things that I've seen, he'd also tell you to burn the dead before nightfall. All of them.

CUT TO: KING'S LANDING

[Qyburn is seen closely analyzing Gregor's body. He's in Pycelle's lab with Cersei]

PYCELLE: I would suggest milk of the poppy to ease his pain but he is completely insensate.

CERSEI: Bloody Martells.

PYCELLE: The cause appears to be manticore venom.

QYBURN: It is, yes, manticore.

PYCELLE: I've read a good deal about it. It's a horrible poison, usually Mantari in origin. Oh! Yes, yes. There's nothing to be done.

QYBURN: Yes there is.

PYCELLE: May I ask what you think you're doing?

QYBURN: Saving him.

PYCELLE: Your grace. I wish it were otherwise, but Sir Gregor is beyond saving. Well, well beyond. This man is not even a Maester, let alone Grand Maester.

QYBURN: That's for the best. No Maester knows how to save him.

PYCELLE: That is exactly the sort of arrogance that had him expelled from the citadel, your grace. His curiosity was deemed dangerous and unnatural. Rightly so in my opinion.

CERSEI: You're dismissed, Grand Maester.

PYCELLE: Your grace. This is my laboratory!

CERSEI: Not anymore.

[Pycelle leaves the laboratory angrily as Qyburn tries to save Gregor's body]

CERSEI: You can save him?

QYBURN: Difficult to say, your grace, but if my past work is any guide. We stand a chance.

CERSEI: Do everything you can. Come to me with anything you need.

QYBURN: Thank you, your grace. You should know, the process may change him, somewhat.

CERSEI: Will it weaken him?

QYBURN: Oh no.

CERSEI: Very well then.

[Cersei leaves as Qyburn drains Gregor's blood. Cersei is seen arguing with Tywin]

TYWIN: Not another word. We've been over this, the matter's closed.

CERSEI: I'm opening it again.

TYWIN: You are betrothed to Loras Tyrell. Still betrothed to Loras Tyrell and you will marry Loras Tyrell as soon as Tommen marries Margaery.

CERSEI: I will not.

TYWIN: Jaime cannot marry or inherit lands. Tyrion's sentence will be carried out tomorrow. You have, on several occasions, made great claims about your commitment to this family's future. Your role in that future is more vital now than it ever was.

CERSEI: I don't care. I will stay in King's Landing where I belong with my son, the king.

TYWIN: When you were nine years old, I was called to the capital. I decided to take your brother with me and not you. You insisted that you would not be left at Casterly Rock under any circumstances and if you recall-

CERSEI: I'm not interested in hearing another one of your smug stories about the time you won. This isn't going to be one of those times.

TYWIN: Do you think you'll be the first person dragged into a sept to be married against her will?

CERSEI: When you marched into the throne room to tell me we'd won the Battle at Blackwater, do you remember?! I was sitting on the iron throne with Tommen. I was about to give him essence of nightshade, that's how far I was willing to go when I thought someone awful had come to take my son away. Someone awful is coming to take him away.

TYWIN: No.

CERSEI: Joffrey is dead. Myrcella's been sold like livestock. And now you want to ship me off to Highgarden and steal my boy, my last boy. Margaery will dig her claws in and you will dig your claws in and you will fight over him like beasts until you rip him apart. I will burn our house to the ground before I let that happen.

TYWIN: And how will you do that?

CERSEI: I'll tell everyone the truth.

TYWIN: And what truth would that be?

CERSEI: You don't know, do you? You never believed it. How is that possible? What am I saying, of course it's possible. How can someone so consumed by the idea of his family have any conception what his actual family was doing? We were right there in front of you and you didn't see us. One look in the past twenty years, one real look and you would've known.

TYWIN: Known what?

CERSEI: Everything they say is true about Jaime and me.

TYWIN: No, no, no, no, no.

CERSEI: Your legacy is a lie.

TYWIN: I don't believe you.

CERSEI: Yes you do.

[Cersei walks away, leaving Tywin standing there alone. Jaime is turning pages in a book in another room]

CERSEI: Jaime.

JAIME: You won. One fewer brother. Must be proud of yourself. There's really nothing you wouldn't do, is there?

CERSEI: For my family, no. I would do things for my family you couldn't imagine.

JAIME: Tyrion is your family.

CERSEI: He's not.

JAIME: You don't get to choose.

CERSEI: I do, so do you. You can choose the creature that killed our mother to come into this world-

JAIME: Are you really mad enough to blame him for that? He didn't decide to kill her. He was an infant.

CERSEI: A disease doesn't decide to kill you, all the same you cut it out before it does. What do you decide? What do you choose?

JAIME: The things I did to get back to you, to endure all that, only to find you-

[Cersei kisses Jaime]

CERSEI: I choose you.

JAIME: Those are words.

CERSEI: Yes. Like the ones I just said to father. I told him.

JAIME: Told him what?

CERSEI: I told him about us.

JAIME: You told him?

CERSEI: I told him I wouldn't marry Loras Tyrell. I told him I'm staying right here with Tommen, with you.

JAIME: You think he'll just accept that?

CERSEI: Go and ask him.

[Cersei kisses Jaime]

JAIME: What did you say?

CERSEI: I don't want to talk about Tywin Lannister. I don't choose Tywin Lannister, I don't love Tywin Lannister. I love my brother. I love my lover. People will whisper, they'll make their jokes. Let them. They're all so small I can't even see them. I only see what matters.

[Cersei kisses Jaime's metal hand. Jaime pulls her close and kisses her]

JAIME: Someone will walk in.

CERSEI: I don't care.

[Jaime picks Cersei up and lays her on the table as the start having sex.]

CUT TO: MEREEN

[Daenerys is sitting on her throne listening to her people's problems]

MISSANDEI: *in Valyrian* You stand before Daenerys Stormborn, the Unburnt, Queen of Mereen, Queen of the Andals and the Rhoynar and the First Men. Khaleesi of the Great Grass Sea, Breaker of Chains and Mother of Dragons.

FENNESZ: *in Valyrian* Thank you for seeing me, your grace. My name is Fennesz. I can speak the common tongue if you wish.

DAENERYS: You speak it very well.

FENNESZ: Before you freed me, I belonged to Master Mighdal. I was tutor to his children. I taught them languages and history. They know a great deal about your family because of me. Little Calla is only seven, but she admires you very much.

DAENERYS: I hope I can prove worthy of her admiration. What can I do for you?

FENNESZ: When you took the city, the children begged me not to leave the house. But Master Mighdal and I agreed that I must. So I lost my home. Now I live on the streets.

DAENERYS: I have outfitted mess halls to feed all former slaves and barracks to shelter them.

FENNESZ: I do not mean to offend, your grace. I went to one of these places. The young prey on the old. Take what they want and beat us if we resist.

DAENERYS: My Unsullied will make them safe again in short order my friend, this I promise you.

FENNESZ: Even if they are safe, who would I be there? What purpose would I serve? With my master, I was a teacher. I had the respect and love of these children.

DAENERYS: What is it that you want from me?

FENNESZ: Your grace, I ask you to let me sell myself back to Master Mighdal.

DAENERYS: You want to return to a man who owned you, like a goat or a chair?

FENNESZ: Please, your grace, the young may rejoice in the new world you've built for them. But for those of us too old to change there is only fear and squalor. I am not alone. There are many outside waiting to beg the same-

DAENERYS: I did not take this city to preside over the injustice I fought to destroy. I took it to bring people freedom. But freedom means making your own choices. I will allow you to sign a contract with your former master. It may not cover a period lasting longer than a year.

FENNESZ: Thank you, your grace. Thank you.

[Fennesz leaves slowly]

BARRISTAN: The masters will take advantage of this situation. The men serving them will be slaves in all but name.

[Another man enters the hall]

DAENERYS: Approach my friend.

MAN: *in Low Valyrian* I do not understand, my queen. I do not understand, my queen.

MISSANDEI: *in Low Valyrian* The Queen says you may approach.

MAN: *crying, speaking Low Valyrian*

MISSANDEI: *translating* I have brought you. He came from the sky. The black one. The winged shadow. He came from the sky and...

[The man kneels on the ground sobbing, laying a pile of burnt bones on the ground]

MISSANDEI: *translating* My girl. My little girl.

[The man continues to sob. In another room Daenerys is speaking with Missandei]

DAENERYS: What was her name?

MISSANDEI: Zala, your grace.

DAENERYS: How old was she?

MISSANDEI: Three.

DAENERYS: Three. *in Valyrian* And still no word on Drogon?

GREY WORM: *in Valyrian* Sailors saw him flying over the Black Cliffs three days ago, my queen. Nothing since then.

DAENERYS: *in Valyrian* Meet me in the catacombs.

[The entrance to the catacombs is rolled open. Daenerys' dragons enter followed by Daenerys. Inside there is food for them. They chomp at the food as Daenerys puts a chain collar around their necks. She walks away crying as they screech at her. She turns around as the catacombs close with tears in her eyes.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

[Aemon and the rest of the Night's Watch burn the bodies of their fallen comrades]

AEMON: They came to us from White Harbor and Barrowton, from Fairmarket and King's Landing, from north and south, from east and west. They died protecting men, women, and children who will never know their names. It is for us to remember them. Our brothers, we shall never see their like again.

ALL TOGETHER: And now their watch is ended.

AEMON: And now their watch is ended.

[Aemon passes the torch around as each member of the Night's Watch helps burn the bodies. Stannis watches from above. Jon Snow and Melisandre share a look]

TORMUND: Your old blind man patched me up. Why?

JON: He's sworn to treat all wounded men, friend or foe.

TORMUND: You want me alive so you can torture me?

JON: No one's going to torture you.

TORMUND: So how do we die? Hanging? Beheading? Drop us from the top of the wall?

JON: I don't know what happens to the prisoners.

TORMUND: Who decides?

JON: I suppose Stannis does.

TORMUND: He your king now?

JON: I don't have a king.

TORMUND: You spent too much time with us, Jon Snow. You can never be a kneeler again.

JON: We're gonna burn the bodies of your dead. Do you want to say any words over them?

TORMUND: Words? What kind of words?

JON: Funeral words. I don't know how the Free Folk do it.

TORMUND: Do what?

JON: Say farewell.

TORMUND: The dead can't hear us, boy.

[Jon walks away]

TORMUND: Snow. Did you love her? She loved you.

JON: She told you?

TORMUND: No. All she ever talked about was killing you. That's how I know. She belongs in the North. The real North. You understand me?

[Jon leaves and takes Ygritte's body out past The Wall. He burns her body in a pile of logs.

CUT TO: BEYOND THE WALL

[Hodor drags Bran through the snow followed by Jojen and Meera Reed]

MEERA: We can stop, we can rest.

JOJEN: We'll rest with the three-eyed raven.

[Jojen falls to the ground]

MEERA: We're not going to make it.

JOJEN: We're already here.

BRAN: Jojen. Jojen! Look, Jojen, look.

[The group stands at the edge of a cliff. A large tree is seen not too far off in the distance. They head toward it. As they walk a skeleton hand reaches up and drags Jojen to the ground. It starts pulling him backwards as Meera runs towards him]

MEERA: JOJEN! Hold on!

BRAN (to Hodor): Help them! Now!

MEERA: Hold on to me!

[More hands burst from the ground.]

HODOR: Hodor...

BRAN: Help them!

[Skeleton warriors have now emerged from the ground. They attack Jojen, Meera and Hodor. A brawl ensues. One of them attacks Bran until his direwolf, Summer, fights it off. Bran then wargs into Hodor and starts fighting back.]

JOJEN: Bran! Save yourself, now!

[Meera defeats a skeleton warrior, only to see another repeatedly stabbing Jojen. Just as two skeletons close in on the warging Bran, they’re destroyed by two fireballs, apparently controlled by a young girl.]

GIRL: Come with me, Brandon Stark!

[She looks at Meera and Jojen.]
GIRL: He is lost. Come with me, or die with him.

[JOJEN: Go with them.

The girl throws some more fireballs and the group move into a cave. When the skeletons try to follow, they explode.]

GIRL: They cannot follow us. The power that moves them is powerless here.

BRAN: Who are you?

GIRL: The First Men called us The Children, but we were born long before them. Come, he waits for you.

[They enter a room filled with tree roots. An old man is seated in the center. Bran approaches him.]

BRAN: You’re the three-eyed raven.

OLD MAN: I have been many things. Now, I am what you see.

MEERA: My brother, he led us to you, and now he…

OLD MAN: He knew what would happen. From the moment he left, he knew, and he went anyway.

MEERA: How do you know?

OLD MAN: I’ve been watching you. All of you, all of your lives, with a thousand eyes and one. Now you’ve come to me at last, Brandon Stark, though the hour is late.

BRAN: I didn’t want anyone to die for me.

OLD MAN: He died so that you could find what you have lost.

BRAN: You’re going to help me walk again?

OLD MAN: You’ll never walk again. But you will fly.

CUT TO: THE RIVERLANDS

[Brienne and Podrick wake up in the open air on their way to the Eyrie.]

BRIENNE: Podrick. Podrick! Where are the horses?

PODRICK: I hobbled them last night.

BRIENNE: What sort of hobble?

PODRICK: A figure-eight, like you taught me.

BRIENNE: If you did it like I taught you then the horses would be here.

PODRICK: Thieves, maybe?

BRIENNE: It’s at least thirty miles to the Eyrie from here. You’re carrying the saddle bags.

[Brienne sees Arya Stark practising her river-dancing.]

ARYA: People coming. You can shit later, there’s people coming!

BRIENNE: Morning!

ARYA: Morning.

BRIENNE: I like your sword. Are we getting close to the bloody gate?

ARYA: About ten more miles.

BRIENNE: Did you hear that Podrick? Only about ten more miles to the Bloody Gate.

ARYA: Are you a knight?

BRIENNE: No.

ARYA: But you know how to use that sword.

BRIENNE: I do.

ARYA: Does it have a name?

BRIENNE: “Oathkeeper.”

ARYA: Mine’s “Needle.”

BRIENNE: Good name.

ARYA: Who taught you how to fight?
BRIENNE: My father.

ARYA: Mine never wanted to. Said fighting was for boys.

BRIENNE: Mine said the same. But I kept fighting the boys anyway. Kept losing. Finally my father said, “If you’re going to do it, you might as well do it right.”

[Sandor “The Hound” Clegane emerges.]

BRIENNE: Seven blessings. I’m Brienne of Tarth, this is Podrick Payne.

HOUND: You want something?

PODRICK: That’s Sandor Clegane- the Hound.

BRIENNE: You’re Arya Stark.

HOUND: I asked if you wanted something.

BRIENNE: I swore to your mother I would bring you home to her.

ARYA: My mother’s dead.

BRIENNE: I know. I wish I could’ve been there to protect her.

ARYA: You’re not a northerner.

BRIENNE: I know, but I swore a sacred vow to protect her.

ARYA: Why didn’t you?

BRIENNE: She commanded me to bring Jaime Lannister back to King’s Landing.

HOUND: You’re paid by the Lannisters. You’re here for the bounty on me.

BRIENNE: I’m not paid by the Lannisters.

HOUND: No? Fancy sword you’ve got there. Where’d you get it? I’ve been looking at Lannister gold all my life. Go on, Brienne of fuckign Tarth, tell me that’s not Lannister gold.

BRIENNE: Jaime Lannister gave me this sword.

ARYA: The Bloody Gate’s ten miles.
BRIENNE: I swore to your mother by the Old Gods and the New…

ARYA: I don’t care what you swore!

BRIENNE: Arya!

HOUND: You heard the girl! She’s not coming with you.

BRIENNE: She is.

[Brienne and The Hound both draw their swords.]

HOUND: You’re not a good listener. Valyrian steel-- I’ve always wanted some Valyrian steel.

BRIENNE: Come with me Arya. I’ll take you to safety.

HOUND: Safety?! Where the fuck’s that? Her aunt in the Eyrie’s dead. Her mother’s dead, her father’s dead, her brother’s dead. Winterfell’s a pile of rubble. There’s no safety, you dumb bitch. If you don’t know that by now, you’re the wrong one to watch over her.

BRIENNE: And that’s what you’re doing? Watching over her?

HOUND: Aye, that’s what I’m doing.

[They begin a swordfight. The Hound seems to have the upper hand but Brienne defends well and floors him.]

BRIENNE: I have no wish to kill you Ser.

[The Hound grabs Brienne’s blade with his palms, shoves it to one side and punches her.]

HOUND: I’m not a knight.

[They fight bare-handed, Brienne bites off The Hound's ear, then The Hound draws a knife, and Brienne grabs a rock. She pushes The Hound down a steep cliff.]

BRIENNE: Arya! Arya! ARYA! Where is she?

PODRICK: She was just here...

BRIENNE: Why weren’t you watching her?

PODRICK: I was watching you I thought you migth need some help…

BRIENNE: Which way Pod? Which way did she go?

PODRICK: Ah, I think that way.

BRIENNE: Arya!

[The camera moves to show us Arya hiding just above Brienne. She walks down to The Hound.]

HOUND: You’re still here? [Coughs] Big bitch saved you.

ARYA: I don’t need saving.

HOUND: No, not you. You’re a real killer. With your water dancing, and your needle.

ARYA: You’re gonna die?

HOUND: Unless there’s a Maester hiding behind that rock, aye, I’m done. I’d skin you alive for wine. [Arya offers water.] Fuck water! Killed by a woman. I bet you liked that. Go on, go after her. She’ll help you. Going out alone, you won’t last a day out there

ARYA: I’ll last longer than you.

HOUND: You remember where the heart is? Fuck it. I’m ready. Go on, girl. Another name off your list. You kept promising me. I cut down your butcher’s boy, the ginger. He was begging for mercy. Please sir, please don’t kill me, please, please. Bled all over my horse. Saddle stunk of butcher’s boy for weeks. And your sister, your pretty sister. I should’ve taken her. That night the Blackwater burned, I should’ve fucked her bloody. At least I’d have one happy memory! Do I have to beg you? Do it. Do it.

[Arya stands up, takes The Hound’s coin purse, and walks away.]

HOUND: Kill me. Kill me! Kill me! Kill me!

CUT TO: KING'S LANDING

[We enter Tyrion’s cell. The door opens.]

TYRION: Oh, get on with it you son of a whore.

JAIME: Is that any way to speak about our mother?

TYRION: What’re you doing?

JAIME: What do you think I’m doing? The galley’s waiting in the bay bound for the Free Cities.

TYRION: Who’s helping you?

JAIME: Varys.

TYRION: Varys?

JAIME: You have more friends than you thought.

[They reach the end of the underground tunnel.]

JAIME: There’s a locked door at the top of the stairs. Knock on it twice, and then twice again. Varys will open.

TYRION: I suppose this is goodbye, then.

[They hug.]

JAIME: Farewell, little brother.

TYRION: Jaime, thank you. For my life.

JAIME: Quickly now.

[Tyrion takes a torch and uses a trap door to enter a room. There is a woman sleeping on a double bed, and we see the booch of the Hand of the King.]

WOMAN: Tywin… my lion...

[We see that the woman is Shae. She grabs a knife, and she and Tyrion struggle. Tyrion eventually strangles her with the bedclothes, weeping.]

TYRION: I’m sorry. I’m sorry.

[Tyrion takes a crossbow from the wall and walks in on Tywin on the privy.]

TYWIN: Tyrion! Put down the crossbow. Who released you? Ah, your brother ,I expect. He always had a soft spot for you. Come, we’ll go and talk in my chambers. Is this how you want to speak to me? Shaming your father has always given you pleasure…

TYRION: All my life, you’ve wanted me dead.

TYWIN: Yes. But you refused to die. I respect that, even admire it. You fight for what’s yours. I’d never let them execute you; is that what you fear? I’d never let Illyn Payne take your head. You’re a Lannister. You’re my son.

TYRION: I loved her.

TYWIN: Who?

TYRION: Shae.

TYWIN: Bah, Tyrion. Put down that crossbow.

TYRION: I murdered her. With my own hands.

TYWIN: It doesn’t matter.

TYRION: It doesn’t matter?

TYWIN: She was a whore!

TYRION: Say that word again.

TYWIN: And what? You’ll kill your own father in the privy? No. You’re my son. Enough of this nonsense…

TYRION: I am your son, and you sentenced me to die. You knew I didn’t poison Joffrey, but you sentenced me all the same. Why?

TYWIN: Enough. We’ll go back to my chambers and speak with some dignity.

TYRION: I can’t go back there. She’s in there.

TYWIN: What, are you afraid of a dead whore?

[Tyrion fires the crossbow at Tywin.]

TYWIN: You shot me. You’re no son of mine.

TYRION: I am your son. I have always been your son.

[Tyrion fires again.]

VARYS: What have you done? Quickly. Trust me, my friend, I’ve brought you this far.

[Varys loads Tyrion, in a transport container, onto a ship. He goes to walk back to King's Landing, but turns around and boards the ship himself]

CUT TO: THE RIVERLANDS

[We go back to Arya, alone. She rides her horse to a small port.]

ARYA: I want to see the captain.

CAPTAIN: You’re seeing him.

ARYA: I want to go north, to the wall.

CAPTAIN: No you don’t.

ARYA: I can pay.

CAPTAIN: There is nothing in the north but ice and war and pirates.

ARYA: I wouldn’t need a cabin. Please, I could work, scrubbing the floors, or…

CAPTAIN: I’m not going north, child, we’re going home.

ARYA: Where’s home?

CAPTAIN: The Free City of Braavos.

ARYA: Wait, I have something else.

CAPTAIN: More silver won’t make a difference.

ARYA: It’s not silver, it’s iron.

[Arya hands over the token she was given by Jaqen H'ghar.]

ARYA: Valar morghulis.

CAPTAIN: How did you… valar dohaeris. Of course, you shall have a cabin.

[We see Arya aboard the

EXT. WOODS
A younger Cersei and her friend Melara are walking in the woods.

MELARA: We shouldn’t be out here alone.

CERSEI: Why not?

MELARA: If your father hears…

CERSEI: He’ll never know we’ve been gone.

MELARA: But if he finds out…

Cersei takes her hands.

CERSEI: You don’t need to be afraid of my father.

They walk until they see a hut with smoke coming out of it.

MELARA: Are you sure?

CERSEI: Yes.

MELARA: We shouldn’t go in.

CERSEI: Of course we should.

INT. MAGGY’S HUT

A fire is burning and various plants are hanging from the ceiling. They hear a shriek then…

MAGGY: Get out. Get out!

MELARA: Let’s go…

CERSEI: No.

MAGGY: Listen to your friend.

CERSEI: They said that you were terrifying. With cat’s teeth and three eyes. You’re not terrifying. You’re boring.

MAGGY: You don’t know what I am.

CERSEI: I know you’re a witch and you can see the future. Tell me mine.

MAGGY: Everybody wants to know their future. Until they know their future.

CERSEI: This is my father’s land. My land. Tell me my future or I’ll have your two boring eyes gouged out of your head.

Maggy chuckles then hands Cersei a knife.

MAGGY: Your blood. Give me a taste.

Cersei cuts her thumb then Maggy grabs her hand to suck her blood.

MAGGY: Three questions you get. You won’t like the answers.

CERSEI: I’ve been promised to the prince. When will we marry?

MAGGY: You’ll never wed the prince. You’ll wed the king.

CERSEI: But I will be queen?

MAGGY: Oh yes, you’ll be queen. For a time. In comes another. Younger, more beautiful, to cast you down and take all you hold dear.

CERSEI: Will the king and I have children?

MAGGY: No. The king will have 20 children, and you will have 3.

CERSEI: That doesn’t make sense.

MAGGY: Gold will be their crowns. Gold their shrouds.

Maggy starts laughing. Cersei’s thumb starts dripping blood.

MELARA: Come on, we have to go. We have to go! Cersei!

CUT TO: CERSEI’S FACE - KING’S LANDING - MODERN DAY

Cersei gets out of a cart to a funeral procession outside of the Great Sept of Baelor. She walks to the top of the stairs.

PRIEST: Your grace, we are honored by your presence. The mourners are waiting.

CERSEI: They will keep waiting. I want a moment alone with him.

PRIEST: But your grace, many of these lords and ladies have travelled day and night to be here…

Cersei starts walking away.

PRIEST: From all seven kingdoms…

CERSEI: They will wait.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR

Tywin’s body rests with hand-painted stones on top of his eyes. Jaime presides over the body. Cersei walks next to him.

CERSEI: He never wanted you to be a King’s Guard, but here you are, protecting his dead body.

JAIME: What he built. The towers. He built it for us. He meant it for us. They’re going to try to take it away, all of it.

CERSEI: They?

JAIME: All of them out there are enemies. They’re waiting a night to make sure he’s really dead and as soon as they see the stones on his eyes they’ll set to work on tearing us apart.

CERSEI: They had nothing to do with it. The man who murdered our father, he tore us apart, he’s the enemy. I’ve been telling you for years, you’ve been defending him for years…

JAIME: This is exactly what they want.

CERSEI: ...and now our father is dead. And that little monster is out there somewhere drawing breath. Did you set him free?

No response from Jaime.

CERSEI: Tyrion may be a monster but at least he killed our father on purpose. You killed him by mistake. With stupidity. You’re a man of action, aren’t you? When it occurs to you to do something you do it, nevermind the consequences. Take a look. (gestures towards Tywin) Look at the consequences. Here they are. He loved you more than anyone in this world.

Cersei kisses Tywin on the head then leaves.

INT. CRATE - PENTOS

We see men working with rope, merchants carrying boxes, and trees through a hole in the crate. The crate is set down and opened up. Tyrion comes out with Varys standing over him.

VARYS: Apologies.

TYRION: I still don’t see why I had to stay in this fucking crate once we set sail.

VARYS: I saved your life. If they catch you, they catch me. I cannot say I feel overly guilty about leaving you in that “fucking crate”.

TYRION: Do you know what it’s like to stuff your shit through one of those air holes?

VARYS: No. I only know what it’s like to pick up your shit and throw it overboard.

Tyrion looks around.

TYRION: Pentos?

Varys nods.

VARYS: The home of my colleague. Ilyrio Mopatis. A merchant. He and I met many years ago, through mutual friends. A group of people who saw Robert Baratheon for the disaster he was. We tried to do what was best for the realm by supporting the Targaryen restoration. And thus began the chain of mistakes that has led us both here. Things have gotten worse, not better. Westeros needs to be saved from itself.

Tyrion pours himself a cup of wine and drinks it.

TYRION: Much better.

VARYS: My lord?

TYRION: I don’t think I am anymore. A lord. Are you a lord if you kill your father? I don’t suppose they revoke your nobility for killing a whore. That has to be happen all the time.

VARYS: You already drank yourself across the Narrow Sea.

TYRION: In a box. Why stop now?

VARYS: Because we are talking about the future of our country.

Tyrion finishes his wine.

TYRION: The future is shit. Just like the past.

He pukes up his wine and then pours himself another cup.

CUT TO: MEEREEN

The giant bronze Harpy statue is pulled down from the top of the pyramid.

EXT. BROTHEL - MEEREEN

An Unsullied soldier, White Rat, walks up to a prostitute and hands her a coin. She takes him into her room and starts undressing him.

PROSTITUTE: You want the same? Same as always?

She undresses herself

WHITE RAT: You… you don’t have to.

PROSTITUTE: Habit.

She puts her clothes back on and lays down next to him in bed, stroking his head and humming. A knife slits his throat. White Rat looks up and sees a member of the Sons of the Harpy holding the knife

INT. GREAT PYRAMID - MEEREEN

A golden Sons of the Harpy mask rests on the table.

DAENERYS: Sons of the Harpy?

BARRISTAN: Yes, your grace. They left it on the body.

DAENERYS: They’ve never killed before.

BARRISTAN: It was only a matter of time, your grace. Conquerors are always met with resistance.

DAENERYS: I didn’t conquer them. Their own people did.

MOSSADOR: They do not see us as people, Your Grace.

DAENERYS: Then they will have to learn to see things differently, Mossador. He did not risk his life fighting for freedom so cowards in masks could take it away. And I did not take up residence in this pyramid so I could watch the city below decline into chaos. What was the name of the man you lost?

GREY WORM: White Rat, your grace.

DAENERYS: I want him buried with honor. Publicly. In the Temple of the Graces.

BARRISTAN: The Sons of the Harpy will hear that message.

MOSSADOR: Make them very angry.

DAENERYS: Angry snakes lash out. Makes chopping off their heads that much easier. Find the men who did this and bring them to me.

INT. HALLWAY

The Unsullied are putting their armor on. Missandei walks up to Grey Worm.

MISSANDEI: Torgo Nudho.

GREY WORM: Missandei hin Naath.

MISSANDEI: I wanted to speak with you.

The other Unsullied leave the room.

GREY WORM: Why do you come?

MISSANDEI: White Rat, the Unsullied who… I have heard they found his body in a brothel. I have heard that more than one Unsullied has been known to visit Meereen’s brothels. May I ask you why? Why would an Unsullied go to a brothel?

GREY WORM: I do not know. I must go.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

Jon Snow is parrying with Olly. Jon puts his sword to Olly’s neck.

JON: Get your shield up.

OLLY: It’s too heavy.

JON: If it wasn’t heavy it wouldn’t stop a sword, now get it up.

Jon knocks Olly into the ground then helps him up.

JON: Come. Try it again. Drive at me. Keep your shield up. Or I’ll ring your head like a bell.

Sam and Gilly are watching them parry from afar.

GILLY: Shouldn’t you be training, too?

SAM: Well, I’m hardly a new recruit. How many brothers can say they’ve killed a white walker and a Thenn? I might be the first in history!

Ser Alliser walks by.

ALLISER: These men need a firm hand. Always have. They’re poachers and thieves.

He gives Sam and Gilly a look.

ALLISER: Not soldiers.

He walks away.

GILLY: That one hates me.

SAM: If Ser Alliser is chosen as the new Lord Commander… he hates the wildlings.

Sam looks at Gilly’s baby.

SAM: All the wildlings.

GILLY: Don’t let them send us away.

SAM: It’s not a sure thing. Ser Denys Mallister has commanded the Shadow Tower for 20 years, and people say he’s a good man. He’s running against Ser Alliser--

GILLY: Sam! Don’t let them send us away.

SAM: I told you. Wherever you go, I go, too.

GILLY: You can’t leave, they’ll execute you.

Cut back to Jon and Olly parrying. Olly is on the offensive.

JON: Good, good, pivot! Don’t forget to pivot! Shield up!

Jon turns and sees Melisandre waiting.

MELISANDRE: The king wants a word.

INT. ELEVATOR - THE WALL

Jon looks uncomfortably at Melisandre.

JON: You’re not cold, my lady?

MELISANDRE: Never. The Lord’s fire lives within me, Jon Snow.

She takes his hand to her face.

MELISANDRE: Feel.

Jon feels her face.

MELISANDRE: Are you a virgin?

JON: No.

MELISANDRE: Good.

EXT. THE WALL

MELISANDRE: Your grace. The bastard of Winterfell.

Jon bows to Stannis. Stannis motions for him to get up.

STANNIS: You know who rules at Winterfell now?

JON: Roose Bolton.

STANNIS: The traitor who plunged a dagger into Robb Stark’s heart. Don’t you want to avenge him?

JON: I want a great many things, your grace. But I’m a sworn brother of the Night’s Watch now.

DAVOS: I’ve been talking to your sworn brothers. Many of them love you.

JON: They’re good men.

DAVOS: Many don’t. You were seen taking the body of a wildling girl north of the Wall. Why?

JON: It’s where she belonged.

DAVOS: Some of the Night’s Watch feel you have too much affection for the wildlings.

JON: They were born on the wrong side of the wall. That doesn’t make them monsters.

STANNIS: No matter. I shall take back the North from the thieves who stole it. Tywin Lannister is dead. He can’t protect them now. I shall mount Roose Bolton’s head on a spike. But if I’m to take Winterfell I’ll need more men.

JON: The men of the Night’s Watch are sworn to play no part--

STANNIS: I’m not talking about the damn Night’s Watch. I’m talking about the wildlings.

JON: Your grace, you want the wildlings to march in your army?

STANNIS: If they swear to follow me, I’ll pardon them. We’ll take Winterfell. Once the North is won, I’ll declare them citizens of the realm. I’ll give them land to live on.

DAVOS: It’s a fair offer. More than fair.

STANNIS: I’ll offer them their lives and their freedom if Mance kneels before me and swears his loyalty.

JON: I don’t think that’s likely.

STANNIS: You admire him, don’t you?

JON: I respect him.

STANNIS: He likes you. Convince him to bend the knee...

JON: Your grace…

STANNIS: ...or he burns.

JON: How much time do I have?

STANNIS: Nightfall. The sun drops fast this time of year. Hurry, Jon Snow.

CUT TO: THE VALE OF ARRYN

Sansa, Littlefinger, and Yohn Royce are watching Robin parry. He is being beaten badly.

MASTER OF ARMS: Sword up! Attack, my lord! Attack! Don’t cross your feet!

YOHN ROYCE: My sons have had swords in their hands from the time they could walk. This one…

BAELISH: Lord Arryn will never be a great warrior.

ROYCE: Great warrior? He sings a sword like a girl with palsy.

SQUIRE: My lord. (hands Baelish a note)

MASTER OF ARMS (O.S.): Sword up, my lord!

BAELISH: Some boys develop more slowly. He’s still young.

ROYCE: He’s 13. Boys go to war at 13.

BAELISH: He has other gifts.

ROYCE: Does he?

BAELISH: The gift of a great name. Sometimes that’s all one needs.

He offers his hand to Sansa and takes her away from the swordfight. Lord Royce follows.

SANSA: Goodbye Lord Royce, and thank you for all you’ve done for me.

ROYCE: I have done nothing more than my duty, my lady.

BAELISH: I have no doubt that upon my return, Robin’s skills will have improved immeasurably.

ROYCE: He’ll be safe here. As for his skills, I make no promises.

CUT TO: COUNTRYSIDE

Podrick sits down next to Brienne, who is sharpening her sword.

PODRICK: Will we head north at some point? He said Sansa had a brother at Castle Black. We’re a few days ride from the Kingsroad, but that will take us--

BRIENNE: Us? The only reason you’re here is that Jaime Lannister told me you weren’t safe in the capital. You’re hundreds of miles from King’s Landing. No one knows what you look like. No one cares. You’re safe.

PODRICK: But I’m you’re squire.

BRIENNE: Do you even know what a squire is?

PODRICK: An attendant to a knight?

BRIENNE: I’m not a knight. That means you’re not a squire.

PODRICK: Well, where would I go?

BRIENNE: I don’t care, I’m not your mother.

PODRICK: You swore to find the Stark girls.

BRIENNE: I found Arya. She didn’t want my protection.

PODRICK: Sansa still might.

BRIENNE: Will you shut your mouth? I didn’t ask for advice. I don’t want anyone following me. I’m not a leader. All I ever wanted is to fight for a Lord I believed in. The good lords are dead and the rest are monsters.

A horse and carriage rides by.

INT. CARRIAGE

SANSA: You told Lord Royce we were going to the Fingers.

BAELISH: I did.

SANSA: But we’re heading west.

BAELISH: We are.

SANSA: If he wanted to betray us, he already would have.

BAELISH: Lord Royce may be as honorable as he thinks he is, but he’s not alone in that castle. Do you trust all those knights and ladies, stable boys and serving girls?

SANSA: No. Do you trust the carriage driver or the knights escorting us?

Baelish smiles.

BAELISH: No. But I pay them well, and they’ve seen what happens to men who disappoint me.

SANSA: So where are we going? To a land where you trust everyone?

BAELISH: So a land so far from here, even Cersei Lannister can’t get her hands on you.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

Close-up on Cersei drinking wine while Loras talks in the background.

LORAS: It was such a deep, deep shock to us all. Your father was a force to be reckoned with. He truly was. I wouldn’t presume to claim to have known him as such…

Cut to Tommen talking and smiling with Margaery.

LORAS: But just being in his presence was enough to make it so clear just how formidable a person you were dealing with. What a… what a force to be reckoned with.

CERSEI (sighs): Thank you so much for your kind words.

Cersei walks away and heads down the stairs.

GRAND MAESTER PYRCELLE: Deepest condolences, your grace. This tragedy… I never trusted Varys. I often warned…

Cersei walks away from him. A barefooted man in a robe walks up to Cersei.

LANCEL LANNISTER: Your grace.

Cersei inspects him for a moment.

CERSEI: Cousin Lancel. I hardly recognized you.

LANCEL: My deepest sympathies.

KEVAN LANNISTER: I apologize for my son’s appearance.

CERSEI: Uncle, it’s quite alright.

Lancel walks away.

KEVAN: They call themselves sparrows. Bloody fanatics. Religion has its place, of course, but at a certain point… They never would have come to the capital when Tywin was alive.

CERSEI: I’m sure he’ll grow out of it. Whatever it is. Excuse me.

KEVAN: Of course.

Cersei walks away, grabs a glass of wine, and heads to a room alone. Lancel greets her after some time.

CERSEI: Your wounds from the Blackwater seem to have healed.

LANCEL: It wasn’t my wounds that needed healing.

CERSEI: What can I do for you?

LANCEL: You can forgive me.

CERSEI: What could you possibly have done to warrant my forgiveness?

LANCEL: I led you into the darkness.

CERSEI: I doubt you’ve ever led anyone anywhere.

LANCEL: I tempted you into our unnatural relations. And, of course, there was the king. His boar hunt. His wine.

CERSEI: I don’t know what you’re talking about.

LANCEL: I’m a different person now. I found peace in the light of the Seven. You can too. They watch over all of us, ready to dole out mercy… or justice. Their world is at hand. I will pray for your father’s soul.

Cersei laughs.

CERSEI: The day Tywin Lannister’s soul needs your help…

Cersei takes a sip of wine and Lancel walks away.

CUT TO: LORAS’ BEDROOM

Close-up of Loras' birth mark.

OLYVAR: It looks like Dorne.

LORAS: No it doesn’t.

OLYVAR: It does. That’s the Sunspear bit right there. And that’s where the mountains are. And over here is… Sunsnake? Stonespear?

LORAS: Sandstone.

OLYVAR: Yes. Yes, Sandstone. Just there.

LORAS: Fine.

They start kissing.

LORAS: It’s Dorne.

OLYVAR: We should go there. I think we would have a lovely time.

LORAS: Judging by my experience, that would be wonderful. Dorne, Highgarden. Anywhere but here.

They kiss. Margaery walks in.

MARGAERY: We’re late for dinner as it is.

LORAS: You’re very respectful.

MARGAERY: I’m very hungry.

She closes the door.

MARGAERY: What’s your name?

OLYVAR: Olyvar, my lady.

MARGAERY: I’m afraid my brother is keeping the king waiting, Olyvar.

Olyvar kisses Loras then leaves the room.

MARGAERY: Perhaps you might consider being a bit more discreet?

LORAS: Why? They all know about me anyway. Everybody knows everything about everyone. What’s the point in trying to keep a secret in a place like this?

MARGAERY: In any event… (throws Loras his clothes) you shouldn’t keep your intended waiting.

LORAS: My intended? Please. Tywin’s dead. That means no one can force Cersei to marry me.

MARGAERY: Lucky you.

LORAS: Unlucky you.

MARGAERY: You think I want that woman married to my brother?

LORAS: If she doesn’t marry me, she doesn’t go to Highgarden. Which means she stays in King’s Landing. Which means you’re trapped here with Cersei Lannister as your mother-by-law.

MARGAERY: Perhaps.

LORAS: Perhaps?

MARGAERY: Perhaps?

CUT TO: PENTOS

Tyrion is standing on a balcony with a glass of wine. Varys approaches him.

TYRION: Eunuch, the spider, the master of whisperers.

VARYS: Imp, half-man.

Tyrion raises his glass.

VARYS: There are faster ways to kill yourself.

TYRION: Not for a coward.

VARYS: You are many things, my friend, but not a coward.

TYRION: You never told me why you set me free.

VARYS: Your brother asked me to.

TYRION: You could have said no.

VARYS: Refuse the Kingslayer? A dangerous proposition.

TYRION: Not as dangerous as releasing me. You risked your life, your position, everything. Why? You’re not family, you owe me nothing.

VARYS: I didn’t do it for you. I did it for the Seven Kingdoms.

TYRION: A drunken dwarf will never be the savior of the Seven Kingdoms.

VARYS: I don’t believe in saviors. I believe men of talent have a role to play in the war to come.

TYRION: You’re going to have to find another soldier. I’m done with Westeros and Westeros is done with me.

VARYS: You have many admirable qualities, self-pity is not one of them. Any fool with a bit of luck can find himself born into power. But earning it for yourself, that takes work.

TYRION: I’m not well-suited for work.

VARYS: I think you are. You have your father’s instinct for politics, and you have compassion.

TYRION: Compassion? Yes. I killed my lover with my bare hands. I shot my own father with a crossbow.

VARYS: I never said you were perfect.

TYRION: What is it you want exactly?

VARYS: Peace. Prosperity. A land where the powerful do not prey on the powerless.

TYRION: Where the castles are made of gingerbread and the moats are filled with blackberry wine. The powerful have always preyed on the powerless, that’s how they became powerful in the first place.

VARYS: Perhaps. And perhaps we’ve grown so used to horror we assume there’s no other way. If you sat on the Iron Throne, would you spread misery throughout the land?

TYRION: I will never sit on the Iron Throne.

VARYS: No, you won’t. But you could help another climb those steps and take that seat. The Seven Kingdoms need someone stronger than Tommen, but gentler than Stannis. A monarch who can intimidate the high lord and inspire the people. A ruler loved by millions with a powerful army and the right family name.

TYRION: Good luck finding him.

VARYS: Who said anything about him? You have a choice my friend. You can stay here at Ilyrio’s palace and drink yourself to death, or you can ride with me to Mereen, meet Daenerys Targaryen, and decide if the world is worth fighting for.

TYRION: Can I drink myself to death on the road to Meereen?

CUT TO: MEEREEN

The Unsullied march through the streets.

DAARIO NAHARIS: When did the Unsullied start patrolling the streets of Meereen? Looks like your friends haven’t been behaving themselves.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID

HIZDAHR ZO LORAQ: The mission to Yunkai was a resounding success. The Wise Masters of Yunkai have agreed to cede power to a council of elders, made up of both the freedmen and the former slaveholders. All matters of consequence will be brought to you for review.

DAENERYS: Good.

HIZDAHR: They did ask for some concessions.

DAENERYS: Concessions?

HIZDAHR: Politics is the art of compromise, your grace.

DAENERYS: I’m not a politician. I’m a queen.

HIZDAHR: Forgive me. You’re right, of course. Still, it’s easier to rule happy subjects than angry ones.

DAENERYS: I don’t expect the Wise Masters to be happy. Slavery made them rich, I ended slavery.

HIZDAHR: They do not ask for the return of slavery. They ask for the re-opening of the fighting pits.

DAENERYS: The fighting pits? Where slaves fought slaves to the death?

HIZDAHR: In the new world that you’ve brought to us, free men would fight free men.

Daario takes out his sword and smiles at Daenerys.

HIZDAHR: The pitfighters that you liberated plead for this opportunity. Bring some here and ask them yourself.

DAENERYS: No fighting pits.

HIZDAHR: Opening them would show the people of Yunkai and Meereen that you respect their traditions.

DAENERYS: I do not respect the tradition of human cockfighting.

HIZDAHR: If you--

DAENERYS: How many times must I say no before you understand?

INT. GREAT PYRAMIND - BEDROOM

DAENERYS: Whatever he wants from me he’s not going to get it. If he really believes I’m going to reopen the fighting pits…

DAARIO: You should reopen the fighting pits.

DAENERYS: What?

DAARIO: My mother was a whore, I told you that. She liked to drink pear brandy. The older she got, the less she made selling her body, the more she wanted to drink. So one day when I was 12, she sold me to a slaver she fucked the night before.

DAENERYS: Why?

DAARIO: I was a bad child. I wasn’t big, but I was quick. And I loved to fight. So they sold me to a man in Tolos who trained fighters for the pits. I had my first match when I was 16.

DAENERYS: You were sold into slavery, forced to fight to the death for the amusement of the masters, and you’re defending the fighting pits?

DAARIO: I’m only here because of those pits. I learned to fight like a Dothraki screamer, a Norvoshi priest, a Westerosi knight. Soon I was famous. 10,000 men and women screamed my name when I stepped into the pit. I made so much money for my master he set me free when I died. I joined the Second Sons, and then I met you.

A long pause.

DAARIO: You’re the queen. Everyone’s too afraid of you to speak truth. Everyone but me. You’ve made thousands of enemies all across the world. As soon as they see weakness, they’ll attack. Show your strength here, now.

DAENERYS: That’s why I have the Unsullied patrolling the streets.

DAARIO (scoffs): Anyone with a chest full of gold can buy an army of Unsullied. You’re not the Mother of Unsullied. You’re the Mother of Dragons.

DAENERYS: I don’t want another child’s bones dropped at my feet. No one’s seen Drogon in weeks. For all I know he’s flown halfway across the world. I can’t control them anymore.

DAARIO: A dragon queen with no dragons is not a queen.

INT. DRAGON PIT

Daenerys walks into the room the dragons are being held. She hears chains rattling.

DAENERYS: Viserion? Rhaegal?

The two fully grown dragons start snapping, screaming, and breathing fire at her.

DAENERYS: Easy. Easy. Easy.

They keep breathing fire and roaring so she leaves the room, terrified.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

Members of the Night’s Watch are constructing a funeral pyre.

INT. MANCE’S CELL

Jon Snow enters the room.

MANCE: So here we are.

JON: Here we are.

MANCE: When we first met you were my prisoner. And now, for our last meeting…

JON: This doesn’t have to be our last meeting.

MANCE: No, but it will be.

JON: You know what Stannis wants?

MANCE: He wants me to bend the knee. And he wants the free folk to fight for him. I’ll give him this much: he’s bold.

JON: Shouldn’t a king be bold?

MANCE: Oh, aye. I respect him. If he gets what he wants, I expect he’ll be a better ruler than the fools sitting on the Iron Throne the last hundred years. But I’ll never serve him.

JON: You told me you weren’t here to conquer. You told me your people have bled enough.

MANCE: That’s right. But I don’t want them bleeding for Stannis Baratheon either.

JON: You spent your life convincing 90 clans to come together for the first time in history. Thenns and Hornfoots, the ice-river clans, even the giants. A life’s work uniting them. You didn’t do it for power. You didn’t do it for glory. You brought them together to save them because none of them will survive the winter, not if they’re north of the wall. Isn’t their survival more important than your pride?

MANCE: Pride? Fuck my pride. This isn’t about that.

JON: Then bend the knee and save your people.

MANCE: They followed me because they respected me. Because they believed in me. The moment I kneel for a Southern king that’s all gone.

JON: And how many tens of thousands are out there right now? How many women? How many children? And you won’t go out and rescue them because why? You’re afraid of looking afraid.

MANCE: Oh, I am afraid. No shame in that. How will they do it? Beheading? Hanging?

JON: They’ll burn you alive.

MANCE: Bad way to go. I’ll be honest with you, I don’t want to die. And burnt to death, I don’t want people to remember me like that. Scorched and screaming. But it’s better than betraying everything I believe.

JON: And what happens to your people? You preserve your dignity and die standing, and they’ll sing songs about you. “You’d rather burn than kneel. The great hero.” Until winter comes, and the white walkers come for us all, and there’s no one left to sing.

MANCE: You’re a good lad. Truly, you are. But if you can’t understand why I won’t enlist my people in a foreigner’s war, there’s no point explaining.

Jon walks to the door, then turns around.

JON: I think you’re making a terrible mistake.

MANCE: The freedom to make my own mistakes was all I ever wanted.

Jon nods then leaves the room.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK - NIGHT

Members of the Night’s Watch escort Mance to Stannis.

STANNIS: Mance Rayder, you’ve been called the King Beyond the Wall. Westeros only has one king. Bend the knee, I promise you mercy.

Mance looks at the Free Folk, including Tormund, the Night’s Watch have chained up. Then he looks at Jon Snow.

STANNIS: Kneel and live.

MANCE: This was my home for many years. I wish you good fortune in the wars to come.

Stannis nods. His men take Mance onto the burning funeral pyre and tie him to it. Melisandre walks to the front of the pyre.

MELISANDRE: Man or woman, young or old, lord or peasant, our choices are the same. We choose light, or we choose darkness. We choose good, or we choose evil. We choose the true god or the false.

She picks up a torch.

MELISANDRE: Free folk, there is only one true king, and his name is Stannis. Here stands the king of lies. Behold the fate of those who choose the darkness.

She lights the pyre. Mance starts panicking as the fire reaches his legs. Jon Snow walks up to a high point and shoots Mance in the heart with an arrow, killing him.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
4
The House of Black and White
Game of Thrones
Featuring Michael Slovis
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 5 Scripts
THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE
EXT. BRAAVOS - SEA
Arya approaches the coast in the boat she boarded in the Season 4 finale. The Titan of Braavos looms over the ship.

BRAAVOSI MAN: In the old times, whenever Braavos stood in danger, the titan would step with fire in his eyes. He'd wade into the sea and smash the enemies.
ARYA: He's just a statue.

A horn blows as they approach the statue. Arya clutches her chest and the man laughs.

MAN: Don't be afraid. He’s announcing our arrival.

ARYA: I'm not afraid.

Boat goes under statue

EXT. BRAAVOS - RAGMAN HARBOR

Arya and the man are in a row boat. The man rows them to shore as they pass various street merchants. The man rows past them and The House of Black and White comes into view.

MAN: The House of Black and White: this is where you'll find the man you seek.

EXT. BRAAVOS - THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

They arrive at The House of Black and White

MAN: Here, I leave you.

He helps Arya get off the boat and onto the dock.

ARYA: Thank you for bringing me.

MAN: Any man of Braavos would have done the same. Valar morghulis.

ARYA: Valar dohaeris.

Arya knocks on the door, twice; the door opens while knocking the second time. An old man enters

ARYA: Hello. Valar Morghulis.

The old man continues to stare; Arya takes out the coin.

ARYA: Jaqen H’ghar gave me this.

OLD MAN: No one here by that name.

The old man is about to close the door before Arya interrupts.

ARYA: Please. I crossed the Narrow Sea. I have nowhere else to go.

OLD MAN: You have everywhere else to go.

ARYA: But wait!

The Old Man shuts the door abruptly; Arya turns around and sits on the top step

EXT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - NIGHT

ARYA: Cersei, Walder Frey, The Mountain, Meryn Trant. Cersei, Walder Frey, The Mountain, Meryn Trant.

Arya repeats the four names until the break of dawn as rain pours outside.

EXT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - DAY

ARYA: ...The Mountain, Meryn Trant.

Arya gets up and throws the coin into the sea
EXT. THE VALE - INN

Brienne rides into the stable outside the inn on horseback, with Podrick walking next to her.

PODRICK: Must be good food if it’s crowded.

INT. THE VALE - INN

Podrick and Brienne are seated at a table. A waitress approaches.

WAITRESS: Ale? (pours ale and leaves table; goes to another table) Ale?

Cut to another table in the inn: Sansa and Littlefinger's

SANSA: Before we left, a maester gave you a raven scroll.

BAELISH: You are becoming an observant young lady.

SANSA: My mother used to say, "dark wings, dark words".

BAELISH: An old saying. Inaccurate in this case.

SANSA: So it was good news.?

BAELISH: My marriage proposal has been accepted.

SANSA: I thought you still mourn the death of my beloved Aunt Lysa.

WAITRESS: Ale?

SANSA: I'll have some.

Back to Podrick and Brienne

PODRICK: My lady!

BRIENNE: What is it?

PODRICK: Sansa Stark. (Brienne begins to turn around) Don't look!

BRIENNE: You sure?

PODRICK: She's dyed her hair, but it's her. She's sitting with Petyr Baelish.

BRIENNE: Littlefinger?

PODRICK: A bunch of knights with him.

BRIENNE Bunch? What's a bunch? 100? 6? 20?

PODRICK: 10, I think. Too many. My lady, I don't think this is the right--

BRIENNE: Ready the horses.

PODRICK: We only have one horse.

BRIENNE: Find more.

Podrick gets up and leaves

BAELISH: Do you like the taste?

SANSA: I don't see what all the fuss is about. Why do men love it so much?

BAELISH: It gives some men courage.

SANSA: Does it give you courage?

Brienne shows up and Baelish's knights get in her way

GUARD: That's far enough.

BRIENNE: Lord Baelish, Lady Sansa, my name is Brienne of Tarth.

BAELISH: We've met. With Renly Baratheon. What did he say about you? He said, "You're a loyalty comes free of charge." Someone appears to have paid quite a bit for it since then.

Baelish gestures to the knights to welcome her; Brienne goes through and takes a knee in front of Sansa

BRIENNE: Lady Sansa, before your mother's death, I was her sworn sword. I gave my word I would find you and protect you. I will shield your back and keep your council, and give my life for yours if need be. I swear it by the old gods and the new.

BAELISH: Please, Lady Brienne. No need for such formality. (Brienne gets up) You are Catelyn Stark's sworn sword?

BRIENNE: I was.

BAELISH: Strange. I knew Cat from the time we were children. She never mentioned you.

BRIENNE: It was after Renly's murder.

BAELISH: Ah, yes. You were accused of killing him.

BRIENNE: I tried to save him.

BAELISH: But you were accused.

BRIENNE: By men who didn't see what happened.

BAELISH: Then what did happen?

BRIENNE: He was murdered by a shadow. A shadow with a face of Stannis Baratheon.

BAELISH: A shadow? With a face? (scoffs) This woman swore to protect Renly; she failed. She swore to protect your mother; she failed. Why would I want somebody with your history of failure guiding Lady Sansa?

BRIENNE: Why should you have any say in her affairs?

BAELISH: Because I am her uncle. I married her Aunt Lysa shortly before my beloved’s untimely death. We're family now, and you're an outsider. Forgive me, Lady Brienne, but experiences made me wary of outsiders.

BRIENNE: Lady Sansa, if we can have a word alone--

SANSA: No.

BRIENNE: Please, my lady. If I could explain--

SANSA: I saw you at Joffrey's wedding bowing to the king.

BRIENNE: Neither of us wanted to be there. Sometimes we don't have a choice.

SANSA: And sometimes we do. You should leave.

BAELISH: We don't want our new friend wandering the countryside alone. The roads of these parts aren't safe. Why don't you stay?

Brienne walks away

KNIGHT 1: He asked you to stay.

Brienne elbows him in the face after Knight 1 and Knight 2 attempt to get in her way. Brienne rushes out of the inn to the stables. She frees some horses then rides away with Podrick.

GUARD: After her!

EXT. VALE - WOODS

The knights chase after Brienne and Podrick. Podrick and Brienne separate.

BRIENNE: Podrick! (Podrick screams as he loses control of the horse)

Podrick gets away from the knights and stops at a river

PODRICK: Stop, stop, stop! (Horse stops) That’s a good boy.

Podrick turnsthe horse around and he loses control again, only this time he falls off the horse. He tries to run after it, but stops.

Enter knight, who sees Podrick. Podrick sees him and throws a rock at him and misses.

KNIGHT: I guess that means you’re unarmed.

Knight pulls out his sword and races towards Podrick.

BRIENNE: Down, Podrick, down!

Podrick gets down. Brienne slices the knight off his horse before he can get to Podrick. Another knight on a horse rushes towards her, and she stabs him in the neck.

BRIENNE: Podrick?

PODRICK: Yes, my lady?

BRIENNE: You can stand now.

PODRICK: Yes, my lady. (stands) Sansa Stark?

BRIENNE: Wary of strangers, as she should me. I saw her riding on the East Trail with Littlefinger. We’ll follow them.

PODRICK: My lady, if those Stark girls refused your service, maybe you’re released from your vow.

BRIENNE: I swore to their mother I’d protect those girls.

PODRICK: If they don’t want your protection--

BRIENNE: Do you think she’s safe from Littlefinger?

PODRICK: (pause) No, my lady.

BRIENNE: Get your horse.

INT. KING'S LANDING - CERSEI'S ROOM

JAIME: A summons from the queen.

Cersei looks farefully at a box on her desk. Jaime opens it, and a viper with a necklace in its mouth comes out. Jaime inspects the necklace; it has the Lannister lion on it.

CERSEI: There are only two like it in the world: the one I’m wearing and the one I gave to Myrcella.

JAIME: It’s a threat.

CERSEI: Of course it’s a threat! Our daughter’s in Dorne surrounded by people who hate our family. (mocking) "It's a threat."

JAIME: No note.

CERSEI: They blame us for the death of Oberyn and his sister, and every other tragedy that’s befallen their cursed country. I will burn their cities to the ground if they touch her!

JAIME: Softer.

CERSEI: What?

JAIME: Not so loud.

CERSEI: Our daughter’s in danger, and you’re worried I’m speaking too loudly!

JAIME: The world can't know knows she’s our daughter.

CERSEI: Then don’t call her your daughter. You’ve never been a father to her.

JAIME: If I was the father to any of my children, they’d be stoned in the streets.

CERSEI: And what has your caution brought? Our eldest child murdered at his own wedding. Our only daughter shipped off to Dorne. Our baby boy sent to marry that smirking whore from Highgarden.

JAIME: I’ll make things better.

CERSEI: You never made anything better.

JAIME: I’m going to Dorne. I’ll bring our daughter home.

CERSEI: You can’t just ask Prince Doran to give her back! She’s promised his son.

JAIME: I’m not going to ask him anything.

CERSEI: You go there with an army, it’s an act of war.

JAIME: No army. Do you know where they’re keeping her?

CERSEI: Oberyn mentioned the Water Gardens.

JAIME: I’ll find her. Is there anything else, your grace?

CERSEI: (scoffs) You’re going to Dorne? A one-handed man? Alone?

JAIME: I never said I was going alone. (exit Jaime)

EXT. THE CROWNLANDS - SHORE

Bronn is skipping stones.

LOLLYS STOKEWORTH: No sunflowers. I don't like yellow. Roses are very nice, definitely roses. And music. I adore music. But no flutes, I hate flutes! We can have a harp if you like, but no flutes. Then there's the food. Food is the most important thing, don't you agree? We're going to need pigeon pies. That's what they eat in the capital, don't they?

Bronn has been skipping stones and ignoring her.

LOLLYS: Don't they?

BRONN: Don't who?

LOLLYS: People eat pigeon pie in the capital.

Bronn puts his arm around her.

BRONN: They certainly do, my dear. They certainly do.

Pan up to Castle Stokeworth.

BRONN: It's a fine place, isn't it? A fine place. I never thought I'd end up settling down in a place like this.

LOLLYS: You won't.

BRONN: Pardon?

LOLLYS: We won't get to live at Stokeworth. When Mother dies, my sister gets the castle because she's older.

BRONN: Oh.

LOLLYS: She hates me. She calls me mean names, and sometimes even still she pulls my hair when Mother isn't looking.

BRONN: You know what I think? I think you're a good person. And your sister is a mean person.

LOLLYS: She is.

BRONN: I've been all over the world. And if there's one thing I've learned, it's that meanness comes around. People like your sister, they always get what's coming to them eventually. One way or another.

They stop walking. Bronn looks at someone in the distance.

LOLLYS: Who's that?

Jaime is sitting on a stone wall, waiting for Bronn.

BRONN: Jaime fucking Lannister.

Bronn leaves Lollys and starts walking towards Jaime.

BRONN: Ser Jaime.

JAIME: Ser Bronn of the Blackwater.

BRONN: I was very sorry to hear about your father.

JAIME: Thank you.

BRONN (gestures to Lollys): This is my betrothed, Lollys.

JAIME: A pleasure. (he kisses her hand)

BRONN: Run along, love.

Lollys starts walking back to the Castle.

JAIME: Beautiful bride you've chosen. When were you planning on getting married?

BRONN: Just get on with it.

JAIME: On with what?

BRONN: What you're here for. There's no way this little visit could possibly mean anything good for me.

JAIME: It's very good for you.

Jaime goes into his coat and pulls out a scroll. He hands it to Bronn.

BRONN: Lollys will be marrying Ser Wyllis Bracken.

JAIME: Mmm.

BRONN: We made a deal, your sister and I.

JAIME: I would have advised against that.

BRONN: How is this good for me?

JAIME: 'Cause you're going to come with me and help me with something important. And when we return, I'm going to give you a much better girl, and a much better castle.

BRONN: Return from where?

JAIME: As far south as south goes.

EXT. DORNE - WATER GARDENS

Ellaria coils her first in rage. A bracelet with a viper's mouth coils around her hand. The camera pans up to reveal she is still in mourning clothes.

TRYSTANE (O.S.): My future queen.

Ellaria glowers from the balcony at Trystane Martell escorting Myrcella through the Water Gardens. Trystane looks up and sees her. Ellaria walks towards Doran's place on the balcony and is blocked by Areo Hotah.

AREO: The prince does not wish to be disturbed.

ELLARIA: Remove myself from my path, or I'll take that long axe and shove it--

DORAN: Captain. Let her pass.

Areo reluctantly steps to the side. Ellaria approaches Prince Doran, staring at the Water Gardens from his wheelchair.

ELLARIA: Your brother was murdered, and you sit here at the Water Gardens, staring at the sky and doing nothing.

DORAN: Oberyn was slain during a trial by combat. By law, that is not murder.

ELLARIA: Your brother--

DORAN: You don't have to remind me. He was my brother long before he was anything to you.

ELLARIA: What will you do about his death.

DORAN: I will bury him. I will mourn for him.

ELLARIA: You would have me go to war?

DORAN: You would have me go to war?

ELLARIA: The whole country would have you go to war.

DORAN: Then we are lucky the whole country does not decide.

ELLARIA: The Sand Snakes are with me. They have the love of their people. They will avenge your father while you sit here in your chair doing nothing.

Doran says nothing. Cut back to Trystane and Myrcella in the Water Gardens.

ELLARIA: Oberyn is dead. And this Lannister girl skips about the Water Gardens eating our food, breathing our air. How many of your brothers and sisters do they have to kill?

Let me have her. Let me send her to Cersei one finger at a time.

DORAN: I loved my brother. And you made him very happy. For that you will always have a place in my heart. But we do not mutilate little girls for vengeance. Not here. Not while I rule.

ELLARIA: And how long will that be?

Ellaria exits the room. Areo goes back to guarding the door. Doran shakes his head.

EXT. MEEREEN - STREET

The Unsullied march through the street.

DAARIO (O.S.): The Unsullied are too conspicuous.

Daario and Grey Worm are walking through an alley together.

DAARIO: Anyone can see you coming from a mile off. Of course you haven't found any Sons of the Harpy. You haven't, have you?

Grey Worm grunts a "no".

DAARIO: My Second Sons, on the other hand, they drink, they whore, fight in the streets--they blend in. They overhear things in taverns, follow people from the taverns to nice, quiet alleys, break a few fingers, overhear a few more things. Before you know it...

Daario has brought them to a door. Grey Worm knocks it in and rushes the room. He, Daario, and an Unsullied inspect the room quietly.

GREY WORM: No one here. We go.

DAARIO: In a hurry? You're afraid?

GREY WORM: Unsullied fear nothing.

DAARIO: Right. That's your problem. You understood fear once, long ago, but you've forgotten what it means. Someone who's forgotten fear has forgotten how to hide.

Daario quickly pulls a dagger out, and stabs into a wall covered by a bookcase that immediately gives way. A man screams and falls out of the wall.

DAARIO: Fear is useful that way.

He pats Grey Worm on the shoulder. The Unsullied soldier grabs the man. Grey Worm searches the hiding place and finds daggers laying on the ground with a Sons of the Harpy mask.

INT. MEEREEN - PYRAMID

MOSSADOR: Sons of the Harpy, they want to put a collar back on my neck. On all of our necks. Please, Your Grace, you must kill him.

DAENERYS: It would send a message.

BARRISTAN: I think you should exercise restraint, Your Grace.

DAENERYS: Why?

BARRISTAN: For one thing, he may have valuable information.

DAARIO: The Son of the Harpy has no more valuable information.

BARRISTAN: How do you know that?

DAARIO: Because I questioned him.

HIZDAHR: And the information you did get, he is young and poor.

MOSSADOR: He is born free.

HIZDAHR: Why should he want to bring back slavery? What did it do for him?

DAENERYS: Perhaps the only thing that gave him pride was knowing that there was someone lower than he was.

MOSSADOR: They pay him. Great families afraid to do a thing. They pay poor man to do it for them.

HIZDAHR: And how do you know this?

MOSSADOR: Everyone knows this.

HIZDAHR: I don't know it, and I'm the head of a great family.

BARRISTAN: We do not know what this man did or didn't do. (to Daenerys) Give him a trial, at least. A fair trial. Show all of the citizens of Meereen that you are better than those who would depose. Teach them a better way.

MOSSADOR: I do not know the place from where Old Ser comes. Things maybe are different there, I hope. But here, in Meereen, before Daenerys Stormborn, they own us. So we learn much about them or we do not live long. They teach me what they are. Mercy, fair trial: these mean nothing to them. All they understand is blood!

They all look to Daenerys.

DAENERYS: Thank you all for your counsel.

Everyone gets up from the table and exits the room besides Ser Barristan.

BARRISTAN: Your Grace, a word, please, I beg you.

DAENERYS: About what?

BARRISTAN: About your father. About the Mad King.

DAENERYS: The Mad King? You're here to remind me of my enemies' lies? Consider me reminded.

BARRISTAN: Your Grace, I served in his Kingsguard. I was at his side from the first. Your enemies did not lie.

DAENERYS: Go on.

BARRISTAN: When the people rose in revolt against him, your father set their towns and castles aflame. He murdered sons in front of their fathers. He burned men alive with Wildfire, and laughed as they screamed. And his efforts to stamp out dissent led to rebellion that killed every Targaryen except two.

DAENERYS: I'm not my father.

BARRISTAN: No, Your Grace. Thank the gods. But the Mad King gave his enemies the justice he thought they deserved. And each time it made him feel powerful and right. Until the very end.

DAENERYS: I will not have the Son of the Harpy executed without a fair trial.

BARRISTAN (nods): Your Grace.

INT. PENTOS - COUNTRYSIDE - CARRIAGE

TYRION: There's a bug.

VARYS: Yes, best be careful. You might accidentally consume some solid food.

TYRION: When I agreed to come with you, did I misrepresent my intentions? (finishes his cup of wine) Besides, what is there for me to do inside this fucking box?

VARYS: You don't like it?

TYRION: I want to take a walk.

VARYS: You can't. Cersei has offered a lordship to the man who brings her your head.

TYRION: She ought to offer her cunt. Best part of her for the best part of me. Well, I suppose a box is as good a place for me as anywhere.

VARYS: Are we really going to spend the entire road to Volantis talking about the futility of everything?

TYRION: You're right. No point. (realizing) The road to Volantis? You said we were going to Meereen. What's in Volantis?

VARYS: The road to Meereen.

TYRION: And what do you hope to find at the end of the road to Meereen?

VARYS: I told you. A ruler.

TYRION: We've already got a ruler. Everywhere has already got a ruler. Every pile of shit on the side of every road has someone's banner hanging from it.

VARYS: You were quite good, you know. At ruling. During your brief tenure as Hand.

TYRION: I didn't rule. I was a servant.

VARYS: Still, a man of talent.

TYRION: Managed to kill a lot of people.

VARYS: Yes, but showed great promise in other areas as well.

TYRION: She wanted me to leave King's Landing. She begged me. I wouldn't go.

VARYS: Why?

TYRION: 'Cause I liked it. Power. Even as a servant. (takes a drink of wine)

VARYS: People follow leaders. And they will never follow us. They find us repulsive.

TYRION: I find us repulsive.

VARYS: And we find them repulsive, which is why we surround ourselves with large, comfortable boxes to keep them away. And yet, no matter what we do, people like you and me are never really satisfied inside the box. Not for long.

TYRION: You're right. Let's go for a walk.

VARYS: No.

TYRION: How many dwarves are there in the world? Is Cersei going to kill them all?

INT. KING'S LANDING - QYBURN'S ROOM

A dwarf head is placed on her desk.

CERSEI: Not him.

MERYN: Are you trying to deceive your Queen? Shall I throw them in a cell, Your Grace?

CERSEI: That won't be necessary, Ser Meryn. I don't want to dissuade the other hunters. Mistakes will be made.

HUNTERS: Thank you, Your Grace. Thank you.

CERSEI: Take the head.

QYBURN: Pardon me, Your Grace. I would take it, if you don't mind. It could prove useful for my work.

CERSEI: Very good.

She and Qyburn exit the room.

QYBURN: Over there will be fine.

MERYN (to hunters): You heard the man. Over there.

The hunters pick up the dwarf head.

INT. KING'S LANDING - RED KEEP

Cersei and Qyburn enter the room, taking the open seats on the small council. Cersei sits at the head of the table.

KEVAN: You're the Hand of the King?

CERSEI: No, Uncle. Clearly it would not be appropriate for a woman to assume that role. I'm merely advising my son until he comes of age and chooses a Hand for himself.

MACE TYRELL: Your Grace, I would be willing to serve provisionally as the King's Hand until he becomes old enough--

CERSEI: You're a good man, Lord Tyrell, but I don't imagine you'll have the time. In addition to being Master of Ships, the king has appointed you Master of Coin.

MACE: Oh, Your Grace.

CERSEI: He called your experience and wisdom in financial matters unparalleled. He said he would be honored to have you represent the crown's interests in the same.

MACE: The honor is all mine, Your Grace.

PYCELLE: Your Grace, in the past on several occasions, a Grand Maester has served as the King's Hand.

CERSEI: The King has named Qyburn the new Master of Whisperers.

PYCELLE: Your Grace, him? This man? This embarrassment to the Citadel? Your Grace, what qualifications can he possibly have for this post?

CERSEI: The qualification of loyalty, Grand Maester. That's far more than the eunuch ever had. Far more than many ever have.

PYCELLE: I must say I cannot see--

CERSEI (cutting him off): Uncle Kevan, in light of your position as commander of the Lannister armies, it would please the king if you would serve as his Master of War. No man living better deserves the title.

KEVAN: That is kind of you to say. I would like to hear it from the king himself.

CERSEI: The king is very busy at this moment.

KEVAN: He should be here, learning what it means to rule.

CERSEI: He is learning. On this occasion, in his capacity as ruler, he's asked me to speak on his behalf.

KEVAN: I returned to the capital to pay my respects to my brother. And to you. And to serve the king. I did not return to the capital to serve as your puppet. To watch you stack the small council with sycophants. (looks to Qyburn) Sending your own brother away so he wouldn't be--

CERSEI: My brother has left the capital to lead a sensitive diplomatic mission.

KEVAN: What mission?

CERSEI: That is not your concern as Master of War.

KEVAN: I do not recognize your authority to dictate what is and is not my concern. You are the Queen Mother. Nothing more.

Kevan gets up from his seat.

CERSEI: You would abandon your king in his time of need?

KEVAN: If he wants to send for me, I will be waiting for him. At Casterly Rock.

He exits the room and closes the door.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - LIBRARY

Shireen runs her finger over the letter "S" in her book.

SHIREEN: Come on. You know this one. It looks like an animal.

GILLY: Snake. Snake... S! It's an S!

SHIREEN: Right, very good!

Sam is reading in a different aisle in the library.

SAM: Hmm! Did you know that the youngest Lord Commander in history, Osric Stark, was elected at the age of 10?

Gilly and Shireen look to him and then back at their book.

GILLY: I know "S".

SHIREEN: You'll learn, I promise. I taught Ser Davos, and old people are terrible at learning new things.

GILLY: Well, you're a wonderful teacher. (to Sam) Very patient!

SAM: I only said that the more time you spend practicing, the faster you'll be able to read.

GILLY: That's alright. We're doing just fine. I'm sure you and Ostrich Stark have a lot to talk about.

Sam goes back to his book.

GILLY (to Shireen): How old were you when you learned to read?

SHIREEN: Three.

SAM (interjecting): Three?! Who taught you, your mother?

SHIREEN: No. Old Maester Cressen did. I had a lot of time to practice. My mother kept me inside because... (trails off)

GILLY (gently): What do you call it in the South, what happened to your face?

SHIREEN: Greyscale. What do you call it north of the Wall?

GILLY: I don't know. But two of my sisters had it. They both died. How did they cure you?

SHIREEN: I don't remember. I was a baby. Lots of people came and tried, I think. Whatever they did, it went away. What happened to your sisters?

GILLY: My father made them move out of the keep into the huts outside. None of us were allowed to go near them. But we heard them. Especially at night. They started to sound... not like themselves.

SAM: Did you ever see them?

GILLY: Only once at the end. They were covered with it. Their faces, their arms. They acted like animals. My father had to drag them out to the woods on a rope.

SHIREEN: What did he do to them in the woods?

Gilly is afraid to answer. Selyse enters the room before she can.

SHIREEN: Mother.

SELYSE (to Sam and Gilly): Leave us.

SAM (nodding): Your Grace.

Sam and Gilly exit the room.

SELYSE: You need to stay away from that girl.

SHIREEN: Why?

SELYSE: She's a wildling.

SHIREEN: Her name's Gilly. She's nice. I'm teaching her to read.

SELYSE: She's a wildling. Your father defeated their people. He executed her king for treason. They could strike at him by striking at you.

SHIREEN: Gilly wouldn't do that.

SELYSE: You have no idea what people will do. All your books and you still don't know.

Selyse exits the library.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - STANNIS'S ROOM

STANNIS: I ordered Mance Rayder burnt at the stake. You prevented that order from being carried out. You showed mercy to Mance Rayder. A king's word is law. Perhaps you should ask Ser Davos how much mercy I show to lawbreakers. Show too much kindness, people won't fear you. If people don't fear you, they don't follow you.

JON: With respect, Your Grace, the free folk will never follow you, no matter what you do. You're the man who burned their king alive.

STANNIS: Who then? You?

JON: No. Only one of their own.

STANNIS: Do you know this wretched girl Lyanna Mormont?

JON: The Lord Commander's niece.

STANNIS: Lady of Bear Island, and a child of 10. I asked her to commit her house to my cause, that's her response.

JON: "Bear Island knows no king but the King in the North, whose name is Stark." (Jon smiles)

STANNIS: That amuses you?

JON: I apologize, Your Grace. Northerners can be a bit like the free folk. Loyal to their own.

STANNIS: I know. My brother Robert went on often and loudly about how difficult it was to control them - even with your father's help.

DAVOS: Tonight, the Night's Watch elect a new Lord Commander. Ser Alliser Thorne is going to win.

JON: Most likely.

DAVOS: Unpleasant man. He thinks you're a traitor. What's your life going to be like on the Wall with Thorne in command?

JON: Unpleasant, I expect.

STANNIS: Your bravery made him look weak. He'll punish you for it. I don't punish men for bravery. I reward them.

JON: I don't doubt it, Your Grace. But I'm a brother of the Night's Watch. I've pledged them my life, my honor, my sword. I don't know what I have left to give you.

STANNIS: You can give me the North.

JON: I can't. Even if I wanted to, I'm a bastard. A Snow.

STANNIS: Kneel before me. Lay your sword at my feet. Pledge me your service and you'll rise again as Jon Stark, Lord of Winterfell.

Jon stares at Stannis deeply without saying a word.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - DINING HALL

SAM: He'll make you a Stark with the stroke of a pen?

JON: It's the first thing I ever remember wanting. I'd daydream that my father would ask the king, and just like that I would never be the bastard of Winterfell again.

SAM: You deserve this. You do. I couldn't be happier for you.

JON: I'm going to refuse him.

SAM (confused): But you'd be Lord of Winterfell.

JON: I swore a vow to the Night's Watch. If I don't take my own word seriously, what sort of Lord of Winterfell would I be?

Jon walks away from Sam and takes a seat.

ALLISER (O.S.): Crowded. You'd think we were serving venison stew.

Maester Aemon rises slowly from the table at the front.

AEMON: Does anyone wish to speak for candidates before we cast our tokens for the 998th Lord Commander of the Night's Watch?

Janos Slynt stands up.

JANOS: Ser Alliser Thorne is not just a knight, he's a man of true nobility. He was acting commander when the Wall came under attack, and led us to victory against the wildlings.

MEN: Hear, hear.

JANOS: He's a veteran of 100 battles and has been a defender of the Watch and the Wall almost all of his life. He's the only true choice.

Alliser smiles. Men cheer and beat on the tables.

AEMON: Is there anyone else?

SHADOW TOWER BROTHER: Ser Denys Mallister joined the Watch as a boy and has served loyally longer than any other ranger. Through 10 winters he served. As commander of the Shadow Tower, he kept the wildlings away. We could do no better.

Men, including Jon, bang their cups on the table, but the reaction is much weaker.

AEMON: If there's no one else, we will begin the voting. The triangular tokens count for Ser Alliser Thorne. The square tokens for Ser Denys Mallister. Each brother will--

SAM: Maester Aemon.

Every Brother, including Jon, look to Sam at the back of the room in shock.

AEMON: Samwell Tarly. Go on.

Jon shakes his head "no" at Sam.

JANOS (O.S.): Sam the Slayer.

The whole room laughs.

JANOS: Another wildling lover just like his friend Jon Snow. How's your lady love Slayer?

More laughs.

SAM: Her name is Gilly. Brother Slynt knows her quite well. They cowered together in the larder during the battle for the Wall.

The men start laughing at Janos now.

JANOS: Lies!

SAM: A wildling girl, a baby, and Lord Janos. I found him there when the battle was over in a puddle of his own making.

Stronger laughter. Maester Aemon cracks a smile.

SAM: Whilst Lord Janos was hiding with the women and children, Jon Snow was leading.

The men go quiet.

SAM: Ser Alliser fought bravely, it is true. And when he was wounded, it is Jon who saved us. He took charge of the wall's defense. He killed the Magnar of the Thenns. (a man next to Sam nods) He went North to deal with Mance Rayder, knowing it almost certainly meant his own death. Before that, he led the mission to avenge Lord Commander Mormont. Mormont himself chose Jon to be his steward. He saw something in Jon, and now we've all seen it, too. He may be young, but he's the commander we turned to when the night was darkest.

The men give Jon a strong cheer.

ALLISER: I can't argue with any of that. (stands up) But who does Jon Snow want to command? Night's Watch or the wildlings? Everyone knows he loved a wildling girl and spoke with Mance Rayder many times. What would have happened in that tent between those two old friends if Stannis's army hadn't come along? We all saw him put the King-beyond-the-Wall out of his misery. Do you want to choose a man who has fought the wildlings all his life, or a man who makes love to them?

Jon doesn't respond. Maester Aemon rises again.

AEMON: It is time.

Brothers of the Night's Watch walk to the front of the room, placing their tokens into a jar. A brother breaks the jar and counts the tokens. Alliser and Jon have the same amount of tokens.

BROTHER: It appears to be a tie, Maester.

Maester Aemon rises once more, feels each stack of tokens to determine which is which, and casts his own vote for Jon. The men near Alliser look angry. The men grouped around Mallister are content. Everyone else cheers.

BROTHERS: Jon Snow! Jon Snow! Jon Snow! Jon Snow!

Jon rises, sees Alliser glaring at him, and lets out a small smile for the first time since he entered the room.

EXT. BRAAVOS - STREETS

Arya creeps up on a pigeon in an alleyway and cuts its head off with Needle. She walks down the street with the pigeon in a pouch and Needle dangling from her hip. Three men walk by, see Needle, and approach her.

MAN: You. You!

Arya stops and turns around to face them.

MAN: What have you got there?

Arya doesn't respond.

MAN: I said--

ARYA: Turn around and go. (pulls out Needle) Turn around and go.

Man: That's a nice little sword. Worth 100 pieces, a sword like that. (pulls out his own sword)

ARYA: Nothing's worth anything to dead men.

The man approaches her with his sword, but then sees the Old Man from the House of Black and White walking towards the altercation and backs off.

MEN: Quickly, go, go!

They flee. The man looks at Arya then begins walking away.

EXT. BRAAVOS - THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

The Old Man leads Arya back to the doorstep.

ARYA: Who are you? Why were they scared of you?

OLD MAN: You lost this.

He tosses Arya her coin, then reaches to his face, pulls it off, and reveals the face of Jaqen H'ghar

ARYA: You said there was no Jaqen H'ghar here.

JAQEN: There isn't. A man is not Jaqen H'ghar.

He begins to head back inside the House of Black and White.

ARYA: Well who are you then?

He turns back around.

JAQEN: No one. And that is who a girl must become.

Jaqen opens the door and waits for Arya. After a moment, she follows him into the House of Black and White. The door closes behind them.

INT. MEEREEN - PRISON

Mossador is let into the Son of the Harpy's cell. The guards hold him up for Mossador.

HARPY (Valyrian): She doesn't belong here. And no matter how many of your traitors call her "Mhysa", she will never be your mother.

Mossador stares at him.

EXT. MEEREEN - STREET - DAY

The Harpy is displayed in the street with his mask on, but the eye holes are cut out. A knife is in his stomach and skull, and "Kill the Masters" is written in blood on the wall next to the body.

INT. MEEREEN - PALACE

DAENERYS: Why?

MOSSADOR (Valyrian): For you, Mhysa. (kneels) You wanted the Harpy dead, but your hands were tied. I set you free, as you did all of us.

DAENERYS: He was our prisoner, awaiting trial. You had no right.

MOSSADOR: He would rather rip your city apart than see slaves lifted from the dirt.

DAENERYS: There are no more slaves. There are no more Masters.

MOSSADOR: Then who lives in the Pyramids? Who wears gold masks and murders your children? (beat) When Grey Worm came to us, I was the first to take up the knife for you. I remember the look on my father's face as I struck down his Master, who had traded his infant son for a dog. My father died in the fighting. If we allow the Sons of the Harpy to return us to chains, he never lived.

DAENERYS: The Harpy's life was not yours to take. Once, the Masters were the law--

MOSADOR: --and now you are the law!

DAENERYS: The law is the law. Take him.

Two Unsullieds carry Mossador out of the room.

EXT. MEEREEN - DAY

The Unsullied escort Daenerys and her small council. A large crowd surrounds them.

CROWD: Mhysa! Myhsa!

They settle in front of the courthouse, surrounded by both former Masters and former slaves. The Unsullied form a ring around her.

HIZDAHR (to Daario): She should have cut off the traitor's head in the Great Pyramid and been done with it.

DAARIO: Which is what I keep telling her to do to you.

The former slaves continues to yell to their Mhysa while the masters leer at her.

DAENERYS (Valyrian, to crowd): You opened your gates to me because I promised you freedom and justice. One cannot exist without the other.

Mossador is carried into the scene by Unsullied and set before Daenerys on his knees.

CROWD (Valyrian): Brother! Brother!

MOSSADOR (Valyrian): Mhysa, please! Forgive me!

DAENERYS (Valyrian): A citizen of Meereen was awaiting trial and this man murdered him. The punishment is death.

CROWD (Valyrian): Mercy! Mercy!

Mossador looks to Daenerys, pleading. She looks to Daario and nods. He takes out his arakh, walks to Mossador, and puts it to his neck. The crowd starts protesting and the Masters look on uncertainly.

MOSSADOR: Mhysa... (prays in Valyrian)

The crowd begs and pleads for mercy. Daenerys stares out to the crowd, then gives a nod to Daario, who swiftly decapitates Mossador.

CROWD: Mhysa...

The crowd goes silent. Suddenly, they start hissing at Daenerys. The Unsullied brace themselves. A former slave throws a rock at a former Master, and the Unsullied attempt to hold back the fight. Barristan and Grey Worm escort Missandei and Daenerys away from the crowd. The Unsullied cover her with their shields.

Former slaves and masters begin killing each other in the streets. Rocks are thrown at the Unsullied shields in attempts to hit Daenerys.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID

BARRISTAN: I'll stand guard outside your door tonight, Your Grace.

GREY WORM: We all guard tonight.

DAENERYS: Leave me.

Barristan, Daario, Missandei, and Grey Worm leave the room. Daenerys hears a noise coming from outside, and goes out on her balcony to investigate.

When she's out she hears a soft growl, and turns to see Drogon, perched on the top of the pyramid and close to fully grown.

DAENERYS (shocked): Drogon...

He slowly climbs down to her balcony. Daenerys extends her hand. Drogon sniffs it hesitantly, and then takes off into the night, so

CUT TO: BRAAVOS
INT. THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

Water drips down a statue of a woman with her eyes closed. Two more statues are shown, a lion sitting in a throne, and a rams head. Behind a large heart surrounded by gold flames, a glowing fire can be seen. A statue of a knight is shown, then a statue of a king’s face. A statue of a contorted tree is covered in a hair-like substance. There is a large pit filled with liquid in the center of the room. Arya can be heard, and then seen, sweeping. The waif carries a bucket past her. Sitting on the edge of the pit, Jaqen whisper to a man. Arya looks up and watches as Jaqen scoops up a cup of liquid from the pit, and hands it to the man. The man looks up at Jaqen, and hesitates before taking it.

MAN: Valar morghulis.

JAQEN: Valar dohaeris.

The man drinks the liquid, and watches as he approaches the statue of the woman with her eyes closed. He kneels down in front of it. Arya puts her broom down and approaches Jaqen.

ARYA: I've been sweeping this floor for days.

JAQEN: Good.

ARYA: I didn't come here to sweep floors.

JAQEN: No? Why come, then?

ARYA: You said that I could be your apprentice. You said you'd teach me how to a Faceless Man.

JAQEN: A man teaches a girl. (Stands up). Valar dohaeris. All men must serve. Faceless men, most of all. (Walks away).

ARYA: I want to serve. (Jaqen stops).

JAQEN: A girl wants to serve herself. Here we serve the Many-Faced God, to serve well. A girl must become no-one.

ARYA: Which one is the Many-Faced God? I see the Stranger. I see the Drowned God. I see the Weirwood Face.

JAQEN: There is only one god. A girl knows his name. And all men know his gift.

Jaqen leaves. Arya looks down at the man who had been kneeling. He is lying on his back, dead. Two men come into the room with a stretcher. They places the man’s body on it and begin walking to an open door at the end of the room. The waif walks past Arya.

ARYA: Where are they taking him?

The waif doesn’t respond, but continues walking. Arya turns to watch as the door closes behind the men carrying the stretcher.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

EXT. STREET

Bells are ringing, and people are cheering and shouting. Many are on the sides of the road, waving as a number of carriages are carried past.

BYSTANDERS: Queen Margaery! Queen Margaery! Queen Margaery!

Inside her carriage, Cersei watches the people on the street, a sullen look on her face. She closes her curtains.

INT. GREAT SEPT

MARGAERY & TOMMEN: I am his/hers, and she/he is mine. From this day, until the end of my days.

Tommen and Margaery share a kiss. Cersei watches them from the crowd, emotionless. The newlyweds turn to the crowd, holding hands. Everyone claps. They smile and laugh. Cersei claps as well, and forces herself to smile.

INT. TOMMEN’S CHAMBERS - THAT NIGHT

Tommen breathes heavily as he and Margaery finish having sex. She turns onto her side and smiles.

TOMMEN: Did I hurt you?

MARGAERY: No. You were lovely.

TOMMEN: It all happened so fast.

MARGAERY: Yes. (Chuckles).

TOMMEN: I was scared maybe I hurt you, it sounded

MARGAERY: No, no, no. You're very sweet. The sweetest king who ever lived.

TOMMEN: This is what I want to do all day, every day for the rest of my life.

MARGAERY: Wouldn't that be glorious? (They laugh. Tommen leans in to kiss her). Shouldn't we rest a little while? Just to catch our breath, there's no rush, is there?

TOMMEN: Of course not. Are you hungry? Shall I have them bring you some cake or pomegranate juice?

MARGAERY: No, I'm fine. I just want you all to myself. I want to know everything there is to know about King Tommen First of His Name.

TOMMEN: King Tommen. It still sounds strange to me. Does Queen Margaery sound strange to you?

MARGAERY: So strange… Husband.

TOMMEN: Wife. (They laugh). Sometimes it feels odd. I'm the king, I've married the most beautiful woman in the world, (She chuckles), and it's all because my brother died.

MARGAERY: I understand. But it's not your fault, you know that, don't you? You mustn't feel guilty.

TOMMEN: I don't feel guilty. That's what's odd.

Margaery looks at him curiously. He suddenly sits up.

TOMMEN: Do you like to sail?

MARGAERY: (Sits up). I love to sail.

TOMMEN: I do, too.

MARGAERY: I think we're going to be very happy, you and I.

TOMMEN: I do, too.

She kisses him and turns around. She gets up, wrapping a bedsheet around herself as a cover.

MARGAERY: Living in a tower so high, it touches the clouds. Of course my grandmother couldn't wait to go home. The capital is not for everyone, I suppose. Does your mother like it here?

TOMMEN: I don't think so. She told me never to trust anyone in King's Landing.

MARGAERY: It's so wonderful to have her watching over you. A lioness guiding her cub. (Pours them some wine).

TOMMEN: Well, but I'm a man now.

MARGAERY: You are. And the king. (Hands him win). But you'll always be her baby-boy.

TOMMEN: I suppose.

MARGAERY: I adore how she has always been so generous with me, so kind. And the horror she's had to injure. (Sits down and begins to comb her hair). Losing her husband, her eldest child and her father. It's no wonder she's so protective of you. She'll never let you out of her sight.

EXT. CASTLE WALL

Cersei and Tommen walk together, her arm around his. A group of guards walk behind them.

CERSEI: You look very much in love. The first days of marriage are often so blissful. She's certainly very pretty, isn't she? Like a doll, she smiles quite a lot. Do you think she's intelligent? I can't quite tell. Not that it matters.

TOMMEN: Do you ever miss Casterly Rock?

CERSEI: There's nothing for me in Casterly Rock.

TOMMEN: That's where you grew up. (They stop). You always told me that you liked the people there better. You said that King's Landing smelled of horse dung and sour milk.

CERSEI: (Chuckles). Why are we speaking of Casterly Rock?

TOMMEN: The way that you talked about it, I always thought that you missed it. That you... That it was your real home.

CERSEI: This is my real home now. Where my family lives.

TOMMEN: I want you to be happy, mother.

CERSEI: I know that. I know you do, my sweet boy.

TOMMEN: But wouldn't you be happier in Casterly Rock?

INT. ROOM

Cersei approaches a room with two guards. Inside, Margaery is having tea with some of her friends.

MARGAERY: I said, "Darling, surely 4 times is enough, are you trying to set a new record?" (Laugher). And he said, "Well, what is the record? I'm sure we can break it."

Margaery’s friends laugh. As Cersei walks in, they all get up and bow.

MARGAERY: Mother! (Gets up and hugs Cersei). Welcome.

CERSEI: Don't you look lovely. Marriage agrees with you.

MARGAERY: Can we bring you anything to eat or drink? I wish we had some wine for you. It's a bit early in the day for us.

CERSEI: No, no. I, I can't stay. I just wanted to let you know if, there is ever anything I can do for you.

MARGAERY: You are very sweet.

CERSEI: Tommen seems quite taken with his new queen.

MARGAERY: I absolutely adore him. You raised a gallant young man. I'm forever grateful.

CERSEI: Good. Good. I'm glad to hear you're happy.

MARGAERY: Ecstatic. I really am. Exhausted, to be honest, but what can I expect, he is half lion, half stag. (Margaery’s friends laugh).

CERSEI: I'll leave you to it then. (Turns to leave).

MARGAERY: Oh, forgive me, I haven't been at Court for long, I get so confused. What's the proper way to address you now? Queen Mother or Dowager Queen?

CERSEI: There's no need for such formalities.

MARGAERY: In any event, judging from the King's enthusiasm, the Queen Mother will be a Queen Grandmother soon.

CERSEI: Won’t that be a lovely day.

MARGAERY: Can you imagine the celebrations? They'll ring the bells all day and night.

CERSEI: Remember. Anything you need.

Margaery smiles. Cersei leaves. Margaery’s smile fades. It returns when her friends begin laughing, and she turns back around. Cersei walks away with her two guards, still able to hear the laughter.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

EXT. COURTYARD

A horse whinnies. Bolton bannermen ride to the keep. In the keep, a number of workmen are busy building and repairing things. Some men carry some raven cages through the middle of the courtyard. Theon, carrying a dead bird, walks through for a moment. He then comes across some soldiers lifting up some flayed bodies with rope. He becomes very tense and forces himself to keep walking, head down. A raven picks at a body in a cart.

INT. DINING HALL

Roose and Ramsay sit at a table as Theon cuts some food. Ramsay talks with his face stuffed.

ROOSE: We can't hold the North with terror alone.

RAMSAY: You can't hold the North if you let these lesser lords insult us.

ROOSE: I sent you there to collect taxes, not bodies.

RAMSAY: Lord Cerwyn refused to pay. Said the Warden of the North would always be a Stark, and he'd be damned if he kissed a traitor's boot.

Theon holds the food in front of Ramsay. He takes some of it and puts it on his plate.

ROOSE: He left you no choice.

RAMSAY: I flayed him living, along with his wife and brother. Made his son watch.

ROOSE: And?

RAMSAY: The new Lord Cerwyn paid his taxes.

ROOSE: (After a moment). I have something important to tell you. Stop eating and listen.

Ramsay, who had been heavily engrossed in his eating, stops suddenly and looks up. Theon slowly puts down a plate nearby. Ramsay puts down his silverware and sits back, looking at his father.

ROOSE: We don't have enough men to hold the North if the other Houses rise up against us. Do you understand that?

RAMSAY: Our pact with the Lannisters protects -

ROOSE: I had a pact with Tywin Lannister, and Tywin Lannister is dead. The remaining Lannisters are a thousand miles away dealing with that fact. They've never once in the history of the Seven Kingdoms sent their army this far north. If you think they will for us, you're a fool. We become a great house by entering in alliances with other houses, and parleying those alliances into greater power. The best way to forge a lasting alliance isn't by peeling a man's skin off. The best way is marriage. (Stands up). Now that you're a Bolton by royal decree, it's time you married a suitable bride. And as it happens, I found the perfect girl to solidify our hold in the North.

CUT TO: MOAT CAILIN

EXT. NEARBY HILLS

Sansa, Baelish, and a number of knights ride towards Moat Cailin. The party stops. Baelish leads Sansa on foot to a spot where they can easily overlook the keep. The keep is shown, surrounded by swampy riverlands.

SANSA: That's Moat Cailin.

BAELISH: Yes. A bit shabby, isn't it? You've been here before.

SANSA: On our way down to King's Landing, with my father and Arya and… where are you taking me?

BAELISH: Home.

SANSA: The Boltons have Winterfell. (He nods). The marriage proposal, it wasn't for you?

BAELISH: (Shakes his head). No.

SANSA: Roose Bolton murdered my brother. He betrayed my family!

BAELISH: He did.

SANSA: He serves the Lannisters.

BAELISH: For now.

SANSA: I won't go.

BAELISH: Winterfell is your home.

SANSA: Not anymore.

BAELISH: Always. You're a Stark. Dyeing your hair doesn't change that. You're Sansa Stark. The eldest surviving child of Ned and Catelyn Stark. Your place is in the North.

SANSA: I can't marry him. You can't make me. He's a traitor. A murderer.

BAELISH: You're not marrying Roose Bolton. No, you'll be marrying his son and heir, Ramsay. One day he'll be Warden of the North and you will -

SANSA: No!

BAELISH: Sansa -

SANSA: No, you can't make me. I will starve myself. I will die before I have to go there.

BAELISH: (Grabbing her). I won't force you to do anything. Don't you know by now how much I care for you? Say the word and we turn the horses round, but listen to me. Listen. (Quietly). You've been running all your life. Terrible things happened to your family and you weep. You sit alone in a darkened room, mourning their fates. You've been a bystander to tragedy from the day they executed your father. Stop being a bystander, do you hear me? Stop running. There's no justice in the world. Not unless we make it. You loved your family. Avenge them.

He kisses her forehead. He walks back to their horses. After a few moments, she regains her composure and gets on her horse. The party starts moving again. On top of a large hill nearby, Brienne and Podrick watch as the party arrives at the keep.

PODRICK: How do we get through there?

BRIENNE: We don't. We go around. (She turns her horse and begins leaving).

PODRICK: It sets miles out of the way. We'll lose sight of them.

BRIENNE: Doesn't matter. I know where they're going.

EXT. CAMPSITE

Podrick sits scrubbing a boot.

BRIENNE: Aren't you getting a bit old to be a squire? How did you end up squiring for the Imp?

PODRICK: He hates that nickname.

BRIENNE: Well, he's not here to complain about it, is he?

Podrick finishes scrubbing and hands the boot to Brienne. He puts the brush down. Brienne begins putting the boot on.

PODRICK: I squired for a knight name Ser Lorimer during the War of the Five Kings. One night, he had a bit too much to drink. And he was famished, so he borrowed a ham.

BRIENNE: He borrowed it?

PODRICK: He wasn't a thief. He was drunk and hungry and he wasn't thinking. I was drunk too. He gave me half the ham. Next morning, one of the guards saw him passed out, under a wagon, with the ham bone still in his hand. They hanged the man afternoon. They tied the noose for me too, but, Lord Tywin heard my family name was Payne. So he pardoned me, and sent me to King's Landing to squire for his son.

BRIENNE: As punishment. For both of you.

PODRICK: It didn't seem that way. Lord Tyrion was always very good to me.

BRIENNE: (Walks away to get firewood). Yes, all of your lords were very kind to you. All except me. Sorry you have to squire such a nasty person.

PODRICK: I'm not sorry. You're the best fighter I've ever seen. You beat The Hound. I'm proud to be your squire.

BRIENNE: I'm sorry I'm always snapping at you.

PODRICK: If you wouldn't snap at me I wouldn't learn anything.

BRIENNE: You want to be a knight, Pod?

PODRICK: Yes.

BRIENNE: Starting tomorrow, we'll train with the sword twice a day, before we ride in the morning and after we camp for the evening. (Sits down). And I'm going to show you how to ride properly.

PODRICK: Thank you.

BRIENNE: I can't knight you, but I can teach you how to fight.

PODRICK: I suppose that's more important.

Podrick leans over the campfire with some rocks. He strikes them together until he gets a spark, and blows until the fire starts going. He wipes himself off and stands up, walking over to Brienne. He begins taking her armor off.

PODRICK: You weren't a knight, but you were a Kingsguard to Renly Baratheon, weren't you?

BRIENNE: I was.

PODRICK: Lord Tyrion said he was a good man.

BRIENNE: He was.

PODRICK: But how did you end up serving Renly?

BRIENNE: (After a few moments). When I was a girl, my father held a ball. I'm his only living child, so he wants to make a good match for me. He invited dozens of young lords to Tarth. I didn't want to go, but he dragged me to the ballroom. (Pauses). And it was wonderful. None of the boys noticed how mulish and tall I was. The shoved each other, and threatened to duel if they thought it was their turn to dance. And whispered in my ear how they wanted to marry me and take me back to their castles. (Smiles). My father smiled at me and I smiled at him. I'd never been so happy. (Her smile drops). Till I saw a few of the boys sniggering. And then they all started to laugh, they couldn't keep the game going any longer. They were toying with me. ‘Brienne the Beauty’, they called me. Great joke. And I realized I was the ugliest girl alive. A great lumbering beast. I tried to run away, but Renly Baratheon took me in his arms. “Don't let them see your tears,” he told me. “They’re nasty little shits. The nasty little shits aren't worth crying over.” He danced with me and none of the other boys could say a word. And he was the king's brother after all.

PODRICK: But wasn't he... Lord Tyrion said he was...

BRIENNE: Yes, Pod, he liked men, I'm not an idiot. He didn't love me, he didn't want me, he danced with me because he was kind and he wouldn't see me hurt. He saved me from being a joke. From that day until his last day. And I couldn't save him in return. Nothing's more hateful than failing to protect the one you love. One day, I will avenge King Renly.

PODRICK: But you said a shadow murdered him. How do you fight a shadow?

BRIENNE: A shadow with the face of Stannis Baratheon. I know it was Stannis. I know it in my heart. Stannis is a man, not a shadow. And a man can be killed.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

INT. LORD COMMANDER’S ROOM

Olly opens the door for Stannis and Davos. Jon sits at his desk.

STANNIS: Lord Commander.

JON: (Stands up). Your Grace.

STANNIS: (To Olly as he closes the door). I'd like to speak alone.

JON: Olly is my steward now, as I was Lord Commander Mormont's. I want him to attend my meetings, to learn from men with experience. One day, he might command.

STANNIS: Very well. (They all sit down). Have you considered my offer?

JON: I have. And I thank you for it. You do me great honor. All my life I wanted to be Jon Stark.

STANNIS: Say the word and you will be.

JON: But I have to refuse you. I'm Lord Commander of the Night's Watch. My place is here.

STANNIS: I'm giving you a chance to avenge your family. To take back the castle where you grew up. To rule the North.

JON: I wish I could fight beside you. Believe me, I do. But I swore a sacred vow at the Godswood. I pledged my life to the Night's Watch.

STANNIS: You're as stubborn as your father. And as honorable.

JON: I can imagine no higher praise.

STANNIS: I didn't mean it as praise. Honor got your father killed. (Stands up). But if your mind’s made up, I won't try to persuade you.

JON: May I ask, Your Grace, how long you plan to stay at Castle Black?

STANNIS: Are you bored of us already?

JON: You saved us from Mance Rayder's army. We will never forget that. But it's a question of survival. The Night's Watch can't continue to feed your men and the wildling prisoners indefinitely. Winter is coming.

STANNIS: I know it. We march on Winterfell within the fortnight. Before the snows trap us here.

JON: And the wildlings?

STANNIS: They'd rather burn than fight for me, so be it. I leave their fate to you. You could execute them, that's the safest course. (After a moment). Or you could see if this Tormund fellow is more willing to compromise than Mance ever was. I assume the brothers of the Night's Watch would rather see the wildlings dead.

JON: Most of the brothers, yes. There's little love for the free folk here. (Olly stares at him).

STANNIS: You're the Lord Commander. Your decision.

Stannis begins to leave. Olly opens the door.

STANNIS: You have many enemies in Castle Black. Have you considered sending Alliser Thorne elsewhere? Give him command of Eastwatch-by-the-Sea.

JON: I heard it was best to keep your enemies close.

STANNIS: Whoever said that didn't have many enemies.

Stannis leaves. Davos begins to leave, but turns to Jon as Jon begins to pace.

DAVOS: He sees something in you. (Jon looks up). Might not be apparent from his tone, but it's the truth. He believes in you.

JON: I'm sorry I disappointed him.

Davos walks forward and takes a seat. Olly closes the door again.

DAVOS: The king is a complicated man. But he wants what's right for the Seven Kingdoms.

JON: As long as he's ruling them.

DAVOS: He's the one true king. He has the blood right to that throne.

JON: I’ve sworn to stay clear of the politics of the Seven Kingdoms.

DAVOS: Have you now? (Turning to Olly). How does the Night's Watch vow go again? I bet you've got it memorized since you got here.

Olly looks to Jon. Jon looks at him, crosses his arms, and nods.

OLLY: Night gathers and now my watch begins -

DAVOS: Not that bit, the bit at the end.

OLLY: I'm the sword in the darkness, the watcher on the walls, the shield that guards the realm of men. I pledge my life -

DAVOS: Wait, that's enough. “The shield that guards the realm of men.” That's what you swore to be. Now I'm not a learned man, but the best way of helping the most people might not be sitting in a frozen castle at the edge of the world. It just might mean wading in the muck, getting your boots dirty, and doing what needs to be doing.

JON: And what needs to be done?

DAVOS: As long as the Boltons rule the North, (Stands up), the North will suffer. Just one man's opinion.

Davos nods and turns to leave. Olly opens the door for him. Jon sits at his desk and sighs.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS

INT. ARYA’S ROOM

Arya lays on her bed, playing with her coin in her hand. Suddenly, the door opens, and she sits up. The waif enters with a cane, and begins pacing.

ARYA: What do you want?

WAIF: Who are you?

ARYA: What?

WAIF: You, who walk in here with a coin you never earned, whose value you do not respect. (Stops and walks to Arya). Who are you?

ARYA: (After a moment, perks up). No one.

The waif quickly swings her cane at Arya, hitting her arm. Arya, now on her feet, turns to face the waif, holding her arm in pain.

ARYA: Ow! Cunt!

WAIF: A lie, a sad little lie. Who are you?

ARYA: I told you, I'm no - (Gets hit again). Do that again and -

The waif hits her a third time, sending her to the ground.

WAIF: Who are you?

ARYA: You're about to find out.

Arya reaches for her sword. Before she can pick it up, Jaqen appears.

JAQEN: What are you doing?

WAIF: We were only playing. The game of faces.

JAQEN: A girl is not ready.

WAIF: Clearly not.

ARYA: (Stands up). I am ready.

JAQEN: For what? For whatever you want. To be a Faceless Man. To be no one.

The waif turns to her. Jaqen looks at the sword on Arya’s bed.

JAQEN: Whose sword is that? It belongs to Arya Stark. Arya Stark's sword, Arya Stark's clothes, Arya Stark's stolen silver. A man wonders how is it that no one came to be surrounded by Arya Stark's things?

The waif, looking smug, leaves.

EXT. DOCK

On a dock near the house of Black and White, Arya wraps a rock in her clothes. She is wearing new clothes, similar to the ones the waif wears. She ties them up and drops them into the water, the rock causing them to sink. She picks up her coin purse and throws it in the water. After a moment of examining her original coin in her hand, she throws it in the water as well. She looks at her sword Needle for a moment, and then picks it up. She prepares to throw it in the sea, but finds herself unable to, and begins to sob. She turns and walks over to some nearby rocks, and hides the sword under some of them.

INT. THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

Arya is again sweeping the floor in the main room. She notices the men from the beginning of the episode carrying another dead body into the back room. However, after a moment, she realizes that she didn’t hear the door close, and she looks up to find it wide open. Jaqen surprises her by suddenly putting his hand on her shoulder. He nods towards the door, and begins walking over to it. Arya follows him, leaving the broom outside. They go down a fire-lit tunnel. Jaqen opens the door at the end of the tunnel to reveal a chamber. Inside, the waif stands motionless next to a large stone slab. On it is the dead man. Jaqen leaves through the back door. After Jaqen closes the door, the waif begins to remove the dead man’s clothes. She looks up at Arya, who walks over and begins to do so as well. The waif inspects his body. She wets a rag and begins cleaning off the man.

ARYA: What do we do with them after we wash them?

The waif only looks up and smiles lightly, making no other response. She goes back to washing him, and Arya wets a rag of her own to help.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

EXT. COURTYARD

MAN: Open gates!

The gates are opened. Sansa, Baelish, and a number of knights on horseback gallop through. They stop. Theon watches from nearby through some metal bars, trembling. Baelish gets off of his horse. Roose, Ramsay, and Walda watch as Sansa gets off hers. Roose walks forward. Baelish leads Sansa towards him, rubbing her hands.

ROOSE: Lady Sansa, welcome.

After a tense moment, Sansa smiles and curtsies.

SANSA: (Smiles). Lord Bolton.

ROOSE: May I introduce my son, (Stands aside), Ramsay Bolton?

Ramsay smiles and walks forwards, removing his gloves. Sansa smiles at him.

RAMSAY: It's an honor to meet you, my Lady.

He takes her hand and kisses it. Nearby, Myranda and other women watch.

INT. HALLWAY

An old servant woman leads Sansa down a hallway to her chambers. She opens the door.

WOMAN: I'll bring you a bowl of hot water. You must want to wash.

SANSA: Thank you.

WOMAN: Welcome home, Lady Stark. (Quieter) The North remembers.

Sansa watches as the woman leaves.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

INT. DINING HALL

Jon sits at a table, tapping his fingers anxiously. The men in the room talk amongst themselves.

JON: Sam. (Sam looks up. Jon looks at Maester Aemon’s chair). Maester Aemon?

SAM: He apologizes for not being here. He's not feeling well.

JON: Take good care of him. (To the group). Brothers. As you all know too well, it's long past time to dig a new latrine pit. (Laughter. Jon looks at Alliser). First Builder Yarwyck and I have decided to appoint a latrine captain to oversee this crucial task. (Laughter. After a moment, he continues). Brian. Seems like a good job for a ginger.

Everyone laughs. Some of the men jokingly pat Brian on his back, and Brian laughs as well.

JON: Ser Alliser. (Silence). You have more experience than any other soldier at Castle Black. You proved your valour many times over, while defending the Wall from the wildling attack. I name you First Ranger.

Some of the men shout in approval. Alliser looks up surprised. Edd and Sam look at each other. Janos pats him on the shoulder.

JON: Lord Janos. I'm giving you command of Greyguard.

JANOS: (Scoffs). Greyguard is a ruin.

JON: Yes, the fort is in a sorry state. Restore it as best you can. First Builder Yarwyck can spare ten of his -

JANOS: I was charged with the defense of King's Landing when you were soiling your swaddling clothes. Keep your ruin.

Some of the men begin talking loudly. Olly shifts in his seat.

SAM: Alright, alright! Enough of that.

JON: You mistake me, my Lord. That was a command, not an offer. Pack your arms and armour, say your farewells, and ride for Greyguard.

JANOS: (Stands up, angrily shouts). I will not go meekly off to freeze and die! Give it to one of the fools who cast a stone for you. I will not have it. Do you hear me, boy? I will not have it!

JON: Are you refusing to obey my order?

The men in the room all turn to look at Janos.

JANOS: You can stick your order up your bastard arse.

Some of the men whisper in shock. Janos looks pleased with himself. Alliser turns to Jon smugly.

JON: Take Lord Janos outside.

The men begin to stand up. Janos scoffs.

JON: Olly, bring me my sword.

Olly turns quickly to Jon, then gets up. Janos looks more unsure of himself as more men get up. Alliser turns and looks at Janos disapprovingly. Edd walks over to get Janos. Alliser stands in his way for a moment. Jon looks at the confrontation, worried. Alliser raises his eyebrows for a moment and moves out of the way. Janos looks at him shocked. Edd grabs Janos, and some other men assist in dragging him outside.

JANOS: You cannot do this! Get your hands off me! (Everyone moves outside). Scum, all of you! If the boy thinks he can frighten me, he's mistaken, yes, very mistaken.

Someone puts a chopping block down. Janos is taken up to it.

JANOS: A disgrace! I have friends, important friends in the capital! You'll see!

Jon takes a final sip of his wine, gets up, and goes outside. The watchmen all gather in the courtyard. Olly hands Jon his sword. Jon walks up to where Janos is being held. Stannis watches from afar. Jon unsheathes his sword, and Janos looks up at it.

JON: If you have any last words, my Lord, now is the time.

JANOS: (Trembling). I was wrong. You're the Lord Commander! We all serve you. I'm sorry. Not only for this, for all I've done and said. I was wrong! (Jon brings his sword up). My Lord, please, mercy! Mercy! I'll go! I will! Please. I'm afraid. I've always been afraid.

Janos sobs for a few moments. Jon hesitates, and then brings his sword down, decapitating Janos. He hands his sword to a watchman standing nearby. He looks up and makes eye contact with Stannis.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. BROTHEL

The High Septon kneels in the center of a room. Seven prostitutes, dressed as each of the new gods, circle around him. Olyvar stands behind the High Septon, wearing a fake beard and holding a scale. The prostitutes giggle as the High Septon eyes them all.

OLYVAR: You have served us well, my son.

HIGH SEPTON: Thank you, Father.

OLYVAR: Which of the Seven will you worship today?

HIGH SEPTON: The Maiden.

OLYVAR: Where is the Maiden?

HIGH SEPTON: And the Stranger.

OLYVAR: (Leaning forward). Two is extra, you realize?

HIGH SEPTON: Yes, yes.

Olyvar snaps his fingers. He and five of the prostitutes step aside. The two dressed as the Maiden and the Stranger remain and approach the High Septon, who smiles. Suddenly, some men led by Lancel Lannister barge into the room. The High Septon gasps and turns around.

OLYVAR: What are you doing? This establishment belong to Lord Petyr Baelish. You can't -

The men force the High Septon to his feet. One of the men rips off Olyvar’s fake beard, hits him to the ground, and begins kicking him. The prostitutes run out of the room.

LANCEL: You have profaned our faith. The faith of our fathers and forefathers.

HIGH SEPTON: I am the High Septon of the -

LANCEL: (Grabs his neck). You are a sinner. And you shall be punished.

The men drag the High Septon out of the room. He is forced out into the street naked, and begin walking. He tries to cover his penis with his hands, but one of the men hits him with a stick. People gather on the sides of the street to watch, and begin chanting.

CROWD: Sinner! Sinner! Sinner!

MAN 1: Repent!

CROWD: Sinner! Sinner! Sinner! Sinner! Sinner! Sinner!

MAN 2: Shame on you!

CROWD: Sinner! Sinner!

INT. SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER

Mace opens the door for the High Septon. He approaches the table. In better light, it is clear that his face is heavily bruised. Mace closes the door and walks over. The High Septon addresses each of the member present.

HIGH SEPTON: (To Cersei) Your Grace, (To Pycelle), Grandmaester, (To Mace) Lord Tyrell, (To Qyburn), uh…

QYBURN: It doesn't matter. (Mace sits down).

HIGH SEPTON: As the High Septon of the Faith of the Seven I give voice to the will of the Gods and am their foremost servant in this world. An insult to me is an insult to the Gods. An assault on my person, is an assault on our very religion.

CERSEI: You were assaulted?

HIGH SEPTON: I was, by those fanatics who call themselves ‘sparrows’. They humiliated me, they they beat me, they left me naked and bleeding on the cobblestones. I am lucky to be alive.

QYBURN: I heard this all began in Littlefinger's brothel.

MACE: High Septon, this is a rather shocking thing to hear.

HIGH SEPTON: I tend to both the highest born, and the lowliest amongst us. Even prostitutes may earn the mercy of the Mother.

QYBURN: So you were administering to the needs of these devout prostitutes?

PYCELLE: A man's private affairs ought to stay private!

CERSEI: What do you want from us, High Septon?

HIGH SEPTON: Justice! I ask that you protect our Faith by arresting these criminals and throwing them in the black cells. I ask that you execute their leader, this so-called High Sparrow. He's a threat to everything we hold sacred. If he goes unpunished -

CERSEI: And where do I find this man? This High Sparrow?

EXT. STREET

A soldier helps Cersei out of her carriage. She begins walking forward. Ser Meryn stands ahead of her.

MERYN: I don't think this is a good idea, Your Grace.

CERSEI: Nonsense, Ser Meryn. These are deeply religious people. (To a man at the bottom of some stairs). Where can I find the High Sparrow?

The man points up the stairs. They are crowded with people. Cersei and Ser Meryn ascend them.

MAN 1: Seven blessings.

Cersei covers her nose. At the top of the stairs is a large room. She watches as many people eat at tables.

MAN 2: Thank you.

MAN 3: Just a little more...

WOMAN: Thank you ever so for the soup!

In the center of the room, an old man is giving soup to people in line. Cersei approaches him.

CERSEI: A young man said I would find the High Sparrow back here. Where is he?

HIGH SPARROW: High Sparrow? Sounds ridiculous, doesn't it? Like Lord Duckling, or King Turtle. (Laughs). So, it's meant to. We're often stuck with the names our enemies give to us. (Prepares soup for the next person in line). The notion that we are all equal in the eyes of Seven doesn't sit well with some, so they belittle me.

WOMAN 2: Seven blessings to you.

HIGH SPARROW: Seven blessings to you, my dear. It's only a name, quite an easy burden to wear. Far easier than hers. (Prepares soup for the next person in line).

CERSEI: Why no shoes?

HIGH SPARROW: Because I gave them away to someone who needed them more. We all do that. It stops us from forgetting what we really are.

CERSEI: Is that why you came to King's Landing? To remind everyone?

HIGH SPARROW: Everyone? I have a hard enough job reminding myself. Oh, I tell them no one's special. And they think I'm special for telling them so.

CERSEI: (Smiles). Perhaps they're right.

HIGH SPARROW: It would be comforting to believe that, wouldn't it? The Gods sent you here to tempt me? I hope not. I had assumed you'd only come here to arrest me. For that incident with the High Septon.

CERSEI: An unacceptable way to treat the chosen representative of the Gods in this world, wouldn't you say?

HIGH SPARROW: Hypocrisy is a boil. Lancing a is never pleasant. Although, they could have been more careful with the blade.

CERSEI: The High Septon came to speak to me today. He doesn't want me to arrest you, he wants me to execute you.

HIGH SPARROW: I wouldn't presume to know your thoughts on the matter.

CERSEI: (After a moment). My thoughts on the matter align with your own. The High Septon's behaviour was corrosive, as was his attitude. Having a man like that reside in the Sept eats away the Faith from the inside. So now he resides in the Red Keep's dungeons instead. (The High Sparrow looks up at her surprised). The Faith and the Crown are the two pillars that hold up this world. If one collapses, so does the other. We must do everything necessary to protect one another.

INT. QYBURN’S LAB

Qyburn pulls a rat out of a cage. He brings it over to a desk and holds a knife above it. The camera switches to his face, and blood splatters onto a protective lens. Cersei enters the room with a letter.

QYBURN: Your Grace.

CERSEI: Send a raven with this message to Littlefinger in the Eyrie, or wherever he's slithering about. (Hands him the letter).

QYBURN: At once, Your Grace. (Walks to his desk).

CERSEI: How's your work coming along?

QYBURN: Very well.

CERSEI: You've made progress?

QYBURN: More than I've expected. Still a way to go, but…

CERSEI: Very good. I'll leave you to it then. Make sure Littlefinger is clear on the meaning of the word "immediately".

Cersei leaves the room. Qyburn begins writing something down. Behind him on a table is a large object, covered by a sheet. After a few moments of writing, the object begins violently jerking around, and then stops.

QYBURN: Shh. Easy, friend.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

COURTYARD

Sansa walks through the busy courtyard. Theon is shoveling dirt nearby. He looks up to see her walking in his direction, and looks away, tense. On a platform above, Ramsay and Baelish stand, watching her.

RAMSAY: She really is lovely. I hope I can make her happy.

BAELISH: I hope so too. I've become quite fond of Lady Sansa during our travels together. She’s suffered enough.

RAMSAY: I'll never hurt her. You have my word.

BAELISH: I've heard very little about you. Which makes you quite a rare thing, as lords go.

RAMSAY: I haven't been a lord very long. I was a bastard.

ROOSE: (Approaching). And you're not anymore. Allow me a moment alone with Lord Baelish.

RAMSAY: Yes, father. And thank you, Lord Baelish. I'm forever in your debt. (Bows).

BAELISH: He seems pleased.

ROOSE: Shouldn't he be?

BAELISH: (They begin walking). I assure you she's still a virgin. Tyrion never consummated the marriage. By the law of the land, she's no man's wife. Inspect her, if you must.

ROOSE: I leave that to the brothel keeper. It's her name I need, not her virtue.

BAELISH: Then I have delivered everything I've promised.

ROOSE: And you prepared for the consequences. When the Lannisters hear I've wed Sansa Stark to Ramsay.

BAELISH: The Lannister name doesn't mean what it once did. Tywin is dead. He kept his house in power through sheer will. Without him, Jaime has one hand and no allies, Tommen is a soft boy, not a king to fear.

ROOSE: The Queen will be enraged.

BAELISH: Queen Margaery adores Sansa. Cersei is Queen Mother, a title whose importance wanes with each passing day.

ROOSE: And yet she still has friends. Men in important places, whom she can ask for favours. (They stop, and Roose holds up a letter). A message for you, from Cersei Lannister. A rider arrived from Eyrie, shortly before dawn. Apparently, she thinks you're still in the Vale.

BAELISH: A message for me, you say. Strange that the seal is broken.

ROOSE: I'm sure you understand my position, Lord Baelish. If you received word in the night from the Queen Mother, it does make me question our new alliance. The Lannisters made you one of the great lords of Westeros. Yet, here you are in the North, undermining them. Why gamble with your position?

BAELISH: Every ambitious move is a gamble. You gambled when you drove a dagger into Robb Stark's heart. It appears that your gamble paid off. You're Warden of the North.

ROOSE: I had Tywin Lannister backing. Who supports me now? You?

BAELISH: The Eyrie is mine. The last time the lords of the Eyrie formed an alliance with the lords of the North, they brought down the greatest dynasty this world has ever known. I'd like to borrow one of your birds. Cersei will expect a reply.

ROOSE: I'd like to read the reply.

Roose walks away.

CUT TO: VOLANTIS

INT. VARYS AND TYRION’S CARRIAGE

Tyrion repeatedly opens and closes a window.

TYRION: I have to get out of this wheelhouse.

VARYS: Volantis is a large city.

TYRION: I have to get out of this wheelhouse.

VARYS: The likelihood of you being spotted here increases a hundredfold.

TYRION: Mm, I have to get out of this wheelhouse.

VARYS: I'm not sure how many new ways I can find of saying this.

TYRION: (Walks over to him). I will not be of any use to Daenerys Targaryen if I lose my mind. I can't remember the last face I saw that wasn't yours.

VARYS: It's a perfectly good face.

TYRION: I'm losing my mind.

VARYS: If anyone recognizes you, you'll lose more than that.

TYRION: Look, we are thousands of miles from Westeros. (Pulls his hood up). What am I? (Varys shakes his head). One more drunk dwarf.

Tyrion knocks on the front of the carriage. The camera then pans over part of the city. Varys and Tyrion walk through a busy marketplace.

TYRION: Slaves.

VARYS: Yes. The Volantene masters are very organized. (Shot of a man with a fly tattooed onto his cheek). Flies for dung shovelers. (Shot of a man with a hammer tattooed onto his cheek). Hammers for builders. (Shot of a man inspecting women with tears tattooed onto their cheeks). Tears for whores. Lest they forget.

Varys and Tyrion arrive at a clearing in the market and stop. A woman speaks before a large crowd.

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) Lord cast your light upon us.

CROWD: (Valyrian, in unison) Lord cast your light upon us.

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) For the night is dark and full of terrors.

VARYS: (Aside) We should keep moving.

Noticing Tyrion is no longer next to him, he frantically looks around.

CROWD: (Valyrian, in unison) For the night is dark and full of terrors.

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) I was once as you are now.

The woman points to her cheek. Tyrion watches from some nearby steps, and drinks some wine.

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) Bought and sold, (Varys approaches Tyrion), scourged and branded...

TYRION: The only red priest we had in King's Landing was Thoros of Myr. This one's much better looking.

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) The Lord of Light hears your voice. He hears the king as he hears the slave; he hears the Stone Men in their misery...

TYRION: Stone men. Good luck stopping this spread of grayscale with prayer. You'd have better luck dancing away the plague. (Varys shushes him worriedly).

PRIESTESS: (Valyrian) He has sent you a saviour! From the fire she was reborn to remake the world! The Dragon Queen!

TYRION: We're going to meet the Saviour! You should have told me. Who doesn't want to meet the Saviour?

The priestess slowly turns her head to lock eyes with Tyrion.

TYRION: (Covering his face). Come on. Let's find a brothel.

They return to the marketplace and continue walking. They stop at a large door, which a man is guarding. He rubs Tyrion’s head.

MAN: (Valyrian) It’s good luck to rub a dwarf’s head.

TYRION: It's even better luck to suck a dwarf's cock.

Varys rolls his eyes, exasperated. The man stares at him unamused.

INT. BROTHEL

TYRION: See? We blend right in. Just two more travellers, mad with lust.

Elsewhere in the brothel, Jorah sets his cup down. Tyrion and Varys sit down at a table, and a woman comes to bring them wine.

VARYS: Thank you.

Tyrion clinks his glass against Varys’s. A prostitute dressed as Daenerys walks through the brothel. Tyrion looks at her.

TYRION: Curious... hair. (She looks at him).

MAN: (Across the room). The mother of dragons!

He gestures for her to come over. She approaches their table.

TYRION: It appears you're not the only Targaryen supporter.

Jorah watches the prostitute, and then looks away.

VARYS: Someone who inspires priests and whores is worth taking seriously.

MAN: What makes you worth that much?

BLONDE PROSTITUTE: I’m magic. (They laugh).

MAN: I bet you bloody are.

Jorah listens to this, appearing extremely uncomfortable.

TYRION: Well, (Watches her kiss the man), she's taken.

Tyrion spots another prostitute, with shorter dark hair. He gets up.

VARYS: Where're you going?

TYRION: I need to speak to someone with hair.

Tyrion approaches the black haired prostitute.

TYRION: Hello?

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: Hello.

TYRION: You've got no drink.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: You've got no money.

TYRION: Do I look like a man without money? (She looks at him incredulously). Never trust looks. Until quite recently, I was one of the richest men in the world. (She laughs). But who needs wealth when you can make a woman laugh? (Sits down). I always pay my debts, I'm well known for it.

The blonde prostitute and the man giggle. Tyrion glances over at them.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: You like her? They all like her. They all want to fuck a queen.

TYRION: That’s because they’ve never met a queen.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: You're just saying that.

TYRION: You know how to spot a liar. If I could pick any girl here, I would pick you.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: Why?

TYRION: Because you have a skeptical mind.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: (Smiles). Alright, then. I'm warning you. We’re gonna have to wash you first.

She takes his hand, but Tyrion doesn’t get up.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: Come on.

TYRION: (After a moment). I'm, I'm sorry, I can't.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: Of course you can. You're shy.

TYRION: I'm not.

BLACK HAIRED PROSTITUTE: Have another drink.

TYRION: Gladly, but this, I can't do. Believe me, no one is more shocked than I am. I hope it passes. What will I do in my spare time? I’ll go for a piss, that’s a start.

She looks confused. Tyrion walks away. Varys, noticing that Tyrion is no longer in his view, gets up worriedly.

INT./EXT. WINDOW

Tyrion pisses out of a window, and sips his wine. He throws the cup out into the water below. He notices that someone is behind him.

TYRION: No need to worry, I was just - (Turns to see it’s not Varys, but Jorah). Oh, I thought you were someone else. Shows almost over. I'm sure the girls inside will be happy to oblige.

Jorah looks behind him. As Tyrion pulls up his pants, Jorah puts a rope around him and begins tying it.

TYRION: You made some kind of mistake. Why don't you tell me what you think you are doing and -

Jorah puts a rag over Tyrion’s mouth.

JORAH: I'm taking you to the Queen.

Tyrion’s eyes widen. Jorah picks him up and leaves

EXT. BEACH
A man hops out of his boat at night, and grabs a basket of fish. As he carries it on shore, Jorah knocks him out with a punch to the face. Looking around, he drags the man out of the water, and throws two coins on him. Jorah walks over to where he has Tyrion tied up. Tyrion is grunting, trying to cut the ropes binding him with a knife. Jorah picks up the knife and Tyrion. He throws Tyrion and his supplies into the boat, and then pushes it out to sea. Once it gains momentum, he hops in himself.

CUT TO: EXT. BOAT

A number of men walk around doing various tasks on deck. Jaime Lannister looks out from the side of the boat. He turns to the captain.

JAIME: Is that Estermont?

CAPTAIN: Tarth, Ser Jaime. (Shot of an island). The Sapphire Isle.

INT. BELOW DECK

A knife hits a sandbag.

BRONN: Why are we on a merchant ship? Why no Lannister sails?

JAIME: This ship's sailing to Oldtown. We'll get off earlier, not far from Sunspear. Row ourselves to the Dornish shores in the night.

BRONN: You ever been to Dorne?

JAIME: No.

BRONN: I have. The Dornish are crazy. All they want to do is fight and fuck. Fuck and fight.

JAIME: You should be happy to go back. (Drinks some water).

BRONN: (Gets up, walking to his knife). There's nothing like a good fight to get you in the mood for fucking. (Pulls out his knife from the sandbag). And there's nothing like a fuck-mad Dornish girl to clear your head for the next fight. It's how the two work together. And we're gonna do a lot of fighting, I am sure. Well, I am. But I don't imagine we'll get to stick around for the rest. Not after we've kidnapped their princess.

JAIME: We are not kidnapping their princess. We are rescuing my niece, bringing her back to the family,

BRONN: (Incredulously) Your niece?

Jaime and Bronn have a stare-off. After a moment, Jaime looks away. Bronn drinks some water.

BRONN: I've been doing this sort of thing a long time. I'm good at it. (Sits down).

JAIME: That's why you're here.

BRONN: I know. Why are you here? Why not send 40 of me, or an army? Unlike most folks, you actually got one.

JAIME: Because I don't want to start a war.

BRONN: That still doesn't explain why you're doing it.

JAIME: It has to be me.

BRONN: (Gets up starts walking). If I'm putting something of a lit together, a one-handed man, (Grabs some rope and walks back), who happens to be one of the most recognizable faces in Westeros, is not -

JAIME: It has to be me.

BRONN: (Sheaths his sword). You set your brother free, didn't you? I bet your sister didn't like that.

JAIME: (Quietly) Varys set him free.

BRONN: Well, if you ever see the little fucker, (Lays down), give him my regards.

JAIME: He murdered my father. If I ever see him, I'll split him in two. And then I'll give him your regards.

CUT TO: KING’S LANDING

INT. SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER

Cersei sits in her chair, looking angry. At the table is Maester Pycelle, Qyburn, Mace Tyrell, and an empty chair.

MACE: The Iron Bank has called one tenth of the Crown's debts. Given the expense of rebuilding the royal -

CERSEI: How much can the Crown afford?

MACE: With winter coming, half what they ask. Less.

CERSEI: You're the Master of Coin. How do we pay them?

MACE: Well, House Tyrell could front the gold, and the the Crown will pay us back in time, or I'll have words with my daughter.

Mace smiles, as if expecting a laugh. Qyburn and Pycelle both look down. Mace’s smile fades. Cersei smiles.

CERSEI: You've already given us too much. (Gets up and walks to a window). No, we must arrange better terms with the Iron Bank.

MACE: Absolutely.

CERSEI: In person.

MACE: (After a moment, looks at her surprised). Me? (Qyburn smiles).

CERSEI: We must send an envoy to the Iron Bank, someone of importance, to show these bankers our respect. As the King's Master of Coin, I can think of no one more qualified.

MACE: I will be honored, Your Grace.

CERSEI: The King has expressed concern about his father-in-law's safety on this voyage. (Smiling). He's ordered Ser Meryn to personally lead your escort.

Ser Meryn walks into the room. Mace turns to look at him, and then back at Cersei.

MACE: My very own Kingsguard? Please express -

CERSEI: Safe travels, Lord Tyrell.

MACE: (Raises his hands). Of course, of course, (Gathers his belongings, and then gets up). I'll give your regards to the Titan of Braavos.

Mace laughs. Qyburn looks down, lightly chuckling. Mace exits, followed by Ser Meryn.

PYCELLE: The Small Council grows smaller and smaller.

CERSEI: (Walking out). Not small enough.

Pycelle watches her leave.

INT. HIGH SPARROW’S CHAMBER

A note lies on the desk, stamped with the seal of the High Sparrow. The High Sparrow sits behind his desk, across from Cersei. She pours a glass of wine.

CERSEI: May I offer you some wine, Your Holiness?

HIGH SPARROW: No. (Smiles).

Cersei looks unsure, presumably having expected him to say yes. After a moment she smiles and pushes the wine away.

CERSEI: The old High Septon would have asked the vintage. (Smiles).

HIGH SPARROW: I could say that our minds are temples to the Seven and should be kept pure. But the truth is, (Chuckles), I don't like the taste.

CERSEI: Hmm.

HIGH SPARROW: (After a moment). How may I serve?

CERSEI: All over Westeros we hear about septs being burned. Silent sisters raped. Bodies of holy men piled in the streets.

HIGH SPARROW: Wars teach people to obey the sword, not the Gods.

CERSEI: Perhaps the Gods need a sword of their own. (HS raises an eyebrow). In the days before the Targaryens, the Faith Militant dispensed the justice of the Seven.

HIGH SPARROW: Well, the Faith Militant was disarmed more than two centuries ago.

CERSEI: If I explain the holy purpose to my son, the king, I have no doubt he will sign a decree arming the believers you felt worthy.

HIGH SPARROW: An army that defends the bodies and souls of the common people.

CERSEI: An army and service to the Gods themselves. And to you, of course. As the chosen representative of the Seven.

HIGH SPARROW: An honor I never expected. Or indeed, ever wished for.

CERSEI: Which is why you were chosen. (HS smiles). You and I both know how the world works. Too often the wicked are the wealthiest, beyond the reach of justice. The king himself cannot always punish those who deserve it most.

HIGH SPARROW: All sinners are equal before the Gods.

CERSEI: (Smiles. Continues after a moment). What would you say if I told you we have a great sinner in our very midst? Shielded by gold and privilege.

HIGH SPARROW: May the Father judge him justly. (Smiles).

EXT. STREET

A group of Faith Militant, wearing black robes and chains, walk down the street. Many nearby people chatter amongst themselves and look on. They begin breaking open casks of wine, and people begin screaming. One throws some men out of a building. Wine from the broken casks flows down some steps.

INT. A ROOM

We see a man in pain, sweating heavily and biting down on a piece of cloth. Someone begins carving something on his forehead, and his hand scratches and grabs at the table.

EXT. MARKETPLACE

Outside, the Faith Militant destroy a marketplace, smashing things for sale, flipping over tables, and attacking merchants. One merchant, laying on the ground, looks up at some gold cloaks on a castle wall.

MERCHANT: Help me! Help me!

The gold cloaks turn around, ignoring him.

INT. A ROOM

The man in the room continues to sweat and bite down on the cloth. His face trembles. The symbol continues being carved.

INT. BROTHEL

A prostitute moans while having sex with a client. Some Faith Militant walk in and interrupt. She shrieks as one grabs her by the hair and pulls her off of the man. Another comes in grinning and strikes the man with a stick. The prostitute is forced out of the room. Some more men interrupt an orgy. Two women start screaming. They begin beating some of the participants, and taking others out of the room. Olyvar attempts to confront a member of the Faith Militant as the man drags out a prostitute.

OLYVAR: (Angrily). This is Lord Petyr Baelish's establishment.

The man elbows Olyvar in the face and continues on his way. After most of the Faith’s Militant are gone, Olyvar hears a scream. He walks towards the source of the scream, blood running from his noise, and hears another scream.

MILITANT: Cocksucker! (Man screams). Boy fucker! You barbaric filth! There's a special place in the Seventh Hell for your kind.

Olyvar stands just outside the doorway of a large room. Inside, a group of militants, most of them armed, stand around a male prostitute and his male client. Both are naked and bloody on the floor.

CLIENT: Please, please, I'll pay! I'll pay all of you.

MILITANT: (Pulls out a knife). Yes, you will! Seize him.

The client begins crying. Olyvar backs out of the doorway and begins running away. The client screams.

INT. A ROOM

Someone finishes carving the symbol on the man’s head. The carver walks away and the man, revealed to be Lancel Lannister, sits up, breathing heavily. The symbol on his forehead is the symbol of the Faith Militant.

EXT. STAIRWELL

A number of Faith’s Militant, all armed, walk down a stairwell. They enter a clearing, where Loras Tyrell is sparring with another man. Some people are spectating. The militants, including Lancel, approach the fight. Loras, having knocked the other man to the ground, removes his helmet. He hands his sword to another man, who hands Loras a drink. He suddenly becomes aware of the presence of the militants.

MILITANT: Seize him.

The militants grab Loras.

LORAS: Get your hands off of me.

LANCEL: Ser Loras of House Tyrell, you have broken the laws of Gods and men.

LORAS: Who do you think you are?

LANCEL: Justice. (Loras grunts and struggles).

INT. HALLWAY

Margaery walks down a hallway. She pushes a set of doors open, enters Tommen’s chambers, and angrily puts her hands on a table. Tommen is eating, and looks up at her, surprised.

MARGAERY: Why is my brother in a cell?

TOMMEN: I, I don't know. I, I didn't order it.

MARGAERY: We both know who did. (Walks away). You told me she was returning to Casterly Rock.

TOMMEN: (Standing up). Are you saying my mother is behind this?

MARGAERY: She's jealous you're not hers anymore. Arresting my brother is her revenge.

TOMMEN: Aren't you and mother getting along?

MARGAERY: (Scoffs). Oh, my sweet, sweet King. (Sits down). Do you have any affection for me at all?

TOMMEN: (Takes her hand). Of course I do. You're my Queen.

MARGAERY: I can't bear to think of my brother locked away in some grimy cell.

TOMMEN: I'll set him free for you.

MARGAERY: Do you promise?

INT. CERSEI’S CHAMBERS

Tommen walks into Cersei’s chambers. Cersei is staring out of a window and drinking wine.

TOMMEN: I demand that Ser Loras be freed now!

CERSEI: (Turns around). Did I arrest him?

TOMMEN: Well, no... But you armed the Faith Militant. You gave the High Sparrow an army.

CERSEI: I did. And your wife has every right to criticize. (Begins walking towards her desk). Can't allow fanatics to arrest the Queen's brother, no matter his perversions.

TOMMEN: Then can I tell Margaery you'll have Ser Loras released?

CERSEI: I told you I am not holding Ser Loras. You're the King. I'm sure if you speak to the High Sparrow, he'll release the poor boy.

EXT. THE GREAT SEPT

A group of kingsguard lead Tommen to the Great Sept.

KINGSGUARD: Halt!

The party stops. Tommen gets out and goes to the steps of the Sept on foot, followed by guards. A number of people are seen milling about around the base of the steps. Some Faith Militant stand guarding the steps. They block Tommen and his guards from walking up.

MILITANT: His Holiness is praying. He will not be disturbed.

KINGSGUARD: Give the order and we'll tear out this rebel.

TOMMEN: You mean, kill them? Here, in the sept?

KINGSGUARD: You'll be sending them to meet the Gods that they love.

The kingsguard and militants both adjust their stances, ready for a fight. A number of other people begin to watch. Some people begin yelling at Tommen.

MAN 1: Bastard!

MAN 2: You're an abomination!

MAN 3: You're born of sin!

WOMAN: Filthy bastard!

TOMMEN: We'll find another way.

Tommen begins walking away, followed by his guards.

MAN 4: Abomination!

INT. TOMMEN’S CHAMBERS

Tommen opens the doors to his chambers, finding it empty.

TOMMEN: My Queen?

Margaery enters from outside.

TOMMEN: There was no way to free Ser Loras without violence.

MARGAERY: You're the King of the Andals, the Lord of the Seven Kingdoms, the Protector of the Realm. And you let a band of fanatics imprison your brother by law.

TOMMEN: I'm going to speak to the High Sparrow.

MARGAERY: Are you? When?

TOMMEN: I--I don't know.

MARGAERY: You don't know?

TOMMEN: He was praying just now.

MARGAERY: (Walking out). I have to send word to Grandmother.

TOMMEN: Will you come back later? (Margaery stops).

MARGAERY: I need to be with my family, Your Grace. (Continues walking).

TOMMEN: Of course.

CUT TO: THE WALL

EXT. CASTLE BLACK

Some Night’s Watchmen spar in the courtyard. A number of others look on. Stannis and Selyse watch from some stairs.

SELYSE: You think highly of this boy.

JON: (To some of the men sparring). Good.

STANNIS: Lord Commander of the Night's Watch.

SELYSE: A bastard by some tavern slut.

STANNIS: Perhaps, but that wasn't Ned Stark's way.

SELYSE: I should have given you a son.

STANNIS: Not your fault.

SELYSE: Whose then? (Looks at their daughter Shireen). I gave you nothing but weakness. (Turns back). And deformity. (Stannis shakes his head).

MELISANDRE: (Walking towards them). Those scars mean nothing to the Lord of Light.

SELYSE: My Lady.

MELISANDRE: Her father is the Lord's chosen King. And her father's blood runs through her veins.

Melisandre and Selyse stare at each other. After a moment, Selyse walks away.

MELISANDRE: You march on Winterfell soon?

STANNIS: We must. To beat the snows.

MELISANDRE: Once before you put your faith in Ser Davos and left me behind. I hope you won't make that mistake again.

STANNIS: I won't. I need you.

MELISANDRE: You only need faith, my King.

STANNIS: (Walking away). And you, my Lady, what do you need?

MELISANDRE: To serve my Lord.

Stannis turns back. They both watch Jon sparring.

INT. JON’S CHAMBER

Jon sits at his desk. Sam hands him various letters to sign, one by one.

SAM: Lord Ashford. (Jon signs). Lady Coalfield. (Jon signs). Lord Smallwood.

JON: Never even heard of these people.

SAM: They haven't heard of you either. (Jon signs). But we need men and they have some.

JON: And how many men does this Lord Maison have to send us?

SAM: (Chuckles, looking at the next letter). More than Lord Weebly.

Sam’s face grows dark after reading the next letter. When Jon finishes signing the letter to Lord Weebly, Sam hands it to him, saying nothing. Jon begins signing, but hesitates.

JON: Not him.

SAM: I know, I'm sorry, but we need men and supplies. And Roose Bolton is the Warden of The North.

JON: He murdered my brother.

SAM: We swore to be the Watchers on the Wall. We can't watch the Wall with 50 men. And we can't get more men without help from the Warden of the North.

Jon hesitates another moment, and then relents and signs the letter. He leans his chair back, and Sam gathers up all of the signed letters. He walks away, almost bumping into Melisandre as she enters Jon’s chambers.

SAM: Apologies, my Lady.

Sam and Melisandre both look at Jon. Jon nods at Sam, and he leaves. Melisandre closes the door behind him, and Jon straightens up his posture.

MELISANDRE: Lord Commander.

JON: How can I help you?

MELISANDRE: Come with us when we ride south. (Walks forwards). None of us know the castle as well as you do. Its hidden tunnels, its weaknesses, its people. Winterfell was your home once. Don't you want to chase the rats out of it? (Turns to Jon).

JON: Castle Black is my home now. Night's Watch takes no part in the wars of the Seven Kingdoms.

MELISANDRE: There's only one war. Life against death. Come. Let me show what you're fighting for. (Walks in front of Jon).

JON: You're gonna show me some vision in the fire. Forgive me, my Lady. But I don't trust in visions.

MELISANDRE: No visions. No magic. Just life.

She opens up her robes, naked underneath. She leans back, and takes Jon’s hand, slowly leading it up her body to cup her breast.

MELISANDRE: Do you feel my heart beating? This power in you, you resist it, and that's your mistake. Embrace it.

Melisandre smiles and looks down at Jon’s hand. Jon looks too. Realizing that she is no longer holding it there, he quickly pulls it away. Melisandre caresses Jon’s face and sits on his lap.

MELISANDRE: The Lord of Light made us male and female. Two parts of a greater whole. We are joining this power. Power to make life, power to make light, and power to cast shadows.

JON: I don't think Stannis would like that very much.

MELISANDRE: Then we shouldn't tell him. (Starts unbuttoning Jon’s coat).

JON: I can't.

MELISANDRE: Why?

JON: I swore a vow. (Melisandre looks at him incredulously). I loved another.

MELISANDRE: The dead don't need lovers. Only the living.

Jon keeps her from unbuttoning his coat any further, breathing heavily.

JON: I know. But I still love her.

Melisandre stands up, closes her robes, and walks away. After opening the door to leave, she turns to Jon.

MELISANDRE: You know nothing, Jon Snow.

Jon’s mouth opens a bit. She smirks and leaves.

INT. STANNIS’S ROOM

Stannis sits at his desk, reading something. There’s a knock at the door. After a moment, Shireen enters. Stannis looks up at her and then back down at his reading material. She closes the door. She smiles, but after Stannis doesn’t return her smile, she walks over to a nearby dresser and begins playing with the objects on top of it.

STANNIS: Are you lonely?

SHIREEN: (Turns around, holding something). Just bored.

STANNIS: My father used to tell me that boredom indicates a lack of inner resources.

SHIREEN: (Looks up). Were you bored a lot, too?

STANNIS: I know Castle Black is no place for a child, but I -

SHIREEN: I like it. (Walks to a table). I thought I'd be left at home. I know mother didn't want to bring me. (Picks up an X from the table).

STANNIS: Why do you say that?

SHIREEN: She told me, "I don't want to bring you."

Shireen fiddles with the objects in her hands. Stannis looks down.

STANNIS: She shouldn't have said that.

Shireen puts down the objects she was playing with, and turns to leave. Before opening the door, she turns back to Stannis.

SHIREEN: Are you ashamed of me, father?

Stannis looks up surprised. He puts down what he was doing. Shireen looks down.

STANNIS: When you were an infant, (Stands up and walks around his desk), the Dornish trailer landed on Dragonstone. His goods were junk except for one wooden doll. He'd even sewn a dress on it in the colors of our House. No doubt he'd heard of your birth, and assumed new fathers were easy targets. I still remember how you smiled when I put that doll in your cradle, (Shireen smiles), and you pressed it to your cheek. (Looks down. Shireen’s smile drops). By the time we burnt the doll, it was too late. (Walks to the table and adjusts the objects on it). I was told you would die. Or worse, the grayscale would go slow. (Turns to her). Let you grow just enough to know the world before taking it away from you. Everyone advised me to send you to the ruins of Valyria to live out your short life with the Stone men, before the sickness spread to the castle. I told them all to go to hell. (Shireen smiles). I called in every maester on this side of the world. Every healer, every apothecary. They stopped the disease and saved your life. Because you did not belong across the world with the bloody Stone men. (Walks towards her). You are the Princess Shireen of House Baratheon. And you are my daughter.

After a moment, Shireen hugs Stannis. At first hesitant, he hugs her back.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

INT. TOMBS UNDERNEATH WINTERFELL

Sansa lights a candle on a tomb. She then walks over to Lyanna’s tomb and places a candle in the hand of Lyanna’s statue. She then leans down to pick a dusty feather off of the ground. As she blows off the dust, a figure is seen approaching in the background.

BAELISH: I thought I might find you here. (Sansa turns to him). Your Aunt Lyanna.

SANSA: Father never talked about her. Sometimes I'd find him down here, lighting the candles. They say she was beautiful.

BAELISH: I saw her once. I was a boy, living with your mother's family. Lord Whent had a great tourney at Harrenhal. Everyone was there. The Mad King, your father, Robert Baratheon. And Lyanna, she was already promised to Robert. You can imagine what it was like for me, a boy from nowhere, with nothing to his name, watching these legendary men, tilting at the lists. The last two riders were Barristan Selmy and Rhaegar Targaryen. When Rhaegar won, everyone cheered for the prince. I remember the girls laughing when he took off his helmet and they saw that silver hair. How handsome he was. Until he rode right past his wife, Elia Martell, and all the smiles died. I've never seen so many people so quiet. He rode past his wife, and he lay a crown of winter roses in Lyanna's lap. Blue as frost. How many tens of thousands had to die because Rhaegar chose your aunt?

SANSA: Yes, he chose her… and then he kidnapped her and raped her.

BAELISH: Come. (Takes her arm). Let's speak somewhere the dead can't hear us. (They begin walking away).

SANSA: Dressed for riding?

BAELISH: I am.

SANSA: Where are you going?

BAELISH: King's Landing.

SANSA: King's Landing?

BAELISH: Cersei sent for me. (They stop). We must not let her sniff out any trouble.

SANSA: You can't leave me here!

BAELISH: I know how hard it is to live with people you despise, believe me. But it won't be for long.

SANSA: How do you know?

BAELISH: (They begin walking again). Stannis Baratheon garrisons at Castle Black. He'll march south to King's Landing before the winter snows block his way. But first, he has to take Winterfell.

SANSA: You don't know that.

BAELISH: I do. Once he liberates these lands from the Boltons he'll rally your father's bannermen to his cause. With the North behind him, Stannis can finally take the Iron Throne.

SANSA: You think he'll defeat the Boltons?

BAELISH: He has a larger army. He's the finest military commander in Westeros. A betting man would put his money on Stannis. (They stop). As it happens, I am a betting man.

SANSA: And if you're right?

BAELISH: Stannis takes Winterfell, he rescues you from the most despised family in the North. Grateful for your late father's courageous support for his claim, he names you Wardeness of the North.

SANSA: But I, I wouldn't… Wardeness of the North

BAELISH: You are the last surviving Stark. He needs you.

SANSA: What if you're wrong? What if Stannis never attacks Winterfell, or he does and the Boltons defeat him?

BAELISH: Then you will take this Bolton boy, Ramsay, and make him yours.

SANSA: I don't know how to do that.

BAELISH: Of course you do. He's already fallen for you.

SANSA: His father frightens me.

BAELISH: He should, he's a dangerous man. But even the most dangerous men can be outmaneuvered. And you’ve learnt to maneuver from the very best. (Puts a hand on her shoulder). I return before too long. (Puts a hand behind her head). You'll be strong without me. (She nods, and he kisses her). The North will be yours. Do you believe me?

SANSA: I expect I'll be a married woman by the time you return.

Baelish chuckles and pats her shoulder. He turns and leaves as Sansa watches him.

CUT TO: DORNE

EXT. BOAT

At night, Bronn and Jaime sit in a boat. Bronn rows to shore alone. Looking across at Jaime, Jaime holds up his fake hand. Bronn begrudgingly goes back to rowing alone. After they get to shore, they carry their boat in, and hide it in some tall grass. They then both walk away.

EXT. DESERT - THE NEXT MORNING

Jaime awakens to find Bronn standing over him with a knife. His eyes widens and he moves to the side as Bronn brings his knife down on a snake that was about to bite Jaime. Jaime looks at the snake and Bronn pulls his knife out of it.

BRONN: Breakfast.

Bronn and Jaime sit at a fire. Bronn cooks the snake while Jaime puts gloves on.

BRONN: That would have been a shit way to die.

JAIME: As far as I've seen, they're all shit ways to die.

BRONN: Aye. But your lot like to give the singers a good ending.

JAIME: I don't care what's sung about me when I'm dead.

BRONN: No? Two knights, off to rescue a princess. Sounds like a good song to me.

JAIME: Sounds like all the rest.

While Bronn is distracted eating, Jaime gets rid of his food.

JAIME: What about you? What shit way would you choose?

BRONN: In my own keep, drinking my own wine, watching my sons grovel for my fortune.

JAIME: How disappointing. I thought you'd have something more exciting planned.

BRONN: I've had an exciting life. I want my death to be boring. How do you want to go?

JAIME: In the arms of the woman I love.

BRONN: She want the same thing?

JAIME: Let's go.

They both get up and gather their things. Bronn stomps out the fire. The scene cuts to them walking through some tall grass later.

BRONN: The captain to that ship… What was he, Braavosi?

JAIME: Pentoshi.

BRONN: And he's headed to Oldtown?

JAIME: As I said. Why?

BRONN: What's to stop him from docking down the coast and telling the locals that Jaime Lannister's in Dorne?

JAIME: A bag of gold.

BRONN: I'm not sure you understand how much people hate your family in this part of the world.

JAIME: It was a heavy bag.

BRONN: And I bet he swore all kinds of oaths to get it. But you won't be around if he breaks them.

A horse neighs in the distance. Jaime looks around. A group of Dornish riders approach. Bronn and Jaime hide in the grass. Jaime watches the riders.

BRONN: How many you count?

JAIME: Four.

BRONN: How many you think you can take?

JAIME: One, if he's slow.

Bronn turns to look at the riders.

RIDER: Halt!

The rider holds up his hand, and the party stops, having spotted Jaime and Bronn’s footsteps.

BRONN: Fucked in the arse. (Both get up). Hiya! (The riders approach them). Morning, lads. Glad we found you.

RIDER: Who are you?

BRONN: Cooper. (Points to Jaime). This is Darnell.

RIDER: You're from King's Landing.

BRONN: Accent gave me away? Flea Bottom. Whelped and whipped.

RIDER: Why are you here?

BRONN: Our ship capsized in the night. We managed to swim ashore. It was a near thing, really.

JAIME: I thought the sharks would get us. (Bronn looks at him).

RIDER: There are no sharks in Dorne.

JAIME: I could have sworn those were shark fins.

BRONN: Dolphins maybe.

RIDER: Throw your swords in the sand.

BRONN: Boys, there's no need for this. Just, point us in the right direction. We'll find our way home.

RIDER: Swords in the sand! Now!

Bronn and Jaime look at each other. They pull out their swords. Bronn puts his down in the sand, and then flings a knife into the throat of a rider. He then kills another, stabbing him and knocking him off of his horse. A third charges him, and Bronn knocks him off of his horse as well. However, he survives. Bronn turns to Jaime.

BRONN: That one should be slow enough.

Bronn approaches the fourth and final rider. Jaime turns to the injured rider, who is revealed to be much larger than Jaime. They begin fighting. In the background, Bronn knocks the fourth rider off of his horse. As Jaime and the man fight, Jaime is slowly pushed back, down a hill. He falls over and begins rolling to escape his attacker. He loses his balance and his sword is knocked away. As the attacker brings his sword down to kill Jaime, Jaime brings his gold hand up to block it. The sword gets stuck in Jaime’s hand. As the attacker is stuck trying to remove the sword, Jaime picks his back up, kills him, and kicks him down the hill.

BRONN: Nice move! (Jaime turns to him).

JAIME: Luck.

BRONN: You had a wonderful teacher.

Bronn turns and walks away. Jaime looks back down the hill, and then to his hand. Failing to shake the sword off, he is forced to dislodge it by kicking it out of his own hand. Bronn is then seen cleaning his sword off on the clothes of one of the dead riders. He sheaths his sword as Jaime approaches.

BRONN: Always wanted a Dornish stallion. Beasts can run a day and night without tiring. We'll ride to the Water Gardens with a nice breeze in our face.

JAIME: First we need to bury these bodies.

BRONN: Birds have to eat too.

JAIME: Corpses raise questions, questions raise armies. We're not here to start a war.

BRONN: Do you know how long it will take us to dig all those holes?

JAIME: (Holding out his hand). I can't dig very well with one hand. Not at all, really.

Jaime walks away as Bronn’s face drops. He begins dragging a body.

EXT. BEACH

Elaria, in all black, swiftly rides down a beach on horseback. She approaches a tent. Nearby are some more horses, and in the tent are Nymeria, Obara, and Tyene. Tyene exits the tent to meet her as she dismounts.

TYENE: Nama!

Tyene and Elaria embrace.

ELARIA: Nym, Obara.

OBARA: Will it be war?

ELARIA: Prince Doran will weep for your father, but nothing else. We must avenge Oberyn ourselves.

OBARA: Without Doran we have no army to march against the Lannisters.

ELARIA: We don't need an army to start a war. (Drinks water). Queen Cersei loves her children, and we have one of them.

NYMERIA: We may have a problem.

Nymeria uses a whip to knock a bucket away. Underneath is the captain who brought Jaime and Bronn to Dorne, buried neck-deep in sand and covered in scorpions.

OBARA: A ship's captain, who found me in Planky Town, claiming he had information to sell. He told me he smuggled Jaime Lannister into Dorne.

ELARIA: He's come for Myrcella. If he gets to her before we do, we lose our only chance for revenge. You must choose. Doran's way and peace, or my way and war.

TYENE: (Walks towards her). I'm with you. Always. (Elaria puts a hand to her face).

ELARIA: Nym? (Nymeria nods). Obara?

OBARA: When I was a child, (Begins walking), Oberyn came to take me to court. I'd never seen this man, and yet he called himself my father. My mother wept, said I was too young, and a girl.
Oberyn tossed his spear at my feet and said, "Girl or boy, we fight our battles. But the Gods let us choose our weapons." My father pointed to the spear, and then to my mother's tears.

Obara picks up a spear that was sticking out of the sand. She twirls it around for a moment, and then tosses it through the captain’s head, killing him.

OBARA: (Smiles). I made my choice long ago.

Elaria and Tyene smile.

CUT TO: EXT. BOAT AT SEA

Jorah steers the boat as Tyrion, tied up and gagged, tries to speak. He only succeeds in mumbling. Eventually he stops trying to say real words, and instead only tries to be as loud as possible, to annoy Jorah. Jorah comes over and ungags him, and then walks back over to continue steering.

TYRION: Thank you. (After a long pause). Who are you?

JORAH: Your captor.

TYRION: Do you have wine?

JORAH: No.

TYRION: I can't sleep without wine.

JORAH: Then stay awake.

TYRION: You're going the wrong way. My sister's in Westeros. Westeros is west! We're heading east.

JORAH: I'm not taking you to your sister.

TYRION: You said you were taking me to the Queen.

JORAH: I am. Queen Daenerys Targaryen. She's the Queen I serve.

TYRION: (Chuckles). What a waste of a good kidnapping. So happens I was heading there myself!

JORAH: What business would you have with the Queen?

TYRION: Gold and glory. Oh, and hate. If you've ever met my sister, you'd understand. So now that it's clear we're on the same side? (Holds out his hands expectantly. Jorah makes no move to respond). A high born knight from the North of Westeros, down on his luck in Essos. Dragon epaulettes? Bear sigil breast plate. You're Jorah Mormont. I have to ask how, exactly, were you serving your Queen in a whore house, half a world away? Is it possible, that you were running? Why would you be running? And why would she have sent you away? Oh, wait! You were spying on her, weren't you? It's all coming back to me! I was drunk through most of the Small Council meetings, but it's all coming back. You passed notes to Varys's little birds. She found out, didn't she? Found out, and exiled you. (Jorah looks downtrodden). And now you hope to win back her favor with a gift. A risky scheme. One might even say, desperate. Do you think Daenerys would execute me, and pardon you? I'd say the reverse is just as likely.

Jorah stops steering and approaches Tyrion. Tyrion holds out his hands again, but Jorah strikes him, knocking him unconscious. He then goes back to steering, looking worried.

CUT TO: YUNKAI

EXT. BALCONY OVERLOOKING THE CITY

Daenerys and Ser Barristan stand on the balcony.

DAENERYS: Everyone looks happy enough from up here. (Barristan chuckles). What?

BARRISTAN: I was thinking of all the times your brother made me go with him down from the Red Keep, into the streets of King's Landing.

DAENERYS: Why?

BARRISTAN: He liked to walk among the people, he liked to sing to them.

DAENERYS: He sang to them?

BARRISTAN: Yes. Rhaegar would take a spot on the Hook or the Street of Seeds and then he'd sing. Just like all the other minstrels.

DAENERYS: And what did you do?

BARRISTAN: I made sure no one killed him. And I collected the money. (Daenerys looks surprised). Well he liked to see how much he could make.

DAENERYS: He was good?

BARRISTAN: He was very good. Viserys never told you?

DAENERYS: He told me Rhaegar was good at killing people. (Sits down).

BARRISTAN: Rhaegar never liked killing. He loved singing.

DAENERYS: And what did you do with the money?

BARRISTAN: Well, one time, he gave it to the next minstrel down the street. One time, he gave it to an orphanage in Flea Bottom. One time... we got horribly drunk. (They both laugh).

DARIO: (Entering). Your Grace. Hizdahr is here, waiting in your audience chamber.

DAENERYS: How many others are there?

DARIO: Fifty a hundred.

DAENERYS: Will you be joining us, Ser Barristan?

DARIO: I think I can protect you from Hizdahr Zo Loraq.

DAENERYS: I think I can protect me from Hizdahr Zo Loraq. Go, Ser Barristan. Sing a song for me.

BARRISTAN: Your Grace. (Leaves).

INT. AUDIENCE CHAMBER

HIZDAHR: All men must die. But not all can die in glory.

MISSANDEI: Glory?

HIZDAHR: Why else do men fight? Why did your ancestors cross the Narrow Sea and conquer the Seven Kingdoms? So their names would live on. Those who find victory in the fighting pits, will never become kings, but their names will live on. It's the best chance they'll ever have.

DAENERYS: Is that what you used to tell men before you set them to butchering each other for sport?

HIZDAHR: Your Grace, today is the traditional start of the fighting season.

DAENERYS: I do not recognize this tradition.

HIZDAHR: Traditions are the only thing that will hold this city, your city, together. (Shots of Sons of the Harpy walking through tunnels with torches). Without them, former slaves and former masters have nothing in common. Nothing but centuries of mistrust and resentment. I can't promise this is the answer to all our problems, but it's a start.

EXT. MARKETPLACE

A prostitute and a soldier laugh with each other. Another soldier talks with some women. Some Sons of the Harpy kill all of the soldiers in the area, causing panic. In a nearby alley, some Unsullied march. Hearing the chaos, they begin running towards the market. They find the prostitute crying over the body of the dead soldier.

WOMAN: (Speaking another language) Sons of the Harpy.

She gestures in the direction the sons went. The Unsullied run in that direction. When they are out of view, she stops her act and wipes the tears away. The Unsullied enter a corridor, expecting to catch the sons. Instead, they themselves are ambushed from every direction by Sons of the Harpy. After a tense few moments, a fight breaks out. During the fight, one of the Unsullied’s helmet is knocked off, and is revealed to be Grey Worm. Another fight breaks out elsewhere. The two Unsullied there are killed almost immediately. Barristan walks down an alley and, upon noticing the chaos, heads to the fighting. Grey Worm is badly injured, and with his party killed, also badly outnumbered. Unsullied are shown being killed elsewhere. Grey Worm continues holding off the sons, and Barristan arrives to assist him. They are able to kill all of the sons, but are both seriously injured in the process. They fall unconscious, and the camera pans up to show them surrounded by all of the dead sons

INT. ROOM
Grey Worm lays in a bed, asleep. Missandei stands over him, crying.

INT. THRONE ROOM

The room is dark, except for some candles. Daenerys and Daario stand over the body of Barristan. Hizdahr enters with two men.

HIZDAHR: I am so sorry, my queen. He was a good man.

DAENERYS: "Barristan the Bold" they called him. He crossed a continent to serve me. He was a loyal friend. And he died in an alley, butchered by cowards who hide behind masks.

DAARIO: We could pull back to the pyramid district, secure it, and use it as a base from which to operate. Then we clean the city out, neighborhood by neighborhood, street by street, until the rats have nowhere left to hide.

Daario walks over the Daenerys and looks at Hizdahr. He looks back. Daenerys turns around.

DAENERYS: I prefer your earlier suggestion. Round up the leaders of each of Meereen's great families and bring them to me.

HIZDAHR: But... I'm the leader of my family.

Daario nods. The two men behind Hizdahr grab and restrain him. He is taken away.

HIZDAHR: No, Your Grace! I had nothing to do with this. Your Grace!

INT. DRAGON CHAMBER

Daenerys, Daario, some Unsullied, and a number of men stand in the chamber. Daario holds a torch. After a few moments, Daenerys turns around and begins walking. Daario follows her. Then a chain can be heard rattling. Daenerys and Daario turn around.

DAENERYS: (in Valyrian) Walk forward.

The Unsullied lower their spears at the other men.

MAN: (Valyrian) You cannot do this.

The Unsullied begin walking forward, forcing the men to move. After a few moments, they stop. Chains rattle again.

DAENERYS: (Valyrian) Another step.

The Unsullied and the men take another step. Chains rattle and an unseen dragon snarls. Daenerys walks through the Unsullied to the front of the group.

DAENERYS: (Valyrian) They will eat you, if I tell them to. They may eat you even if I don’t. Children. Some say I should give up on them. (One of the men is mumbling). But a good mother never gives up on her children. She disciplines them if she must.

Daenerys looks at Daario. He walks over and pushes the mumbling man forward, onto his knees.

DAENERYS: (Valyrian) But she does not give up on them.

The man’s eyes widen. A dragon comes out of the shadows and breathes fire on him. He screams and dies. The dragons take his corpse, tear it in two, and eat it.

DAENERYS: (Valyrian) Who is innocent? Maybe all of you are, (Looks at Hizdahr), maybe none of you are. Maybe, (Touching Hizdahr’s arm), I should let the dragons decide.

HIZDAHR: (Valyrian) All men must die.

The other men besides Hizdahr grovel before Daenerys. The dragons continue eating. After a moment, she takes her hand off of Hizdahr.

DAENERYS: Don't want to overfeed them. Tomorrow perhaps.

Daario and the Unsullied take the men out. Daenerys watches her dragons eat for a moment, and then walks out herself.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

INT. LIBRARY

Sam sits at a table, reading a letter. Aemon is with him.

SAM: "And though Daenerys maintains her grip on Slaver's Bay, forces rise against her from within and without. She refuses to leave until the freedom of the former slaves is secure." She sounds like quite a woman.

AEMON: And she's alone, under siege, no family to guide her or protect her. Her last relation thousands of miles away, useless, dying.

SAM: Don't say that, Maester Aemon.

AEMON: A Targaryen, alone in the world, is a terrible thing.

Jon walks in.

JON: Maester Aemon.

AEMON: Lord Commander.

JON: Sam, I'd like to speak to the maester alone.

Sam gets up, grabs his papers, and leaves. Jon walks over and sits at the table.

JON: How are you feeling?

AEMON: Oh, like a hundred-year-old man slowly freezing to death.

JON: I need your advice. There's something I want to do, something I have to do. But it'll divide the Night's Watch. Bitterly. Half the men will hate me the moment I give the order.

AEMON: Half the men hate you already, Lord Commander. Do it.

JON: But you don't know what it is.

AEMON: That doesn't matter. You do. You will find little joy in your command. But with luck, you will find the strength to do what needs to be done. Kill the boy, Jon Snow. Winter is almost upon us. Kill the boy, and let the man be born.

INT. ROOM

Jon and Tormund sit across from each other at a table.

JON: Where are the rest of the free folk now? (Tormund scoffs). Where have they gone? (No response). Who leads them?

TORMUND: They followed Mance. They won't follow anyone else.

JON: What about you?

TORMUND: Hard to lead when you're in chains.

JON: What if I unchained you?

TORMUND: Why would you do that?

JON: Because you are not my enemy. And I'm not yours.

TORMUND: You sure seemed like my enemy when you were killing my friends.

JON: For 8,000 years the Night's Watch have sworn an oath to be the shield that guards the realms of men. And for 8,000 years we've fallen short of that oath. You belong to the realms of men. All of you.

TORMUND: And now everything is going to change?

JON: It is.

TORMUND: Why now?

JON: Because now, (Leans forward), I am Lord Commander of the Night's Watch.

TORMUND: What would you have me do, (Leans forward), Lord Commander?

JON: (Stands up). I'd have you go north of the Wall. Gather the remaining free folk wherever they are and bring them back here. I'll open the gates for them and let them through. I'll find them lands to settle south of the Wall.

TORMUND: They won't kneel for you and neither will I.

JON: I don't want them to kneel for me. I want them to fight with me when the time comes.

TORMUND: The day I ask my people to fight with the crows is the day my people cut my guts from my belly and make me eat them.

JON: And how many of your people can't fight? The women, the children, the old, the sick, what happens to them? You're condemning them to death. Worse than death because you're too proud to make peace. Or maybe you're not proud. Maybe you're just a coward.

TORMUND: (Stands up). Easy thing to say to a man in chains.

Jon unchains Tormund. Tormund’s eyes widen as he feels his hands.

JON: Your people need a leader. And they need to get south of the Wall before it's too late. We don't have much time and they have less. The walkers are coming and they'll hit your people first. I'm not asking you to make peace to save your skin. Make peace to save your people.

TORMUND: Most of them are at Hardhome. You know where that is?

JON: Up on Storrold's Point. I can give you 10 horses and nine other men. You can get there in a week.

TORMUND: We'll need ships.

JON: I'll talk to King Stannis about lending you his fleet.

TORMUND: All right, then. You're coming with me. You're the Lord Commander of the Night's Watch. They need to hear it from you. They need to know the ships they are boarding won’t be torched in the middle of the sea. You come with me, or I don't go.

INT. DINING HALL

The Night’s Watchmen present talk amongst themselves. Stannis and Davos are present. Jon stands at a table in the front of the room with Allister and two others. One of them addresses Jon.

MAN 1: You'd bring wildlings here, through our gates?

JON: Men, women, and children will die by the thousands if we do nothing.

MAN 1: Let them die. We got our own to worry about. Less enemies for us.

Some of the men in the crowd cheer.

STANNIS: Fewer.

DAVOS: What?

STANNIS: Nothing.

SAM: (Standing up) There is good farmland in the Gift. (Laughter). Land that no one uses now. A dozen abandoned villages.

MAN 2: And why do you think the farmers abandoned those villages? Because the wildlings raided them for years. Cut them down! Just like they did this boy's people.

The man points to Olly, who lowers his head. Sam sits down.

ALLISTER: We've been fighting them all for thousands of years. They've slaughtered villages. They've slaughtered our brothers.

JON: And we've slaughtered theirs.

EDD: I will follow you anywhere, you know that. But they killed Grenn. And they killed Pyp. (Men mumble in agreement). They killed 50 of our brothers. I can't forget that. I can't forgive it.

JON: You were at the Fist of the First Men. If we abandon them, you know what they become. We can learn to live with the wildlings or we can add them to the army of the dead. Whatever they are now, they're better than that.

The men in the room return to bickering loudly.

INT. LORD COMMANDER’S ROOM

Jon walks in, takes off his coat, and puts his hands on his desk. Olly knocks and walks in with a plate of food, and sets it down.

JON: Thank you. (Olly walks away). Olly. (He stops). If you have something you want to say to me, say it. It's all right.

OLLY: You don't mean it, do you? Telling the wildlings you want to make peace. You're just doing it to trick them.

JON: It's not a trick.

OLLY: They burned my village. They put an arrow through my father's head right in front of me. They butchered my mother, everyone I ever knew.

JON: I know what it's like to lose the people you love. I know this is hard for you. But winter is coming. We know what's coming with it. We can't face it alone.

OLLY: Will there be anything else you need, Lord Commander?

JON: No.

Olly leaves. Jon sighs.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL

EXT. COURTYARD

Podrick walks carrying some supplies. He enters a building. Inside, Brienne stares out of a window. Podrick sets down the supplies.

PODRICK: She's far away from the Lannisters. This is her home. Maybe Lady Sansa is better off here.

BRIENNE: (Turns around). Better off with the Boltons who murdered her mother and brother? Sansa's in danger even if she doesn't realize it.

A man enters with some water and a towel.

BRIENNE: Thank you. You've lived here a long time?

MAN: Aye.

BRIENNE: Did you know Lord Eddard?

MAN: I knew him and his father before him. The Starks are gone now.

BRIENNE: Not all of them. I know who's inside that castle.

MAN: Everyone knows. The Boltons.

BRIENNE: I'm not talking about the Boltons. I need to get a message to her. To Sansa Stark.

MAN: Who are you?

BRIENNE: Someone who swore to keep her safe.

MAN: Swore to who?

BRIENNE: Her mother.

MAN: Her mother's dead.

BRIENNE: That doesn't release me from an oath. I served Lady Catelyn. I serve her still. Who do you serve?

INT. RAMSAY’S CHAMBERS

Myranda stands naked in front of a window.

RAMSAY: Come back here. Myranda.

MYRANDA: I saw you staring at her.

RAMSAY: I'm going to marry her. That will involve looking at her from time to time.

MYRANDA: You said you'd marry me.

RAMSAY: And I meant it. When I was a bastard named Snow. But I'm a Bolton now. What I want is no longer the primary consideration. I'm furthering a dynasty.

MYRANDA: Do you think she's pretty?

RAMSAY: Of course I do. I'm not blind.

Ramsay sighs and gets up. He walks over to Myranda and grabs her waist.

RAMSAY: You think she's pretty, too. I'm looking forward to our wedding night. But don't worry, I'll have plenty of time for you.

MYRANDA: Perhaps I'll marry, too.

RAMSAY: (Laughs). You're the kennel master's daughter. Who are you going to marry, the stable keeper's son? (She tries to hit him, but he restrains her). You're mine. You're not going anywhere. Unless I have to listen to more of your jealousy. Jealousy bores me. You remember what happens to people who bore me. You're not going to bore me, are you, Myranda?

After a moment, Myranda kisses him. She then bites down hard on his lower lip, causing it to bleed.

MYRANDA: (Smiles). Never.

Ramsay smiles back. They begin having sex.

INT. SANSA’S CHAMBERS

Sansa sits alone at a table. There’s a knock on the door. She turns, gets up, and opens it. An old servant woman comes in.

WOMAN: Beg pardon, my lady. I've come to refill the wash basin.

SANSA: Oh, I don't need-

WOMAN: (Closes the door). You still have friends in the North. If you're ever in trouble, light a candle in the highest window of the broken tower.

SANSA: But who -

WOMAN: You're not alone.

The woman leaves, and closes the door.

EXT. OUTSIDE

Sansa walks through the snow, looking up at the broken tower. Myranda approaches her.

MYRANDA: I like your dress. Who made it for you?

SANSA: I made it myself.

MYRANDA: Really?

SANSA: Who, who are you?

MYRANDA: I'm Myranda, the kennel master's daughter. May I? (Takes Sansa’s arm and inspects her sleeve). Oh, wonderful. The stitching. Who taught you?

SANSA: My mother. (Pulls away).

MYRANDA: I'm sorry for what happened to her.

SANSA: Thank you.

MYRANDA: It's good that she taught you. It was a gift. Now every time you wear something you made, you can remember her.

SANSA: I'd rather have a mother.

MYRANDA: I know. It's not the same. Still, it's good to remember. Remember the way things were. I almost forgot. There's something else to help you remember.

INT. DUNGEON ENTRANCE

Myranda opens the gate and lets Sansa in. Some dogs bark.

MYRANDA: Down there at the end.

SANSA: What is it?

MYRANDA: That would spoil the surprise. Go ahead, it's perfectly safe. You won't believe it when you see it.

The dogs continue barking and growling. Sansa walks down the aisle of cages. Most contain dogs. Sansa looks behind to see Myranda has disappeared. She comes to the last cage, which is open. Inside is Theon, on the floor. He gets up and notices her.

SANSA: Theon?

THEON: You shouldn't be here.

She looks at him angrily. He backs away from her. She leaves.

INT. RAMSAY’S CHAMBERS

Theon unties Ramsay’s jacket.

RAMSAY: You smell particularly ripe this evening. Pour me some wine.

Theon walks over to a table and pours some wine. He then brings it over to Ramsay, who drinks it.

RAMSAY: Do you have something to tell me?

THEON: No, my lord.

RAMSAY: Reek.

THEON: (Stuttering). She saw me.

RAMSAY: Who?

THEON: Sansa. Lady Sansa. She came to the kennels.

RAMSAY: She saw you?

THEON: Yes. I'm sorry, master. Forgive me. I didn't think -

RAMSAY: Come here.

Theon walks forward. Ramsay holds his chin.

RAMSAY: You mustn't keep secrets from me, Reek. Get on your knees.

Theon gets on his knees. Ramsay sips his wine, and then puts it aside. Theon looks down.

RAMSAY: Give me your hand.

Theon hesitantly holds his hand up. As Ramsay takes it, Theon begins stammering. After a moment, Ramsay cups Theon’s hand with his own hands.

RAMSAY: I forgive you.

Theon looks up. Ramsay smiles.

INT. DINING HALL

Sansa, Ramsay, Roose, and Walda sit at a table, eating.

ROOSE: I trust you find your chamber suitable, my lady.

SANSA: Yes, thank you, my lord.

RAMSAY: Allow me.

Ramsay pours Sansa some wine.

RAMSAY: Mother.

WALDA: Thank you, Ramsay.

He pours her some wine as well. She smiles. Ramsay gets up and holds his wine up.

RAMSAY: My lady, we are all a family, we northerners. Our blood ties go back thousands of years. So I'd like to drink to our wedding. May our happiness spread from Moat Cailin to the Last Hearth.

ROOSE: (Raises his cup). To your wedding.

WALDA: (Raises her cup). To your wedding.

Ramsay takes a large sip of wine. Sansa puts her own glass down. Ramsay sits down.

WALDA: It must be difficult for you being in a strange place.

SANSA: This isn't a strange place. This is my home. It's the people who are strange.

RAMSAY: You're right. Very strange. More wine, please.

Theon enters the room with some wine. Sansa looks away.

RAMSAY: I heard you two had reunited. A fitting place for it. (Theon begins pouring wine). I like to imagine that the last time you spoke was in this very room. Are you still angry with him after he - what he did? Don't worry. The North remembers. I punished him for it. He's not ironborn anymore. Not Theon Greyjoy anymore. He's a new man. A new person, anyway. Aren't you, Reek?

THEON: (Turns around). Yes, master.

RAMSAY: That's his new name, Reek.

SANSA: Why are you doing this?

RAMSAY: Because Reek has something to say to you. Don't you, Reek? (He gestures Theon over). An apology. Apologize to Lady Sansa for what you did. Apologize for murdering her two brothers.

Theon shakes his head "no" when Ramsay looks away

THEON: (After a moment, stuttering). I'm sorry.

RAMSAY: Look at her, Reek. An apology doesn't mean anything if you're not looking the person in the eye.

THEON: I'm sorry.

RAMSAY: Sorry about what?

THEON: For killing your brothers.

RAMSAY: There, over and done with. Doesn't everyone feel better? I do. That was getting very tense. Whew. (Theon turns to leave). You know what, my lady? What with him having murdered your brothers and the rest of your family gone Reek here is the nearest thing to living kin that you have left. Reek. You will give away the bride. Someone has to. What better person? Good? Good?

ROOSE: Yes, yes, very good.

RAMSAY: Wonderful. (Sips wine).

ROOSE: Walda and I have some good news as well, since we're all together.

WALDA: We're going to have a baby.

SANSA: I'm very happy for you.

ROOSE: From the way she's carrying, Maester Wolkan says it looks like a boy.

Ramsay sips some wine and angrily sets his cup down. Sansa looks at him smugly.

INT. ROOSE’S WAR ROOM

Ramsay and Roose sit at a war table.

RAMSAY: How can you be sure?

ROOSE: Sure of what?

RAMSAY: That she's pregnant. I mean how can you tell?

ROOSE: Maester Wolkan has assured us beyond all doubt.

Ramsay gets up and walks around to the other side of the table, wine in hand.

RAMSAY: So how did you manage it?

ROOSE: Manage what?

RAMSAY: Getting her pregnant.

ROOSE: I imagine you're familiar with the procedure.

RAMSAY: Of course, but how did you find it?

ROOSE: You disgraced yourself at dinner, parading that creature before the Stark girl.

RAMSAY: And if it's a boy?

ROOSE: You're worried about your position.

RAMSAY: My position is quite clear. I'm your son until a better alternative comes along.

Ramsay finished his wine and goes to get more.

ROOSE: You've never asked me about your mother.

RAMSAY: Why would I? She had me, she died. And here we are.

ROOSE: She was a peasant girl. Pretty in a common sort of way. She was the miller's wife. Apparently they had married without my knowledge or consent. So I had him hanged and I took her beneath the tree where he was swaying. She fought me the whole time. She was lucky I didn't hang her, too. A year later she came to my gates with a squalling baby in her arms. A baby she claimed was mine. I nearly had her whipped and the child thrown in the river. (Stands up). But then I looked at you and I saw then what I see now. You are my son. (After a moment). Stannis Baratheon has an army at Castle Black. But he won't stay for long. He wants the Iron Throne, and the road to King's Landing comes right through Winterfell. He means to take the North. But the North is ours. It's yours and mine. Will you help me defeat him?

RAMSAY: Yes.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK

INT. LIBRARY

Gilly walks through the bookshelves, examining them. Sam sits at the table reading.

GILLY: Is this every book there is?

SAM: Every book there is?

GILLY: In the world.

SAM: Well, no. There are thousands and thousands of books out there. This library is rather small, actually.

GILLY: Where you grew up, were there more books?

SAM: My father's not the most literate man. They say the Citadel has the largest library in the world.

GILLY: Where's that?

SAM: The Citadel? In Oldtown.

GILLY: I'm sorry I don't know things.

SAM: Gilly, look at me. You know how to do a hundred things I can never do. You can build a fire with wet wood. You can cook. You can stitch a wound.

GILLY: I can wash the linens. I can sweep the floor.

SAM: Well -

GILLY: Why does the Citadel have the biggest library?

SAM: It's where they train the maesters.

GILLY: Like Maester Aemon?

SAM: I wanted to be one when I was young. Instead, I became a man of the Night's Watch. Far more adventure up here anyway. I wouldn't have met you.

Stannis enters the library. Sam stands up.

SAM: Ah, Your Grace.

Gilly quickly exits.

STANNIS: You're Samwell Tarly?

SAM: I am, Your Grace.

STANNIS: Your father is Randyll Tarly. He defeated my brother at the Battle of Ashford. Only battle Robert ever lost. I told him he shouldn't go so far west so soon, but he never listened. Fine soldier, your father. You don't look like a soldier. But I'm told you killed a white walker.

SAM: I did, Your Grace.

STANNIS: How?

SAM: With a dagger made of dragonglass.

STANNIS: Dragonglass?

SAM: What the maesters call obsidian -

STANNIS: I know what it is. We have it in Dragonstone. Why would obsidian kill a walker?

SAM: I don't know. I've been going through all the old manuscripts hoping to find something, and all I've learned is that the children of the forest used to hunt with dragonglass.

STANNIS: The Lady Melisandre told me that death marches on the Wall.

SAM: I've seen it, Your Grace.

STANNIS: Seen what?

SAM: The army of the dead. And when they come -

STANNIS: We have to know how to fight them. (After a moment). Keep reading, Samwell Tarly.

Stannis leaves.

INT. DINING HALL

Davos carves away at a piece of wood. Stannis approaches him.

STANNIS: It's time.

DAVOS: Uh, Your Grace. Wouldn't it be better to wait? When Jon Snow returns with the wildlings, we could have thousands more men.

STANNIS: If Jon Snow returns with the wildlings. We can't wait that long. We have the advantage, more men, more horses, all fed and rested. But every day we wait, the odds shift in Bolton's favor. This could turn to winter at any moment. We have to act now. Give the order. We march at sunrise.

DAVOS: I'll choose a dozen men to stay and guard the queen and the princess.

STANNIS: No need, they're coming with us.

DAVOS: It's a tough road ahead, Your Grace. Won't they be safer -

STANNIS: Here? Half these watchmen are killers and rapists. No, they march with us.

They walk outside.

DAVOS: As you wish, Your Grace.

Stannis walks away. Davos spots Melisandre.

EXT. COURTYARD - THE NEXT MORNING

Stannis’s men prepare to ride out. Sam and Gilly watch. Gilly holds baby Sam. Olly, Edd, and some other watchmen are also shown watching.

SHIREEN: (On horseback). Do you think Father will let me go down into the crypt?

DAVOS: Beg your pardon?

SHIREEN: At Winterfell. All the Kings in the North are buried there. Bran the Builder and King Dorren and-

DAVOS: First things first. It's a long march ahead. And then we have to take the castle.

SHIREEN: Is there going to be a battle?

DAVOS: Aye, princess, but you won't be anywhere near -

SELYSE: That's enough talk of battle, Ser Davos. You'll scare the child.

DAVOS: Yes, my queen.

SHIREEN: I'm not scared.

DAVOS: Well, I am. When the battle comes, promise you'll protect me.

SHIREEN: (Smiling). I promise.

Shireen looks back at Gilly. Selyse catches her, and she looks down and away. Jon walks through the courtyard. He and Stannis meet on some stairs.

STANNIS: I hope you know what you're doing with these wildlings. I need those ships.

JON: You'll get them back, I swear it. Have a safe journey, Your Grace. And thank you.

Jon watches Stannis walk away and get on his horse. He makes eye contact with Melisandre, but she looks away. Stannis and his army begin leaving.

CUT TO: MEEREN

INT. GREY WORM’S ROOM

Missandei watches over Grey Worm. He suddenly gets up, startling her.

MISSANDEI: You're still too weak. (He lays back down).

GREY WORM: (Valyrian) How long have I been here?

MISSANDEI: (Valyrian) Three days.

He looks at her. His face is bruised.

GREY WORM: Ser Barristan?

Missandei shakes her head.

GREY WORM: (Valyrian) I failed him. I failed my men, I failed my queen.

MISSANDEI: (Valyrian) You failed no one. You fought bravely. You’ll fight again. (In Common Tongue) Are you ashamed? You were ambushed, outnumbered. There was no way you could have known.

GREY WORM: This is not why. Wounded in war, there is no shame for this. I am ashamed because when the knife go in and I fall to the ground, I am afraid.

MISSANDEI: All men fear death.

GREY WORM: No, not death. I fear I never again see Missandei from the Island of Naath.

Missandei looks down, on the verge of tears. She gets up and lies down in the bed with him, caressing his face, and then kissing him.

INT. DAENERYS’S CHAMBERS

Missandei and Daenerys stand, talking.

MISSANDEI: Now you have given the Masters what they deserve.

DAENERYS: If I give everyone what they deserve, I'll have no one left to rule. Ser Barristan counseled mercy when I took this city right up to the morning he died. Daario Naharis thinks I should kill the former Masters and let the rest of the city fend for itself. What do you think?

MISSANDEI: Your Grace, I think that I am not fit to have an opinion on these matters.

DAENERYS: (Sitting down). You are as fit as anyone I know. You know why I'm here. And you know who will suffer the most if this all falls apart. So what do you think?

MISSANDEI: I can only tell you what I have seen, Your Grace. (Sitting down). I have seen you listen to your counselors. I have seen you lean on their experience when your own was lacking and weigh the choices they put before you. And I have seen you ignore your counselors, because there was a better choice. One that only you could see.

INT. DUNGEONS

Daenerys is led by Unsullied to a room in a dungeon. The door is opened to reveal Hizdahr. She enters, and he kneels before her.

HIZDAHR: My, my queen, please do not do this.

DAENERYS: What about "Valar Morghulis"?

HIZDAHR: I did not want to die a coward. Apparently I do not want to die at all. (Sniffles).

DAENERYS: It takes courage to admit fear. And to admit a mistake. I came here to tell you that I was wrong. I was wrong and you were right. About tradition. About bringing the people of this city together. I will reopen the fighting pits. To free men only. Slavery will never return to Meereen, not while I live.

HIZDAHR: Yes, my queen.

DAENERYS: And in order to forge a lasting bond with the Meereenese people, I will marry the leader of an ancient family. (Hizdahr nods). Thankfully a suitor is already on his knees.

Hizdahr looks surprised. Daenerys faintly smiles, and then leaves. Hizdahr is left in the cell, with the door wide open.

CUT TO: SEA

EXT. JORAH’S BOAT

Tyrion wakes up and feels his head.

TYRION: Don't worry. I'll be fine. Nothing broken, I don't think. Where are we now? Not the Rhoyne. (No response). Long, sullen silences and an occasional punch in the face. The Mormont way. Let's start over. I apologize for before. My mouth sometimes runs away from me. This doesn't have to be an unpleasant trip. We're going to be spending a lot of time together on the way to Meereen.

JORAH: We are.

TYRION: What would make our time together truly enjoyable would be some wine.

JORAH: No wine.

TYRION: I am a person who drinks. People who drink need to keep drinking. Otherwise, they're not…

Jorah stands up and looks ahead. Tyrion turns as well. A large bank of fog lies ahead of the boat.

TYRION: I know where we are. You're taking us through Valyria.

JORAH: I am.

TYRION: Have you sailed this route before?

JORAH: No.

TYRION: You're going to bring Daenerys a souvenir from her ancestral homeland in case I'm not enough?

JORAH: I think you'll be plenty.

TYRION: You know what they say. The Doom still rules Valyria. What about the demons and the flames? Aren't you afraid of the Doom?

JORAH: No. But the pirates are.

TYRION: Oh.

EXT. RIVER SURROUNDED BY WOODS

TYRION: The Smoking Sea. How many centuries before we learn how to build cities like this again? Thousands of years the Valyrians were the best in the world at almost everything. And then -

JORAH: And then they weren't.

TYRION: And then they weren't. "They held each other close and turned their backs upon the end. The hills that split asunder and the black that ate the skies; The flames that shot so high and hot that even dragons burned; Would never be the final sights that fell upon their eyes. A fly upon a wall, the waves the sea wind whipped and churned -"

JORAH: "The city of a thousand years, and all that men had learned; The Doom consumed it all alike, and neither of them turned."

TYRION: I would clap.

He holds up his bound hands. Jorah smirks.

TYRION: I suppose this is it, then. This is what remains.

They look at the approaching ruins of the city. Suddenly Tyrion spots Drogon passing overhead. He stands up. Both of them look up and watch as he passes. Behind Tyrion, someone hops in the water. Jorah hears the splash and turns to see the ripples.

TYRION: What was that?

The boat passes into a tunnel. A Stone Man jumps down into the boat from the ceiling.

JORAH: Stone Men! Don't let them touch you!

Jorah hits the stone man from behind before he gets to Tyrion. They begin fighting. Another stone man jumps into the water and begins trying to get on the boat. Tyrion tries to keep him off. Jorah manages to push the first man into the water. He then begins fighting the other one.

JORAH: Get behind!

TYRION: Mormont, cut me free! (Jorah falls into the water). Mormont!

Jorah climbs back onto the boat and fights off the stone man. He manages to get his sword and cuts the stone man. The other stone man inches his way towards Tyrion.

TYRION: Mormont! Mormont!

Jorah cuts through the stone man he was fighting and pushes him into the water. Tyrion rolls into the water to avoid the other one. He desperately tries to remove the rope around his hands. A stone man grabs his ankle and begins attempting to pull him down. The screen fades to black. After a few moments, we see Tyrion’s perspective. Jorah stands over him as his eyes slowly blink open.

EXT. SHORE

JORAH: (Faintly). Tyrion? Tyrion. Tyrion. Tyrion. You're all right.

Tyrion looks around. Jorah helps him up. He unsheathes his knife and cuts Tyrion’s binds.

JORAH: You're heavier than you look. Did any of them touch you?

TYRION: (Shakes his head). You? (Jorah shakes his head). I've seen greyscale before, but nothing like that.

JORAH: I suppose that's why they send them there.

TYRION: It'd be kinder to put daggers in their hearts and be done with it. (Jorah spits). Thank you for saving me. Of course, I wouldn't have needed saving if you hadn't kidnapped me in the first place. (Jorah gets up). So what now?

JORAH: We walk, up the coast. With luck, we'll find a fishing village. Maybe another boat.

TYRION: Without luck?

JORAH: We've got a long walk ahead of us. I'll get some wood for a fire. Try to get some rest, huh?

TYRION: That's the best idea you've had all day.

Jorah walks away. After looking out for a moment, he stops, and pulls up his sleeve. He examines his wrist, which has the beginnings of greyscale. After a moment, he begins walking again.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
18
Unbowed, Unbent, Unbroken Script
Game of Thrones
Featuring Jeremy Podeswa
Produced By D.B. Weiss & David Benioff
Album: Season 5 Scripts
UNBOWED, UNBENT, UNBROKEN SCRIPT
INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - CHAMBER

Arya cleans, washes, and covers three different bodies. Two Faceless Men come in to carry the body away. Arya tries to follow them but the waif closes and locks the door.
ARYA: What are they doing with the bodies?

WAIF: Get back to work.

ARYA: No! I’ve been here for weeks. I’m not scrubbing one more corpse until you tell me why I’m doing it.

WAIF: You will know why.

ARYA: When?

WAIF: When it’s time. Not before. Get back to work.

ARYA: When do I get to play the game?

WAIF: Game?

ARYA: The game. The game of faces.

WAIF: You tried already. You failed.

ARYA: I didn’t even know I was playing.

WAIF: Who are you?

ARYA: No one.

WAIF: Get back to work.

ARYA: Well who are you? What are you doing here? How’d you get here?

WAIF: I’m from Westeros. Just like you. Daughter of a Lord. Just like you. Except I was an only child. Heir to his fortune. My mother died. My father remarried and his new wife gave birth to a girl. My stepmother didn’t want any rivals for her precious daughter so she tried to kill me with poison. I found out, sought help from the Faceless Men and my father was widowed again. I’ve been serving them ever since.

beat

WAIF: Was that true or a lie?

ARYA: What?

WAIF: Did you believe every word I said?

Arya is unsure.

WAIF: Get back to work.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - CHAMBERS - NIGHT

Arya is asleep.

JAQEN: Who are you?

Arya wakes up and turns to him.

JAQEN: Who are you?

ARYA: Arya.

JAQEN: And where did you come from?

ARYA: Westeros. My family home is Winterfell. I’m the youngest daughter of a great lord. Eddard Stark. He died in battle.

Jaqen hits Arya with a stick.

JAQEN: A lie.

ARYA: After he was executed I fled the capital. Had to kill a stable boy. Drove my sword through his back.

Jaqen hits her again.

JAQEN: A lie.

ARYA: I stabbed him in the gut. I tried to find my mother and brother. I never did. They were murdered by Walder Frey. An outlaw kidnapped me. A man called Polliver.

Jaqen hits her.

JAQEN: A lie.

ARYA: A man called the Hound. Sandor Clegane. He tried to sell me but was wounded in a fight. He begged me to kill him but I wouldn’t. I left him in the mountains to die. I wanted him to suffer, I hated him.

Jaqen hits her.

ARYA: I hated him.

Jaqen hits her.

ARYA: I hated him!

Jaqen hits her again.

ARYA: That’s not a lie!

JAQEN: The girl lies. To me. To the Many Faced God. To herself. Does she truly want to be no one?

ARYA: Yes.

Jaqen hits her. Arya starts bleeding from the mouth.

ARYA: I’m not playing this stupid game anymore!

JAQEN: We never stop playing.

Jaqen exits the room.

EXT. SHORE

Jorah inspects the Grey Scale then covers it up.

TYRION: So, those villages we were supposed to find. We can’t live on berries and roots.

JORAH: I can.

TYRION: You’re not hungry?

JORAH: Of course I’m hungry.

TYRION: You’re an awful travelling companion, do you know that? Possibly the least charming man I have ever met.

JORAH: I am not your travelling companion.

TYRION: We are travelling together. In each other’s company. Therefore…

JORAH: Do you ever shut up?

TYRION: I sailed from King’s Landing to Pentos in a crate. Without ever saying a word.

Jorah sits down next to Tyrion.

JORAH: Why?

TYRION: Never occurred to you to ask why until now? You never wondered why Tyrion Lannister decided to visit a brothel in Volantis.

JORAH: I’m sure you’ve visited many brothels in many cities.

TYRION: I killed my father. He wanted to execute me for a crime I didn’t commit. And he was fucking the woman I loved.

Jorah gets up.

TYRION: As miserable as you are, Mormont, at least your father was a good man.

JORAH: What do you know about my father?

TYRION: I met him. I visited the Wall. When I asked him about his men he knew all the stories, every one of them. He actually cared about the people in his command. How did they put it in the Watch? “We shall never see his like again.”

Jorah looks stunned.

TYRION: You didn’t know. I’m sorry. I am.

JORAH: How?

TYRION: I only know what I heard

JORAH (stronger): How?

TYRION: He was leading an expedition beyond the wall. There was a mutiny. He was murdered by his own men.

JORAH: We better keep moving.

He gets up and walks away, then Tyrion.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

Arya is scrubbing the floor. A man carries a young girl in and sets her by the pool. He walks over to Arya and she stops scrubbing.

MAN: Valar morghulis.

ARYA: Valar dohaeris.

MAN: I have nowhere else to go. I’ve taken her to every healer in Braavos. I’ve spent every penny I had. She suffers every day of her life. I just want it to end.

Arya looks the man in the eyes then walks over to the girl.

GIRL: It hurts.

ARYA: I know. Don’t be afraid. I used to be like you. I was sick. I was dying. But my father never gave up on me. He loved me. More than anything in the world, just like your father loves you. So he brought me here. My father prayed to the many faced god. And I drank the water from this fountain. It healed me.

Arya fills a cup with the water.

ARYA: I’ve devoted my life to him now. You don’t want to hurt anymore. Drink.

The girl takes a sip. Jaqen watches from afar.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - BODY ROOM

Arya fixes the dead girl’s hair. Jaqen walks in from the door Arya was trying to open earlier and leads her in. Arya follows him down a staircase lit by fire.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - HALL OF FACES

Arya looks up and sees the room is filled with columns containing the faces of the dead. She walks through the room, examining the faces.

JAQEN: Is the girl ready to give up her ears, her nose, her tongue, her hopes and dreams, her loves and hates, all that makes a girl who she is, forever?

Arya scans through the faces then fixates on one face in particular - that of an old lady.

JAQEN: No. The girl is not ready to become no one. But she is ready to become someone else.

EXT. COUNTRYSIDE

TYRION: Why Daenerys? Why is she worth all this? As I recall, the Mormonts fought against the Targaryens during Robert’s Rebellion.

JORAH: Do you believe in anything?

TYRION: I believe in many things.

JORAH: In something greater than ourselves, I mean. The Gods. Destiny. Do you believe there's a plan for this world?

TYRION: No.

JORAH: Neither did I. I was a cynic, just like you. Then I saw a girl step into a great fire with three stone eggs. When the fire burned out I thought I’d find her blackened bones. Instead I found her. Daenerys. Alive and unhurt. Holding her baby dragons. Have you ever heard baby dragons singing?

TYRION: No.

JORAH: It's hard to be a cynic after that.

TYRION: Doesn’t mean she’s going to be a great queen.

JORAH: No it doesn’t.

TYRION: The Targaryens are famously insane. What if she conquers the world? Then what? 1,000 years of peace and prosperity?

JORAH: First we have to conquer the world.

TYRION: We? Alright, let’s assume your dreams come true. She’s ecstatic when you bring her this enemy dwarf. She hacks off my head and restores your position. You command her army, sail to Westeros, defeat all your enemies, then watch as she climbs those steps and sits on the Iron Throne. Hurrah, long live the Queen. Then what?

JORAH: Then she rules.

TYRION: So a woman who has not spent a single day of her adult life in Westeros becomes the ruler of Westeros? That’s justice?

JORAH: She is the rightful heir.

TYRION: Why, because her father who burned living men for amusement was the king?

Jorah sees a ship anchored in the middle of the sea and pushes Tyrion behind a rock.

JORAH: Shh! It’s a slave ship

TYRION: Why is it anchored?

JORAH: They probably came ashore for--

MALKO: --water.

Malko and his men, all carrying swords, surround Tyrion and Jorah, smiling.

SAME PLACE - LATER

Tyrion and Jorah’s hands are tied. Malko punches Jorah in the face. He gets up.

MALKO: Got a lot of fight in you, huh?

Malko punches Jorah again.

SLAVER: Salt mines.

MALKO: That or a galley slave. He looks strong enough.

SLAVER: What about the dwarf?

MALKO: Worthless. Cut his throat.

The slaver’s man approaches Tyrion.

TYRION: Wait, wait! Wait, wait, wait, let’s discuss this!

MALKO: And then chop off his cock. We can sell it for a fortune. A dwarf’s cock has magic powers.

The slaver puts his sword to Tyrion’s throat.

TYRION: Wait, wait, wait, wait! You can’t just hand a dried cock to a merchant and expect him to pay for it. He has to know it came from a dwarf. And how could he know unless he sees the dwarf?

SLAVER: It will be a dwarf-sized cock.

TYRION: Guess again.

Tyrion looks to Malko.

MALKO: The dwarf lives until we find a cock merchant.

The slavers get Jorah and Tyrion to their feet.

JORAH: Queen Daenerys has outlawed slavery.

MALKO: We’re bound to Volantis, not Slaver’s Bay. Besides, she reopened the fighting pits. I never heard of free men fighting in the pits.

TYRION: The fighting puts in Mereen! You’re in luck then, you’re about to be rich. You are looking at one of the great warriors in the seven kingdoms.

Malko looks at Tyrion and laughs.

TYRION: (looks at Jorah) Him.

MALKO: Him? He’s got to be 60 years old.

TYRION: Sure, he’s a bit long in the tooth, a bit withered, been in the sun too long. We can all see that. But he is a veteran of 100 battles. They wrote songs about him!

Malko gestures to his men to bring Jorah closer.

Malko: Is that true?

Jorah nods.

TYRION: He won the tournament at Lannisport, unseating Ser Jaime Lannister himself.

Malko shakes his head and laughs.

TYRION: The Kingslayer!

MALKO: Jousting. You’re talking about jousting. A fancy game for fancy lads. The men who fight at Mereen will swallow him whole.

JORAH: I killed a Dothraki blood rider in single combat.

Malko jumps up, shocked, and gets in Jorah’s face.

MALKO: Liar.

JORAH: It’s no lie. His name was Qotho. He was bloodrider to Khal Drogo. Take me to Slaver’s Bay, put a sword in my hand, I’ll prove my worth.

Malko looks in his eyes, smiles, then nods.

EXT. KING’S LANDING - STREETS

Littlefinger walks by the Faith Militant.

LANCEL: Lord Baelish.

BAELISH: Yes? (Lancel approaches him) Lancel Lannister.

LANCEL: Brother Lancel. We abandoned our family names.

BAELISH: That’s quite a family to abandon.

LANCEL: The city has changed since you were here last. We flooded the gutters with wine, smashed the false idols, and sent the godless on the run.

BAELISH: Well done.

He tries to walk past Lancel. Lancel puts his hand on Baelish’s shoulder and stops him.

BAELISH: I’m here on urgent business for the Queen Mother. Should I send word that I’ll be delayed?

Lancel lets go.

LANCEL: Step carefully, Lord Baelish. You’ll find that there’s little tolerance for flesh peddlers in the new King’s Landing.

BAELISH: We both peddle fantasies, Brother Lancel. Mine just happen to be entertaining.

INT. CERSEI’S ROOM

BAELISH: Do you think it’s wise, your Grace, arresting the heir to Highgarden?

CERSEI: The Faith arrested the heir to Highgarden.

BAELISH: Of course. And the Faith were armed on your orders.

CERSEI: The King’s orders. Is the King to blame for Ser Loras’ perversion?

BAELISH: House Tyrell won’t tolerate these insults.

CERSEI: House Tyrell won’t tolerate it? I’m the insulted party, Lord Baelish. Ser Loras was promised to me, instead he chose the company of boys.

BAELISH: One’s choice of companion is a curious thing.

Cersei is silent for a moment.

CERSEI: Most curious. Lysa Arryn for instance. A sorrily repellent woman. Forgive me. I know you’re still in mourning.

BAELISH: Lysa was a good woman. A kind woman.

CERSEI: She was neither of those things, we both know it. Still, I pity her son. How fortunate that the young Lord of the Vale has a new father to counsel him.

BAELISH: I know how hard it can be to lose both of your parents at such a young age.

CERSEI: If war comes to Westeros will the Knights of the Veil fight for their king?

BAELISH: Young Lord Robyn heeds my advice. And I have always counseled loyalty to the throne.

CERSEI: Good. (Cersei gets up) If there’s nothing else.

BAELISH: There is another matter, your Grace. Something so urgent I couldn’t trust the words to a raven. You once charged me with finding Arya Stark. To my shame I failed you. But I have found Sansa Stark. Alive, and well, and home again. In Winterfell.

CERSEI: That’s not possible.

BAELISH: My sources are well placed. They tell me Roose Bolton plans to marry her to his son, Ramsay, a bastard recently legitimized by King Tommen.

CERSEI: Roose Bolton is Warden of the North by the grace of my father.

BAELISH: Indeed. As reward for stabbing his own king in the heart.

CERSEI: We were fools to trust a turncloak.

BAELISH: Marrying his son to the last of the Starks gives him more legitimacy in the North than an alliance with a hated southern house.

CERSEI: I will skin him and his bastard like that wretch on that bloody sigil.

BAELISH: I would counsel patience, your grace.

CERSEI: Patience? Sansa helped murder my son, Roose Bolton is a traitor.

BAELISH: Stannis Baratheon is also a traitor, marching with his army on Winterfell. Let Stannis and Roose battle, let the enemies of the throne slaughter each other and when they’re done seize Winterfell from whichever thief survives.

CERSEI: Winterfell is 1,000 miles away from here. The weather has already begun to turn.

BAELISH: That is why it is critical to strike soon, while the victor still licks his wounds. Surely your Uncle Kevan could muster a force.

CERSEI: My Uncle Kevan has all the courage of a kitchen mouse.

BAELISH: Ser Jaime, then.

CERSEI: Jaime is away on a sensitive diplomatic mission. I’ve no idea when he’ll be back.

BAELISH: Perhaps I can help. The Knights of the Vale are some of the best fighters in Westeros, trained to battle in the ice and the snow.

CERSEI: Forgive me Lord Baelish, you have a reputation as a money lender and brothel keeper, not a military man.

BAELISH: You wouldn’t risk a single Lannister soldier or a single coin from the Royal Treasury. What do you have to lose, a brothel keeper?

CERSEI: And if you succeed?

BAELISH: Name me Warden of the North.

CERSEI: I’ll speak to the king this evening. Have him issue a royal decree.

BAELISH: I’ll not rest until the lion flies over Winterfell.

CERSEI: And I’ll l know you’re a man of your word when I see Sansa Stark’s head on a spike.

BAELISH: As I said. I live to serve.

EXT. DORNE - GARDEN

Trystane puts a flower in Myrcella’s hair.

TRYSTANE: I’m going to ask him tomorrow.

MYRCELLA: What if he says no?

TRYSTANE: He won’t. You’ve waited long enough. I want you to be my wife now. What is it?

MYRCELLA: Do you want to marry me because our families arranged it, or do you…

Trystane kisses her in the middle of the sentence. Myrcella pushes him off.

MYRCELLA: We can’t. Not yet.

TRYSTANE: Why not?

MYRCELLA: You know why not. Someone will see.

TRYSTANE: You are going to be my wife. I am going to be your husband. We are allowed to walk through the gardens together.

MYRCELLA: How many other girls have you walked through these gardens?

TRYSTANE: I like the way your eyes go squinty when you’re jealous.

MYRCELLA: They don’t go squinty, and you didnt answer the question.

Cut to Doran and Areo on the balcony.

DORAN: They make a lovely couple. A Lannister and a Martell. They have no idea how dangerous that is. We must protect them.

AREO: Yes, my prince.

DORAN: You have not had to use that axe of yours in a very long time. I hope you remember how.

AREO: I remember how.

EXT. DORNE - COUNTRYSIDE

BRONN (singing): The Dornishman’s wife was as fair as the sun and her kisses were warmer than spring. The Dornishman’s blade it was made of black steel and its kiss was a terrible thing. The Dornishman’s wife would sing as she bathed in a voice that was sweet as a peach...

JAIME: Alright, thats enough.

BRONN: I’m coming to the best part.

JAIME: We’re trying to blend in. We don’t want everyone in Dorne to hear your accent.

BRONN: This song really is all about the ending.

JAIME: It can wait. Up there.

He spots a line of Dornishmen walking towards the Water Gardens.

JAIME: That’s the Water Gardens.

BRONN: Once we got the princess, then what?

JAIME: I like to improvise.

BRONN: That explains the golden hand.

EXT. DORNE - WATER GARDENS

Jaime and Bronn ride in behind common folk carrying meat and other goods. They break off from the pack.

INT. SHADOWY ROOM

ELLARIA: Unbowed, unbent, unbroken. For Oberyn.

SAND SNAKES: For Oberyn.

They storm towards the Water Gardens as Ellaria watches.

EXT. WATER GARDENS

Jamie and Bronn converge on Myrcella and Trystane as the Sand Snakes approach. They see the two kissing.

BRONN: Well, she’s made herself at home.

They walk over.

JAIME: Myrcella.

They stop kissing.

MYRCELLA: Uncle Jaime? I don’t understand, what are you doing here?

JAIME: Let’s speak in private.

TRYSTANE: I am Trystane Martell.

MYRCELLA: Trystane is my intended.

JAIME: Excellent. Good to meet you.

Jaime shakes hands with Trystane with his good hand.

TRYSTANE: We weren’t expecting you, Ser Jaime.

Bronn advances.

BRONN: Why don’t you let them have some time alone, son?

Trystane inspects Bronn’s armor, looking for a sigil.

BRONN: Let’s not do something stupid.

Trystane reaches for his sword and Bronn punches him across the face, knocking him out.

MYRCELLA: No!

BRONN: That was something stupid.

JAIME: We have to go, Myrcella, now.

MYRCELLA: You hurt him!

JAIME: You’ll be fine, I promise, but we have to--

A whip wraps around Jaime’s wrist. The Sand Snakes are here.

BRONN: Oh for fuck’s sake.

The Sand Snakes attack Jaime and Bronn, one wielding a spear, one wielding a whip, and one wielding a pair of daggers. They occupy Bronn and Jaime long enough for Obara to get to Myrcella.

OBARA: You’re coming with me.

MYRCELLA: I don’t want to!

OBARA: I wasn’t asking, princess.

Obara starts taking Myrcella out of the gardens. A Sand Snake cuts Bronn’s arm open. Areo and his men meet Obara as she escapes.

AREO: Drop you weapons!

The rest of Areo’s men surround the Sand Snakes, Bronn, and Jaime.

OBARA: I am Obara Sand. Daughter of Oberyn Martell. I fight for Dorne. Who do you fight for?

AREO: Drop your weapons!

The Snakes drop their weapons. Jaime stares down Areo, sword still in hand. Areo puts his axe to Jaime’s neck.

AREO: When you were whole, it would have been a good fight.

Jaime drops the sword, Areo’s men grab him. Bronn drops his sword.

BRONN (to Snake): You fight pretty good for a little girl.

She screams at Bronn and is restrained by Areo’s men. They are all escorted away. The rest of Areo’s men corner Elaria in the room outside the Gardens.

EXT. THE KINGSROAD

A carriage rides on the outskirts of King’s Landing.

RIDER: Halt!

Cut to inside the carriage.

OLENNA: Oh! You can smell the shit from 5 miles away. Well, why are we stopped, go on.

EXT. KING’S LANDING - GARDEN

OLENNA: Rumors and gossip, that’s all they got. It’s theater, nothing more. If they arrested all the pillow biters in King’s Landing there’d be no room left in the dungeons for anyone else.

MARGAERY: Everyone knew about him and Renly.

OLENNA: Renly Baratheon shagged half the stable boys in the Seven Kingdoms. Everyone knew. No one cared.

MARGAERY: But he was the king’s brother.

OLENNA: And Loras is the queen’s brother. No, no, no, no, this is unacceptable.

MARGAERY: Cersei is behind this.

OLENNA: Of course she is. She wants to drag our names through the dirt. Put us in our place. Get some rest, dear, you look appalling. Let me deal with Cersei Lannister.

INT. CERSEI’S ROOM

Cersei writes at her desk without acknowledging Olenna.

OLENNA: Your Grace, I have travelled a long way.

CERSEI: You must be exhausted.

OLENNA: Put the pen down, dear, we all know you aren’t writing anything.

CERSEI: Ah, yes, the famously tart-tongued queen of thorns.

OLENNA: And the famous tart Queen Cersei.

CERSEI: Beg your pardon.

OLENNA: I know you’re behind this absurd incarceration of my grandson.

CERSEI: If you apologize for that comment perhaps--

OLENNA: You’ll get your apology when I get Loras.

CERSEI: I was as shocked as anyone when The Faith arrested Ser Loras. I have no love for these fanatics. But what can the queen mother do?

OLENNA: Has the crown suddenly stopped needing the troops, gold, and wheat my house supplies?

CERSEI: I assure you our alliance with House Tyrell remains--

OLENNA: Do you expect the alliance to continue after you’ve thrown our future into prison?

CERSEI: As I said, i didn’t imprison anyone. As for your veiled threats--

OLENNA: What veil?

CERSEI: The Lannister-Tyrell alliance brought peace to a war-torn country. Do you really want to see the Seven Kingdoms slide back into warfare?

OLENNA: I didn’t trust your father. I didn’t particularly like him. But I respected him. He was no fool. He understood that sometimes we must work with our rivals rather than destroy them.

CERSEI: House Lannister has no rival. The High Septon has called for an inquest, not a trial. Just a small hearing to determine whether the charges against Loras have merit, which I’m sure they don’t. Loras will be freed, our happy alliance will continue, and we’ll forget this unfortunate conversation ever happened. Good day, Lady Olenna.

INT. HIGH SEPTON’S ROOM

HIGH SPARROW: You are aware of the rumors concerning you and Renly?

LORAS: I don’t pay attention to rumors.

SPARROW: You were said to be despondent when he died. Witnesses said that you refused to leave his bedside, even as Stannis’ army closed in

LORAS: He was my friend. He was my king.

SPARROW: Wasn’t Joffrey your king? He was anointed by the 7, not Renly.

LORAS: I was wrong to support Renly’s claim. I know that. But I was forgiven by Joffrey. I fought for him at the Battle of the Blackwater.

SPARROW: Wearing Renly’s armor.

LORAS: Why does it matter what I wore?

SPARROW: Do you deny all of the charges against you? Fornication, buggery, blasphemy.

LORAS: Of course I deny them.

SPARROW: You never lay with Renly Baratheon.

LORAS: Never.

SPARROW: Nor any other man.

LORAS: Never.

SPARROW: That will be all Ser Loras.

Loras walks back to his seat.

OLENNA: Well I think that’s quite enough of that.

SPARROW: Faith calls Queen Margaery forward.

MARGAERY: You call me forward?

SPARROW: Yes. We have some questions for you.

MARGAERY: I am the queen.

SPARROW: You are. And according to Law of the Seven, neither kings nor queens are exempt from testimony at a holy inquest.

Margaery walks to the stand.

SPARROW: How do you respond to these charges against your brother?

MARGAERY: They are lies.

SPARROW: All of them?

MARGAERY: All of them.

SPARROW: Queen Margaery, in the presence of the gods, do you swear that your brother is innocent of these charges against him, to the best of your knowledge?

MARGAERY: Yes, I swear it.

SPARROW: Thank you, your grace.

The Faith brings Olyvar in. Loras looks shocked. Cersei gives a thin smile.

SPARROW: Do you know this man?

OLYVAR: Yes, very well. He is Ser Loras Tyrell, heir to Highgarden.

SPARROW: How did you come to meet?

OLYVAR: I squired for him. He took a liking to me. He summoned me to his chamber the first day we met.

SPARROW: And what occurred in his chamber?

OLYVAR: We engaged in intimate relations.

SPARROW: You laid with him?

OLYVAR: That night and many others.

LORAS: Liar! He’s a liar!

SPARROW: Is there anyone else who can support your claim?

OLYVAR: Yes, yes, Queen Margaery. She walked in on us once not long ago. She didn’t seem surprised.

CERSEI: This testimony is an insult to a great house. Why should The Faith or anyone else take the word of a squire over the heir to Highgarden?

OLYVAR: He has a birthmark, your grace. Quite high on his thigh, wine-colored, and roughly the shape of Dorne.

Loras jumps at Olyvar and The Faith restrains him. Margaery and Olenna get up to leave and The Faith blocks their way.

LORAS: Liar!

OLENNA: What are you doing? Let us pass.

SPARROW: The Faith is satisfied that there is enough evidence to bring a formal trial for Ser Loras... and Queen Margaery.

MARGAERY: What?

SPARROW: Bearing false witness before the gods is as grave a sin as any. Take her.

The Faith grabs her and carries her out of the room.

MARGAERY: Tommen! Tommen!

King Tommen looks around the room, unsure of what to do.

MARGAERY: You can’t do this, I am the queen! Tommen, Tommen! I am your queen, how dare you!

Olenna glares at Cersei. Cersei smiles back.

INT. WINTERFELL - SANSA’S CHAMBER

Sansa looks at herself in the mirror. She hears a knock and opens the door. It's Myranda.

SANSA: What do you want?

MYRANDA: Lord Ramsay sent me to draw your bath, my lady. You want to be clean and fresh for your new husband don’t you?

Cut to Sansa in the bath. Myranda washes the black dye out of Sansa’s hair.

MYRANDA: You’re so beautiful. But if you need to keep him happy. Ramsay gets bored easily. You dont want to end up like... Well, like the others.

SANSA: What others?

MYRANDA: I shouldn’t gossip. It’s good to see the red again. No point in hiding anymore.

SANSA: What others?

MYRANDA: Let’s see. There was Kiera. The blacksmith’s daughter. She was tall. Like you. Lovely figure. But she talked and talked and talked and… Ramsay got tired of that. Then there was Violet. She had gorgeous blond hair. But she got pregnant and, well, that was boring. Then Tamsay. Such a sweet girl. Of course sweet girls get a bit dull after a while, don’t they? Ramsay let me come with him on that hunt.

SANSA: Hunt?

MYRANDA: Mm. Have you ever seen a body after the dogs have been at it? Not so pretty. But it’s your wedding day, why am I talking about such things?

SANSA: What was your name again?

MYRANDA: Myranda.

SANSA: And how long have you loved him, Myranda. Did you imagine that he would be with you forever, is that it? Then I came along and ruined it. I am Sansa Stark of Winterfell. This is my home and you can’t frighten me.

MYRANDA: Are you done with your bath, my lady?

SANSA: Go. I can finish on my own.

EXT. SANSA’S ROOM - MORNING

Snow falls outside. There is a knock on the door.

SANSA: Yes?

INT. SANSA’S ROOM

Theon enters.

THEON: I’ve come to escort you to the Godswood, my lady. If you please, my lady, will you take my arm?

SANSA: No.

THEON: Lord Ramsay, he said I'm to take your arm.

SANSA: I’m not touching you.

THEON: Please. He’ll punish me.

SANSA: Do you think I care what he does to you.

Sansa leaves the room without Theon.

EXT. THE GODSWOOD

Sansa walks to the Godswood with Theon. Ramsay is waiting alongside his father and with the Bolton men forming an aisle. Roose walks forward.

ROOSE: Who comes before the Old Gods this night?

THEON: Sansa of the House Stark comes here to be wed. A woman grown, trueborn and noble. She comes to beg the blessings of the gods. Who comes to claim her?

Ramsay steps forward.

RAMSAY: Ramsay of House Bolton. Heir to the Dreadfort and Winterfell. Who gives her?

THEON: Theon of House Greyjoy. Who was… who was her father’s ward.

ROOSE: Lady Sansa, will you take this man?

Long pause. Cut to Ramsay, Walda, and Myranda. Sansa steps forward.

SANSA: I take this man.

Ramsay smiles.

INT. RAMSAY’S CHAMBERS

Theon opens the door for Ramsay and Sansa.

RAMSAY: Are you pleased my lady?

Sansa nods.

RAMSAY: Good. I want you to be happy. My father said you’re still a virgin.

SANSA: Yes.

RAMSAY: Why? Why are you still a virgin? Afraid of dwarves?

SANSA: Lord Tyrion was kind, he was gentle, he never touched me.

RAMSAY: You’re not lying to me?

SANSA: No, my lord.

RAMSAY: Lying to your husband on his wedding night, that would be a very bad way to start a marriage. We are man and wife now, we should be honest with each other, don’t you think?

SANSA: Yes sir.

Ramsay kisses her.

RAMSAY: Good. Now take off your clothes.

Theon starts to leave.

RAMSAY: Oh, no no no. You stay here Reek. You watch. (to Sansa) Do I need to ask a second time? I hate asking a second time.

Sansa starts to undo her coat. Theon closes the door.

RAMSAY: Reek? I told you to watch.

Theon looks up.

RAMSAY: You’ve known Sansa since she was a girl. Now watch her become a woman.

Ramsay rips Sansa’s coat open and pushes her onto the bed. We hear clothes ripping. A belt being undone. Sansa starts moaning. Close up on Theon crying.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
22
The Gift Script
Game of Thrones
Featuring Miguel Sapochnik
Album: Season 5 Scripts
THE GIFT SCRIPT
EXT. CASTLE BLACK

Men of the Night’s Watch prepare the horses as snow falls on Castle Black. Thormund is brought before Jon. Jon looks at him, nods, and a Brother removes Tormund’s chains. Thormund raises his free hands to Ser Alliser in the distance and is carried away. Jon walks over to Alliser.
JON: First Ranger, you have command of Castle Black.

ALLISER: Lord Commander, it is my duty to tell you I believe this mission to be reckless, foolhardy, and an insult to all of the Brothers that have died fighting the wildlings.

Cut to Olly watching their conversation from afar.

JON: As always, thank you for your honesty.

Jon walks away to Sam.

SAM: Safe travels, Lord Commander.

JON: Thank you, Sam.

SAM: Oh, and…

Sam hands him a wrapped package. Jon opens it to find a sword.

SAM: It’s Dragonglass. It’s what I used to kill the White Walker. I hope you don’t need them.

JON: Me too.

They hug. Jon gets on a horse next to Tormund and rides away.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - MAESTOR AEMON’S ROOM

AEMON: There he is. That laugh. Egg! Egg laughed like that. One of the first things I remember about him.

Gilly looks at Sam, confused.

SAM: His little brother, Aegon. He became king.

AEMON: And before that, he was a jolly fellow. Like this one.

Aemon’s mood changes, he suddenly becomes panicked.

AEMON: Get him south, Gillyflower. Before it’s too late.

INT. WINTERFELL - HALLWAY

Theon carries a food plate across the hall. He arrives at a door and unlocks it.

INT. SANSA’S ROOM

Sansa is sleeping. Theon approaches and closes a window, waking Sansa.

SANSA: Theon, wait.

THEON: Not Theon, my lady. Reek.

Sansa sits up in bed, revealing cuts and bruises along her arms.

SANSA: Help me.

THEON: You’re his wife now.

SANSA: Theon

THEON: Do what he says. Do what he says or he’ll hurt you.

SANSA: He already hurts me every night. All day I’m locked in this room and every night he comes. It can’t be worse.

THEON: It can. It can always be worse.

Sansa stands up.

SANSA: What did he do to you?

THEON: Please…

Theon goes for the door. Sansa runs to the door and blocks him from leaving.

SANSA: You betrayed my family!

THEON: I’m sorry. I’m sorry!

SANSA: You have to help me!

THEON: He’ll see us. You don’t know him.

SANSA: My family still has friends in the North. All I have to do is give a signal and they’ll rescue me. Climb to the top of the Broken Tower, light this candle, and put it in the window. Promise me, Theon.

THEON: Reek, my lady, Reek!

SANSA: Your name is Theon Greyjoy. Last surviving son of Balon Greyjoy, Lord of the Iron Islands, do you hear me? Theon. Promise me.

Theon hesitates, nods, and exits the room.

EXT. WINTERFELL

Theon walks across Winterfell with the Broken Tower in the background.

INT. WINTERFELL - BROKEN TOWER

Theon climbs the stairs to the top floor. He opens the door to see Ramsay eating.

RAMSAY: Yes, Reek?

EXT. OUTSIDE WINTERFELL

Brienne stares at the top floor of the Broken Tower from beyond the walls of Winterfell.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - AEMON’S ROOM

Close-up on a candle, then Gilly’s baby.

AEMON: Egg! Egg! Mothers looking for you! Egg!

GILLY: Get some sleep, Sam. You’ll have to speak for him tomorrow.

SAM: You don’t know that.

GILLY: Get some sleep. I’ll watch over him.

SAM: I’ll stay too. He’s always been good to me. I can’t leave him now.

AEMON (panicked): Egg! Egg.. I dreamed... that I was old

EXT. CASTLE BLACK

Close up on Maester Aemon’s funeral pyre.

SAM: His name was Aemon Targaryen. He came to us from King’s Landing, a Maester of the Citadel, chained and sworn. And a sworn brother of the Night’s Watch, ever faithful. No man was wiser or gentler or kinder. At the Wall a dozen Lord Commanders came and went during his years of service, but he was always there to counsel them. He was the blood of the dragon, but now his fire has gone out. And now his watch has ended.

BROTHERS: And now his watch has ended.

Sam lights the pyre, then hands the torch to Alliser, who lights it then passes it along.

ALLISER: You’re losing all your friends, Tarly.

Sam looks up to see a Brother glaring at him.

EXT. WINTERFELL

Sansa walks up to Ramsay.

RAMSAY: My beautiful wife.

He kisses her.

RAMSAY: When my father told me we were marrying I half expected a fat, bearded beast. Do you know how pleased I was when I saw you? You’ve made me very happy.

They start walking down stairs. Sansa grabs a cross in the snow before they leave.

RAMSAY: Our scouts report that Stannis Baratheon rides for Winterfell. He’s a respected commander. His troops are loyal and battle tested. He’s hired thousands of foreign sell swords to bolster his army. But this storm was a stroke of luck for us northerners. Our people are used to fighting in frost. His army’s out there now, suffering in the snow. One day I’ll be Lord of Winterfell, and Warden of the North. You’ll be my Lady and Wardeness.

SANSA: But isn’t your step mother pregnant?

RAMSAY: What of it?

SANSA: What happens if she has a boy?

RAMSAY: Then I’ll have a baby brother.

SANSA: But he’ll be the heir.

RAMSAY: I’m Lord Bolton’s eldest son.

SANSA: But you’re a bastard, a true born will always have the stronger claim.

Ramsay stops walking.

RAMSAY: I’ve been naturalized by a royal decree of--

SANSA: Tommen Baratheon. Another bastard.

They start walking again.

RAMSAY: Bastards can rise high in the world. Like your half-brother Jon Snow. Born The Bastard of Winterfell, now the Lord Commander of the Night’s Watch.

Sansa looks shocked.

RAMSAY: You didn’t know? Yes, he’s done very well for himself. Ah. I near forgot why I asked you to join me. Come, my lady.

EXT. WINTERFELL

The woman who visited Sansa’s chamber previously is out in the open, flayed to death.

RAMSAY: Your Northern friend. Reek told me you wanted to leave.

Cut to Theon looking terrified.

RAMSAY: Why? Winterfell is your home and I am your husband.

Sansa continues to look at the woman, horrified.

RAMSAY: Tough old bird. Everyone talks when I start beating them. But this one. Her heart gave out before I got to her face. We do breed them tough in the North. Bring my wife back to her chamber. It’s far too cold out here for a lady. You should hold on to your candles. The nights are so long now.

He kisses her on the cheek then she is carried away.

EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP

Daavos rides through the camp on horseback, observing the men as they cough and huddle around each other. The snow is falling hard.

INT. STANNIS’ CAMP - STANNIS’ TENT

DAAVOS: 40 horses died in the night. We’ll lose more come sunset. We’re running out of food. We can’t open the supply line until the snow clears.

STANNIS: What else?

DAAVOS: The Stormcrows rode off last night.

STANNIS: 500 men.

Daavos nods. Stannis removes a Baratheon piece from his chess board.

STANNIS: Sell swords, loyal to nothing but gold.

DAAVOS: We still have a hard march to Wintefell and we won’t be marching anywhere in this weather.

STANNIS: And?

DAAVOS: This isn’t our time, we should head back to Castle Black when the snow clears.

STANNIS: I retreated from King’s Landing, Ser Daavos. If I retreat again, I become “The King Who Ran.”

DAAVOS: Your Grace..

STANNIS: Winter is coming. Those arent just the Stark words, it’s a fact. If we march back to Castle Black, we winter at Castle Black. And who can say how many years this winter will last.

DAAVOS: It’s better to wait for the right time than to risk everything.

STANNIS: This is the right time, and I will risk everything. Because if I don't, we’ve lost. We march to victory or we march to defeat, but we go forward only forward,

Daavos looks to Melisandre, lurking in the back of the tent.

DAAVOS: Your Grace. (leaves)

STANNIS (to Melisandre): I’ve trusted in your visions, in your prophecies for years.

MELISANDRE: You saw it yourself, my king, when you stared into the flames. A great battle in the snow.

STANNIS: I don’t know what I saw.

MELISANDRE: You do know. Trust yourself.

STANNIS: And you, do you trust yourself?

MELISANDRE: I trust in the Lord.

STANNIS: Are you sure?

MELISANDRE: I have seen myself walk along the battlements of Wintefell. I have seen the flayed men banners lowered to the ground.

She flips the Bolton pieces over on Stannis’ board.

MELISANDRE: But sometimes sacrifices must be made to ensure victory. I have shown you the power of king's blood. The Usurper Robb Stark. The Usurper Joffrey Baratheon.

STANNIS: We don’t have Robert’s bastard here.

MELISANDRE: No, we have someone better, and your blood runs through her veins.

STANNIS: Have you lost your mind?

MELISANDRE: Do you doubt me still? After all that you’ve seen?

STANNIS: There must be another way. Leeches or something.

MELISANDRE: There is only one way. You must become king before the Long Night begins. Only you can lead the living against the dead. All your life has led us to this moment. To this decision.

STANNIS: She’s my daughter.

Melisandre embraces him.

STANNIS: Get out.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - WASH ROOM

Gilly washes clothes. Two Brothers walk into the room.

DERRYK: The beauty from beyond The Wall.

Gilly starts walking away.

BRAND: Where are you going, huh? Aren’t we better looking than the fat man?

DERRYK: The question is, is she pretty down south in the real world, or is she pretty because she’s the only girl here?

BRAND: Even in White Harbor, I’d want a kiss.

DERRYK: Come on love, give us a kiss.

GILLY: Leave me alone.

DERRYK: If you were my girl I wouldn’t leave you alone.

BRAND: One little kiss.

DERRYK: Come on, give him a kiss.

BRAND: A man gets lonely guarding the Wall.

She tries to walk away. They slap the laundry basket out of her hands and trap her.

BRAND: There’s no need to be rude.

DERRYK: We just want a little affection.

She slaps Derryk across the face. Sam enters the room and pulls out his sword.

SAM: Get your hands off her. Brother Derryk. Brother Brand. I believe you both have guard duty tonight.

BRAND: Sam the Slayer. Are you gonna slay me with that sword?

DERRYK: Look at his hands shaking.

SAM: Gilly go on, Get back to your room and lock the door.

Derryk throws her to the floor.

SAM: I’m warning you.

DERRYK: Come on! Come on!

Sam swings the sword. It is deflected and he is subdued. Derryk punches him in the gut then starts kicking him.

DERRYK: You lying sack of shit! Killed a White Walker, eh? You fatass fuck. Come on, get up. (to Gilly) He’s your hero. He’s a hog!

GILLY: Leave him alone!

She charges at Derryk. He subdues her.

DERRYK: Stubborn little wilding bitch aren’t ya?

Brand kicks Sam in the face.

GILLY: Sam! Sam! Sam!

He punches Sam repeatedly in the face until he seems to lose consciousness.

BRAND: Alright. Hold still.

They both hold Gilly down as she screams. Sam gets back up.

SAM: I said get your hands off her.

BRAND: You’re gonna get yourself killed.

DERRYK: Roll over. Jon Snow’s not here to save you.

SAM: I killed a White Walker. I killed a Thenn. I’ll take my chances with you.

Ghost shows up and growls at the brothers. They sprint out of the room. Sam falls to his knees.

GILLY: Sam!

SAM: I’m alright.

GILLY: You’re not.

SAMMY: Just a bit woozy.

Sam collapses onto his side.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - BEDROOM

Gilly washes out Sam’s wounds with a wash cloth.

GILLY: The next time you see something like that you leave it alone.

SAM: I will not. They would’ve… I don’t know what they would have done

GILLY: I know they would have killed you if Ghost hadn’t come.

SAM: No. They were tiring out. I had them in the palm of my hand.

GILLY: Don’t be stupid Sam, you’re not a fighter.

SAM: What kind of man would I be if I ran away when I saw someone hurting you?

GILLY: Just promise me that whatever happens you’ll take care of little Sam.

SAM: Of course I will. And I’ll take care of you, too.

GILLY: I need more water.

She gets up. Sam grabs her arm.

SAM: Stay. Please.

Gilly gets on top of Sam and starts kissing him. She gets back up, and puts her hands around his neck and starts kissing him again.

GILLY: Am I hurting you?

He shakes his head no.

GILLY: Are you sure?

Sam nods yes. She pulls his pants down, pulls her dress up, and starts riding him.

SAM: Oh. Oh my.

EXT. VOLANTIS - SLAVER’S AUCTION

The slaves are carried up to the auction stage. One of Malko’s men whips Tyrion.

MALKO: A rare find for the fighting pits, my friends. Not your usual street tough old drunken pirate. This one’s a Westerosi knight from an ancient house, trained in sword and lance. he fought beside the Stag King Robert on the far side of the Narrow Sea. He was first from the breach during the siege of Pyke, slaughtering 50 men with his flaming sword. He killed the great Khal Drogo in single combat. Betrayed by his woman, he sold himself into slavery to repay his debts. Bidding begins at 12 gold honors.

A hand goes up.

MALKO: 13. Do I have 14?

A hand goes up.

MALKO: 15? 15 golds honors. Do I have 16?

A man in the front who has been studying Jorah intently raises his hand.

SLAVE BUYER: 20.

MALKO: Sold!

Jorah is taken away.

TYRION: Wait! You have to buy me as well.

BUYER: Why?

TYRION: We’re a team. I’m a great fighter, too.

The crowd laughs.

MALKO: He’s funny. You have to give him that.

The man holding Tyrion’s chains laughs at him. Tyrion yanks his chains, pulling the man to the ground, and starts beating on him with the chains as the crowd roars. Tyrion kicks him in the head then looks to the buyer.

BUYER: Alright. He’s funny.

He hands Malko coins.

TYRION: Thank you my Lord. Thank you.

BUYER: Yes.

TYRION: My Lord, if I may. I’ve heard Mereen’s become a free city. You might run into trouble if you try to fight slaves in the fighting pits. Now if you were to fight free men who were paid a wage…

The buyer hits Tyrion in the mouth then tosses him a few coins.

BUER: Here’s your wages, funny man. It’ll last the rest of your life.

INT. MEREEN - DAENERYS’ CHAMBER

DAARIO: How long before the king of Mereen comes to claim my pillow?

DAENERYS: Don’t be ridiculous. My marriage to Hizdahr is political. I think he’s smart enough to understand that.

DAARIO: I think the Sons of the Harpy have stopped killing because their leader was made king.

DAENERYS: Are you jealous?

DAARIO: Do you think I’m petty enough to speak ill of a man just because he represents competition?

DAENERYS: I do.

Daario laughs.

DAARIO: You’re right. My motivations are entirely impure.

They start kissing.

DAARIO: Doesn’t make me wrong.

DAENERYS: You told me yourself, I can’t fight enemies within and without. So when enemies from without come knocking, I need the city of Mereen behind me. I have no choice.

DAARIO: Everyone has a choice. Even slaves have a choice. Death or slavery.

DAENERYS: So what else can I do?

DAARIO: Marry me instead.

DAENERYS: Even if I wanted to do such an inadviseable thing, I couldn’t.

DAARIO: Why not? You’re our queen, you can do as you like.

DAENERYS: No. I can’t

DAARIO: Then you are the only person in Mereen who’s not free.

Daenerys sits up in bed.

DAARIO: I know I’m here to serve my queen and not to give advice, but can I make one more suggestion?

DAENERYS: Of course

DAARIO: On the day of the Great Games, gather all the great masters, and wise masters, and worthy masters you can find, and slaughter them all.

DAENERYS: I am a queen. Not a butcher.

DAARIO: All rulers are either butchers or meat.

INT. KING’S LANDING - GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR

OLENNA: You there! Where would I find the High Septon, or High Sparrow, or whatever bloody fool name he’s got.

HIGH SPARROW: It’s not as good a name as Queen of Thorns, I’ll admit.

OLENNA: You should have the decency to stand when you talk to a lady.

SPARROW: You should have the decency to kneel before the gods

OLENNA: Don’t spar with me little fellow.

The High Septon gets up.

SPARROW: For me, it’s the knees. You?

OLENNA: Hips.

SPARROW: Huh.

OLENNA: A man of the people, is that your game? It’s an old game. dull and unconvincing. A man of the people who does Cersei’s dirty work for her.

SPARROW: The people always do the dirty work.

OLENNA: Spare me the homilies, I can smell a fraud from a mile away.

SPARROW: A useful talent.

OLENNA: I’m here for my grandson and granddaughter.

SPARROW: Your grandson and granddaughter swore sacred vows and lied. The Father judges us all. Sons of high lords, sons of fishermen. If you break his laws you will be punished.

The High Sparrow heads for the door.

OLENNA: Don’t you walk away from me.

SPARROW: You don’t give commands here, Lady Olenna.

OLENNA: What is it you want? Gold? I’ll make you the richest septon who ever lived.

The High Sparrow laughs.

OLENNA: What then?

SPARROW: I imagine this is strange for you. Everyone you meet has a hidden motive, and you pride yourself on slitting in and out. But I’m telling you a simple truth: I serve the gods. The gods demand justice.

OLENNA: How do they communicate their demands? By raven or horse?

SPARROW: By the holy text. The seven pointed star. If you don’t have one in your library I’ll give you my own.

OLENNA (with contempt): I’ve read the seven pointed star.

SPARROW: Then you’ll remember the passages concerning buggery and perjury. Your grandchildren will be punished in the same manner as anyone who breaks the sacred laws.

OLENNA: Half the men, women, and children in this foul city break the sacred laws. You live among murderers, thieves, and rapists. And yet you punish Loras for shagging and Margaery for defending her brother?

SPARROW: Yes. The Gods’ laws must be applied to all equally.

OLENNA: If it’s equality you want then so be it. When House Tyrell stops sending our crops to the capital, everyone here will starve. And I’ll make sure the hungry know who to blame,

SPARROW: Have you ever served the field, Lady Olenna? Have you ever reaped the grain? Has anyone in House Tyrell? A lifetime of wealth and power has left you blind in one eye. You are the few. We are the many. And when the many stop fearing the few…

He walks out of the room.

EXT. SEPT OF BAELOR

SQUIRE: Lady Olenna.

He hands her a letter with Baelish's mockingbird sigil.

INT. KING’S LANDING - DINING ROOM

CERSEI: Starving yourself won't make things any better for her, my love.

TOMMEN: She’s in a prison cell and there’s nothing I can do. I am the king! The queen is in prison and there’s nothing I can do!

Tommen walks to the window. Cersei joins him.

CERSEI: No matter who you are, no matter how strong you are, sooner or later, you'll face circumstances beyond your control.
Events you couldn't possibly have anticipated or prevented even if you had. You cannot blame yourself for fate. Your father, your brother, your grandfather-- I was Queen of the Seven Kingdoms and what could I do? Hold them as they left this world. Kissed their heads after they'd gone.

TOMMEN: I’ll call in the army. I’ll take back the sept and kill every last one of them. I’ll start a war if I have to.

CERSEI: You know as well as I do who the first casualty in that war would be.

TOMMEN: I love her. I love her. I can’t help her.

CERSEI: We must be strong for those we love. We cannot give in to despair.

TOMMEN: I will speak to the high sparrow. There must be something--

CERSEI: Let me speak to him on your behalf. The king cannot dirty sully himself negotiating with an unwashed fanatic.

CERSEI: Your happiness is all I want in this world

TOMMEN: I know.

CERSEI: No you don’t. You can’t possibly. Not until you have children of your own. I would do anything for you. Anything to keep you from harm. I would burn cities to the ground. That is all that matters. You and your sister. From the moment you came into this world, my boy. My only boy.

Cersei embraces him and starts crying.

INT. DORNE

Jaime is being kept in a closely monitored room.

AREO: Prince Doran hopes this satisfies your concerns about the princess’s wellbeing.

Areo brings Myrcella into the room.

MYRCELLA: You looked different when I left. You had more hair.

JAIME: And more hands. How’s Trystane?

MYRCELLA: He’ll be alright.

JAIME: I’m sorry for that. It wasn’t supposed to happen that way.

MYRCELLA: Why is it happening at all?

JAIME: Your mother’s worried about you. Threats have been made. Dorne is too dangerous for you. I’ve come to take you home.

MYRCELLA: This is my home, this has been my home for years. I didn’t want to come here but she told me to. I did what she said, I did my duty and now she’s forcing me to go back?

JAIME: It's for your own good. These are complicated matters.

MYRCELLA: It’s not complicated at all, it’s simple. I love Trystane, I’m going to marry him, and we’re staying right here.

JAIME: I don’t understand.

MYRCELLA: Of course you don’t! You don’t know me!

Myrcella leaves the room.

INT. DORNE - CELL

BRONN (singing): Brothers oh brothers, my days here are done, the Dornishman’s taken my life. Bur what does it matter, for all men must die, and I’ve tasted the Dornishman’s wife! Yes I’ve tasted the Dornishman’s wife!

In the adjacent cell to Bronn, Tyene claps as the other Snakes glare at her.

TYENE: He’s got a good voice.

OBARA: We’re lucky he’s a singer. If he were a fighter we might have been in trouble.

BRONN: It’s against my code to hurt a woman.

OBARA: It’s amazing how many men we beat seem to have this code.

BRONN: I wouldn’t say you beat me.

TYENE: How’s your arm?

BRONN: Wonderful. Wouldn’t feel right to leave Dorne without a new scar.

TYENE: You think you’re leaving Dorne?

BRONN: No great hurry. Dornish women are the most beautiful women in the world.

TYENE: Thank you.

BRONN: I said Dornish women. I didn’t say you.

TYENE: I’m not the most beautiful woman you’ve ever seen?

BRONN: I’ve seen quite a few women in all the Seven Kingdoms.

TYENE: Name one more beautiful than I am.

BRONN: Well now, in King’s Landing there was an absolutely gorgeous...

Tyene takes one of her breasts out of her tunic.

TYENE: There was a what? In King’s Landing you were saying.

BRONN: Was I?

TYENE: There was a woman more beautiful than I am.

Tyene takes both her breasts out.

BRONN: Was there? My memory’s not what it was earlier.

TYENE: How’s your arm now?

BRONN: You seem concerned with it. You must really like me.

Tyene undoes the rest of her tunic.

TYENE: And how about your head?

BRONN: My head… You don’t even wanna know what’s going on in…

As Bronn scans her naked body, his vision starts to blur and he collapses to the ground.

TYENE: Your nose is bleeding.

BRONN: It’s nothing. It’s the dry air.

TYENE: My dagger was coated with a special ointment from Asshei. They call it the Long Farewell. It takes time to work, but if a single drop makes contact with the skin, death.

She holds a tiny blue cap up to Bronn from her cell.

TYENE: The only antidote. Who’s the most beautiful woman in the world?

Bronn gasps for breath.

TYENE: Sorry? Who?

BRONN (finally): You.

TYENE: Don’t drop it.

Tyene tosses it into his cell and Bronn downs it.

TYENE: I think you’re very handsome as well.

INT. KING’S LANDING - BAELISH’S BROTHEL

Littlefinger peers at the Great Sept of Baelor through the window. The brothel is destroyed, with many seven-pointed stars scribbled on the floor, walls, and artwork.

BAELISH: I’m sorry about the locale.

OLENNA: No you’re not.

BAELISH: It felt like the safest place.

OLENNA: Not for your clientele, clearly.

BAELISH: It was an establishment like no other. The sheer range of appetites catered to, desires that didn’t exist until we invented them.

OLENNA: You’ve always been rather impressed with yourself, haven’t you?

BAELISH: The past is the past. The future is all that’s worth discussing. The future of House Tyrell.

OLENNA: Don’t pretend to have any concern for my house, my grandchildren, or me. I should have known you’d return to the capital once things started going wrong.

BAELISH: I promise you..

OLENNA: I promise you, Lord Baelish, that our fates are joined. Together we murdered a king. And if my house should fall, I would have nothing to hide. And if i should meet with some accident here at this broken little flesh market, they’ll never even find what’s left of you. So do you deny a part in all of this?

BAELISH: Cersei summoned me to King’s Landing. I dared not refuse her.

OLENNA: And what did she want?

BAELISH: A piece of info that she know that I had. Neither silence nor lies were an option. But I have other information of which she is unaware. And as you say, our interests are aligned. I have a gift for you.

OLENNA: What kind of gift?

BAELISH: The same kind I gave Cersei. A handsome young man.

INT. MEREEN - FIGHTING PITS - WAITING AREA

Gladiators prepare their swords and armor.

SLAVE OWNER: Many worthy fighters have died trying to make it to the Great Games. When most of you worthless scum join them in death this afternoon it will represent a significant rise in your station. But if you happen to triumph here you will fight at the great pit of Daznak itself in front of the queen. So whatever happens, the gods have smiled upon you today. Today is the day your lives actually start to mean something.

Close-up on Jorah.

OWNER (O.S.): You and you, you, you two, you, you, and you.

Jorah is not one of the gladiators selected.

OWNER: Valar morghulis.

MEN: Valar dohaeris.

OWNER: Prepare yourselves.

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

DAENERYS: Sitting through the great games will be bad enough.

HIZDAHR: For generations, in the days leading up to the great games, it has been customary for our ruler to make the rounds to the lower pits to pay the fighters there the honor of her presence.

The fighters enter the pit.

OWNER: Move yourselves!

The slave owner sees Daenerys and runs in front of her and Hizdahr.

OWNER: Your Grace. Your Future Grace. You honor us all.

The owner gets all his gladiators to face Dany, whispering instructions to them.

OWNER: “We fight and die for your glory, O glorious queen.”

MEN: “We fight and die for your glory, O glorious queen.”

The fight begins

INT. FIGHTING PIT - WAITING AREA

Jorah hears “O glorious queen” and runs to the edge of the pit. He sees Daenerys through the grated entrance to the ring.

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

One bald gladiator dominates the pit. He slits one fighter’s throat, and slices another fighter’s leg as he runs away.

DAENERYS: I think I’ve seen enough.

HIZDAHR: Your Grace, it’s a tradition for the queen to stay until the victor has emerged.

DAENERYS: I’ve sacrificed more than enough for your traditions.

INT. FIGHTING PIT - WAITING AREA

Jorah straps a helmet on.

TYRION: What are you doing?

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

Jorah rushes the pit. His owner tries to stop him but he knocks him out with the butt of his sword. Jorah takes out the bald man as he was smashing a man’s head in with a rock. Daenerys takes notice of the fighter but can’t see his face.

INT. FIGHTING PIT - WAITING AREA

The other gladiators that weren’t chosen to fight follow Jorah’s lead and enter the ring. Tyrion tries but is chained up. He starts sawing at his chain.

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

Jorah melees a fighter with a shield, then knocks another out with his own helmet.

INT. FIGHTING PIT - WAITING AREA

A giant man sees Tyrion sawing at his chains. He raises a giant sword above Tyrion’s head, but comes down on the chain, freeing Tyrion. Tyrion nods in thanks.

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

Daenerys is watching intently now. Jorah is the last man standing. He walks up to Daenerys and Hizdahr and removes his helmet. She stares at him for a moment.

DAENERYS: Get him out of my sight.

Her men grab Jorah.

JORAH: Khaleesi, please, I just need a moment of your time. I brought you a gift.

TYRION (O.S.): It’s true. He has.

Tyrion enters the pit.

DAENERYS: Who are you?

TYRION: I am the gift. It’s a pleasure to meet you, Your Grace. My name is Tyrion Lannister.

Cut to Dany in shock and deep thought after hearing his name.

INT. KING’S LANDING - BLACK CELL

Cersei enters Margaery’s cell.

CERSEI: This is horrible. Unacceptable. Are they feeding you enough at least? I brought you this. Venison. It’s quite good. I had it myself for supper only last night. We did everything we could from the moment they took your brother. Tommen even went to the sept himself to confront the high sparrow, but I fear The Faith has left reason behind.

MARGAERY: I know you did this.

CERSEI: We are making every effort on your behalf. I swear to you by all the seven gods.

MARGAERY: Lies come easily to you. Everyone knows that. But innocence, decency, concern? You’re not very good at those, I’m afraid. Perhaps that’s why your son was so eager to cast you aside for me.

CERSEI: You’re upset. You’re not thinking clearly. I’ll visit again when you’ve had a chance to calm down.

MARGAERY: I don’t want to see you again.

CERSEI: I do hope you change your mind about that. I’ve been told men often go mad in the Black Cells below the Red Keep, but I suppose your isolation will end once your trial begins.

MARGAERY: Leave.

CERSEI: Yes, I’m afraid I must. My son needs me now more than ever.

Margaery throws the medicine at Cersei.

MARGAERY: Get out you hateful bitch!

CERSEI: Sleep well, sister.

Cersei walks out smiling. She is taken to High Septon’s room by a Sparrow.

INT. GREAT SEPT - CHAPEL

HIGH SPARROW (to Sparrow): Thank you. (to Cersei) You saw her?

CERSEI: Yes.

SPARROW: And?

CERSEI: Her accommodations seem sufficient. What happens to her now?

SPARROW: Well she and her brother are both being held under fair suspicion. A trial will be held for each of them to determine if they are guilty of any acts that might constitute a violation of the tenants of the faith.

CERSEI: Who will stand judge?

SPARROW: Seven septons. As it was in all trials before the Targaryens.

CERSEI: Will you be one of them?

SPARROW: I will.

CERSEI: If one or both of them were to confess before the trial…

SPARROW: Then they will be at The Mother’s mercy.

CERSEI: What does The Mother’s mercy entail?

SPARROW: It depends on the situation. The acts themselves, the degree of contrition.

CERSEI: Thank you High Septon for bringing them whatever justice they deserve in the eyes of the Seven.

SPARROW: Did you know this chapel is one of the oldest structures in King’s Landing?

CERSEI: I think I may have heard at one point.

SPARROW: Baelor built his sept around it. But men worshipped here long before him.

The High Septon gestures to a stone altar with seven-pointed stars engraved into it.

SPARROW: Who carved this altar do you know?

CERSEI: I’m afraid i don’t.

SPARROW: No one does. There’s no name on it. Or anywhere else in the chapel. The people who built this place didn’t inflict their vanity on the people who came after them. The way Baelor did with that great gilded monstrosity out there. Their faith was clean.

Strip away the gold and the ornaments, knock down the statues and the pillars, and this is what remains. Something simple, solid, and true. The Tyrell’s finery will be stripped away. Their lives knocked down, their true hearts laid bare for all to see. And so it will be for all of us, high and low alike. What will we find when we strip away your finery?

The High Septon stares intently at Cersei.

SPARROW: A young man came to us not long ago, broken in body and spirit. He had so much to strip away, so much weighing him down. But piece by piece he unburdened himself. Let go of vanity, pride, sin, now his soul is so light he will float through the Seven Heaves like a bird.

Cersei gives a faint laugh.

SPARROW: And he has much to say about you.

Lancell enters the room and stands next to the High Septon. Cersei goes for the door and is blocked.

CERSEI: Move. Let me go immediately.

Cersei is grabbed and carried away from the room.

CERSEI (O.S.): You will order her to let me go! I am the queen! I am the queen! Have you lost your mind? Let me go! You filthy… I am the queen! Let me go!

INT. BLACK CELL

Cersei is thrown into the cell. She looks up at the people who put her there.

CERSEI: Look at me. Look at my face. It’s the last thing you’ll see before you die.

The door slams closed and is bolted shut.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
41
Hardhome Script
Game of Thrones
Featuring Miguel Sapochnik
Album: Season 5 Scripts
HARDHOME SCRIPT
INT. MEEREEN - PYRAMID

JORAH: Your Grace, I want to say--
DAENERYS: You will not speak. How do I know you are who you say you are?

TYRION: If only I were otherwise.

DAENERYS: If you are Tyrion Lannister why shouldn’t I kill you? To pay your family back for what it did to mine

TYRION: You want revenge against the Lannisters? I killed my mother Joanna Lannister the day I was born. I killed my father Tywin Lannister with a bow to the heart. I am the greatest Lannister killer of our time.

DAENERYS: So I should welcome you into my service because you murdered members of your own family?

TYRION: Into your service? Your Grace we have only just met. It’s too soon to know if you deserve my service.

DAENERYS: If you’d rather return to the fighting pits just say the word.

TYRION: When I was a young man I heard a story about a baby born during the worst storm in living memory. She had no wealth, no lands, no army, only a name and a handful of supporters, most of whom probably thought they could use that name to benefit themselves. They kept her alive, moving her from place to place, often hours ahead of the men who had been sent to kill her. She was eventually sold off to some warlord on the edge of the world and that appeared to be that. And then a few years later the most well informed person I knew told me that this girl without wealth, lands, or armies had somehow acquired all 3 in a very short span of time, along with three dragons. He thought she was our best, last chance to build a better world. I thought you were worth meeting at the very least.

DAENERYS: And why are you worth meeting? Why should I spend my time listening to you?

TYRION: Because you can not build a better world on your own. You have no one at your side who understands that land you want to rule. The strengths and the weaknesses of the houses that will either support or oppose you.

DAENERYS: I have a very large army and very large dragons.

TYRION: Killing and politics aren’t always the same thing. When I served as Hand of the King I did quite well with the latter considering the king in question preferred torturing animals to leading his people. I could do an even better job advising a ruler worth the name.

DAENERYS: So you want to advise me. Very well. (looks to Jorah) What would you have me do with him? I swore I would kill him if he ever returned.

TYRION: I know.

DAENERYS: Why should the people trust a queen who can’t keep her promises?

TYRION: Whomever Ser Jorah was when he started informing on you, he is no longer that man. I can’t remember seeing the same man as devoted to anything as he is to serving you. He claims he would kill for you and die for you, and nothing I have witnessed gives me reason to doubt him. And yet he did betray you.

Tyrion approaches Daenerys and Missandei. Her guards raise their spears to her. Daenerys waves them off.

TYRION: Did he have an opportunity to confess his betrayals?

DAENERYS: Yes, many opportunities.

TYRION: And did he?

DAENERYS: No. Not until forced to do so.

TYRION: He worships you. He is in love with you, I think. But he did not trust you with the truth - an unpleasant truth, to be sure - but one of great significance to you. He did not trust that you would be wise enough to forgive him.

DAENERYS: So I should kill him?

TYRION: A ruler who kills those that are devoted to her is not a ruler that inspires devotion. And you’re going to need to inspire devotion, and lots of it, if you’re ever going to rule across the Narrow Sea. But you cannot have him by your side when you do.

DAENERYS: Remove Ser Jorah from the city.

Daenerys and Jorah hold back tears. Jorah is escorted out of the Pyramid. Jorah checks his Greyscale and walks away.

INT. BLACK CELLS

The Septa holds water out to Cersei.

SEPTA: Confess.

CERSEI: My son. Let me speak to--

She slaps Cersei with a spoon.

SEPTA: Confess. I meant it.

CERSEI: My face will be the last thing you see before--

She slaps her with a spoon again then leaves. Cersei starts screaming.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

ARYA: My name is Lana. I’m an orphan. When I was 8 I begged enough money to buy my first bucket of oysters, and I sold that bucket and made enough money to buy 2 more.

CUT TO: EXT. BRAAVOS - MARKET

Arya pushes an oyster cart through a crowded market.

ARYA (V.O.): Iit took a while but I finally saved enough to buy myself an oyster cart. Now every morning I make my way down to the canals. I pass the fish mongers and the bakers. I usually see Lhara, my first customer of the day on my way home. Then I turn left onto Moonsinger Lane--

CUT TO: INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

Jaqen slaps her.

ARYA: Left onto Ragman Lane, where I do most of my trade.

JAQEN: Lana is very impressive. Very industrious. She will make a fine servant for the Many Faced God.

ARYA: How will she serve him?

JAQEN: She will no longer turn left onto Ragman Lane. She will turn right and go to Ragman Harbor.

ARYA: What will she do there?

JAQEN: She will see.

ARYA: See what?

JAQEN: How can a man tell a girl this. If he knew what she would see, there would be no reason to send her.

ARYA: Oysters, clams and cockles!

Arya takes a right with the cart.

ARYA: Oysters clams and cockles! Oysters clams and cockles!

THIN MAN: Your oysters fresh?

ARYA: Best in the city.

THIN MAN: You wouldn’t lie to an old man would you?

Arya cracks an oyster and hands him one he slurps it.

THIN MAN: Very nice. Give me 4. With vinegar.

A man throws a bag of money and a map on the Thin Man’s table.

MAN: It’s my 18th voyage. I’ve returned from all of them without a scratch on me.

THIN MAN: Can’t do it.

MAN: Please I have 3 children. Without me-- here take it you have to, I have 3 children, what will they do? Please you have to! Please! You don’t understand?

He is carried away as the Thin Man slurps the oyster

CUT TO: INT. THE HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

JAQEN: The man is a gambler. He wages that his sailor's ship will make it to its destination. It is a strange wager for the captain. He only wins if he loses his life.

ARYA: So why would a captain make the wager in the first place?

JAQEN: A girl tells a man that she has seen.

ARYA: If the captain dies, the thin man pays his family a lot of money.

JAQEN: But perhaps the gambler loses his bet and decides that he doesn’t have to pay after all. A destitute woman and her small child, what can they do to such a man if he keeps their money for himself? To whom can they turn for recourse?

Arya looks to see a man praying on the floor.

ARYA: The Many Faced God. You said you didn’t know what I would see at the docks.

JAQEN: A man had no idea what she would see and what she would not. A girl named Lana will return to the docks. She will watch the gambler. She will come to know as much about him as she knows about herself.

ARYA: And then what?

JAQEN: A gift for the Thin Man.

He holds up a clear vile. Arya takes the vile, smiling.

WAIF: She is not ready.

JAQEN: Perhaps she is, perhaps she’s not.

WAIF: And if she’s not?

JAQEN: It is all the same to the Many Faced God.

INT. BLACK CELLS

Qyburn enters the cell and bows.

QYBURN: The trial will take place. The High Sparrow will be presenting a substantial case against you.

CERSEI: The charges?

QYBURN: Fornication, treason, incest, the murder of King Robert.

CERSEI: All lies.

QYBURN: Of course, Your Grace. My concern is that The Faith does not adhere to the same standards of proof as the crown. And I hope you’ll excuse me for saying it, but belief is so often the death of reason.

CERSEI: I wish you’d said it sooner. Any word from Jaime?

QYBURN: I’m afraid not. Your Grace, Grand Maester Pycelle has summoned your Uncle Kevan back from Casterly Rock to serve as Hand of the King. He now presides over the small council.

CERSEI: Tell him I need to speak to him.

QYBURN: I implored him to visit you but he would not.

CERSEI: What about my son, the king? If you can visit me then surely the king--

QYBURN: Your arrest, and Queen Margaery’s arrest, the king has not taken well. He remains in his chambers, his servants often find his food in the hall. Left untouched.

CERSEI: You need to talk to him, you need to talk to my son to come and see me, come and see his mother.

QYBURN: I tried my grace, he wouldn’t see me. He wouldn’t see anyone.

CERSEI: I can’t stay here.

QYBURN: There is a way, Your Grace. A way out.

CERSEI: Confess? To the High Sparrow? I won’t. I made him. I rose him up from nothing, I will not kneel before some barefooted commoner and beg his forgiveness.

The septa enters the room.

QYBURN: Goodbye my queen. The work continues.

Qyburn leaves the cell.

INT. WINTERFELL - SANSA’S CHAMBER

Theon enters Sansa’s room and sets food down.

SANSA: Why. Why Theon.

THEON: Not Theon. There is no Theon. Reek.

SANSA: Reek. Why did you tell him, Reek?

THEON: I was helping you. You were trying to escape, there is no escape. Not ever. Theon Greyjoy tried to escape. The master knew. He knows everything. He hunted him, he caught him, he strapped him to a cross, and cut away piece after piece until there was no Theon left.

SANSA: Good. If it weren’t for you I’d still have a family. If I could do to you what Ramsay did to you right here, right now, I would.

THEON: I deserved everything. I deserve to be Reek. I did terrible things. Turned on Robb. Captured Winterfell. Killed those boys.

THEON: They weren’t “those boys”, they were Bran and Rickon. They were your brothers, you’d know them since they were born.

THEON: They weren’t. They were only--

SANSA: Only what?

THEON: I can’t..

SANSA: Tell me!

THEON: I can’t, not unless the master says...

SANSA: Tell me, they weren’t what?!

THEON: They weren’t...

SANSA Tell me why Bran and Rickon should be dead while you still breathe the air. Tell me to my face Theon, tell me that they weren’t your brothers!

THEON: They weren’t Bran and Rickon! I couldn’t find them. It was two farm boys. I killed them and burned them so no one would know.

SANSA: You didn’t…?

Theon shakes his head no.

SANSA: Do you know where they went, Bran and Rickon?

THEON: I can’t talk to you anymore.

SANSA: Theon, you have to tell me, do you have any idea where Bran and Rickon--

THEON: Not Theon, Reek!

Theon runs out the door.

INT. WINTERFELL - HALL

BOLTON BANNERMAN: Our scouts tells us he’s got no more than 6000 men. More than half of them are mounted, however.

ROOSE: And how high can Stannis’ horses jump? Our walls have been full repaired our walls have been reinforced. We have enough food for six months. We are more prepared for a siege than they could have ever been. All we have to do is wait for them to freeze, starve, and mutiny.

Ramsay gives a disagreeing look.

ROOSE: You disagree?

RAMSAY: Stannis isn’t from the North. You are, father. I think you’re missing an opportunity to show the people of the North how House Bolton treats southern invaders.

ROOSE: And what do you recommend?

RAMSAY: That we not sit and wait to let Stannis to decide what type of fight this is going to be. That we hit first, and hit hard, and leave a feast for the crows.

ROOSE: A smart commander does not surrender a defensive advantage. As long as we stay behind these walls they can’t touch us. Not to mention that the snow is so deep that we couldn’t get an army through if we wanted to.

RAMSAY: I don’t need an army. I need 20 good men.

INT. MEEREEN

DAENERYS: So have you decided yet? Whether I’m worthy of your service?

TYRION: Have you decided yet whether you’re going to have me killed?

DAENERYS: It’s probably my safest option.

TYRION: I can see why you would think so. It’s what your father would have done.

DAENERYS: And what would your father do?

TYRION: My father? Who publicly sentenced me to death? I’d say his thoughts on having me killed were abundantly clear.

DAENERYS: Is that why you killed him?

TYRION: Some day if you decide not to execute me, I’ll tell you all about why I killed my father. And on that day, should it ever come, we’ll need more wine than this.

DAENERYS: I know what my father was. What he did. I know the Mad King earned his name.

TYRION: So here we sit, two terrible children of two terrible fathers.

DAENERYS: I’m terrible?

TYRION: I’ve heard stories.

DANERYS: Why did you travel to the other side of the world to meet someone terrible?

TYRION: To see if you were the right kind of terrible.

DAENERYS: Which kind is that?

TYRION: The kind that prevents your people from being even more so.

DAENERYS: I did reopen the fighting pits. Under my rule murder will once again become entertainment.

TYRION: Yes, that was wise. And you agreed to marry someone you loathed for the greater good. Very impressive. My own sister married someone she loathed as well, though not by choice and certainly not for the greater good, Gods forbid. She ended up having him killed.

DAENERYS: Perhaps it won’t come to that.

TYRION: It’s not impossible that Varys was right about you after all.

DAENERYS: Varys? King Robert’s spy master?

TYRION: Yes. He was the one who convinced me to come find you. He was my travelling companion before Ser Jorah seized that role for himself.

DAENERYS: Jorah sent my secrets to Varys. For 20 years the spider oversaw the campaign to find and kill me.

TYRION: He did what he had to do to survive. He did a lot of other things that he didn’t have to do. I suspect he’s the main reason you weren’t slaughtered in your crib.

DAENERYS: But you trust him?

TYRION: Yes, oddly. He might be the only person in the world that I trust. Besides my brother.

DAENERYS: The brother who killed my father.

TYRION: That’s the one.

DAENERYS: Perhaps I will have you killed after all.

TYRION: Your queenly prerogative. I had given up on life until Varys convinced me you might be worth living for. You chop off my head? Well, my final days were interesting.

DAENERYS: I’m not going to kill you.

TYRION: No? Banish me?

DAENERYS: No.

TYRION: So if I’m not going to be murdered, and I’m not going to be banished...

DAENERYS: You’re going to advise me. (takes his wine cup) While you can still speak in complete sentences.

TYRION: Advise you on what?

DAENERYS: How to get what I want.

TYRION: The Iron Throne. Perhaps you should try wanting something else.

DAENERYS: If I want jokes I’ll get myself a proper fool.

TYRION: I’m not entirely joking. There’s more to the world than Westeros after all. How many hundreds of thousands of lives have you changed for the better here? Perhaps this is where you belong. Where you can do the most good.

DAENERYS: I fought so that no child born into Slaver’s Bay would ever know what it was like to be bought or sold. I will continue that fight here and beyond. But this is not my home.

TYRION: And when you get back to your home, who supports you?

DAENERYS: The common people.

TYRION: Let’s be generous and assume that’s going to happen. Here in Slaver’s Bay you had the support of the common people and only the common people. What was that like, ruling without the rich? House Targaryen is gone, not a single person who shares your blood is alive to support you. The Starks are gone as well, our two terrible fathers saw to that. The remaining Lannisters won’t back you, not ever. Stannis Baratheon won’t back you either, his entire claim to the Throne depends on the illegitimacy of yours. That leaves the Tyrells. Not impossible, but not enough.

DAENERYS: Lannister, Targaryen, Baratheon, Stark, Tyrell. They’re all just spokes on a wheel. This one's on top, then that ones on top and on and on it spins, crushing the people on the ground.

TYRION: It’s a beautiful dream. Stopping the wheel. You’re not the first person to have dreamt it.

DAENERYS: I’m not going to stop the wheel. I’m going to break the wheel.

EXT. FIGHTING PIT

Two gladiators spar. Jorah walks to the pit. The master whistles for them to stop fighting. Jorah flips him a coin.

JORAH: You said whoever wins would fight at the Great Pit in front of the queen. I won.

MASTER: You struck me.

JORAH: I’ve been flogged if it makes you happy. I’m the best you’ve got. If I win at the Great Pit how much can you sell me for?

MASTER: You’re a free man, you could have gone anywhere, why did you come back?

JORAH: Let me fight for her and I belong to you.

INT. BLACK CELLS

SEPTA: Thirsty? Confess.

CERSEI: I’ll get out of here, you realize. Before long.

SEPTA: Confess.

CERSEI: I can make you a wealthy woman. A lady of the court.

SEPTA: Confess.

CERSEI: I can make sure you die in the most hideous way imaginable, and all I do is sit here imagining ways for you to die.

She dumps her water out on the floor. Cersei licks it from the floor when she leaves.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - SAM’S ROOM

GILLY: Does it hurt?

SAM: No.

GILLY: Good.

SAM: How are you?

GILLY: I’m not the one who got punched and kicked in the face.

SAM: You know what I mean.

GILLY: I’m good.

SAM: Are you scared?

GILLY: A little.

SAM: Me too.

There is a knock on the door. Sam grabs his knife.

SAM: Who’s there?

OLLY: Olly.

Sam puts the knife down.

SAM: Come in.

OLLY: I heard what happened.

SAM: Not to worry. Men brawl from time to time. It’s only natural.

Olly sets a tray of food on Sam’s bed.

OLLY: Figured you were hungry.

SAM: You’re a good lad.

OLLY: Wanted to ask you something. (Olly looks at Gilly) If you’ve got the time.

GILLY: I need to check on baby Sam.

She exits the room.

SAM: Now then. How can I help?

OLLY: It’s about the Lord Commander.

SAM: Yes?

OLLY: He’s going up to Hardhome to save all them wildlings. Wildlings killed my mom and dad. They killed everyone in my village.

SAM: We’ve been fighting them for years.

OLLY: This wasn’t a fight. We were farmers and they slaughtered us. So why’s he saving them?

SAM: Wildlings are people, just like us. There are good ones and bad ones.

OLLY: The one he’s travelling with, the one with the red beard, he led the raid on my village.

SAM: Olly...

OLLY: How can he trust him?

SAM: I’ve seen the army of the dead. I’ve seen the white walkers, and they’re coming for us, for all the living. And when it’s time we’ll need every last man we can find.

OLLY: But what if we let the wildings through the gates and they cut our throats while we sleep?

SAM: Jon’s taking a risk, but he has to. We don’t stand a chance otherwise. Sometimes a man has to make hard choices, choices that might look wrong to others but you know are right in the long run.

OLLY: You believe that?

SAM: With all my heart.

Olly looks conflicted. He walks towards the door.

SAM: Try not to worry Olly. I’ve been worrying about Jon for years. He always comes back.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

The ships full of Crows and wildlings dock at Hardhome. Jon and Tormund get out together. The camera fixates on the swords on their hips.

TORMUND: You trust me Jon Snow?

JON: Does that make me a fool?

TORMUND: We are fools together now.

They walk to meet the men and women of Hardhome, lead by the Lord of Bones.

TORMUND: Lord of Bones. Been a long time.

LORD OF BONES: Last time I saw you the little crow was your prisoner. The other way around now. What happened?

TORMUND: War.

LORD OF BONES: You call that a war? The greatest army the North has ever seen cut to pieces by a southern king.

TORMUND: We should gather the elders find somewhere quiet to talk.

LORD OF BONES: You don’t give the orders here.

TORMUND: I’m not giving an order.

LORD OF BONES: Why aren’t you in chains?

JON: He’s not my prisoner.

LORD OF BONES: What is he?

JON: We’re allies.

The Hardhome wildlings complain loudly.

LORD OF BONES: You fucking traitor! You fight for the crows now.

TORMUND: I don’t fight for the crows.

JON: We’re not here to fight. We’re here to talk.

LORD OF BONES: Is that right? You and the pretty crow do a lot of talking, Tormund. And when you’re done talking, do you get down on your knees and suck his cock--

Tormund grabs the Lord of Bones’ staff from him and beats him to death with it.

TORMUND: Gather the elders and let’s talk.

INT. HARDHOME - CABIN

Jon is surrounded by Karsi, a Wildling chieftess, Loboda, a Thenn, a Wildling elder, and various other Wildlings.

JON: My name’s Jon Snow. I’m Lord Commander of the Night’s Watch. We’re not friends. We’ve never been friends. We won’t become friends today. This isn’t about friendship. This is about survival. This is about putting a 700 foot wall between you and what’s out there.

KARSI: You built that wall to keep us out.

LOBODA: Since when do the crows give 2 shits if we live?

JON: In normal times we wouldn’t. But these aren’t normal times. The white walkers don’t care if a man’s Free Folk or Crow. We’re all the same to them. Meat to their army. But together we can beat them.

KARSI: Beat the white walkers? Good luck with that. Run from them, maybe.

Jon holds the bag full of Dragonstone to Karsi. She looks at it hesitantly.

JON: It’s not a trick. It’s a gift for those who join us.

Karsi examine the glass in shock.

JON: Dragonglass. A man of the Night’s Watch used one of these daggers to kill a walker.

LOBODA: You saw this?

JON: No. But I trust the man.

KARSI: There are old stories about Dragonglass.

LOBODA: There are old stories about ice spiders big as hounds.

KARSI: And with the things we’ve seen you don’t believe them?

JON: Come with me and I'll share these weapons.

KARSI: Come with you where?

JON: There are good lands south of the wall. The Night's Watch will allow you through the tunnel and allow your people to farm those lands.

There is hesitation.

JON: I knew Mance Rayder. He never wanted a war with the Night’s Watch, he wanted a new life for his people. For you. We’re prepared to give you that new life.

KARSI: If…?

JON: If you swear you join us when the real war begins.

LOBODA: Where is Mance?

JON: He died.

LOBODA: How?

JON (after a long pause): I put an arrow through his heart.

The wildlings in the cabin start to riot.

LOBODA: I say we send the Lord Commander back to Castle Black with no eyes.

Loboda brandishes his axe. Tormund steps forward.

TORMUND: None of you saw Mance die! I did. The Southern King who broke our army, Stannis, wanted to burn him alive to send him a message. Jon Snow defied that cunt’s orders. His arrow was mercy. What it did took courage, and that’s what we need today: the courage to make peace with men we’ve been fighting for generations.

KARSI: I lost my father, my uncle, and 2 brothers fighting the damn crows.

JON: I’m not asking you to forget your dead. I’ll never forget mine. I lost 50 brothers the night that Mance attacked the wall. But I’m asking you to think about your children now. They’ll never have children of their own if we don’t band together. The Long Night is coming and the dead come with it. No clan can stop them. The free folk can’t stop them. The Night’s Watch can’t stop them. And all the southern kings can’t stop them. Only together, all of us, and even then it might not be enough, but at least then we’ll give the fuckers a fight.

There are small nods of approval throughout the room.

KARSI: You vouch for this man, Tormund?

TORMUND: He’s prettier than both my daughters, but he knows how to fight. He’s young, but he knows how to lead. He didn’t have to come to Hardhome. He came because he needs us. And we need him.

LOBODA: My ancestors would spit on me if I broke bread with a crow.

KARSI: So would mine, but fuck 'em, they’re dead.

Karsi walks in front of Jon.

I’ll never trust a man in black.

Karsi walks over to Tormund.

But I trust you, Tormund. If you say this is the way, we’re with you.

TORMUND: This is the way.

WILDLING ELDER: I’m with Tormund. We stay here we’re dead men. At least with King Crow there’s a chance.

GIANT: Tormund.

LOBODA: Keep that new life you want to give us. Keep your glass, King Crow. Soon as you get on his ships they’re gonna slit your throats and dump your bodies to the bottom of the Shivering Sea. That’s our enemy. That has always been our enemy.

Wildlings start leaving the cabin and head towards the boats.

KARSI (to Tormund): I fucking hate Thenns.

Tormund nods.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

Jon, Tormund, and Karsi lead the Wildlings to the boats.

JON: How many are with us? 5000?

TORMUND: I’m not good at counting.

JON: We’re leaving too many behind.

TORMUND: The free folk are stubborn. You know how long it took Mance to band them together. 20 fucking years.

JON: And he knew them better than I ever will.

TORMUND: They’re running out of food and there’s nothing to hunt. They’ll come around.

Cut to Karsi loading two children onto a boat.

KARSI: Johnna is gonna look after you. She’s in charge, you listen to her.

DAUGHTER: I wanna go with you.

KARSI: I need to get the old folks on the boats. I’m right behind you, I promise. (she kisses them on the forehead) Go on.

INT. HARDHOME - CABIN

The Giant picks up a piece of Dragonglass and strokes it intently. Edd begins picking up the pieces of glass and looks at the giant with his piece of glass. Wun Wun turns to Edd and stares at him annoyed.

WUN WUN: Lokh kif rukh?

Edd leaves. Dogs are barking outside.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

Jon loads girls onto a boat then turns to hear the dogs barking. The wind starts whipping from a neighboring cliff and the dogs start whimpering. Every wildling and Crow slowly turns to the source of the noise.

EXT. HARDHOME - GATE

LOBODA: Shut the gate.

Men hurry towards the gate to board it up. More howling from the distance. The Wildlings on the other side of the gate begin charging the gate.

LOBODA: Shut the gate!!

Men rush to put a board in place to hold the gate shut.

SHOUTING: Wait! Open the gate! Let us in! Help us! Please open it!

Loboda walks to the gate with his axe and peers through a small hole in the wall. There is a faint scream in the distance, then a wight charges at the hole in the wall.

LOBODA: Ready your arrows!

The wights claw at the gate. Arrows are nocked and fired. A wight sticks his hand through the gate and Loboda chops it off.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

There is a mad rush towards the boats with many people jumping in the water to catch one.

JON: Get in line! Get in line!

EXT. HARDHOME - GATE

A wight tries to climb the gate.

INT. HARDHOME - CABIN

Wights crawl to the top of the cabin and jumps through the hole in the roof. The men prepare their weapons and the giant growls.

EXT. HARDHOME - GATE

One wight tries to climb under the gate. A barrage of arrows flies at the wights trying to get through the wall. Most of them land. The wight crawls even further under the gate. The wights start making holes in the gate. A sword sticks through the gate coming close to Loboda on the gate. Loboda dodges the sword, looks down to see the wight crawling under the gate, and stomps its head in.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

The people continue to rush onto the boats with Jon, Tormund, and Karsi leading them.

JON: Hold the line! Hold the line!

NIGHT’S WATCH BROTHER: Lord Commander!

JON: Get them to the ship and come back for me!

BROTHER: But you’ll never make it--

JON: Now!

Karsi approaches Jon.

JON: You should be on one of those boats.

KARSI: So should you ! My little girl has gone on. They're gonna let them pass the wall even if you’re not there ?

JON: You have my word. I’ve given orders.

KARSI: Don’t think you’re gonna be there to enforce those orders !

Karsi heads back to helping people onto the boats.

TORMUND: If they get through, everyone dies !

JON: Night’s Watch with me! Move! Move! Move!

Jon, Tormund, Karsi, and the Night’s Watch brothers charge from the shore to the gate.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

The wights have knocked a hole into the gate big enough to crawl out of. One breaks through, tears someone apart, and then is taken down. A group of wights storm through the same hole. Cut to an overhead that shows just how many wights are behind the gate.

Jon arrives at the gate. He pins a wight to the gate with Longclaw as Tormund and Karsi kill the wights that have already gotten through. The archers take out the wight Jon pinned to the gate, and then the men cover the hole the wights had been escaping from with a sled.

Fighting continues. A group of wights tear into a Crow. Loboda and Karsi continue to kill the wights.

Jon looks up through the mist and sees 4 White Walkers on horseback on the top of the cliff.

JON: The Dragonglass!

LOBODA: You’re with me, lad! Now!

Jon and Loboda charge towards the cabin. Jon cuts a wight in half then kills another. The giant breaks through a wall in the cabin as the cabin starts to go down in flames. He shakes the wights off of his back, snapping some in half and stomping others into pieces. Jon and Loboda storm the cabin.

INT. HARDHOME - CABIN

The entire cabin is on fire. A White Walker wielding a staff walks towards them through the fire.

LOBODA: Get the glass.

Loboda walks towards the White Walker as Jon scrambles towards the Dragonglass. Loboda misses with his axe twice, getting it caught in the wall. He pulls it out to parry in time, but the Walker’s spear shatters his axe. The Walker plunges his spear through Loboda's stomach.

Jon reaches the glass but is thrown across the room by the Walker before he can pick it up, causing Longclaw to fly out of the cabin. Jon ducks from the Walker’s swings with his spear, and runs out to grab another sword. The Walker swings and shatters the sword. He knocks Jon down again. Jon struggles, then gets up again, running to pick up Longclaw. He stumbles and drops the sword. The White Walker staggers towards him. Jon picks up Longclaw just in time to match the White Walker, and to both of their surprises, Longclaw stops the Walker’s spear. The Walker deflects one blow from Jon, but then he swings and shatters the Walker into pieces.

Jon falls to the ground after the struggle. The Night’s King watches him alone from the top of the cliff.

EXT. HARDHOME - GATE

Tormund and Karsi continue to tear through wights. Karsi looks up, and sees a group of blue-eyed wight children staring at her. They do nothing for a moment, then charge at her, chewing and clawing her to death.

Cut to Jon crawling across the snow, coughing up blood. A man grabs him and Jon puts Longclaw to his neck. The man turns out to be Edd and they lower their weapons.

JON: The Dragonglass!

EDD: Fuck the glass! We’re gonna die here.

A screech comes from the top of the cliff. Hundreds of wights dive from the top of the cliff. They appear to have died for a brief moment after landing, but then wake up and charge at Jon and Edd.

Cut to Tormund continuing to hold the gate. The gate starts creaking then comes down. Tormund runs to the boat.

The giant starts roaring as the other gate comes down, swinging a fiery log. Jon, Tormund, and Edd sprint towards the boat with the giant clearing a path for them with the log. The Night’s King continues to watch them from the top of the cliff.

EXT. HARDHOME - SHORE

Jon, Tormund, and the Crow jump off the dock onto the boat.

JON: Go! Go! Go!

TORMUND: Wun Wun, to the sea.

The giant stays back, continuing to take out loads of wights by swinging his flaming log. He begins to walk towards the boat, ripping the wights hanging onto him off of his back and throwing them into the water to die.

JON: Let’s go now! Now!

Jon looks back to shore to see the Wights, along with a White Walker, killing the last surviving wildlings.

Slowly, a figure walks to the end of the dock. The camera pans up to reveal the Night’s King. He stares at Jon and Jon stares back. The Night’s King turns his head to the carnage at the edge of the shore and then looks back to Jon. He slowly starts raising his arms.The dead wildlings twitch, then open their eyes to reveal blue. Karsii comes back to life, blue-eyed . They all start standing up, joining the army of the dead, and staring at Jon. Jon can do nothing but stare back at the Night’s King back as the boat drifts away.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
27
The Dance of Dragons (Script)
Game of Thrones
Album: Season 5 Scripts
THE DANCE OF DRAGONS (SCRIPT)
EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP - NIGHT

A man walks by each of the tents.
INT. MELISANDRE’S TENT

Melisandre stares into the fire. She exits the tent.

EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP - NIGHT

Melisandre surveys the camp. In the distance, a tent catches on fire. Men start screaming and rushing out of their tents. A burning horse runs by Melisandre.

EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP - MORNING

DAVOS: A band of 20 men, maybe less. They were in and out before anyone spotted them, burnt our food stores to the ground, all our siege weapons were destroyed, dozens of tents were--

STANNIS: Horses?

DAVOS: We’re still getting a count, but hundreds are dead.

STANNIS: 20 men rode into our camp without a single guard sounding the alarm?

DAVOS: The northerners know more about their land than we ever will.

STANNIS: Put last night’s guards in chains, either they fell asleep or they were conspiring with the enemy. Find out the truth and then hang them.

DAVOS: Unless there’s a thaw, we can’t press forward to Winterfell, and we don’t have enough food to get us back to Castle Black.

STANNIS: We’re not returning to Castle Black.

DAVOS: Forgive me, Your Grace, I never claimed to be an expert in military matters. But if we can’t march forward, and we won’t march back…

Stannis looks to Melisandre and Selyse. Davos follows his gaze then looks back.

STANNIS: Have the dead horses butchered for meat.

Stannis walks over to Melisandre.

EXT. THE WALL

The Hardhome survivors, led by Jon, Tormund, Tollett, and Wun-Wun, approach the wall. Alliser looks down at the group. Jon steps forward, Alliser stares for a moment, then--

ALLISER: Open the gates.

The lower gate is lifted.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK

The Hardhome Wildlings are being escorted through Castle Black.

JON: It was a failure.

SAM: It wasn’t.

JON: I went to save them, I failed.

SAM: You didn’t fail him, or him, or her. Every one of them is alive because of you, and no one else.

JON: I don’t think that fact’s lost on them.

Cut to many men of the Night’s Watch glaring at Jon, then Olly who exchanges a long look with Jon from the top of the stairs. Alliser walks down the steps to Jon.

ALLISER: You have a good heart, Jon Snow. It will get us all killed.

INT. STANNIS’ TENT

Stannis is studying his chessboard. There are 2 Baratheon pieces next to a sword and opposed to 2 Bolton pieces. Davos enters the tent.

DAVOS: You sent for me, Your Grace.

STANNIS: Find you some healthy horses and a few good men to guard you, I’m sending you back to Castle Black. Tell the Lord Commander to send food, supplies, fresh horses, in return when I take the throne I’ll make sure the Night’s Watch has all the men it requires. He can guard all 19 castles if he so wishes.

DAVOS: Your Grace, you’ve named me your Hand.

STANNIS: Yes.

DAVOS: The King’s Hand should never abandon the King, especially in a time of war.

STANNIS: You’re not abandoning me, you’re obeying a command.

DAVOS: A boy with a scroll could deliver this message.

STANNIS: And if Jon Snow refuses a boy with a scroll, what does the boy say? I didn’t name you hand for your expertise in military matters, ride for Castle Black, don’t come back empty handed.

DAVOS: Your Grace, perhaps Queen and Princess Shireen could accompany me.

STANNIS: My family stays with me.

DAVOS: At least let me take Shireen. A siege is no place for a little girl.

STANNIS: My family stays with me.

EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP

The men are shivering, waiting in line for food. Davos walks by.

INT. SHIREEN’S TENT

Shireen is reading one of her books. Davos enters.

DAVOS: What’s this one now?

SHIREEN: "The Dance of Dragons: A True Telling" by Grand Maester Munkun.

DAVOS: Well that sounds like a proper story.

SHIREEN: Ser Byron Swann wanted to kill the dragon Vhagar. He polished his shield for a week, til the steel was like a mirror. Then he crouched behind it, and crept forward, hoping the dragon would only see his own reflection.

DAVOS: But the dragon only saw a dumb man, holding a mirrored shield.

SHIREEN: And burnt him to a crisp.

Davos and Shireen share a laugh.

DAVOS: Thus ending the dragonslaying career of Ser Byron Swann. I made you something, Princess.

Davos hands her a stag carved out of wood.

DAVOS: Do you like it?

SHIREEN: He’s beautiful.

Shireen kisses him on the cheek.

SHIREEN: Thank you.

DAVOS: You’re very welcome.

SHIREEN: Will you make me a doe, too, so that he can have company?

DAVOS: Of course I will.

SHIREEN: But why am I getting a present?

DAVOS: Because you deserve it. My son was always on me trying to teach me to read. Gods, I was stubborn about it. Made it this far without reading, seemed to me I could make it to the grave. I wish I had listened to them. This is my own poor way of saying thank you for teaching me to be a grown up. (beat) I’ll be gone for a few days, Princess. I’ll want to hear all about the dance of dragons when I’m back.

SHIREEN: You’ll just have to read it yourself.

Davos kisses Shireen on her forehead then leaves. Shireen looks over the stag.

INT. DORNE - PALACE

Jaime is escorted by Areo to Doran’s room.

JAIME: Prince Doran. (bows)

DORAN: Forgive us, we started without you. Please, sit.

JAIME: Princess Myrcella.

MYRCELLA: Uncle.

JAIME: What a lovely dress.

MYRCELLA: You don’t like it?

JAIME: You must be cold.

MYRCELLA: Not at all. The Dornish climate agrees with me.

JAIME: Prince Trystane. How’s your jaw?

TRYSTANE: A fleabite.

ELLARIA: What are you doing in Dorne?

JAIME: Looking out for the safety of my niece, the princess Myrcella.

DORAN: And rather than send a raven or speak to me directly you decided to enter my country in secret and abduct our guest by force.

JAIME: We received a threatening message. The princess’s necklace in the jaws of a viper.

Jaime looks at Ellaria.

MYRCELLA (surprised): That necklace was stolen from my room.

Doran looks at Ellaria. A servant sets down food and drink before Jaime.

JAIME: Ah. Excellent. The last meal before the beheading.

DORAN: We can’t behead you. Many in Dorne want war. But I’ve seen war. I’ve seen the bodies piled on the battlefields. I’ve seen the orphans starving in the cities. I don’t want to lead my people into that hell.

ELLARIA: No, you want to break bread with the Lannisters.

DORAN: And that is precisely what we are doing. (raises glass) Let us drink to Tommen, the first of his name, the King of the Andals and the First Men, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms.

Everyone drinks. Ellaria dumps her cup out on the floor and looks at Doran.

DORAN: King Tommen insists on his sister’s return to the capital?

JAIME: I’m afraid he does.

DORAN: I cannot disobey my King’s command. (Ellaria glares at Doran) She will return with you to King’s Landing. And my son, Prince Trystane, will accompany you both. If the alliance between Dorne and the Iron Throne is to continue, their engagement must stand.

JAIME: I accept.

DORAN: One more thing. My brother was named to the small council before his death. Your father understood the importance of keeping Dorne in the loop. With Oberyn gone, Trystane will take his place on the small council.

JAIME: You have my word.

ELLARIA: The word of a Kingslayer.

Ellaria gets up and walks to Doran.

ELLARIA: No wonder you can’t stand. You have no spine.

Ellaria tries to leave the room. Doran grabs her wrist.

DORAN: You are mother to four of my nieces, girls I love very much. For their sake, I hope you live a long life. Talk to me that way again and you won’t.

Doran lets go. Ellaria leaves the room.

JAIME: May I inquire into the fate of my man?

DORAN: Tell me, Ser Jaime, in King’s Landing, how do they punish a commoner who strikes a prince?

JAIME: He said it was just a fleabite. The fault is mine. Bronn is merely a soldier following my orders. If anyone should be punished it’s me.

DORAN: Prince Trystane must learn judgement if he’s to rule one day. I’ll let him decide.

Jaime looks to Trystane. Trystane considers.

TRYSTANE: I have learned the value of mercy from my father. I will set your man free.

JAIME: You’re a good man.

TRYSTANE: On one condition.

INT. DORNE - CELL

Bronn is laying on the ground in his cell. Tyene and Nymeria are playing a game where one tries to slap the other’s hand before they pull their hands away. Nymeria slaps Tyene.

NYMERIA: Why do we play? I’m better than you, I’ll always be better than you. Have I ever missed once? I don’t think, I can’t recall. You must love humiliation or pain. Which do you love most? Humiliation or-- (slaps) -- pain? That one hurt didn’t it? You going to cry? Give up, little sister.

TYENE: You’re going to miss.

NYMERIA: I never miss.

TYENE: You will. You’re thinking too much. Now you’re nervous. “What if she’s right?”

Nymeria slaps at Tyene and Tyene gets out of the way in time.

NYMERIA: Luck.

TYENE: Now it’s my turn.

NYMERIA: You’re too slow. You’ve always been too slow.

Nymeria sticks her hands out and blows a kiss to Tyene. Tyene slaps her across the face then blows one back. They get in fighting stances as the guards arrive. They take Bronn out of his cell.

BRONN: Am I going to be happy at the end of this walk?

AREO: You’ll find out very soon.

Bronn starts leaving the prison.

TYENE: Say it one more time, handsome. Who am I?

BRONN: The most beautiful woman in the world.

TYENE: And that’s the truth!

NYMERIA: Slut.

Tyene laughs.

INT. DORNE - PALACE

Areo escorts Bronn into Doran’s room.

JAIME: Prince Doran, Ser Bronn of the Blackwater.

DORAN: : I didn’t realize there were knights of the Blackwater.

BRONN: Only the one.

JAIME: I believe you’ve already met Prince Trystane.

BRONN: Prince. Sorry about the other day.

JAIME: Prince Trystane here is a man of mercy. He’s agreed to grant you your freedom.

BRONN: I’m glad to hear it. The pie looks good.

JAIME: There was one condition.

Jaime nods to Areo. Areo elbows Bronn in the jaw, knocking him to the ground.

DORAN: Perhaps some soup instead?

EXT. BRAAVOS - RAGMAN HARBOR

Arya pushes her oyster cart through the street.

ARYA: Oysters, clams, and cockels! Oysters, clams, and cockels! Oysters, clams, and cockels! Oysters, clams, and cock--

Two shady looking men approach her.

MAN: How much for your little clam?

They laugh and walk away. Arya looks down the street and sees the Thin Man, looking over another sailor’s application.

ARYA: Oysters, clams, and cockels! Oysters, clams, and cockels!

Arya stops her cart, inspects the vile Jaqen gave to her, and tucks it back in her pouch. She starts pushing the cart again and makes eye contact with the Thin Man.

THIN MAN (waving): Come on.

Arya stares off into the distance.

THIN MAN: Some oysters, girl! I’m talking to you! Girl?! Are you deaf? Girl?!

Arya looks to the dock, and sees Meryn Trant and Mace Tyrell being helped off the boat. A Iron Banker approaches him and Arya starts walking away from the Thin Man and towards them.

BANKER: Lord Tyrell! On behalf of the Iron Bank, may I be the first to welcome you to the free city of Braavos. I hope your journey was trouble free.

MACE: Bit of chop the last few days but nothing too awful. Good to see the old chap is still guarding the Harbor.

BANKER: And how goes the harvest in the Reach?

MACE: Vintnors say this might be the best year for red grapes in half a century. If we come to a satisfactory arrangement, I’ll be sure to send the Arbor’s finest your way.

BANKER: I’m afraid I don’t partake.

Arya studies the group, focuses in on Meryn, and begins following them with her cart.

EXT. BRAAVOS - IRON BANK

MACE: Some consider usury distasteful, dishonorable. Pure nonsense, of course.

BANKER: I'm glad we see eye-to-eye on this matter.

MACE: Did you know that at one point Maegor the third tried to outlaw it in the Seven Kingdoms? Wanted to arrest anyone caught charging interest and cut off both their hands.

Meryn and Arya exchange quick looks at each other.

BANKER: Most unfortunate for the glovers.

MACE: If a man charges low interest on a loan then he has nothing to gain and everything to lose, so why charge him? Whereas a reward makes a man willing to gamble.

BANKER: We are not gamblers here at the Iron Bank, Lord Tyrell.

MACE: You are the world's best gamblers. And all those bets you won built this.

Mace gestures to the Iron Bank and the camera cuts to it.

EXT. IRON BANK - LATER

Arya is waiting on the steps of the building opposite the bank, eating her oysters. The men start walking out of the Bank.

BANKER: I’m afraid I still have a good deal of work to do.

MACE: Oh, nonsense. Work's over. Do you sing?

BANKER: I don't have that gift.

MACE: It's not a gift, it’s a skill, anyone can learn it. “So give me a kiss by the Long Canall and give me two kisses in Salty Town, for we are going to die, tomorrow. The bareheaded beggar, the king with his crown…”

INT. BRAAVOS - BROTHEL - DOORWAY

Meryn Trant and his men walk through the doorway.

MERYN: I thought that old shit would never stop singing.

MAN: It wasn’t bad, though.

MERYN: The Tyrells can all rot in hell, treasonous cunts. They were going to make that boy-fucker Renly king.

They arrive at a door.

MERYN: This is the place, lads. The sleekest little minks in Braavos.

MAN: You’re buying?

MERYN: Oh, I’m buying. But I never was good at sharing.

They enter the brothel. Arya pulls up to the doorway with her cart and sees the men entering.

INT. BROTHEL

Arya walks through the door with a tray of oysters. The brothel keeper stops her.

BROTHEL KEEPER: Sell your fish somewhere else.

PROSTITUTE: Oh let her in, Brusco, I’m hungry. Come here, sweetness.

The brothel keeper gestures nods for Arya to go on. She walks to the prostitute and the man she’s with.

PROSTITUTE: They say oyster’s get the juices flowing. We’ll take half a dozen.

ARYA: Three coppers.

Arya begins cutting an oyster open.

JOHN: Here’s a silver because the lady likes you.

The man places a silver on her tray in exchange for the oysters. Arya turns and sees Trant’s men being taken to a back room.

INT. BROTHEL - BACK ROOM

Arya enters the room and peers through a divider to see a prostitute posing for Meryn.

MERYN: Too old.

HEAD PROSTITUTE: Brea.

Brea poses for Meryn.

MERYN: Too old.

HEAD: I have just the one. Anara our most expensive girl, but well worth it, I assure you.

A younger, 20-something prostitute poses for Meryn.

MERYN: Too old.

The people in the room share uneasy glances as they realize what he’s asking for.

MERYN: Do you have what I want or not?

HEAD: Of course. Of course.

One of Trant’s men crosses to the other side of the divider and confronts Arya.

MAN: Fresh? Come on, the lads are hungry.

The man drags her into the room.

MAN: Nothing better for you cock stand than fresh oysters.

MAN 2: I’ll have one.

Meryn stares at Arya.

HEAD: Who let this girl in? Shoo shoo!

The head prostitute brings in a child.

MERYN: Good.

The head prostitute hands Meryn an hourglass. He hands it back.

MERYN: I’ll tell you when we’re done.

He leads the girl towards a bedroom.

MERYN: You’ll have a fresh one for me tomorrow.

HEAD: Of course.

The head prostitute realizes Arya is still standing there.

HEAD: I’ll have you whipped, girl! Go on!

Arya leaves the room, but takes one last glance at where Meryn is taking the girl.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

Jaqen kneels next to a man at the fountain of the center of the room and offers him a drink from the fountain.

MAN: Valaar morghulis.

The man takes a drink. Arya approaches Jaqen.

JAQEN: And?

ARYA: The Thin Man wasn’t hungry today.

JAQEN: Perhaps that’s why the man is thin.

The man drops to the ground, creating a thud off-screen.

ARYA: Tomorrow.

JAQEN: Tomorrow.

JAQEN: A girl has work to do.

Arya walks towards the man who is now collapsed on the ground.

INT. DORNE - PALACE

Doran is addressing Ellaria with Areo standing guard next to the three Sand Snakes.

DORAN: Your rebellion is over. You can swear your allegiance to me now, or you can die.

She kneels and kisses his ring, crying. Nymeria and Obara look disgusted, Tyene’s face reveals less.

DORAN: I believe in second chances. I don’t believe in third chances.

INT. DORNE - JAIME’S ROOM

Jaime is writing a letter in his former cell that is now unlocked. Ellaria enters.

ELLARIA: You write like a 7 year old.

JAIME: Your maester kindly agreed to copy it over for me.

ELLARIA: He didn’t try to make you pay?

ELLARIA: Then maybe he’s changed. The Queen will be thrilled to know you’ll be bringing her daughter home

JAIME: She will.

ELLARIA: You love her very much, don’t you?

JAIME: Of course, she’s my niece.

ELLARIA: I wasn’t talking about her.

Jaime looks up from his writing at Ellaria.

ELLARIA: You think I disapprove. Why? Because people disapprove of that sort of thing where you are from? They disapproved of Oberyn and me where you are from. Here, no one blinked an eye. 100 years ago, no one would have blinked an eye at you if you had been named Targaryen. It’s always changing, who we’re supposed to love and who we’re not.The only thing that stays the same is that we want who we want.

Ellaria pauses, taking a walks around the room.

ELLARIA: I know your daughter had no part in the terrible thing that happened to the man I loved. Perhaps even you were innocent of that.

Ellaria exits the room.

INT. SHIREEN’S TENT

Shireen plays with her stag figurine next to a fire and on top of her book. Stannis enters the tent.

SHIREEN: Father. Aren’t you cold?

STANNIS: No. What are you reading?

SHIREEN: The Dance of Dragons.

STANNIS: What’s it about?

SHIREEN: It’s the story of the fight between Rhaenyra Targaryen and her half-brother Aegon for control of the Seven Kingdoms. Both of them thought they belonged on the Iron Throne. When people started for declaring for one of them or the other, their fight divided the kingdom in two. Brothers fought brothers. Dragons fought dragons. By the time it was over, thousands were dead. And it was a disaster for the Targaryens as well. They never truly recovered.

STANNIS: “The dance of dragons”? Why is that a dance?

SHIREEN: That’s just what they call it.

STANNIS: Doesn’t make much sense.

SHIREEN: I think it’s poetic.

STANNIS: If you had to choose between Rhaenyra and Aegon, who would you have chosen?

SHIREEN: I wouldn’t have chosen either. It’s all the choosing sides that made things so horrible.

STANNIS: Sometimes a person has to choose. Sometimes the world forces his hand. If a man knows what he is and remains true to himself, the choice is not choice at all. He must fulfill his destiny and become who he is meant to be. However much he may hate it.

SHIREEN: It’s alright, father.

STANNIS: You don’t even know what I’m talking about.

SHIREEN: It doesn’t matter. I want to help you. Is there any way I can help?

STANNIS: Yes there is.

SHIREEN: Good, I want to. I’m the Princess Shireen of House Baratheon and I’m your daughter.

They hug.

STANNIS: Forgive me.

EXT. STANNIS’ CAMP

Shireen is flanked by guards as she walks towards a pyre, clutching the stag Davos gave her. When she arrives at the pyre Melisandre steps to the front.

SHIREEN: Where’s my father? I want to see my father.

MELISANDRE: It will all be over soon, Princess.

The men drag her to the pyre and tie her up.

SHIREEN: Where’s my father? No you can’t do this, father where are you?!

Stannis watches on from the crowd.

SHIREEN: Let me see my father! Where are you, please?!

SELYSE: It’s what the Lord wants. It’s a good thing. A great thing.

MELISANDRE: The year is now, my Lord. For you we offer up this girl, that you may cleanse her with your fire and that its light may lead our way.

SELYSE: If we don’t act then we’ll all starve here all of us, but if we make this sacrifice…

MELISANDRE: Accept this token of our faith, my lord and lead us from the darkness. Lord of Light show us the way!

SHIREEN: Mother, please mother! Mother, please mother!

SELYSE: I can’t.

STANNIS: There’s no other way. She has King’s blood.

MELISANDRE: Lord of Light protect us, for the night is dark and full of terrors!

SHIREEN: Mother, don’t do this please! Please help! Don’t do this! Please, father! Mother, help!

Melisandre lights the pyre. Selyse runs towards the pyre and is stopped by Stannis’ men. Shireen burns as Melisandre, Selyse, and Stannis look on, Melisandre pleased, Selyse horrified, and Stannis conflicted.

SELYSE: No...

EXT. MEEREEN - FIGHTING PIT

Daenerys sits next to Missandei at the top of the pit, with an open seat between her and Tyrion at the end, and Daario standing behind them. Hizdahr takes the open seat.

DAENERYS: Where have you been?

HIZDAHR: Just making sure everything’s in order.

Camera pans through the fighting pit to reveal it is covered with House Targaryen sigils. An announcer steps to the middle of the pit and waves his arm to silence the crowd.

ANNOUNCER (Valyrian): Free citizens of Meereen! By the blessings of the Graces and her majesty the Queen, welcome to the Great Games!

The Announcer raises his hands and the crowd begins to roar. Cut to Daenerys’ box - she and Missandei look disgusted, Daario looks impressed. Two gladiators enter the pit.

ANNOUNCER: My queen, our first contest. Who will triumph: the strong or the quick?

QUICK: I fight and die for your glory, oh glorious queen.

STRONG: I fight and die for your glory, oh glorious queen.

They stand waiting in front of her. The crowd is silent.

HIZDAHR: They’re waiting for you. Clap your hands.

Daenerys looks down at the two men. After a moment, and with a look of disgust on her face, she claps her hands. The crowd roars and they start fighting. After some parries, the Quick man slices at the Strong man’s neck.

DAARIO: That one, the smaller man, no question, that’s where you should put your money.

TYRION: The smaller man it is.

DAENERYS: I’m not putting my money anywhere.

HIZDAHR: Kings and queens never bet on the games. Perhaps you should go find someone who does.

DAARIO: People used to bet against me when I fought in the pits. (looks at Hizdahr) He would have bet against me. Common novice mistake.

HIZDAHR: I have spent much of my life in Meereen, and in my experience, larger men do triumph over smaller man, far more often than not.

DAENERYS: Has your experience ever involved any actual fighting? You, yourself, have you ever tried to kill a man that was trying to kill you?

Hizdahr is silent.

DAARIO: Whenever I got into the pit against a beast like that one, the crowd saw me, all skin and bone back then, then they saw a pile of angry muscles ready to murder me. They couldn’t get their money out fast enough. But the pile of angry muscles never had any muscles here (he puts a dagger to his neck) or here (he puts the dagger to Hizdahr’s neck). And the big men were always too slow to stop my dagger from going where their muscles weren’t. Yes, whenever I saw a beast like that one, standing across from me making his beast faces, I knew I could rest easy.

The Strong man decapitates the Quick man with one quick stroke. Hizdahr smiles and Daario looks turns away angrily. Tyrion says nothing.

HIZDAHR: You don’t approve?

TYRION: There’s always been more than enough death in the world for my taste. I can do without it in my leisure time.

HIZDAHR: Fair enough, yet -- it’s an unpleasant question -- but what great thing has ever been accomplished without killing or cruelty?

TYRION: It’s easy to confuse what is with what ought to be. Especially when what is has worked in your favor.

HIZDAHR: I’m not talking about myself. I’m talking about the necessary conditions of greatness.

Cut to pit workers carrying the decapitated head out of the pit, leaving a trail of blood behind.

DAENERYS: That is greatness?

HIZDAHR: That is a vital part of the great city of Meereen. Which has existed long before you arrived and will remain standing long after we have returned to the dirt.

TYRION: My father would have liked you.

ANNOUNCER: We ask again: who will triumph?

DAENERYS: One day your great city will return to the dirt as well.

HIZDAHR: At your command?

DAENERYS: If need be.

ANNOUNCER: A Meereenese champion?

The crowd applauds.

HIZDAHR: How many people will die to make this happen?

DAENERYS: If it comes to that they would have died for a good reason.

HIZDAHR (looks at pit): Those men think they’re dying for a good reason.

DAENERYS: Someone else’s reason.

HIZDAHR: So your reasons are true, and theirs are false. They don’t know their own minds, but you do.

TYRION: Well said, you’re an eloquent man. Doesn’t mean you’re wrong. In my experience, eloquent men are right every bit as often as imbeciles.

ANNOUNCER: ...or a Westerosi Knight?!

Crowd jeers.

JORAH (O.S.): I fight and die for your glory, oh glorious Queen.

Daenerys stares at Jorah. They both hold back emotion.

HIZDAHR: Your Grace--

DAARIO: Shut your mouth.

Daenerys claps. Jorah nods. They begin fighting, with Daenerys’ eyes following Jorah. He takes a blow to the mouth, is knocked down and starts bleeding. He gets up, has his sword knocked away, and pulls out a dagger. He wrestles with the man trying to choke him, throws him off, then stabs him in the chest. He pulls the dagger out, looking at Daenerys, throws it away, and picks up his longsword.

Jorah squares off against a flashy fighter that just brutally stabbed another fighter through the back. He slices Jorah in the cheek. The other two fighters square off, with a heavily armored fighter wielding a spear killing his opponent. The crowd cheers.

Jorah’s opponent slices Jorah’s arm then knocks him over, knocking his sword out of his hand. He holds his blade to Jorah’s throat. Both he and Jorah look to Daenerys.

TYRION: You can end this.

HIZDAHR: She cannot.

TYRION: You can!

The fighter holds his blade to Jorah’s throat. He is about to make a move when the other fighter comes over and stabs Jorah’s opponent in the back, killing him. Jorah gets up and faces the final opponent. Jorah matches the spearman, is knocked over, but catches the spear before it reaches his throat. He gets back up and the two face off again. Jorah spins, somersaults, and stabs him through the stomach, killing him. He looks up to Daenerys.

Jorah reaches for his opponent’s spear. He picks it up and hurls it towards Daenerys’ seat. Daario rushes to protect Daenerys and everyone else gets out of the way. It connects with a Son of the Harpy.

Cut to the crowd. Many audience members have put on Sons of the Harpy masks.

DAARIO: Protect your queen!

The Sons of the Harpy start slitting the throats of former slaves and Unsullied in the crowd. Unsullied guards and Daario surround Daenerys and Missandei, fighting off the Harpys. Hizdahr starts running towards Daenerys.

HIZDAHR: Your Grace, Your Grace, come with me! I know a way out! I know a way--

Two Sons of the Harpy come up on Hizdahr from behind and stab him to death. They run at Daenerys. Daario takes one out, and Jorah comes up from the pit to take Hizdahr’s spot and take out the other. He offers his hand to Daenerys and she takes it. He leads her down to the pit with Daario and the Unsullied, leaving Tyrion and Missandei.

A Harpy comes towards Missandei. Tyrion comes from behind, pulls him to his knees, and slits his throat. He leads her down to the pit.

TYRION: Stay close!

Sons of the Harpy have began to rush the pit. Unsullied fight them off as Daenerys, Daario, and Jorah head towards a side exit.

JORAH: This way!

They run through the exit, but a door swings shut. A Son of the Harpy steps out and Jorah kills him.

DAARIO: The other side, follow me!

They rush towards the other side and join up with Tyrion and Missandei.

DAARIO: Protect your queen!

Jorah, Daario, and the Unsullied form a ring around Missandei, Daenerys, and Tyrion in the center of the pit. Sons of the Harpy begin to rush from the other exit they were heading towards. They surround the ring, testing out the outer ring before they begin rushing. A few make it past the outer ring but are killed by Daario. Missandei and Daenerys join hands and Daenerys closes her eyes.

A roar is heard in the distance. All of the Harpys look up. Drogon appears, breathing fire and circling the pit. The Sons run away from Daenerys to the edge of the pit. One charges at her and Drogon rips him apart. He breathes fire on 4-5 of them at a time before a spear hits his back. 2 more spears connect and he starts slowing down.

DAENERYS: Drogon!

She takes a spear from his neck. He roars at her, but then closes his mouth. She slowly reaches to touch his nose. More spears are thrown at him by Sons of the Harpy and he turns to them and roars. Daario continues to fight off every Harpy that comes near her.

Daenerys climbs onto Drogon’s back slowly.

DAENERYS: Valahd..

Drogon runs towards the Harpys, starts flapping and then takes off from the Pit. He flies past the Pyramid and into the sky as Tyrion, Jorah, Daario, and Missandei stare up at him.

A dragon roars in the distance.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
47
Mother's Mercy Script
Game of Thrones
Album: Season 5 Scripts
MOTHER'S MERCY SCRIPT
INT. STANNIS’S CAMP - MELISANDRE’S TENT

Melisandre looks at the icicles hanging outside her tent and sees that they are melting.
EXT. STANNIS’S CAMP - DUSK

Melisandre walks to find Stannis, stepping in a pile of mud on the way.

INT. STANNIS’S CAMP - STANNIS’S TENT

Stannis straps his armor on.

MELISANDRE: The Lord of Light has made good on his promise, my king. His fires have melted the snows away. The way ahead is clear.

STANNIS: We ride for Winterfell.

MELISANDRE: And you will take it. The Lord has shown me Bolton banners burning. You will receive what is yours by right.

Melisandre wraps her arms around Stannis. He brushes her off then exits the tent. She follows after him.

INT. STANNIS’S CAMP

Stannis walks by his men as they prepare for battle. One soldier approaches him.

SOLDIER: Your Grace.

STANNIS: Prepare to form up.

SOLDIER: Your Grace.

The soldier waits for a response from Stannis.

STANNIS: Tell me.

SOLDIER: The men. Many deserted before dawn.

STANNIS: How many?

SOLDIER: Nearly half. All the sell-swords, with all the horses.

Stannis is speechless. He looks to Melisandre who appears even more devastated than he. Another soldier comes up to Stannis.

SOLDIER 2: Your Grace?

STANNIS: Speak up. It can’t be worse than mutiny.

The man is silent.

EXT. WOODS OUTSIDE STANNIS’S CAMP

Stannis is led by his men to a tree. Stannis looks up and sees Selyse hanging from it. Stannis takes a long look but tries not to reveal his emotions.

STANNIS: Cut her down.

The men cut the noose and bring her to the ground.

SOLDIER: Your Grace. The Lady Melisandre was just seen riding out of camp.

Stannis seethes but says nothing.

STANNIS: Get the men into marching formation. On to Winterfell.

Stannis walks from the woods back to camp.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - LIBRARY

JON: He raised his hands. And they all stood up at once. Tens of thousands of them, the biggest army in the world.

SAM: So what are you gonna do?

JON: I’m gonna hope they don’t learn how to climb the wall.

SAM: But… the Dragonglass?

JON (shakes his head): No one’s ever getting that back, now. It wouldn’t have mattered anyway, unless we had a mountain of it.

SAM (confused): But… you killed a White Walker.

JON: With Longclaw. I saw them shatter steel axes like they were glass. But Longclaw…

SAM: He’s made of Valyrian steel. How many Valyrian steel swords are left in the Seven Kingdoms?

JON: Not enough. (pause) The first Lord Commander in history to sacrifice the lives of sworn Brothers to save the lives of Wildlings. How’s it feel to be friends with the most hated man in Castle Black? (smiles)

SAM: You were friends with me when I first got here. And I wasn’t winning any elections back then.

JON: Here’s to us then. Long may they sneer.

Jon and Sam clink glasses and drink. Sam looks to Jon.

JON: What?

SAM: I wanted to ask you something. To ask something of you. Send me, Gilly, and the baby to Oldtown so I can become a Maester. That’s what I’m meant to be, not this.

JON: I need you here, Sam. If you leave, who’s left to give me advice I trust?

SAM: Well, there’s Edd.

Jon gives Sam a look.

SAM: I’ll be more use to you as a Maester. More use to everyone now that Maester Aemon’s gone. The Citadel has the world’s greatest library. I’ll learn about history, strategy, healing. And other things. Things that will help when they come.

Jon stares at Sam, saying nothing.

SAM: If Gilly stays here then she’ll die. And the baby that she named after me will die. And I’ll end up dying, too, trying to protect them. Which means that the last thing that I’ll see in this world will be the look in her eyes when I fail them. (pause) I’d rather see a thousand White Walkers than see that.

Jon inhales, exhales, then nods somberly. Sam smiles.

SAM: Thank you.

JON: You know that The Citadel will make you swear off women, too.

SAM: They’ll bloody try.

Jon looks at Sam incredulously.

JON: Sam?

SAM: What?

JON: Sam…

Sam smiles.

JON: You’ve just been beaten half to death. How did you--

SAM (smiling): Very carefully.

Jon smiles and lets out a small laugh.

JON: I’m glad the end of the world’s working out for someone.

They sit in silence for a moment.

SAM: I’ll come back.

JON (raises a glass): To your return.

SAM: To my return.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK

Sam, Gilly, and little Sam mount the horses. Sam looks up to see Jon watching from the top of his steps.They exchange a wave, and then Sam begins riding out of Castle Black.

EXT. OUTSIDE OF WINTERFELL

Stannis’s depleted army marches onto Winterfell. Stannis is at the front with flaming heart banners flying all around him.

EXT. WINTERFELL - COURTYARD

The Bolton army is preparing for battle.

INT. WINTERFELL - SANSA’S ROOM

Sansa uses the device she previously picked up to unlock her door. She drops the device and then exits her tower with a hood on.

EXT. WINTERFELL - COURTYARD

Sansa walks by the Bolton men as they are preparing for battle.

EXT. OUTSIDE OF WINTERFELL - HILL

Podrick returns to he and Brienne’s camp with firewood and dead rabbits. He hears screaming then looks down to see Stannis’s army marching for Winterfell. He drops the wood and rabbits and sprints back to Brienne.

Brienne is staring at the Broken Tower.

PODRICK: My lady! Stannis. Stannis Baratheon is coming. His whole army.

BRIENNE: How do you know it’s Stannis?

PODRICK: He’s carrying his flaming heart banners. From the Blackwater. I’ll never forget it.

Brienne takes one last look at the Broken Tower. She sees there is still no candle in the window.

EXT. WINTERFELL - BROKEN TOWER

Sansa approaches the Tower with a candle in hand.

EXT. OUTSIDE OF WINTERFELL - HILL

Brienne takes one last, hard look at the Tower, then turns around and heads for Stannis’s army. Podrick grabs his axe and follows her. Right as they turn away, a candle appears at the top of the Broken Tower.

EXT. OUTSIDE OF WINTERFELL

STANNIS: Trench here. Another one 300 yards from the castle wall. Hurry them along. And send out a foraging party immediately. The siege begins at sunrise.

SOLDIER: There’s not going to be a siege, Your Grace.

Stannis looks to the distance and sees the Bolton army racing towards him as they come over the top of a hill.

EXT. WINTERFELL - BROKEN TOWER

Sansa looks down at the ensuing battle from the top of the Broken Tower with a candle in the window.

EXT. OUTSIDE OF WINTERFELL

Stannis sees he the army approaching. He takes a deep breath then unsheathes his sword. Cut to an overhead shot revealing Stannis is badly outnumbered.

EXT. WINTERFELL - BROKEN TOWER

Sansa watches from the window as the fight begins. She walks away from the window.

EXT. WINTERFELL - WOODS

Pan across the ground to reveal all but one of Stannis’s men are slaughtered alongside various banners and shields with his sigil. Stannis hobbles away from these men, using his sword as a crutch. Two Bolton men arrive on horse and kill the lone survivor of Stannis’s men. They charge at Stannis, one slices his leg, but he kills them both with a dagger and sword then falls to the ground.

Stannis leans onto a tree and groans. He looks down to his bleeding leg with a resigned look, then looks up to the sound of a horse riding.

STANNIS: Bolton has women fighting for him.

Cut up to Brienne of Tarth.

BRIENNE: I do not fight for the Boltons. I’m Brienne of Tarth. I was Kingsguard to Renly Baratheon. I was there when he was murdered by a shadow with your face. You murdered him? With blood magic?

Stannis is silent for a long moment.

STANNIS: I did.

Brienne approaches him and unsheathes her sword.

BRIENNE: In the name of Renly of House Baratheon, First of his Name, Rightful King of the Andals and the First Men, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms, and Protector of the Realm, I, Brienne of Tarth, sentence you to die. Do you have any last words?

STANNIS: Go on, do your duty.

Brienne unsheathes her sword, pulls it back, swings forward, and--

CUT TO: EXT. WINTERFELL - BATTLEFIELD

Ramsay plunges his sword into a survivor. Then he surveys the corpses on the battlefield.

RAMSAY: Looks like we’re done here.

Ramsay heads back towards his horse but sees one of Stannis’s men is survive, and is attempting to crawl away.

SURVIVOR: I surrender. I surrender!

RAMSAY: And I accept your surrender.

Ramsay plunges his sword into the man then pulls it out and wipes the blood off.

RAMSAY (to squire): Let’s head back. My wife must be lonely.

Pan out to reveal the bodies on the battlefield.

EXT. WINTERFELL - COURTYARD

Sansa hurries through Winterfell with her hood on. She heads up the stairs, sees one of the Bolton men walking her way, and doubles back.

EXT. WINTERFELL - BALCONY

Sansa rushes through a door towards the exit. She finds Myranda and Theon waiting for her, with Myranda’s bow drawn.

MYRANDA: My lady. I have come to escort you back to your chamber.

THEON: Go with her. Please.

SANSA: I know what Ramsay is. I know what he’ll do to me. (looks to Theon) If I’m going to die, let it happen while there’s some of me left.

MYRANDA: Die? (lowers the bow) Who said anything about dying? You can’t die yet. Your father was Warden of the North, and Ramsay needs you. Though I suppose he doesn’t need all of you. Just the parts he’ll use to make his heir. Until you’ve given him a boy or two and he’s finished using them. (raises bow) He’s got incredible plans for those parts. So. Shall we wait for him to come back, or shall we begin now?

Sansa says nothing.

MYRANDA: You’re leaving it to me? Good. Let’s begin.

She draws her arrow back. Just as she goes to release it, Theon tackles her into a wall, causing the arrow to miss Sansa. They struggle for a moment.

MYRANDA: Stop! Stop!

Theon throws her over the edge, killing her on impact. As Sansa and Theon go to the edge to inspect the body, a horn begins to blare.

MAN: Open the gates!

Bolton men return from the battle and ride through the gates to Winterfell.

THEON: He’s coming back.

Theon grabs Sansa’s hand and leads her along the walls. They climb to the top of the wall and look down to see a pile of snow at the bottom. Theon offers his hand to Sansa, she takes it, and they leap off of the wall.

INT. BRAAVOS - BROTHEL

Meryn Trant looks to 3 young girls in front of him and tightens his grip on the stick in his hand. He walks behind the first one and whips her, she starts crying. He does the same to the second and she cries as well. He walks up to the third girl, whose face is hidden by her hair, and whips her in the back. She doesn’t react. He whips her harder in the side and doesn’t get a reaction. He whips her a third time across the face and the girl still doesn’t make a sound.

MERYN: I can see I have my work cut out for me.You two. Out.

The two other girls flee the room. The third removes her hair to show an unknown face. Meryn punches her in the stomach. She falls to the ground doubled over. Meryn smiles but loses the smile when he sees she is reaching for something. The girl pulls off her face, revealing she is Arya, and leaps towards Trant, stabbing him in the eye. She stabs his other eye then gags him with his shirt as he screams. He grabs at her but she stabs him in the chest until he rolls on his side.

ARYA: You were the first person on my list, you know. For killing Syrio Forel, remember him? Probably not. I’ve gotten a few of the others. The Many Faced God stole a few more for me. I’m glad he left me you. Do you know who I am?

Trant struggles to make a noise through the gag.

ARYA: I can’t hear you.

She stabs him in the stomach.

ARYA: You know who I am. I’m Arya Stark.

A look of surprise comes across Trant’s face, he grunts, and then Arya stabs him in the back. She removes the gag.

ARYA: Do you know who you are?

Trant whimpers.

ARYA: You’re no one. You’re nothing.

She slowly slits his throat and he keels over.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - FACE ROOM

Arya walks into the room holding the face of the girl she wore to the brothel. She returns it to where she took it from.

JAQEN: A girl has taken a life. The wrong life.

WAIF: I was right about her.

JAQEN: You were.

WAIF: You’re not ready. Not at all.

The waif grabs Arya and holds her in front of Jaqen.

JAQEN: That man’s life wasn’t yours to take. A girl stole from the Many Faced God. Now a debt is owed.

Jaqen holds up the same vial he gave to Arya to give to the Thin Man. The waif holds Arya’s face up near the vial as she struggles.

JAQEN: Only death can pay for life.

Jaqen drinks the vial and then falls straight to the ground.

ARYA: No! No! No, you don’t die! Don’t die! (sobs)

WAIF: Why are you crying?

ARYA: He was my friend.

WAIF: No he wasn’t. Didn’t you listen to him?

JAQEN (O.S.): He was no one.

Arya turns to see a man looking identical to Jaqen standing behind her.

ARYA: But if you’re… (looks to the Jaqen who drank the potion and is seemingly dead) Who’s this?

JAQEN: No one at all. Just as a girl should have been before she took a face from the hall.

Arya reaches and pulls off the Jaqen face, revealing the face of an old man.

JAQEN: The faces are for no one.

Arya pulls off the old man face to reveal a younger man’s face.

JAQEN: You are still someone.

Arya pulls off the young man’s face to reveal a different old man.

JAQEN: And to someone…

Arya pulls off multiple faces, revealing the face of multiple different men.

JAQEN: ...the faces are as good as poison.

Arya pulls off the final face and sees her own face staring back at her.

ARYA: I can’t see!

Arya’s vision begins to blur until the screen goes black.

ARYA: What’s happening?! What’s happening?!

EXT. DORNE - DOCK

Myrcella kisses Prince Doran.

DORAN (to Jaime): I wish you a safe journey home.

JAIME: Thank you.

Doran looks to Ellaria and nods. She walks up to Myrcella.

ELLARIA: Forgive me child. I wish you all the happiness in the world.

Ellaria kisses Myrcella on the lips, holding the kiss then rubbing her lips. She nods to Jaime and Jaime nods back. Jaime helps Myrcella into the boat.

BRONN: Maybe I’ll come visit you sometime.

TYENE: Maybe I’ll come visit you.

BRONN: Don’t wait too long. I’ve a noble woman to marry back home.

TYENE (leans in): You want a good girl, but you need the bad pussy. (bites his ear)

JAIME (to Bronn): Whenever you’re ready, My Lord.

Bronn nods to Tyene and the Snakes, then heads to the boat.

INT. SEA OF DORNE - BOAT

Myrcella looks down at her lion necklace.

JAIME: Try not to lose it this time.

MYRCELLA: I’ll never take it off again.

JAIME: I know you didn’t want to leave Dorne. But I’m glad you’re coming home. Your mother’s desperate to see you. And I’m glad Trystane’s coming with us. He seems like a nice boy. You’re lucky. Arranged marriages are rarely so… so well arranged.

MYRCELLA: Do you think mother will like him.

JAIME: If she sees you’re happy, I’m sure she will.

MYRCELLA (laughing): And you really believe that?

JAIME (smiles): Have you ever known your mother to like anyone aside from her children?

MYRCELLA: She likes you.

JAIME: I’m not so sure about that. Listen. There’s something I’ve wanted to tell you. Something I should have told you long ago. So. Now that you’ve seen more of the world, you’ve learned how complicated things can be. People can be. The Lannisters and the Martells have hated each other for years, but you’ve fallen in love with Trystane. It was an accident, really, I mean what were the chances? You happen to fall in love with the man you were assigned to marry? (Myrcella laughs) My point is… we don’t choose whom we love. We just… It’s beyond our control. I sound like an idiot.

MYRCELLA: No you don’t.

JAIME: What I’m trying to say. What I’m trying and failing to say…

MYRCELLA: I know what you’re trying to say.

JAIME: No. I’m afraid you don’t.

Myrcella stands up and looks Jaime in the eyes.

MYRCELLA: I do.

She takes his good hand in hers.

MYRCELLA: I know. About you and mother. I think a part of me always knew. And I’m glad. I’m glad that you’re my father.

Jaime looks shocked but happy. They embrace. She releases the hug and smiles at Jaime, with blood beginning to trickle out her nose.

JAIME: Myrcella?

The bleeding gets worse.

JAIME: Myrcella?!

Myrcella collapses in Jaime’s arms, blood streaming down her face.

JAIME: Myrcella?! Myrcella?!

CUT TO: EXT. DORNE - DOCK

Ellaria stares at Jaime’s ship from the dock. Blood begins to trickle out of her nose and splatter the floor. Tyene hands her a rag for the blood and she wipes it away then thrrows the rag away. She opens the antidote and drinks it down. She and the Sand Snakes begin walking from the dock.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID

Tyrion, Daario, and Jorah sit on the steps in Dany’s throne room.

TYRION (to Jorah): You love her, don’t you? How could you not. Of course, it’s hopeless for the both of you. Sellsword from the fighting pits, a disgraced knight. Neither one of you is fit consort for a queen. But, we always want the wrong woman.

DAARIO: Does he always talk so much?

Jorah nods. Missandei brings Grey Worm into the room, with bandages around his torso.

GREY WORM: Jorah the Andal.

JORAH: Torgo Nudho.

GREY WORM: You should not be here.

DAARIO: No, but he is.

GREY WORM: Our queen ordered him exiled from city.

DAARIO: Our queen would be dead if not for him.

MISSANDEI (Valyrian): It’s true. And I would be dead if not for the… (look at Tyrion) little man.

TYRION (Valyrian): Dwarf. I believe that’s the word. Apologies. My Valyrian is a bit “nostril”.

MISSANDEI: (Valyrian) A bit “rusty”.

TYRION: (Valyrian) “Rusty” (Common Tongue) Thank you.

GREY WORM: I am sorry. Sorry I am not there to fight for my queen.

DAARIO: You missed a good scrap.

JORAH: None of that matters now. The longer we sit here bantering the longer Daenerys is out there in the wilderness.

TYRION: He’s right. The dragon headed north. If we’re going to find her, that’s where we’re to go.

JORAH: We? You’re a Lannister. The Queen intends to remove your family from power.

TYRION: And I intend to help her do it.

JORAH: You’ve been here for how many days now? I’ve fought for her for years. Since she was little more than a child.

TYRION: You betrayed her!

JORAH: Careful now.

TYRION: And she exiled you, twice, I believe?

JORAH: The second time thanks to you.

TYRION: Don’t blame me for your crimes, Mormont.

DAARIO: (gestures to Tyrion) He’s right. The Queen exiled Jorah. (gestures to Jorah) And he’s right, Jorah saved her life. Perhaps she feels differently about him now. Perhaps not. The only way we’ll know is if we ask her.

TYRION: Fine, fine, I suppose he can join us. Just as long as he promises not to kill me in my sleep.

JORAH: If I ever kill you your eyes will be wide open.

DAARIO (to Tyrion): Forgive me, but why would we bring you?

TYRION: Pardon me?

DAARIO: Have you ever tracked animals in the wilderness?

TYRION: Not precisely, but I have other skills that’d be very useful--

DAARIO: Can you fight?

TYRION: I have fought. I don’t claim to be a great warrior.

DAARIO: Are you good on a horse?

TYRION: Middling.

DAARIO: So mainly you talk?

TYRION: And drink. I’ve survived so far.

DAARIO: Which I respect. But you would not help us on this expedition. You would help us here in Meereen, though. (to Missandei, Grey Worm, and Jorah) None of us have any experience governing a city, except for him. You want to prove your value to the queen? Prove it right here in Meereen.

JORAH: He’s a foreign dwarf that barely speaks the language. Why would the Meereenese listen to him?

DAARIO: They wouldn’t. They will listen to Grey Worm.

GREY WORM: I’ll come with you. I’ll find our queen.

MISSANDEI: You are not strong enough to go anywhere.

GREY WORM: I am.

DAARIO: He is, he’s the toughest man with no balls I’ve ever met. But you still can’t go. The people believe in you. They know you speak for the queen.

MISSANDEI: It’s true. Only the Unsullied can keep the peace in Meereen. If you leave, half the city will consume the other half.

DAARIO: And Missandei. Our queen trusts no one more than Missandei. Certainly not me. The queen’s closest confidant, the commander of the Unsullied, and the foreign dwarf with the scarred face. Good fortune, my friends, Meereen is ancient and glorious. (to Tyrion) Try not to ruin her. (to Jorah) Looks like it’s you and me, Jorah the Andal. Let’s find some good horses. We have so much to talk about.

Tyrion walks down the steps towards Missandei and Grey Worm. They exchange uncertain glances with each other.

EXT. MEEREEN - BALCONY

Tyrion stands in the place where Dany had Mossador executed and watches Jorah and Daario ride out of the city.

VOICE (O.S.): Hello, old friend.

Tyrion turns to see Varys on the balcony next to him.

VARYS: I thought we were so happy together until you abandoned me.

TYRION: I suppose there’s no point in asking how you found me.

VARYS: The birds sing in the west, the birds sing in the east. If one knows how to listen. They tell me you’ve already found favor with the Mother of Dragons.

TYRION: Well, she didn’t execute me, so that’s a promising start. Now the heroes are off to find her, and I’m stuck here, trying to placate a city on the brink of civil war. Any advice for an old comrade?

VARYS: Information is the key. You need to learn your enemies’ strengths and strategies. You need to learn which of your friends are not your friends.

TYRION: If only I knew someone with a vast network of spies.

VARYS: If only. (beat) A grand old city, choking on violence, corruption, and deceit. Who could possibly have any experience managing such a massive, ungainly beast?

Tyrion looks up to Varys with a slight smile.

TYRION: I did miss you.

VARYS: Oh, I know.

EXT. COUNTRYSIDE - PLATEAU

Dany looks to Drogon who is lying down in a ring full of bones.

DAENERYS: We have to go home.

Drogon lies down and grunts.

DAENERYS: My poor, sweet thing. Does it hurt? (pause) We have to go home. Drogon? Can you take me back to Meereen?

Daenerys pets his nose but gets no response.

DAENERYS: How far did you carry me? (surveys the area)

Drogon begins turning away from her to lick at his wounds.

DAENERYS: Drogon, we need to return. My people need me.

She climbs back on his back, but he hisses and bucks her off, then goes to sleep.

DAENERYS: Well, there’s no food. At the very least you can hunt us some supper.

Dany begins walking across the plateau to explore. A horse gallops in the distance. Camera cuts to reveal the pony-tail of a Dothraki. Three more Dothraki men arrive on horseback. Daenerys drops her ring to the ground. Another group of Dothraki arrives, and then the rest of the khalasar. They begin circling around Daenerys, howling.

INT. CERSEI’S CELL

Cersei is huddled in the corner. She shudders as the door opens.

SEPTA: Confess. Confess.

Cersei looks up to the Septa.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - HIGH SPARROW’S ROOM

Cersei is knelt before the High Sparrow in the room where she was taken away.

CERSEI: I have sinned. I see that now. How could I have been so blind for so long. I want to be clean again. I want absolution. The Crone came to me with her lamp raised high, and with its holy light--

HIGH SPARROW: You wish to make a confession?

CERSEI: Once I’ve confessed, will I be free?

SPARROW: Your Grace will be dealt with according to her sins.

CERSEI: The Mother have mercy then. I lay with a man outside the bonds of marriage, I confess.

SPARROW: Name him.

CERSEI: Lancel Lannister.

SPARROW: Your cousin. And the King’s squire.

CERSEI: I was lonely and afraid.

SPARROW: You had a husband.

CERSEI: A husband of whoring every chance he got.

SPARROW: His sins do not pardon your own.

CERSEI: May the gods forgive me.

SPARROW: Other men?

CERSEI: No.

SPARROW: No others?

CERSEI: No.

SPARROW: Speaking falsehoods before the Gods is a great crime. You understand this?

CERSEI: I do.

SPARROW: There are those who say your children were not fathered by King Robert. That they are bastards born of incest and adultery.

CERSEI: A lie. A lie from the lips of Stannis Baratheon. He wants the Throne, but his brother’s children stand in his way, so he claims they are not his brothers’. The filth. There is not one shred of truth to it. I deny it.

SPARROW: Good. But these are terrible charges. And the realm must know the truth of them. If Your Grace has given honest testimony, your trial will prove your innocence.

CERSEI: Trial? I have confessed?

SPARROW: To a single sin. Others you have denied. Your trial will separate the truths from the falsehoods.

CERSEI: I bow to the wisdom of your High Holiness. But if I might beg for just one drop of the Mother’s mercy. I haven’t seen my son… I don’t know how long it’s been. I need to see him. Please.

SPARROW: You have taken the first step on a path back to righteousness. In light of this, I will permit you to return to the Red Keep.

CERSEI: Thank you. Thank you.

SPARROW: The Mother is merciful. It is her you should thank.

CERSEI: I will, I will. I swear it, day and night.

SPARROW: Good.

CERSEI: Am I free to go?

SPARROW: After your atonement.

CERSEI: My atonement?

INT. CERSEI’S CELL

Cersei is stripped naked and has the dirt washed off of her by the septas. After they scrub her clean, they sit her down and begin chopping her hair away with a knife. They leave her naked, with short hair and a bloody scalp, and then shut the door on her.

EXT. KING’S LANDING - GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR

Cersei is carried to the top of the steps, in front of a massive crowd of King’s Landing citizens.

SPARROW: A sinner comes before you. Cersei of House Lannister, mother to his Grace King Tommen, widow to his Grace King Robert. She has committed the acts of falsehood and fornication. She has confessed her sins and begged for forgiveness. To demonstrate her repentance, she will cast aside all pride, all artifice, and present herself as the gods made her, to you. The good people of the city. She comes before you with a solemn heart. Shorn of secrets. Naked before the eyes of gods and men. To make her walk of atonement.

The septas remove her robe. She stands naked before the citizens of King’s Landing, who gasp. They force her to start walking down the stairs.

SEPTA: Shame. Shame. Shame. (rings bell)

The septa repeats “Shame. Shame. Shame.” and rings the bell through the duration of Cersei’s walk. Cersei is escorted by the Sparrows through the crowd of people. Silence at first, but once one man yells “Cunt!”, she begins to be heckled.

CROWD: Bitch! Whore! All hail her royal tits!

They begin pelting her with food. A prostitute runs in front of Cersei with her breasts out.

WOMAN: I’ve had half as many cocks as the queen!

The sparrows force her out of Cersei’s way. A man with his penis out runs in front of her later in the walk.

MAN: Suck me off! Suck me off, you bitch!

As Cersei approaches the end of her walk things get more violent. A man spits directly in her face, and a Sparrow has to beat a woman with a club as she charges Cersei. She is knocked to her knees at the end of her walk, but gets back to her feet when she sees the Red Keep in the distance. She finally reaches the end of the walk of atonement, and enters the Red Keep, sobbing.

INT. RED KEEP

Kevan Lannister, Grand Maester Pycelle, Qyburn, and the Lannister guards wait for her. Qyburn rushes to cover her naked body with a blanket as Cersei begins weeping.

QYBURN: Your Grace. It’s good to have you back. Come. We’ll take you inside. I need to have a look at those feet.

Cut to her bloody feet. We hear two giant footsteps off screen.

QYBURN: May I have the honor of presenting the newest member of the Kingsguard.

A hulking man, who is revealed to have a blue face through the eye holes in his helm, walks over to Qyburn and Cersei. He takes Cersei in his arms.

QYBURN: If it please Your Grace, he’s taken a holy vow of silence. He has sworn that he will not speak until all his Grace’s enemies are dead, and the evil has been driven from the realm.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK

Jon and Davos exit the elevator.

DAVOS: He came to your aid. Stannis. Now he needs you!

JON: We don’t have enough men to make any difference.

DAVOS: The wildlings will make a difference!

JON: The wildlings won’t ever fight for Stannis, I told you before--

DAVOS: You saved their bloody lives. If they’re going to live in the Seven Kingdoms, safe behind our wall, they ought to fight for the damn place.

JON: It’s not their fight!

The gates to Castle Black are opened and Melisandre arrives, alone and on horseback. Jon and Davos rush over to her.

JON: Stannis?

No response.

DAVOS: Shireen? The princess?

A long look but no response. Melisandre walks away from the two of them.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - JON’S ROOM

Jon goes through the various scrolls on his desk. Olly enters the room.

OLLY: Lord Commander. It’s one of the wildlings you brought back. Says he knows your Uncle Benjen. Says he’s still alive.

JON (stands up): Are you sure he’s talking about Benjen?

OLLY: Says he was first Ranger. Said he knows where to find him.

Jon rushes out of his room down to the ground. He is met by Alliser.

ALLISER: Man says he saw your uncle at Hardhome the last full moon.

JON: He could be lying.

ALLISER: Could be. There are ways to find out.

JON: Where is he?

ALLISER: Over there.

Jon walks past a group of Brothers holding torches. He sees a sign that reads “TRAITOR” when he passes them, and turns to see he is cornered. Alliser stabs him in the gut.

ALLISER: For the Watch.

Another Brother stabs him.

BROTHER: For the Watch.

A third Brother stabs him.

BROTHER: For the Watch.

A fourth brother stabs him.

BROTHER: For the Watch.

A fifth brother stabs him.

BROTHER: For the Watch.

Jon falls to his knees, struggling but still alive. Olly walks up to Jon.

JON: Olly…

Olly stabs him.

OLLY: For the Watch.

Jon stays on his knees, then falls backwards. The Brothers walk away from him. Jon lays on the ground, expressionless. A puddle of blood spreads to the top of the screen.



TEXTS

F
EXT. CASTLE BLACK - NIGHT
Pan down from the inside of The Wall towards Castle Black. GHOST is howling. Slow zoom to JON SNOW’s body, lying in the snow. A sign with the word “TRAITOR” is posted on a beam behind him. Closeup on JON SNOW. He is staring upwards, lifelessly. GHOST howls louder and pushes against the door to his pen.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - DAVOS’ CHAMBER
DAVOS hears GHOST’s howling and exits, then peers across the courtyard and sees JON SNOW’s body. He immediately runs down the steps. He slows as he approaches JON SNOW’s body. Other brothers of the Night’s Watch approach. DAVOS kneels beside JON SNOW’s body.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN: It’s the Lord Commander!

DOLOROUS EDD and other Night’s Watchmen rush up behind DAVOS.

DAVOS: Help me get him inside.

The other Night’s Watch brothers pick up JON SNOW’s body and carry it away. DAVOS remains, staring at the left over pool of blood.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - ROOM

DOLOROUS EDD wipes the table clean. The other Night’s Watch brothers place JON SNOW’s body on the table. DOLOROUS EDD places his hand on JON SNOW’s wounds, then brushes JON SNOW’s eyes closed.

DOLOROUS EDD: Thorne did this.

DAVOS: How many of your brothers do you think you can trust?

DOLOROUS EDD: Trust? The men in this room.

DAVOS: Does the wolf know you?

DOLOROUS EDD looks at DAVOS over his shoulder and nods.

DAVOS: We need all the help we can get.

As DOLOROUS EDD moves towards the door, someone knocks on it. The Night’s Watch brothers draw their blades.

MELISANDRE (O.S.): Ser Davos.

DOLOROUS EDD looks over his shoulder at DAVOS. DAVOS nods. The Night’s Watch brothers sheathe their swords. DOLOROUS EDD walks to the door and opens it. MELISANDRE enters. DOLOROUS EDD closes the door behind her. MELISANDRE is distressed at the sight of JON SNOW’s body.

MELISANDRE: I saw him in the flames, fighting at Winterfell.

DAVOS: I can’t speak for the flames, but he’s gone.

MELISANDRE touches JON SNOW’s cheek.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - MESS HALL

ALLISER THORNE sits at the high table among the other leaders of the Night’s Watch. The rest of the Night’s Watch brothers are shouting at each other.

MALE VOICE #1: He was our Lord Commander!

MALE VOICE #2: He never should have been!

ALLISER THORNE pounds his fist three times on the high table, then stands. The room quiets.

ALLISER THORNE: You all know why you’re here. Jon Snow is dead.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #1: Who killed him?

ALLISER THORNE: I did.

The Night’s Watch brothers resume shouting.

ALLISER THORNE: And Bowen Marsh and Othell Yarwyck and the other officers in this castle.

NIGHT’S WATCHMEN #1: Murderers!

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #2: Traitors!

The shouting resumes. OLLIE walks up beside the high table. ALLISER THORNE pounds the high table again.

ALLISER THORNE: You’re right!

The shouting stops.

ALLISER THORNE: We’ve committed treason, all of us. Jon Snow was my Lord Commander. I had no love for him. That was no secret. But I never once disobeyed an order. Loyalty is the foundation on which the Night’s Watch is built, and the Watch means everything to me. I have given my life, we have all given our lives to the Night’s Watch. Jon Snow was going to destroy the Night’s Watch. He let the wildlings through our gates, as no Lord Commander has ever done before. He gave them the very land on which they reaved and raped and murdered. Lord Commander Snow did what he thought was right, I’ve no doubt about that. And what he thought was right would have been the end of us. He thrust a terrible choice upon us, and we made it.

The men begin to murmur among themselves.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - ROOM

GHOST nudges JON SNOW’s hand and whimpers.

DAVOS: He’ll have seen we didn’t come. Thorne will have made it official by now. Castle Black is his.

DOLOROUS EDD: I don’t care who’s sitting at the high table. Jon was my friend, and those fuckers butchered him. Now we return the favor.

DAVOS: We don’t have the numbers.

DOLOROUS EDD: We have a direwolf.

DAVOS: It’s not enough. I didn’t know Lord Commander Snow for long, but I have to believe he wouldn’t have wanted his friends to die for nothing.

DOLOROUS EDD: If you were planning to see tomorrow, you picked the wrong room. We all die today. I say we do our best to take Thorne with us when we go.

DAVOS: We need to fight, but we don’t need to die. Not if we have help.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN: Who’s gonna help us?

DAVOS: You’re not the only ones who owe your lives to Jon Snow.

DOLOROUS EDD’s washes over with realization. He turns to the Night’s Watchman at his side.

DOLOROUS EDD: Bolt the door. Don’t let anyone in. I’ll be back as soon as I can.

DOLOROUS EDD leaves through the door.
EXT. WINTERFELL - DAY
Two men sit on horses on a hill outside Winterfell. They carry flags bearing the flayed man sigil of House Bolton.

RAMSAY (V.O.): She was 11 the first time I saw her.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - ROOM

MYRANDA’s body lies on a table.

RAMSAY: The kennelmaster’s daughter. She smelled of dog. I wasn’t much older, but everybody was already afraid of me. You certainly were.

RAMSAY turns and looks at MAESTER WOLKAN, then looks back at MYRANDA’s body..

RAMSAY: Myranda wasn’t, though. What could I do to her that those hounds couldn’t? She was fearless. There was nothing she wouldn’t do.

RAMSAY stands and places his hand on MYRANDA’s forehead.

RAMSAY: Your pain will be paid for a thousand times over. I wish you could be here to watch.

RAMSAY looks as though he is going to cry.

MAESTER WOLKAN: Shall I have a grave dug for her, my lord? Or would you rather the men build a pyre?

RAMSAY: Buried, burned?

RAMSAY walks past MAESTER WOLKAN as he exits the room.

RAMSAY: This is good meat. Feed it to the hounds.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - HALLWAY

RAMSAY is walking with ROOSE.

ROOSE: Your command of the cavalry was impressive. Thanks to you, the false king Stannis Baratheon is dead. Do you know who struck the killing blow?

RAMSAY: No.

ROOSE: A shame. I’d reward the man. Still, a great victory. Do you feel like a victor?

RAMSAY and ROOSE stop walking. RAMSAY looks back over his shoulder at ROOSE.

ROOSE: I rebelled against the crown to arrange your marriage to Sansa Stark. Do you think that burning wagons in the night and mowing down tired, outnumbered Baratheons is the same as facing a prepared and provisioned Lannister army?

RAMSAY: No.

ROOSE walks past RAMSAY into Winterfell’s great hall.

ROOSE: A reckoning will come. We need the North to face it. The entire North. They won’t back us without Sansa Stark. We no longer have Sansa Stark. You played your games with her. You played your games with the heir to the Iron Islands and now they’re both gone.

RAMSAY: I have a team of men after them with some of my best hounds. They won’t get far.

ROOSE: I’m glad to hear it. Without Sansa, you won’t be able to produce an heir. And without an heir, well…

ROOSE sits at the dinner table. RAMSAY stares at him, astonished.

ROOSE: ...let’s hope the maesters are right and Lady Walder’s carrying a boy.

EXT. NORTHERN WILDERNESS
SANSA and THEON are running through the woods frantically. The barking of dogs can be heard in the distance. SANSA tires. THEON runs back to hear and pulls her onward.

THEON: We can’t stop.

The pair resume running. They happen upon a large, snowy river.

THEON: We have to cross here.

SANSA steps on a patch of thin ice and gasps.

SANSA: I can’t.

THEON: It’s the only way to throw off the hounds.

SANSA: But it’s too cold. I can’t. I won’t make it. I’ll die.

THEON: I’ve seen what his hounds do to a person. This way is better.

THEON guides SANSA into the water. SANSA gasps at the cold. The both wade across.

CUT TO: NORTHERN WILDERNESS - WOODS

THEON and SANSA are walking together. They are blue with cold. Barking can no longer be heard. THEON spots something off camera.

THEON: Over here. Come on.

THEON leads SANSA to an overturned tree. Its roots provide shelter from the snow. They sit down under the roots, shivering.

THEON: Sansa. Sansa.

THEON wraps his arms around SANSA. She rests her head on his shoulder and closes her eyes. Dogs barking can suddenly be heard closeby.

THEON: Stay here. I’ll lure them away.

SANSA: No, I won’t make it without you.

THEON: You will. Go north, only north. Jon is Lord Commander at Castle Black. He’ll help you.

THEON runs into the woods but is immediately confronted by House Bolton soldiers and hounds.

BOLTON OFFICER: Where is Lady Bolton?

THEON: Dead.

BOLTON OFFICER: Liar.

THEON: She broke her leg jumping from the ramparts. I left her to die in the snow.

The dogs catch SANSA’s scent and begin barking. They lead the soldiers to SANSA under the roots of the tree. SANSA cowers from them.

BOLTON OFFICER: I can’t wait to see what parts Ramsay cuts off you this time.

One of the soldiers grabs SANSA and pulls her to her feet. A horse whinnies in the distance. The soldiers draw their weapons. BRIENNE and PODRICK ride towards the soldiers with their sword drawn.

BOLTON OFFICER: It’s a bloody woman.

BRIENNE cuts down BOLTON OFFICER as she rides past. PODRICK engages one of the soldiers in mounted combat. BRIENNE faces off with another mounted soldier. Their blades clash, but neither is hit. As BRIENNE rides past him, another soldier knocks her from her horse. She drops her blade but scrambles to retrieve it when she sees a soldier advancing towards her on foot. When she reaches the blade, the soldier kicks her. She retrieves the blade again and stands, engaging him in a swordfight. She cuts him down. A mounted soldier charges at BRIENNE. She jumps and strikes him, causing his horse to fall over, trapping him beneath it. While PODRICK continues his mounted sword fight, THEON grabs the blade of a fallen soldier off the ground. PODRICK cuts down the soldier he is fighting and they both fall from their horses. Another soldier advances on PODRICK, and they begin fighting. BRIENNE crawls over to the man trapped beneath his horse and slits his throat with a dagger. The soldier PODRICK is fighting knocks PODRICK’s sword out of his hand. PODRICK falls to the ground. Just before the soldier is about to strike PODRICK, THEON stabs the soldier from behind. PODRICK stands up. BRIENNE walks over to SANSA. SANSA stands up to confront her. BRIENNE places her blade on the ground in front of SANSA and kneels before her.

BRIENNE: Lady Sansa, I offer my services once again. I will shield your back and keep your council and give my life for yours if need be. I swear it by the old gods and the new.

SANSA turns at looks at THEON for confirmation. THEON nods his head.

SANSA: And I vow...that you shall always have a place by my hearth and…

PODRICK: Meat and mead at my table.

SANSA: Meat and mead at my table. And I pledge to ask no service of you that might bring you dishonor. I swear it by the old gods and the new. Arise.

BRIENNE stands up. SANSA smiles at BRIENNE.

EXT. KING’S LANDING - DAY
A ship with sails bearing the sun and spear sigil of House Martell approaches the Red Keep.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER

CERSEI is sitting in the dark by a table. The door to her chamber opens and a handmaiden enters.

HANDMAIDEN: Your Grace, I’m sorry to disturb you. A ship from Dorne has sailed into the harbor.

CERSEI smiles.

CERSEI: Myrcella…

CUT TO: RED KEEP - COURTYARD

CERSEI runs through the courtyard and out to the harbor. She descends the steps to the harbor where a small boat is coming to shore. Her smile fades. As the small boat gets closer to shore, it is revealed to be carrying JAIME and a casket. CERSEI begins to tear up.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER

JAIME is standing on the balcony, looking out. A bell tolls in the background. JAIME turns and looks back into CERSEI’s room, then enters it.

CERSEI: Do you remember the first time you saw a dead body?

JAIME: Mother.

CERSEI: All I could think about when she died was what would happen to her now. Every day, every night, what does Mama look like now? Has she started to bloat? Has her skin turned black? Have her lips peeled back from her teeth?

CERSEI begins to tear up.

CERSEI: I think about locking Myrcella in a crypt.

JAIME walks over to CERSEI and kneels in front of her.

CERSEI: I think about her beautiful little face starting to collapse.

JAIME: Shh, shh. Don’t think about it.

CERSEI: I have to. I have to. It’s not right she has to suffer alone.

JAIME: She’s not suffering. She’s gone. No one can hurt her anymore.

CERSEI (crying): She was good. From her first breath, she was so sweet. I don’t know where she came from. She was nothing like me. No meanness, no jealous, just good.

JAIME: I know.

CERSEI: I thought if I could make something so good, so pure...maybe I’m not a monster.

JAIME: Listen -- listen to me. She was my daughter and I failed her.

CERSEI: No, I knew this would happen. The witch told me years ago. She promised me three children. She promised me they’d die. “And gold their shrouds.” Everything she said came true. You couldn’t have stopped it. It’s prophecy. It’s fate.

JAIME: You don’t believe that.

CERSEI: Of course I do. You told me yourself when Father died. You said we had to stay together. You said people would try to tear us apart, take what’s ours. That was a prophecy, too. I didn’t listen to you, and everything you said came true.

JAIME places his hand on CERSEI’s cheek..

JAIME: Fuck prophecy. Fuck fate. Fuck everyone who isn’t us. We’re the only ones who matter, the only ones in this world. And everything they’ve taken from us, we’re going to take back and more.

JAIME embraces CERSEI.

JAIME: We’re going to take everything there is.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - MARGAERY’s CELL
SEPTA UNELLA is reading scripture to MARGAERY.

SEPTA UNELLA: “The Seven Hells brim with the souls of saintly men. They scream in agony and their shame is so great, they do not feel the flames, for now they see if not for a single sin they concealed, they were saved.”

MARGAERY: I’d like to see my brother.

SEPTA UNELLA: Confess.

MARGAERY: Please. How is he? At least tell me that.

SEPTA UNELLA: Confess.

MARGAERY: I am the queen and I demand to see my brother.

SEPTA UNELLA: Sinners don’t make commands. They make confessions.

SEPTA UNELLA slams the scripture book closed and approaches MARGAERY aggressively.

The door opens and HIGH SPARROW enters.

HIGH SPARROW: Septa Unella.

HIGH SPARROW sighs.

HIGH SPARROW: Our other guests need you.

SEPTA UNELLA exits. HIGH SPARROW walks over to MARGAERY and gently pulls her hair away from her face.

HIGH SPARROW (whispering): There.

MARGAERY looks up at HIGH SPARROW.

HIGH SPARROW: Septa Unella can be overzealous at times. I’ll speak with her.

MARGAERY: My brother, can you tell me how he is?

HIGH SPARROW sits on a stool beside MARGAERY.

HIGH SPARROW: It isn’t Ser Loras that brings me here. Your husband misses you dearly. The love between a man and wife is sacred. It reflects the love the gods have for all of us. But sin leads us away from the sacred. And only confession can purge sin.

MARGAERY: I have nothing to confess.

HIGH SPARROW: So you believe you are pure? Perfect? Wholly without sin?

MARGAERY: None of us are.

HIGH SPARROW: You have started down the path. But you have many miles to go..

HIGH SPARROW exits. MARGAERY hugs her knees.

EXT. SUNSPEAR COURTYARD - DAY
ELLARIA is assisting DORAN to his wheelchair. They are accompanied by TYENE, AREO, and several guards.

DORAN: I always envied Oberyn. He lived. He truly lived. Sailed around the world. Fought men from every country. Lay with the most beautiful women alive.

ELLARIA: And men.

DORAN: And men. He experienced everything, while I sat here in Dorne trying my best to keep my people alive and well fed. But that is life. We each have our roles.

DORAN sits in his wheelchair. ELLARIA places a pillow behind him.

DORAN: Oberyn was born to be an adventurer. And I was born to rule.

ELLARIA: The gods are not fools. You would have been a lousy adventurer. And Oberyn, pfft, he would have been a terrible ruler.

A maester approaches.

DORAN (to TYENE): Your mother is a brilliant woman, you know that?

MAESTER: Prince Doran.

The maester bows and hands DORAN a scroll. DORAN unravels and reads it.

DORAN: The Princess Myrcella…

TYENE produces a dagger from her boot and stabs AREO in the back, killing him. ELLARIA produces a dagger of her own and stabs DORAN in the chest. The maester tries to run away, but TYENE retrieves her dagger from AREO’s body and throws it into the back of the maester’s neck, killing him. ELLARIA removes her dagger from DORAN’s chest and pushes him to the ground. The remaining guards do nothing.

ELLARIA: When was the last time you left this palace? You don’t know your own people. Their disgust for you. Elia Martell raped and murdered, and you did nothing. Oberyn martell butchered, and you did nothing. You’re not a Dornishman. You’re not our prince.

DORAN is bleeding out on the ground. He gasps for air.

DORAN: My son Trystane…

ELLARIA scoffs.

ELLARIA: Your son is weak just like you. And weak men will never rule Dorne again.

DORAN dies.

CUT TO: SUNSPEAR - TRYSTANE’S CHAMBER

TRYSTANE is painting an eye on a stone. OBARA and NYMERIA enter. TRYSTANE does not look at them.

TRYSTANE: I told you I’m not hungry.

OBARA: We’re not here to feed you.

TRYSTANE stands and turns around to look at them.

OBARA: We’re here to kill you.

OBARA walks to the opposite side of the room. NYMERIA remains by the door. TRYSTANE reaches for his sword.

NYMERIA: You want her to do it or me?

TRYSTANE: We are family. I don’t want to hurt you.

NYMERIA: Her or me?

TRYSTANE draws his blade and points it at NYMERIA.

NYMERIA: Good.

OBARA: Smart boy.

TRYSTANE steps between the two women, readying himself to fight NYMERIA. OBARA stabs him through the back of his head with her spear.

NYMERIA: You’re a greedy bitch, you know that?

OBARA and NYMERIA exit.

EXT. MEEREEN TOWNSHIP - DAY
TYRION and VARYS are walking through the streets together.

TYRION: We’re never going to fix what’s wrong with this city from the top of an 800-foot pyramid.

VARYS looks over his shoulder at a passing commoner.

TYRION: We’ll be fine. We’re dressed like common merchants.

VARYS: You walk like a rich person.

TYRION: You’ve spent a lot of time studying the way rich people walk?

VARYS: You walk as though the paving stones were your personal property. I used to steal from people like you when I was a boy.

TYRION: It’s a good thing you’re not a boy anymore...because you have no cock.

A woman is lying in the street holding a baby. TYRION and VARYS approach.

TYRION (speaking Valyrian): For your baby. To eat.

The woman cowers away from TYRION.

VARYS (to TYRION): She thinks you want to eat her baby.

VARYS kneels.

VARYS (speaking Valyrian): His Valyrian is terrible. He only wants to give you money, so your baby can eat.

VARYS hands the woman money. She gestures at them to thank them, and they walk on. They walk into a courtyard where “KILL THE MASTERS” is written in red on a wall. Beneath it, “MHYSA IS A MASTER,” is written.

VARYS: Mhysa means mother in Valyrian.

TYRION: I know what mhysa means.

VARYS: Who wrote it?

TYRION: Hard to know. Our queen is not as popular in Meereen as she used to be.

VARYS: The Sons of the Harpy?

TYRION: Very possibly. Daenerys Targaryen took away their most valuable property, told them human beings weren’t even property to begin with. You can see why they’re unhappy. Of course, it could also be the freed men.

TYRION and VARYS enter a chamber where a red priest is preaching to a group of listeners.

LISTENERS (speaking Valyrian): For the night is dark and full of terrors.

RED PRIEST: The Lord of Light sent the Mother of Dragons to you, and those who love the darkness chased her away.

TYRION: Many of the former slaves feel that Daenerys has abandoned them.

VARYS: She did fly away on a dragon and not come back.

RED PRIEST: How will you respond? Will you wring your hands, while you wait for the Mother of Dragons to return? Or will you you take up her flames yourselves? Will you fight for your own salvation, now that Queen Daenerys is not here to fight for you?

TYRION: It’s a problem.

TYRION and VARYS proceed in a much larger courtyard.

TYRION: Fear has brought Meereen to a standstill. Whoever you are, wherever you go, someone in this city wants to murder you. We can’t fight an enemy we don’t know.

VARYS: The Sons of the Harpy planned their attack in the fighting pits very carefully, which means they take orders from someone.

TYRION: And have you started looking for that someone?

VARYS: My little birds have already taken wing. Soon they’ll return, singing songs of men in gold masks.

Men are shouting in the distance. A bell begins to toll. A flood of people run through an archway on the opposite side of the courtyard toward TYRION and VARYS, then run past them. TYRION and VARYS proceed through the archway and into the harbor. Smoke pours from the burning wreckage of all the ships in the harbor.

TYRION: Well, we won’t be sailing to Westeros anytime soon.

EXT. ESSOS COUNTRYSIDE - DAY
JORAH and DAARIO are riding horses across the countryside. Cut to JORAH kneeling. He is lifting the charred skull of a ram. DAARIO remains on his horse.

DAARIO: Goat?

JORAH: Ram.

DAARIO: You think our friend got him?

JORAH: Don’t know anything else that can melt a ram’s horn.

DAARIO: We’re on the right path, then.

JORAH and DAARIO return to their horses. They proceed across the countryside.

DAARIO: Perhaps she’s tired of being queen. I don’t think she likes it very much.

JORAH: She’s too smart to like it.

DAARIO: Maybe she’s flown somewhere else, somewhere far away from men like us.

JORAH: I’ve been all over the world. There’s no escaping men like us.

DAARIO: There’s no escaping her, eh? You keep coming back. Why?

JORAH: You know why.

DAARIO: isn’t it frustrating wanting someone who doesn’t want you back?

JORAH: Of course it is.

DAARIO: You’re a romantic. I admire that. Sometimes I look at you and I think, “So that’s what I’ll be like when I grow old.”

JORAH: If you grow old.

DAARIO: If I grow old. I hope I do. I want to see what the world looks like when she’s done conquering it.

JORAH: So do I.

JORAH stops his horse. DAARIO proceeds ahead. JORAH pulls back his sleeve and looks at the growing patch of Greyscale on his forearm. The men resume riding in unison. They pull up on a circular swathe of horse tracks. There is a smaller circle of untouched grass in the center of the swathe.

DAARIO: Huh, an army?

JORAH: Not an army. A horde.

JORAH dismounts his horse and walks to the circle of untouched grass.

DAARIO: Dothraki?

JORAH looks down and sees something in the grass. He bends down and retrieves a ring.

JORAH: They have her.

EXT. ESSOS ARID LANDS - DAY
The Dothraki horde is traveling together in great numbers. DAENERYS is walking beside the horse of two Dothraki bloodriders. DAENERYS trips. BLOODRIDER #1 whips her. Both men laugh. They speak in Dothraki.

BLOODRIDER #1: Maybe she saw a ghost. My friend’s mother saw a ghost and her hair turned white.

BLOODRIDER #2: Pink people are afraid of the sun. It burns their skin. This one stands too long in the sun and her hair goes white.

BLOODRIDER #1: You think she’s got white pussy hair too? You ever been with a girl with white pussy hair?

BLOODRIDER #2: Only when I was fucking your grandma.

BLOODRIDER #1 chuckles and makes a kissing sound at DAENERYS.

BLOODRIDER #1 (to DAENERYS): I’ll ask Khal Moro for a night with you. What do you think?

BLOODRIDER #2: Pretty eyes, but she’s an idiot.

BLOODRIDER #1: She doesn’t have to be smart to get fucked in the ass.

BLOODRIDER #2: I like to talk when I’m finished. Otherwise, we might as well be dogs.

CUT TO: ESSOS ARID LANDS - DOTHRAKI SETTLEMENT

The Dothraki folk are tending to their affairs. BLOODRIDER #1 and BLOODRIDER #2 escort DAENERYS to KHAL MORO’s tent. KHAL MORO is sitting with his wives and other bloodriders.

BLOODRIDER #2: For you, my Khal. The white-haired girl we found in the hills.

BLOODRIDER #1 pushes DAENERYS towards KHAL MORO. KHAL MORO considers her. The attendants speak in Dothraki.

BLOODRIDER #3: Look at those lips, blood of my blood.

WIFE #1: Blue-eyed women are witches.

WIFE #2: It is known.

WIFE#1: Cut off her head, before she casts a spell on you.

KHAL MORO stands and walks around DAENERYS.

KHAL MORO: Even if I was blind, I’d hear my wives say, “Cut off her head” and I’d know this woman was beautiful. I’m glad I’m not blind. Seeing a beautiful woman naked for the first time, what is better than that?

BLOODRIDER #3: Killing another Khal?

KHAL MORO: Yes, killing another Khal.

BLOODRIDER #4: Conquering a city and taking her people as slaves, and taking her idols back to Vaes Dothrak.

BLOODRIDER #3: Breaking a wild horse, forcing it to submit to your will.

KHAL MORO (annoyed): Seeing a beautiful woman naked for the first time is among the five best things in life.

KHAL MORO grabs DAENERYS by the chest.

DAENERYS (speaking Dothraki): Do not touch me.

The bloodriders and wives look at each other. KHAL MORO released DAENERYS.

DAENERYS: I am Daenerys Stormborn of the House Targaryen, the First of Her Name, the Unburnt, Queen of Meereen, Queen of the Andals and the Rhoynar of the First Men, Khaleesi of the Great Grass Sea, Breaker of Chains and Mother of Dragons.

KHAL MORO and his bloodriders laugh. He places his hand on the back of DAENERYS’ head

KHAL MORO: You are nobody, the millionth of your name, Queen of Nothing, slave of Khal Moro. Tonight I will lie with you, and if the Great Stallion is kind, you will give me a son. Do you understand?

DAENERYS: I will not lie with you. And I will bear no children, for you, or anyone else. Not until the sun rises in the west, and sets in the east.

WIFE #1: I told you she was a witch. Cut off her head.

KHAL MORO: I like her. She has spirit.

DAENERYS: I was wife of Khal Drogo, son of Khal Bharbo.

KHAL MORO takes his hand away from DAENERYS and steps backwards.

KHAL MORO: Khal Drogo is dead.

DAENERYS: I know. I burnt his body.

KHAL MORO: Forgive me. I did not know. It is forbidden to lie with a Khal’s widow. No one will touch you. You have my word.

KHAL MORO draws his blade and cuts DAENERYS’ bindings.

DAENERYS: If you will escort me back to Meereen, I will see that your khalasar is given a thousand horses, as a sign of my gratitude.

KHAL MORO: When a Khal dies, there is only one place for his Khaleesi.

KHAL MORO sits down.

WIFE #1: Vaes Dothrak. The Temple of the Dosh Khaleen.

WIFE #2: To live out her days with the widows of dead Khals. It is known.

EXT. BRAAVOS STREET - DAY
An older man walks through the street carrying a basket. He walks past a beggar. The beggar is revealed to be ARYA. Another man walks up and places a coin in ARYA’s beggar bowl.

ARYA: Thank you.

ARYA falls silent and listens to the chatter of the common folk. The waif of the House of Black and White appears carrying two staves.

WAIF: Are you listening, blind girl? Do you hear them talking? Do any of them talk to you? No. So sad.

WAIF holds out one of the staves and throws it at ARYA. ARYA catches it clumsily. WAIF hits ARYA with the other staff, knocking her over.

WAIF: Stand and fight, blind girl.

ARYA stands, holding the staff out in front of her.

ARYA: I can’t see.

WAIF: That’s your problem, not mine.

WAIF strikes ARYA on the leg. ARYA cries out and swings her staff. She misses. WAIF jabs ARYA in the stomach with the end of the staff, then knocks her to the ground. ARYA stands back up and swings her staff. She misses again. WAIF strikes ARYA in the face with her staff twice. The second blow knocks ARYA over. ARYA stands up and swings for a third time. She misses again. WAIF strikes ARYA several more times, then knocks her to the ground again. ARYA tries to get up by leaning on her staff, but WAIF knocks the staff out of her hands.

WAIF: See you tomorrow.

WAIF walks away. ARYA remains on her knees, panting.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK COURTYARD - DAY
Several Night’s Watch brothers allied to ALLISER THORNE are pointing crossbows at the room that DAVOS and the other Night’s Watch brothers allied with JON SNOW are holed up. ALLISER THORNE approaches the door to the room with several men and knocks. The Night’s Watch brothers inside draw their sword and GHOST growls. DAVOS stands up and walks to the door. ALLISER THORNE knocks again.

ALLISER THORNE: Ser Davos, we have no cause to fight. We are both anointed knights.

DAVOS: Hear that, lads? Nothing to fear.

ALLISER THORNE: I will grant amnesty to all brothers who thrown down their arms before nightfall. And you, Ser Davos, I will allow you to travel south, a free man with a fresh horse.

DAVOS: And some mutton. I’d like some mutton.

ALLISER THORNE: What?

DAVOS: I’m not much of a hunter. I’ll need some food if I’m gonna make it south without starving.

ALLISER THORNE: We’ll give you food. You can bring the Red Woman with you if you like. Or you can leave her here with us, whichever you choose. But surrender by nightfall or this ends with blood.

DAVOS: Thank you, Ser Alliser. We’ll discuss amongst ourselves and come back to you with an answer.

ALLISER THORNE and his men leave.

DAVOS: Boys, I’ve been running from men like that ll my life. In my learned opinion, we open that door --

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #1: And they’ll slaughter us all.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #2: They want to come in, they’re gonna come in.

DAVOS: Aye, but we don’t need to make it easy for them.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #2: Edd is our only chance.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #1: It’s a sad fucking statement if Dolorous Edd is our only chance.

DAVOS: There’s always the Red Woman.

NIGHT’S WATCHMAN #1: What’s one redhead gonna do against 40 armed men?

DAVOS: You haven’t seen her do what I’ve seen her do.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - MELISANDRE’S CHAMBER

MELISANDRE is sitting at the edge of her bed by a fire. She looks across the room at a small mirror standing on a table, then walks over to it. MELISANDRE gazes into the mirror, then disrobes. She removes her collar. The gemstone in its center glimmers. She places the collar on the table beside the mirror. The mirror’s reflection reveals that her appearance has changed to that of an en extremely elderly woman. MELISANDRE continues to stare at herself in the mirror, then walks back over to the bed and gets under the covers.



TEXTS

FORUMS

EXT. BEYOND THE WALL
Heavy snow is falling. MEERA is dragging BRAN’s sledge through the forest. BRAN’s eyes are glazed white. He experiences many visions of the past all at once. MEERA staggers and falls against the base of a tree. She puts all her weight into pulling the sledge, but it does not budge. She begins crying and goes to BRAN, cradling his head. BRAN continues to have rapid fire visions, then sees a group of wights running through the woods. He wakes up from the visions and looks at MEERA.

BRAN: Meera. They found us.
MEERA looks out into the woods and sees the group of wights. She begins crying and embraces BRAN.

MEERA: I’m so sorry.

The wights converge on MEERA and BRAN. Moments before they reach them, a cloaked rider appears. The rider’s horse kicks one of the wights out of the way, then the rider extends a chain which lights on fire at the end. Two wights charge, and the rider hits them both with the chain, setting them on fire. A third wight tries to attack his horse, but the horse’s bulk rebuffs it into a tree and it crumbles. The rider plunges a chain-sickle into the chest of another wight, then rides forward, dragging the wight behind his horse. He sets another wight on fire with the chain, launching it into the air, and then approaches BRAN and MEERA.

RIDER: Come with me, now.

A large group of wights approaches.

RIDER: The dead don’t rest.

The rider leans down and hoists BRAN up onto his horse. MEERA takes the rider’s hand and joins them on the horse’s back. The three of them ride off into the forest with wights in pursuit.
EXT. ROAD TO HORN HILL
SAM, GILLY, and LITTLE SAMare riding in a carriage escorted by several soldiers. GILLY looks out the window. SAM is holding LITTLE SAM.

GILLY: It’s so green.

SAM: Oh, yes. Once you get south of the Riverlands, very different sorts of trees start to take over. Maple, elm, beech, poplar. The odd willow. And of course now that summer’s over, you’ll start seeing the autumn colors coming in. Still, you’ll find more green here than anywhere else.

GILLY: You’re nervous. You’re a nervous talker.

SAM looks away.

GILLY: That’s not any better being a nervous mute.

SAM: I didn’t think I’d ever come back here after my father made me renounce my title and inheritance and, well, threaten to kill me if I didn’t. A person just doesn’t feel welcome at that point.

GILLY looks at LITTLE SAM.

SAM: And I certainly didn’t expect to be introducing him to my family. So you know what to tell them.

GILLY: That Little Sam is your baby.

SAM: Yes, now that’s very important. If he thinks that Little Sam is his grandchild, he’ll take you in. He’ll get an education. He’ll learn to read. And you can help teach him. Huh?

GILLY: What did you tell your family about me?


SAM: I told them I met you in the North.

GILLY: Did you tell them how far north?

SAM: Well, it wasn’t a very large piece of parchment.

GILLY: You didn’t tell them where I’m really from? You didn’t tell them I’m a wildling?

SAM: The thing is...my father doesn’t like wildlings. He hoped I’d make a man of myself by “killing some bloody wildlings,” so it’s probably a good subject to avoid if at all possible.

GILLY looks out the window.

GILLY: I think we’re here.

SAM looks out the window. The carriage is approaching the castle on Horn Hill.

CUT TO: HORN HILL - COURTYARD

A party of guests is lined up at the entrance to the castle courtyard. GILLY and SAM enter. GILLY is carrying LITTLE SAM. SAM’s mother, MELESS, and his sister, TALLA, descend a set of stairs and approach them.

MELESSA: Sam. Oh, Sam.

SAM and MELESSA embrace.

SAM: Oh, hello, Mother.

MELESSA: I never thought I’d see you again. You look wonderful.

SAM: Oh.

TALLA embraces SAM and he grunts.

SAM: Talla? Gods, you’re a woman now.

TALLA: Father says I have to marry Symun Fossoway. He has yellow teeth- -

MELESSA: That’s enough, Talla.

SAM: Oh, um, Mother, this is Gilly.

GILLY bows her head and curtsies.

MELESSA: Oh, my. You are lovely.

GILLY: I am happy to know you, Lady Tarly.

SAM: Oh, and this, this is our son Samwell.

MELESSA and TALLA smile at each other. MELESSA approaches the baby and smiles.

MELESSA: Hello, little one. It’s me, your grandmother.

LITTLE SAM smiles and touches MELESSA’s face.

MELESSA: May I hold him?

GILLY: Yes, of course.

GILLY passes LITTLE SAM to MELESSA.

MELESSA (to LITTLE SAM): You have a curious mind, I can tell. You’ll be a scholar like your father.

SAM: Where is Father? And Dickon?

MELESSA: They’re on a hunt. They’ll join us for dinner. Come inside. Such a journey. You must be exhausted.

MELESSA passes LITTLE SAM back to GILLY. SAM and MELESSA proceed up the steps. TALLA takes GILLY’s arm and they follow.

TALLA: Come, you’ll be wanting a bath after all that travel. Oh, and a dress for dinner. You can wear one of mine. What’s your color? Midnight blue or silver? Silver, maybe. Come. You can choose one of my bedrooms if you want.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR
TOMMEN and the HIGH SPARROW are standing in the central chamber. TOMMEN lights a candle.

TOMMEN: Is there no other way?

HIGH SPARROW: You’re afraid for her?

TOMMEN: Of course I’m afraid for her! It just seems very dangerous.

HIGH SPARROW: She’ll be protected the entire way. The Faith Militant are very stern with those who overstep their bounds. And Queen Margaery isn’t your mother. I suspect the gods will predispose the common people to gentleness on her behalf. She’s truly opened her heart to them.

TOMMEN: She’s always been very devoted to the poor and the unfortunate.

HIGH SPARROW: And now she’s devoted to the gods as well. Would you like to see her?

CUT TO: GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - PRAYER ROOM

MARGAERY is sitting on a bench reading a book. The door opens. TOMMEN and the HIGH SPARROW are visible outside. TOMMEN enters and stares at MARGAERY. The HIGH SPARROW closes the door behind TOMMEN. MARGAERY sets down her book and stands. They embrace.

TOMMEN: Have they hurt you? Have they mistreated you?

MARGAERY: No, Your Grace.

TOMMEN: I’ve missed you. More than you could know.

MARGAERY: We’ll be together again soon and everything will be better than it was before.

TOMMEN: Better how? Soon the- - walk of atonement. He says there’s no other way.

MARGAERY: Have you spoken to him at all, the High Sparrow?

TOMMEN: Yes, a few times. Have you?

MARGAERY: Yes, I have. He’s not quite what we thought he was, is he?

TOMMEN scrunches up his face. MARGAERY chuckles and turns away.

MARGAERY: You think I’m mad. I sound mad.

TOMMEN: No. No, you don’t. You- - you could never. You’re right, he’s not. He’s a lot more- -

MARGAERY: He is. There’s something about him. His way of looking at the world. It’s not an easy thing admitting to yourself what you really are. It’s taken me a while. He’s helped me.

TOMMEN: What are you talking about? You’re a good person. You’ve always been a good person. You’re the best person I know.

MARGAERY chuckles and retrieves her book from the bench.

TOMMEN: I was just telling him about your devotion to the poor.

MARGAERY: Ah, yes, I visited their hovels and I fed them soup and I made sure I was seen doing it. I never gave them what they really needed, though. I’ve had lots of time to think about how good I was at seeming good. All those stories I told myself about who I was and why I did the things I did. There were so many lies in those stories.

TOMMEN: I don’t understand.

MARGAERY rushes to TOMMEN and takes his hand.

MARGAERY: It’s all right. It really is. It’s such a relief to let go of those lies.

MARGAERY leads him to the bench and they sit down on it together.

TOMMEN: What about Loras?

MARGAERY: I love my brother. I will always love my brother. His soul is pure and perfect. His sins don’t erase that purity, they only obscure it. He just needs to atone for them. We all do. Sooner or later, one way or another. The gods have a plan for us all.

INT. HORN HILL - HALLWAY
SAM paces. GILLY enters on the far end of the hall. She is wearing a dress and her hair is done up.

GILLY: It’s hard to walk in this.

SAM: It’s beautiful. You’re beautiful.

GILLY takes SAM’s arm and they walk down the hall together.

CUT TO: HORN HILL - DINING HALL

SAM, GILLY, MELESSA, TALLA, DICKON, and RANDYLL are sitting around the dinner table eating. RANDYLL takes a bite and stares at SAM. GILLY looks around at others using their utensils and mimics them. SAM looks at DICKON.

SAM: This venison, it’s very tasty. Is it from today’s hunt?

DICKON: Well, no. We haven’t been able to cure that one yet. This is last week’s.

SAM: Oh, of course. Sorry. Long journey.

DICKON: Brought it down from 70 yards. One shot.

SAM: Oh, that’s a fair distance.

DICKON: So do you do much hunting up at the wall?

SAM: Oh, yes. Yes. A good amount. North of the Wall, you don’t hunt, you don’t eat.

DICKON: Mm-hmmm. Mostly deer or is it elk as well?

SAM: Rabbits. Sometimes squirrels. I say “we,” it’s my friend Jon mostly. Sometimes Edd. Oh, and Gilly. She’s- - she’s quite a good hunter as well. Um, huntress.

MELESSA (to GILLY): I imagine it’s common where you’re from. We once met a man, Lord Umber from Last Hearth, wasn’t it, Randyll, who said he taught all his daughters how to hunt.

TALLA: Your father taught you to hunt? Our father would never teach us. I think our father could learn a thing or two from your father.

RANDYLL: That’s enough of that.

MELESSA: Samwell, would you care for more bread?

SAM: Oh, yes. Yes, please. Thank you, Mother.

A servant girl retrieves the basket of bread. She holds out the basket to SAM. SAM reaches for the bread.

RANDYLL: Not fat enough already?

SAM waves the servant away.

SAM: I travelled south under orders from the Lord Commander. He wants me to- -

RANDYLL: I read your letter. You’re to be a maester.

SAM: Yes. And once I have my chain, I’ll return to Castle Black.

RANDYLL: I thought the Night’s Watch might make a man of you. Something resembling a man at least. You managed to stay soft and fat.

SAM puts down his utensils.

RANDYLL: Your nose buried in books. Spending your life reading about the achievements of better men. I’ll wager you still can’t sit a horse or wield a sword.

MELESSA: Randyll, to be maester of the Night’s Watch is a great honor.

GILLY: He can wield a sword. He killed a Thenn. He killed a White Walker.

DICKON laughs.

DICKON: There’s no such thing.

GILLY: I saw it with my own eyes on our way down to Castle Black. He drove a dagger into the walker’s heart. He risked his own life to save mine more than once. He’s a greater warrior than either of you will ever be.

RANDYLL: Your way down to Castle Black? Where did he kill a white walker? Where are you from? How’d you come to meet my son?

GILLY: The Night’s Watch came to our keep.

RANDYLL: Where?

SAM: Gilly.

GILLY: North of the Wall.

RANDYLL: North of the Wall? You’re a Wildling. The Seven Kingdoms have waged war against these savages for centuries and here I sit hosting one in my hall thanks to my son. See that sword?

RANDYLL points to a blade mounted on a mantle beside the table.

RANDYLL: It’s called Heartsbane. It’s been in our family for 500 years. It’s Valyrian steel. Only a handful of them left in the world. It’s supposed to go to my firstborn son after I die. To him. He will never wield that sword. If he were to become Lord Tarly of Horn Hill, it would be the end of this house. I took you for a Mole’s Town whore when I saw you and I made my peace with that. Who else would have him? But I overestimated him. No. It was a wildling whore that seduced my son. This you getting back at me, boy? Hmm? Bring that to my table and making me dine with it. And you got what you were after, didn’t you? A bastard. A half-breed bastard. Your invitation into our home.

MELESSA throws down her utensils and stands. She walks to GILLY.

MELESSA: Come, my dear. Talla.

TALLA and GILLY stand and begin to follow MELESSA out of the hall.

MELESSA: I’ve lost my appetite.

RANDYLL: He dishonors us.

MELESSA: You dishonor yourself.

RANDYLL (to SAM): Your mother’s a fine woman. You’re not worthy of her. To please her, I’ll take the wildling in. She can work in the kitchens. The bastard will be raised here. But this will be the last night you ever spend at Horn Hill.

CUT TO: HORN HILL - GILLY’S GUEST CHAMBER

GILLY is sitting at the foot of the bed. LITTLE SAM is in a crib beside her. SAM stands before them both. He hangs his head.

SAM: I’m sorry I let him treat you that way. I was afraid he’d turn you and Little Sam away.

GILLY: I’m not angry at you. I’m angry that horrible people can treat good people that way and get away with it. When do you have to go?

SAM: First light.

LITTLE SAM fusses and reaches for SAM. SAM takes his hand.

SAM: Say good-bye to him for me.

SAM starts off but GILLY stands and gets in his way. She places her hands on his chest and kisses him.

GILLY: You’re not what he thinks you are, Sam. He doesn’t know what you are.

SAM: Good-bye, Gilly.

SAM walks to the door. He turns back and stares at GILLY before closing the doors. GILLY looks around the guest chamber and then goes to LITTLE SAM. She pulls his blanket up higher and comforts him. SAM bursts back into the room.

GILLY: Sam?

SAM: We’re leaving.

GILLY: What?

SAM: Get your things.

GILLY: I don’t have any things.

SAM picks up LITTLE SAM.

GILLY: What are you doing?

SAM: We belong together. All of us.

CUT TO: HORN HILL - DINING CHAMBER

SAM and GILLY walk briskly through the hall. GILLY is carrying LITTLE SAM.

GILLY: What about your mother and sister?

SAM: Oh, they’ll understand.

GILLY: Your sister’s dress.

SAM grabs a stool and carries it in front of the mantle hosting Heartsbane.

SAM: She won’t mind. Looks better on you anyway.

SAM climbs on top of the stool.

GILLY: Sam. That’s your father’s sword.

SAM lifts Heartsbane off the mantle. He groans and slides it into its scabbard.

SAM: It’s my family’s sword.

GILLY: Sam. Won’t he come for it?

SAM: He can bloody well try.

SAM hops down off the stool.

EXT. BRAAVOS - SHEELBA SQUARE
The acting troupe is putting on a repeat performance of The Bloody Hand, their play about the happenings of Westerosi royalty. AYRA is standing in the crowd in the front row. On stage is CLORENZO portraying JOFFREY, an actress portraying MARGAERY, BIANCA portraying SANSA, BOBONO portraying TYRION, and LADY CRANE portraying CERSEI. CLORENZO is at center stage, brandishing a prop sword.

CLARENZO: The lion and the rose are one. I thank the gods above.

The actress portraying MARGAERY runs to CLARENZO.

CLARENZO: And to you, my beauteous bridge, I pledge undying love.

ALL: Hail King Joffrey. Hail Queen Margaery.

CLARENZO: I’ll drink a toast to my new queen, for there is no one fairer. Dear Uncle, will you share my joy and be my royal cupbearer?

BOBONO approaches CLARENZO and hands him a prop cup.

BOBONO: Drink long and deep, my noble king, from this cup of sweet wine.

CLARNEZO takes the prop cup and BOBONO walks to center stage, addressing the audience.

BOBONO: The last drink he shall ever take. And vengeance shall be mine.

BOBONO laughs and the audience boos. CLARENZO takes a sip from the prop cup, then gags and sputters. The audience gasps. He moves to center stage.

CLARENZO: Poison! Murder! I gasp. I- - I die.

ARYA smiles and laughs in the crowd.

CLARENZO: I limp. And it was he…

CLARENZO points at BOBONO. BOBONO holds up a prop vial of poison. The audience gasps and boos.

CLARENZO: ...that poisoned me. My evil Uncle Imp.

BOBONO laughs and exits with BIANCA. The audience boos. CLARENZO collapses and LADY CRANE kneels down beside him. ARYA laughs. LADY CRANE cradles the head of the actor portraying JOFFREY.

LADY CRANE: My firstborn son. My golden lion foully, falsely slain. I pray you found a lasting peace free from strife and pain.

ARYA’s smile fades.

LADY CRANE: Hear my prayer, O cruel gods. Take my life instead. For I cannot face another day when my sweet boy is dead. Oh, woe. Oh grief.

ARYA notices BIANCA standing offstage. BIANCA is watching LADY CRANE’s performance and mouths her lines as she utters them.

LADY CRANE: Oh, darkest day, my heart is full of sorrow. All hope is lost. All joy is gone. And there is no tomorrow.

LADY CRANE kisses CLARENZO’s cheek and lays his head down. The audience claps. The actors clear out the stage and the prop men change the scene. BOBONO enters carrying a prop crossbow. IZEMBARO, portraying TYWIN, is sitting on a prop toilet.

BOBONO: What is that I hear and smell? Someone I’ll soon send to hell.

ARYA leaves the front row and moves through the crowd.

BOBONO: It’s time to see if truth they told who said Tywin Lannister shits gold.

BOBONO pretends to shoot IZEMBARO with the crossbow. IZEMBARO cries out.

IZEMBARO: You beast. You beast. You killed my wife and now you’ve taken your father’s life.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE BACKSTAGE

ARYA enters and walks further inward. On her way through the entrance hall, she sees the prop head the performers use for NED’s execution scene.

IZEMBARO (O.S.): No worse child ever stained this land.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE STAGE

IZEMBARO: Curse the day I named you.

IZEMBARO groans as though dying and turns to the side. The sound guy makes a farting noise.

BOBONO: My greatest crime. Now I must flee.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE BACKSTAGE

ARYA walks into the actor’s break room.

BOBONO (O.S.): Then sail across the Narrow Sea to do unto you more treachery.

ARYA draws the curtain and stares at LADY CRANE’s bottle of rum.

BOBONO (O.S.): Don’t fear the winter.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE STAGE

BOBONO: Fear me!

BOBONO shoots a prop arrow into the audience and laughs. The audience gasps and boos him offstage.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE BACKSTAGE

IZEMBARO (O.S.): Thank you. Ladies and gentlemen, I give you Bianca, Clarenzo.

ARYA retrieves a vial of from her satchel. She uncorks LADY CRANE’s bottle of rum.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE STAGE

IZEMBARO, BIANCA, and CLARENZO stand center stage.

IZEMBARO: I give you Bobono.

BOBONO enters the stage and the audience boos.

IZEMBARO: I give you Camello.

CUT TO: SHEELBA SQUARE BACKSTAGE

ARYA pours the contents of the vial into LADY CRANE’s rum bottle and corks it.

IZEMBARO (O.S.): And last but not least, sweet Lady Crane.

On stage, LADY CRANE enters and bows. The crowd cheers wildly. AYRA hears the cheering. She tucks the away the vial, draws back the curtain, and exits the break room. The actors are all piling into the area. CAMELLO approaches ARYA in the entrance hallway and hands her his costume cloak.

CAMELLO: Give this a good beating. Shake those fleas out. That’s a dear.

IZEMBARO and BIANCA enter.

IZEMBARO (to BIANCA): That crowd was shit.

ARYA walks past them and puts down the cloak. She moves to leave. LADY CRANE enters and sees her.

LADY CRANE: Girl.

ARYA stops on the steps and looks at LADY CRANE.

LADY CRANE: What are you doing back here?

ARYA: Nothing.

LADY CRANE: I saw you the other day in the audience. How many times have you seen this stupid play?

ARYA: Three times.

LADY CRANE: Did you pay?

ARYA smiles.

ARYA: No.

ARYA walks off the steps to get out of the way of the prop men.

LADY CRANE: I remember when the players came to my village. I didn’t have any money, so I snuck in. Just like you. Saw the painted faces, the costumes, listened to the songs, cried when the young lovers died in each other’s arms. I ran off and joined them the next day, never looked back.

ARYA: You’re very good.

LADY CRANE: My final speech is shit.

LADY CRANE takes ARYA by the waist and ushers her towards the break room.

LADY CRANE: But to be fair to myself, which I always like to be, the writing’s no good.

They stop in a side corridor.

ARYA: So change it. It would all just be farting, belching, and slapping without you.

LADY CRANE: How would you change it?

ARYA: The queen loves her son more than anything. And he was taken from her before she could say good-bye. She wouldn’t just cry. She would be angry. She would want to kill the person who did this to her.

LADY CRANE: What’s your name?

ARYA: Mercy.

LADY CRANE: You have very expressive eyes, Mercy.

ARYA smiles.

LADY CRANE: Wonderful eyebrows. Do you like pretending to be other people?

ARYA: I have to go. My father’s waiting for me.

ARYA exits. LADY CRANE enter the break room. BIANCA takes off her wig and notices LADY CRANE.

BIANCA: Lady Crane, they loved you.

LADY CRANE removes her wig.

LADY CRANE: They were sweet. Or drunk. Drunkenly sweet.

IZEMBARO: No laugh for Ned’s death. These people are worse than animals.

IZEMBARO sips from a mug and gestures to LADY CRANE.

IZEMBARO: But they loved her. They all love her.

CAMELLO removes his wig and approaches LADY CRANE.

CAMELLO: Yes, you are adored by people and animals alike.

LADY CRANE: I do what I can with what I’m given.

IZEMBARO: With what you’re given?

LADY CRANE: Well, I was thinking- -

IZEMBARO: Oh, we’re all thinkers now, are we?

IZEMBARO stands, slaps his chest, and walks closer to LADY CRANE.

IZEMBARO: Full to the tits with ideas.

LADY CRANE: I didn’t mean- -

IZEMBARO: You have ideas, I have ideas, he has ideas. Why should my ideas have any more value than yours simply because I’ve been doing this my whole life? Who is anyone to judge my work? This is my profession. I know what I’m doing.

IZEMBARO removes his wig.

IZEMBARO: You have no right to an opinion.

LADY CRANE brings a glass of rum to her lips. Just before she drinks, ARYA appears and slaps the glass out of her hands. Everyone in the room stares at ARYA. ARYA points at BIANCA.

ARYA: Careful of that one. She wants you dead.

ARYA exits. The WAIF is revealed to have been watching.

CUT TO: HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - OUTSIDE

ARYA pulls the stones away from where she hid Needle. She pulls Needle from inside the rocks and stares at it.

CUT TO: HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - WASHING CHAMBER

JAQEN is cutting the face of a corpse. The WAIF enters.

JAQEN: And?

WAIF: As I expected.

JAQEN: A shame. A girl had many gifts.

JAQEN begins lifting the face off of the corpse.

WAIF: You promised me.

JAQEN: Don’t let her suffer.

The WAIF nods and exits. JAQEN pulls the face from the corpse.

CUT TO: UNKNOWN ALLEY

ARYA sets down a lit candle and brandishes Needle. She places Needle on the ground, sits down beside it, and blows out the candle.

EXT. KING’S LANDING
JAIME is wearing armor and sitting atop a horse. He watches as MACE TYRELL, also wearing armor, leads a force of many soldiers down the street. MACE stops in front of JAIME and the soldiers halt.

MACE: My lord.

JAIME: My lord.

MACE turns his horse to face the soldiers.

MACE: My friends, the hour has come. Madness has overtaken this city and grasped in its claws my children. But now we must drive it back under the rocks whence it came. Madness has had its day!

MACE turns his horse back the other way and nods at JAIME. JAIME nods back.

CAPTAIN: Forward, march!

CUT TO: GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - STEPS

The HIGH SPARROW is standing on the steps beside MARGAERY and SEPTA UNELLA.. They are surrounded by Faith Militant, including LANCEL. The HIGH SPARROW is addressing a large gathering of commoners who stand at the foot of the steps.

HIGH SPARROW: Rich or poor, noble or common, if we win, we must atone. Margaery of House Tyrell came to us a sinner. She stood before the gods in the holy sept and lied. She turned a blind eye to her brother’s sins. She disgraces her house, the king, and herself.

The crowd murmurs and parts. JAIME and MACE enter, leading the soldiers. MARGAERY gasps to herself. On the side, a smaller group of soldiers sets down a carriage. OLENNA steps out of the carriage.

CAPTAIN: Company, halt! Face front! Turn!

The soldiers form up and turn to face the steps.

HIGH SPARROW: Lord Tyrell.

MACE nods at the HIGH SPARROW.

HIGH SPARROW: Ser Jaime.

JAIME: Sorry to interrupt. We’re here for Queen Margaery and Ser Loras Tyrell. Give them to us and we’ll be on our way.

HIGH SPARROW: I don’t have the authority to give them to you. And you don’t have the authority to take them.

The crowd murmurs. JAIME ushers his horse forward and rides it up the steps. He halts in front of the Faith Militant.

CAPTAIN: Lock spears!

The soldiers grunt and point their spears towards the Faith Militant.

JAIME: I speak for King Tommen of House Baratheon, First of His Name.

HIGH SPARROW: The gods don’t recognize his authority in this matter.

JAIME: You already insulted one great house. It won’t happen twice. Every last sparrow will die before Margaery walks down that street.

HIGH SPARROW: To die in the service of the gods would please each and every one of us. We yearn for it. But there is no call for it today. There will be no walk of atonement.

The crowd murmurs. OLENNA motions to MACE with her fan. MACE motions to one of the high ranking soldiers, who nods to the Captain.

CAPTAIN: Order up!

The soldiers return to a relaxed position.

HIGH SPARROW: Queen Margaery has already atoned for her sins by bringing another into the true light of the Seven.

The doors to the Great Sept of Baelor open. TOMMEN emerges, accompanied by the Kingsguard. The crowd murmurs. JAIME looks back at OLENNA, who looks down. TOMMEN and the Kingsguard walk down the steps until TOMMEN stands beside MARGAERY. TOMMEN takes MARGAERY’s hand.

HIGH SPARROW: Together we announce a new age of harmony. A holy alliance between the Crown and the Faith.

The crowd cheers.

WOMAN: Long live King Tommen and bless you, Queen Margaery!

TOMMEN looks at JAIME. JAIME shakes his head. TOMMEN looks at the crowd.

TOMMEN: The crown and the faith are the twin pillars upon which the world rests. Together we will restore the Seven Kingdoms to glory.

The crowd cheers.

MACE (to OLENNA): What’s happening?

OLENNA: He’s beaten us. That’s what’s happening.

The HIGH SPARROW smiles at JAIME.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - THRONE ROOM

The room is lined with soldiers on either side. TOMMEN is sitting on the throne. KEVAN stands beside him. JAIME stands at the foot of the throne and removes his armor, letting it drop to the floor.

TOMMEN: When you attack the Faith, you attack the Crown. Anyone who attacks the Crown is unfit to serve as Lord Commander of the Kingsguard.

JAIME: I’ve been a member of the Kingsguard since before you were born. You don’t have to do this. You don’t have to do anything.

TOMMEN: I have to answer to the gods.

JAIME: Not when you’re sitting in that chair.

TOMMEN: The Crown’s decision on this matter is final.

JAIME: Will I be walking naked in the streets? Or will I spend a few months in the sept dungeons first to teach me about the gods’ mercy?

TOMMEN and KEVAN look at each other.

TOMMEN: You have served your house and your king faithfully for many years. And you will continue to do so. But not in this city.

THE CROSSING - DINING HALL
WALDER FREY is sitting in a high chair addressing two of his sons, BLACK WALDER and LOTHAR. One of his young daughter stands beside him. Many other family members sit at the tables, eating.

WALDER: You’ve lost it?

BLACK WALDER: Yes, father.

WALDER: It’s a castle, not a bloody sheep. Presumably you still know where it is. You didn’t lose Riverrun. You let the Blackfish take it from you.

LOTHAR: He surprised us. He knows the castle better than anyone.

WALDER: You did lose the Blackfish after the Red Wedding. You had him right here in this hall and you let him leave. Then when I told you to hunt him down and kill him, you couldn’t find him. That’s what it means to lose something. Now he’s come back and taken Riverrun.

BLACK WALDER: I don’t think it’s fair to blame us- -

WALDER: For 300 years we kissed Tully boots, swore oaths to them and their stinking fish banners. Not again. Riverrun is ours. Take it back.

BLACK WALDER: We don’t have the men.

WALDER: We’ve got 10 times as many men as the damn Blackfish.

BLACK WALDER: The Mallisters have risen against us. And the Blackwoods.

LOTHAR: The Brotherhood Without Banners is rallying the commoners against us, raiding our supply trains and camps.

BLACK WALDER: Riverrun can withstand a siege for a year.

WALDER slaps his daughter on on the buttocks.

WALDER: If I want excuses, I’ll put her in charge. They’re laughing at us. All across the Riverlands right down to King’s Landing, they’re laughing at us.

WALDER stands. Many family members stare at him.

WALDER: I hear it in my sleep! I’m not dead yet, unfortunately for you. And I’ll not leave this world until they all choke on that laughter. Take that castle back.

LOTHAR: He’ll never yield, Father.

WALDER: Oh, he’ll yield.

WALDER nods at some servants at the rear of the hall. LOTHAR looks back at the servants. The servants exit. WALDER points first at LOTHAR and then at BLACK WALDER.

WALDER: You’ll show him the knife you used to kill Robb Stark’s child in his whore mother’s belly, and you’ll show him the knife you used to open his niece’s throat. And you’ll remind him who it was that got married at the Red Wedding in the first place. His nephew.

WALDER pulls his daughter into his lap. The servants return, ushering in a man bound in chains. They undo his chains. The man is EDMURE TULLY. EDMURE stares at WALDER.

WALDER: Cheer up, Lord Edmure. You’re going home.

INT. RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER
JAIME and CERSEI are sitting in chairs across the room from each other.

JAIME: I’m being sent to deal with the Blackfish. Apparently Walder Frey can’t manage it on his own because he’s 400 years old. Sent me with an army to the Riverlands and a siege that could last months.

JAIME stands and paces.

CERSEI: BEtter you’re elsewhere at the head of an army than in the sept dungeons.

JAIME: I’m not going to the Riverlands.

JAIME pours himself a cup of wine.

CERSEI: What, then?

JAIME: I’m going to give Bronn the largest bag of gold anyone’s ever seen and have him gather the best killers he knows. I’ll take them to the sept and I’ll remove the High Sparrow’s head and every other sparrow head I can find.

CERSEI: You can’t.

JAIME: He has our son! He stole our son! He’s torn our family apart. How should we treat people who tear us apart?

CERSEI: We should treat them without mercy and we will. But if you kill the High Sparrow, you won’t leave the sept alive. And without you, this is all for nothing. Stand at the head of our army where you belong, where Father wanted you. Show our men where their loyalties belong. Show them what lannisters are, what we do to our enemies. And take that stupid little castle back because it’s ours and because you can.

JAIME: You’ll stand trial soon. I need to he here for you.

CERSEI: It will be a trial by combat. I have the Mountain. They’ve made us both stronger, all of them.

CERSEI stands and approaches JAIME.

CERSEI: They have no idea how strong we are. No idea what we’re going to do to them.

JAIME and CERSEI embrace and kiss. CERSEI whispers into JAIME’s ear.

CERSEI: We’ve always been together. We’ll always be together. We’re the only two people in the world.

They resume kissing.

EXT. BEYOND THE WALL
MEERA, BRAN, and the rider are gathered around a campfire. The rider beheads a rabbit and begins draining its blood. MEERA watches him.

MEERA: Why did you help us?

The rider looks at MEERA from behind his face mask.

RIDER: The Three-Eyed Raven sent for me.

MEERA: The Three-Eyed Raven’s dead.

RIDER: Now he lives again.

BRAN startles as he comes out of a vision. MEERA goes to him.

RIDER (to BRAN): When I last saw you, you were a boy. A fearless boy. Loved to climb the castle walls, frighten his mother.

BRAN: Who are you?

The rider removes his hood and face mask. He is BENJEN STARK. His skin is gray and he has blemishes on his face.

BRAN: Uncle Benjen. The last letter Jon wrote me said you had been lost beyond the Wall.

BENJEN: I led a ranging party deep into the North to find White Walkers. They found us. A white walker stabbed me in the gut with a sword of ice. Left me there to die. To turn. The Children found me. Stopped the walker’s magic from taking hold.

BRAN: How?

BENJEN: The same way they made the Walkers in the first place. You saw it yourself.

BRAN: Dragonglass. A shard of dragonglass plunged into your heart.

BENJEN: You are the Three-Eyed Raven now.

BRAN: I didn’t have time to learn. I can’t control anything.

BENJEN stands and walks over to BRAN and MEERA.

BENJEN: You must learn to control it before the Night King comes.

BENJEN kneels beside BRAN and offers him a cup.

BENJEN: Drink.

BRAN takes the cup and drinks.

BENJEN: One way or another, he will find his way to the world of men. When he does, you will be there waiting for him. And you will be ready.

EXT. ESSOS ARID LANDS
DAENERYS and DAARIO are leading the Dothraki horde on horseback. DAARIO shouts in Dothraki and raises his hand, halting the horde. DAENERYS stares at the face of a mountain crag in the distance.

DAARIO: Everything all right?

DAENERYS: How many days’ ride to Meereen?

DAARIO: A week at best.

DAENERYS: How many ships will I need to bring my khalasar to Westeros?

DAARIO: Dothraki and all their horses, the Unsullied, the Second Sons- - 1,000 ships easily. Probably more.

DAENERYS: And who has that many?

DAARIO: Nobody.

DAENERYS: Nobody yet.

DAARIO: So we ride for Meereen and after that we sail for Westeros. What then?

DAENERYS: I take what is mine.

DAARIO: You weren’t made to sit on a chair in a palance.

DAENERYS: What was I made for?

DAARIO: You’re a conqueror, Daenerys Stormborn.

The wind howls. DAENERYS stares beyond the mountain crag

DAENERYS: Wait here.

DAENERYS rides away from the horde and around the bend. Time passes. The Dothraki are growing antsy.

DAARIO (speaking Dothraki): I’m going after her. Wait for me here.

DAARIO starts off, but stops when a dragon’s roar erupts from the sky. The Dothraki look around. The shadow of a dragon appears on the mountainside. DROGON flies over the Dothraki horde with DAENERYS on its back. DROGON circles around and lands in front of the horde. He roars.

DAENERYS (speaking Dothraki): Every khal who ever lived chose three blood riders to fight beside him and guard his way. But I am not a khal. I will not choose three blood riders. I choose you all.

The Dothraki cheer.

DAENERYS (speaking Dothraki): I will ask more of you than any khal has ever asked of his khalassar! Will you ride the wooden horses across the black salt sea?

The Dothraki cheer.

DAENERYS: Will you kill my enemies in their iron suits and tear down their stone houses?

The Dothraki cheer.

DAENERYS: Will you give me the Seven Kingdoms, the gift Khal Drogo promised me before the Mother of Mountains?

The Dothraki cheer.

DAENERYS: Are you with me?

The Dothraki continue to cheer.

DAENERYS: Now and always?

DROGON spreads his wings and roars.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

NEWS GENIUS

ANNOTATE THE WEB
1
The Broken Man (Script)
Game of Thrones
Produced By George R. R. Martin, Vince Gerardis, Guymon Casady, Bryan Cogman & 8 more
Album: Season 6 Scripts
THE BROKEN MAN (SCRIPT)
EXT. RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT
Many men are performing various tasks pertaining to the construction of a church. Many women are preparing food.

MAN: That’s it. Get it to the top.
MAN #2: Steady. Steady.

BROTHER RAY is standing beneath the framing, addressing two men who are hoisting up a log.

RAY: Up she goes.

RAY turns to another man and slaps him on the back.

RAY: Hey, come on. Put your back into it, huh?

RAY walks a few paces away, grabs an ax, and lifts it up to a man standing on the church framing.

RAY: Here you are, son.

The man standing on the framing takes the ax. RAY turns to see two men carrying a log into the opening beneath the framing. He waves them in.

RAY: Oh, gentlemen, please.

RAY walks out from beneath the framing and addresses more men carrying logs.

RAY. And you lot, come on. Come on, get it moving. Come on, come on.

RAY hurries beneath one of the logs and laughs. He turns and looks up at the church framing, smiles, and nods. In a field a little ways off, more men are carrying larger logs towards the church framing. Four men c
EXT. RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT OUTSKIRTS
SANDOR repeatedly swings an ax into a horizontal log. Woods chips fly everywhere. RAY walks up behind SANDOR.

RAY: In all my days I’ve never seen a man swing an ax like that. How many men did it take to cut you down?

SANDOR: Just one.

RAY: Ooh. he must have been some kind of monster.

SANDOR sinks the ax into the log.

SANDOR: He was a woman.

RAY laughs. SANDOR continues chopping. RAY walks away.

CUT TO: BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT

A man standing beneath the church framing rings a bell. All of the men rush down off the church framing and father at the food stations. The women divvy out food. RAY pours a cup of water and walks among the people. They are all sitting down on the ground and eating. SANDOR is sitting on a rock away from everyone else, eating. RAY approaches him from behind and hands him the cup of water. SANDOR takes it.

RAY: I think some of the men are a bit afraid of you.

SANDOR: I’m used to it.

SANDOR drinks the entire cup of water.

RAY: When I found you, I thought you’d been dead for days. The way you were stinking already and you had bugs all over you and bone was coming through right there.

RAY sits down next to SANDOR and points at SANDOR’s right knee.

RAY: I was gonna give you a proper burial and then you coughed. Oh, nearly shit myself. I reckoned you were gonna die by the time I loaded you on the wagon, but you didn’t. Now, I reckoned you’d die a dozen more times over the next few days, but you didn’t. What kept you going?

SANDOR pauses and stares ahead.

SANDOR: Hate.

SANDOR continues eating.

RAY: No, there’s a reason you’re still here.

SANDOR: Aye, there’s a reason. I’m a big fucker and I’m tough to kill.

RAY: No, a reason. Gods aren’t done with you yet.

SANDOR smiles. RAY stands and walks a few paces away from SANDOR, then turns to face him.

SANDOR: I’ve heard that before. Man was talking about a different god, though.

RAY: Well, maybe he was right. I don’t know much about the gods.

SANDOR: You’re in the wrong line of work.

RAY: Oh, there’s plenty of pious sons of bitches who think they know the word of god or gods. I don’t. I don’t even know their real names. Maybe it is the Seven. Or maybe it’s the old gods. Or maybe it’s the Lord of Light. Or maybe they’re all the same fucking thing. I don’t know. What matters, I believe, is that there’s something greater than us. And whatever it is, it’s got plans for Sandor Clegane.

SANDOR stops eating and stares up at RAY. RAY nods at him.

SANDOR: You didn’t know me back in my time. You don’t know the things I’ve done.

RAY: I’ve heard stories.

SANDOR: If the gods are real...why haven’t they punished me?

RAY: They have.

RAY walks away. SANDOR stares out across the fields.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - PRAYER ROOM
MARGAERY is reading from the Book of the Seven. She is wearing a crown. The HIGH SPARROW enters.

HIGH SPARROW: Your Grace. What are we reading today?

MARGAERY: The Book of the Mother, Your Holiness. Chapter three, verse 12.

HIGH SPARROW: Ah, “As water rounds the stones, smoothing- -”

MARGAERY: “Smoothing what was jagged, so does a woman’s love calm a man’s brute nature. A wife salves her husband’s wounds, a mother sings her son to sleep.”

HIGH SPARROW: You learn quickly. There are some who know every verse of the sacred text, but don’t have a drop of the Mother’s mercy in their blood and savages who can’t read at all who understand the Father’s wisdom.

MARGAERY: For year I pretended to love the poor, the afflicted. I had pity for them, but I never loved them. They disgusted me.

HIGH SPARROW: They are hard to love.

The HIGH SPARROW sits down on a bench.

HIGH SPARROW: The poor disgust us because they are us, shorn of our illusions. They show us what we’d look like without our fine clothes. How’d we smell without perfume.

The HIGH SPARROW sighs.

HIGH SPARROW: Can I ask you about a personal matter?

MARGAERY: Of course.

MARGAERY sits on the bench beside the HIGH SPARROW.

HIGH SPARROW: The king mentioned that since your reunion, you haven’t joined him in the marriage bed.

MARGAERY: No.

HIGH SPARROW: You have a duty, Your Grace. To your husband, your king, your country, to the gods themselves.

MARGAERY: It’s just...the desires that once drove me no longer do.

HIGH SPARROW: Congress does not require desire on the woman’s part, only patience. The king must have an heir if we are to continue our good work.

MARGAERY: Forgive me. Sometimes the truth path is hard to find.

HIGH SPARROW: Hard to find and harder still to walk upon. But you’ve made great progress. I only pray your grandmother follows your lead.

The HIGH SPARROW stands.

MARGAERY: My grandmother?

HIGH SPARROW: Yes. The Queen of Thorns is a remarkable woman, a strong woman, and an unrepentant sinner. You must teach her the new way as she taught you the old. Or I fear for her safety, body and soul.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - OLENNA’S CHAMBER

MARGAERY and OLENNA are sitting at a table. SEPTA UNELLA stands several feet away, watching them.

OLENNA: Does it move or talk? I want to speak with you alone.

MARGAERY: Septa Unella has been my true friend and counselor.

OLENNA stands.

OLENNA: Oh, this is madness!

OLENNA takes MARGAERY’s hand and leads her out onto the balcony to a different table. SEPTA UNELLA follows them out. MARGAERY sits at the table.

OLENNA (to SEPTA UNELLA): You’re not in your sanctuary now, my dear. All I have to do is whistle and my men will stroll in here and bash you about...

MARGAERY: Grandmother.

OLENNA: ...until I tell them to stop. If I tell them to stop. You could use a good bashing.

MARGAERY: Grandmother, please.

OLENNA sits across from MARGAERY.

OLENNA: What have they done to you?

MARGAERY: You marched against the High Sparrow, against the Faith.

OLENNA: We marched for you.

MARGAERY: The gods could have punished you and Father, but they didn’t. They showed mercy.

OLENNA: And what about your brother? What mercy did they show him?

MARGAERY: Loras’s only hope is to confess his crimes and repent. If he does, the Faith will allow him to return to Highgarden. He’ll have to renounce his name and title...

OLENNA: Have you lost your mind?

MARGAERY: ...and live his life as a penitent.

OLENNA: He is the heir to Highgarden, the future of House Tyrell.


MARGAERY: He can begin again.

OLENNA: As a mindless fanatic.

MARGAERY: As a free man.

OLENNA: You will leave for Highgarden today. There is no law that says you must stay here.

MARGAERY stands.

MARGAERY: I am the queen. It is my duty to serve my husband the king.

MARGAERY walks around the table and kneels before OLENNA. Her back is to SEPTA UNELLA.

MARGAERY: But you should leave, Grandmother. Your place is at home.

OLENNA: I will never leave you. Never.

MARGAERY: You must.

MARGAERY slips a piece of paper into OLENNA’s hand. MARGAERY’s eyes widen.

MARGAERY: Go home. Find comfort in prayer and good works.

MARGAERY stands.

MARGAERY: The Mother watches over us all.

OLENNA stands.

OLENNA: I’ll see you soon, my dear.

MARGAERY and OLENNA embrace. MARGAERY closes her eyes and then steps back.

MARGAERY: Seven blessings to you, Grandmother.

OLENNA nods and walks back into her chamber. MARGAERY stifles tears. She regains her composure and turns to face SEPTA UNELLA.

MARGAERY: Shall we pray?

CUT TO: RED KEEP - OLENNA’S CHAMBER INNER BALCONY

OLENNA walks out onto the balcony and shuts the door behind her. She looks around and then unfolds the piece of paper MARGAERY placed in her hand and looks at it. There is a drawing of a rose on it. OLENNA looks up and smiles.

EXT. SOUTH OF THE WALL - WILDLING ENCAMPMENT
JON SNOW, SANSA, DAVOS, TORMUND, and WUN WUN are meeting with DIM DALBA and the other Wildling leaders. They are all gathered around a fire pit.

DIM DALBA: We said we’d fight with you, King Crow, when the time comes and we meant it, but this isn’t what we agreed to. These aren’t White Walkers. This isn’t an army of the dead. This isn’t our find.

TORMUND: If it weren’t for him, none of us would be here. All of you would be meat in the Night King’s army. And I’d be a pile of charred bones just like Mance.

DIM DALBA: Remember Mance’s camp? It stretched all the way to the horizon. And look at us now. Look what’s left of us. And if we lose this, we’re gone. Dozens of tribes, hundreds of generations. Be like we were never there at all. We’ll be the last of the free folk.

JON SNOW: That’s what’ll happen to you if we lose. The Boltons, the Karstarks, the Umbers, they know you’re here. They know that more than half of you are women and children. After they finish with me, they’ll come for you. You’re right. This isn’t your fight. You shouldn’t have to come to Winterfell with me. I shouldn’t be asking you. It’s not the deal we made. I need you with me if we’re gonna beat them, and we need to beat them if you’re going to survive.

TORMUND gestures to JON SNOW.

TORMUND: The crows killed him because he spoke for the free folk when no other southerners would. He died for us. If we are not willing to do the same for him, we’re cowards. And if that’s what we are, we deserve to be the last of the free folk.

WUN WUN stands.

WUN WUN: Snow.

WUN WUN walks away. DIM DALBA looks at the men around him. One of them nods. DIM DALBA walks up to JON SNOW and holds out his hand. JON takes it. DIM DALBA returns to his men.

JON SNOW (to TORMUND): Are you sure they’ll come?

TORMUND: We’re not clever like you southerners. When we say we’ll do something, we do it.

JON SNOW exhales.

INT. RED KEEP - OLENNA’S CHAMBER
OLENNA is sitting at a table, writing. CERSEI enters with GREGOR in tow.

CERSEI: I heard you were leaving King’s Landing.

OLENNA: That is hardly your concern.

CERSEI: Your grandson is still a prisoner. You’ll leave him rotting in a cell?

OLENNA: Loras rots in a cell because of you. THe High Sparrow rules this city because of you. Our two ancient houses face collapse because of you and your stupidity.

CERSEI: You’re right. I made a terrible mistake. I carry it with me every single day.

OLENNA: Good.

CERSEI: I delivered an army of fanatics onto our doorstep. And now we must fight them together. We need each other.

OLENNA: I wonder if you’re the worst person I’ve ever met. At a certain age, it’s hard to recall. But the truly vile do stand out through the years. Do you remember the way you smirked at me when my grandson and granddaughter were dragged off to their cells? I do. I’ll never forget it.

CERSEI: You love your granddaughter. I love my son. It’s the only truth I know. We must defend them.

OLENNA: I’m leaving this wretched city as fast as I can before that shoeless zealot throws me into one of his cells. If you’re half as bright as you think you are, you’ll find your way out of here, too.

CERSEI: Never. I’ll never leave my son.

OLENNA: What’ll you do, then? You have no support. Not anymore. Your brother’s gone. The High Sparrow saw to that. The rest of your family have abandoned you. The people despise you. You’re surrounded by enemies, thousands of them. You’re going to kill them all by yourself? You’ve lost, Cersei. It’s the only joy I can find in all this misery.

OLENNA goes back to writing.

EXT. RIVERRUN - OUTSKIRTS
A Lannister army approaches Riverrun led by JAIME and BRONN. JAIME and BRONN stop their horses on a hill and look out at the encampment of Freys at the foot of Riverrun.

MAN: Pick the pace up. Keep going.

MAN #2: Keep it moving!

BRONN: Now, that is a sorry attempt at a siege. Someone needs to teach those sad twats how to dig trenches.

JAIME: Someone certainly does.

JAIME looks at BRONN.

BRONN: Oh, no. Not me. I’m just an upjumped sellsword.

JAIME: You’re an anointed knight. There’s quite a difference.

BRONN: Aye, knights don’t get paid.

JAIME: You have better instincts than any officer in the Lannister army.

BRONN: That’s like saying I have a bigger cock than anyone in the Unsullied army.

JAIME: I expect to command all the Lannister forces before long. You can be the right hand I lost.

BRONN: You promised me a lordship and a castle and a highborn beauty for a wife.

JAIME: And you’ll get all three. A Lannister always- -

BRONN: Don’t say it. Don’t fucking say it.

BRONN ushers his horse onwards.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - FREY ENCAMPMENT

JAIME and BRONN lead a group of Lannister soldiers through the encampment. Some Frey men gather around and stare at them. LOTHAR is standing at the foot of Riverrun, shouting up at the castle walls. BLACK WALDER is behind him, standing on a makeshift hangman’s platform. EDMURE is also on the platform with a noose around his neck. JAIME and BRONN watch them.

LOTHAR: Come out and fight us, Blackfish. Yield the castle or we’ll hang him.

BRYNDEN TULLY, the Blackfish, walks along Riverrun’s castle wall and comes to a stop in front of an arrowslit. He stares out at LOTHAR, BLACK WALDER, and EDMURE.

LOTHAR: This is your last warning. Yield the castle.

LOTHAR looks back at BLACK WALDER. BLACK WALDER takes the noose off of EDMURE’s neck and draws a knife.

BLACK WALDER: You think I won’t do it, old man?

BLACK WALDER holds the knife to EDMURE’s neck.

BLACK WALDER: I sliced your niece’s throat from ear to ear. And where were you? Running and hiding like a fucking coward. Yield the castle or I cut his throat.

BRYNDEN: Go on, then. Cut his throat.

BRYNDEN walks away. LOTHAR looks at BLACK WALDER and shrugs. BLACK WALDER takes the knife away from EDMURE’s neck. Some Frey men take EDMURE away. JAIME, BRONN, and the Lannister army advance towards LOTHAR and BLACK WALDER, and stop in front of them.

JAIME: Lothar, is it?

LOTHAR: Ser Jaime. We didn’t know you were coming.

JAIME: ‘Cause you didn’t set up a proper perimeter. You just allowed 8,000 men to approach unchallenged.

BRONN: Good thing we’re friends or we’d be fucking you in the ass right now.

JAIME: Have Lord Edmure bathed and fed.

BLACK WALDER waves at the Frey men escorting EDMURE.

BLACK WALDER: Whoa, whoa.

The Frey men stop walking. BLACK WALDER approaches JAIME.

LOTHAR: Walder.

LOTHAR puts his hand out to stop BLACK WALDER, but BLACK WALDER pushes him away. BLACK WALDER walks up to JAIME.

BLACK WALDER: Edmure is a prisoner of House Frey.

JAIME looks BLACK WALDER up and down.

JAIME: Only a fool makes threats he’s not prepared to carry out. Now let’s say I threatened to hit you unless you shut your mouth, but you kept talking. What do you think I’d do?

BLACK WALDER: I don’t give a rat’s- -

JAIME hits BLACK WALDER across the face with his gold hand. BLACK WALDER staggers back beside LOTHAR.

JAIME: I’m here by the king’s command to take back this castle. Have him bathed and fed. Unless you’d like to take his place.

LOTHAR: Apologies, Ser Jaime.

LOTHAR waves at the Frey men escorting EDMURE.

LOTHAR: Do as he says.

JAIME: The siege is now under my command. The next time the Blackfish looks out from those ramparts, he’ll see an army at his gates, not whatever this is.

BRONN: Have your lads start digging perimeter trenches. Set pickets every hundred yards. And work double-time on those siege towers and trebuchets.

BLACK WALDER: Those are our siege towers- -

JAIME: As I said, the siege is under my command. If that’s not to your liking, go home.

LOTHAR and BLACK WALDER walk away. BRONN walks up behind JAIME.

JAIME: Get word to the Blackfish. I want a parley.

BRONN: A parley or a fight?

JAIME: He’s an old man.

BRONN: You’ve got one hand. My money’s on the old boy.

EXT. BEAR ISLAND
The castle of House Mormont sits atop a high hill. Waterfalls pour out below. A bird screeches.

CUT TO: BEAR ISLAND - CASTLE AUDIENCE CHAMBER

LYANNA MORMONT sits at a high table flanked by a commander and a maester. JON SNOW, SANSA, and DAVOS enter. Some guards close the doors behind them.

JON SNOW: Lady Mormont.

LYANNA: Welcome to Bear Island.

JON SNOW looks at SANSA.

SANSA: I remember when you were born, my lady. You were named for my Aunt Lyanna. It was said she was a great beauty. I’m sure you will be, too.

LYANNA: I doubt it. My mother wasn’t a great beauty or any other kind of beauty. She was a great warrior, though. She died fighting for your brother, Robb.

JON SNOW: I served under your uncle at Castle Black, Lady Lyanna. He was also a great warrior and an honorable man. I was his steward. In fact- -

LYANNA: I think we’ve had enough small talk. What are you here?

JON SNOW: Stannis Baratheon garrisoned at Castle Black before he marched on Winterfell and was killed. He showed me the letter you wrote to him when he petitioned for men. It said- -

LYANNA: I remember what it said. “Bear Island knows no king but the King in the North whose name is Stark.”

JON SNOW: Robb is gone, but House Stark is not. And it needs your support now more than ever. I’ve come with my sister to ask for House Mormont’s allegiance.

LYANNA leans towards her maester. They whisper to each other. LYANNA turns back to face JON SNOW.

LYANNA: As far as I understand, you’re a Snow and Lady Sansa is a Bolton. Or is she a Lannister? I’ve heard conflicting reports.

SANSA: I did what I had to do to survive, my lady. But I am a Stark. I will always be a Stark.

LYANNA: If you say so. In any case, you don’t just want my allegiance. You want my fighting men.

JON SNOW: Ramsay Bolton cannot be allowed to keep Winterfell, my lady. It is our duty to stop him. Even more so because he holds our brother Rickon Stark as prisoner. What you have to understand, my lady, is that- -

LYANNA: I understand that I’m responsible for Bear Island and all who live here. So why should I sacrifice one more Mormont life for someone else’s war?

JON SNOW and SANSA fall silent. DAVOS steps forward.

DAVOS: If it please, my lady, I understand how you feel.

LYANNA: I don’t know you, Ser…?

DAVOS: Davos, my lady, of House Seaworth.

LYANNA turns to her maester.

DAVOS: You needn’t ask your maester about my house. It’s rather new.

LYANNA settles back into her chair.

LYANNA: All right, Ser Davos of House Seaworth. How is it you understand how I feel?

DAVOS: You never thought you’d find yourself in your position. Being responsible for so many lives at such a young age. I never thought I’d be in my position. I was a crabber’s son, then I was a smuggler. And now I found myself addressing the lady of a great house in time of war. But I’m here because this isn’t someone else’s war. It’s our war.

LYANNA: Go on, Ser Davos.

DAVOS: Your uncle, Lord Commander Mormont, made that man his steward. He chose Jon to be his successor because he knew had the courage to do what was right, even if it meant giving his life. Because Jeor Mormont and Jon Snow both understood that the real war isn’t between a few squabbling houses. It’s between the living and the dead. And make no mistake, my lady, the dead are coming.

LYANNA: Is this true?

JON SNOW nods.

JON SNOW: Your uncle fought them at the Fist of the First Men. I fought them at Hardhome. We both lost.

DAVOS: As long as the Boltons hold Winterfell, the North is divided. And a divided North won’t stand a chance against the Night King. You want to protect your people, my lady. I understand. But there’s no hiding from this. We have to fight and we need to do it together.

LYANNA’s maester leans over to whisper in her ear, but she waves him away.

LYANNA: House Mormont has kept faith with House Stark for 1,000 years. We will not break faith today.

JON SNOW: Thank you, my lady. How many fighting men can we expect?


LYANNA leans to her military commander and they whisper to each other.

LYANNA: 62.

JON SNOW: 62?

LYANNA: We are not a large house, but we’re a proud one. And every man from Bear Island fights with the strength of 10 mainlanders.

DAVOS: If they’re half as ferocious as their lady, the Boltons are doomed.

LYANNA smiles and nods.

EXT. RIVERRUN - LANNISTER ENCAMPMENT
JAIME is on horseback, galloping through the encampment. He is accompanied by a bannerman and a regiment of foot soldiers. When he reaches the bridge leading to Riverrun’s castle, he dismounts his horse and walks across it. He stands at the foot of the bridge and stares down into the water. Above, several Tully soldiers notch their crossbows and point them at him through arrowslits. The drawbridge lowers. BRYNDEN stands on the other side, accompanied by a regiment of Tully soldiers. BRYNDEN walks out across the drawbridge alone and approaches JAIME.

BRYNDEN: Kingslayer.

JAIME: Blackfish.

BRYNDEN: I assume you’re here to fulfill the vow you gave my niece. I don’t see Sansa and Arya.

JAIME: I don’t have them.

BRYNDEN: Pity. Do you wish to resume your captivity?

JAIME shakes his head.

BRYNDEN: Then why are you here?

JAIME: You know why I’m here. This castle belongs to House Frey. You’re trespassing. In the name of King Tommen, I order you to surrender or- -

BRYNDEN: Or you’ll kill Edmure?

BRYNDEN walks past JAIME.

BRYNDEN: My nephew’s marked for death no matter what. Hang him and be done with it.

JAIME: It won’t stop with Edmure. You’ll force me to storm the castle. Hundreds will die.

BRYNDEN: Hundreds of mine. Thousands of yours. If you can breach the walls.

JAIME positions himself beside BRYNDEN.

JAIME: We’ll breach them and kill every last one of you. But if you surrender, I’ll spare the lives of your men. On my honor.

BRYNDEN: Your honor? Bargaining with oathbreakers is like building on quicksand.

JAIME: The war is over, ser. Why sacrifice living men to a lost cause?

BRYNDEN turns to face JAIME and walks close to him.

BRYNDEN: As long as I’m standing, the war is not over. This is my home. I was born in this castle and I’m ready to die in it. So you can either attack or try to starve us out. We have enough provisions for two years. Do you have two years, Kingslayer?

BRYNDEN walks past JAIME and continues back across the drawbridge.

JAIME: You clearly have no intention of saving your men’s lives. Why did you come to treat with me?

BRYNDEN turns back to face JAIME.

BRYNDEN: Sieges are dull. And I wanted to see you in person, get the measure of you.

JAIME: Well, now you have.

BRYNDEN: Aye, now I have. I’m disappointed.

BRYNDEN turns around and walks back inside the castle. The drawbridge begins to close. JAIME scrunches up his face, turns around, and walks back across the bridge.

EXT. DEEPWOOD MOTTE - COURTYARD
JON SNOW, SANSA, and DAVOS are meeting with ROBETT GLOVER. Several men serving under ROBETT stand in attendance.

ROBETT: The answer is no.

JON SNOW: Lord Glover, if you could just hear us out.

ROBETT: I’ve heard enough. We’ve only just taken back this castle from the Ironborn. The Boltons helped us do it. Now you want me to fight against them? I could be skinned for even talking to you.

JON SNOW: The Boltons are traitors. Roose Bolton- -

ROBETT: Have other northern houses pledged to fight for you?

JON SNOW: House Mormont.

ROBETT: And?

JON SNOW: We sent raven to Houses Manderly- -

ROBETT: I don’t care about ravens. You’re asking me to join your army. Who is fighting in this army?

JON SNOW: The bulk of the force is made up of wildlings.

ROBETT laughs.

ROBETT: Then the rumors are true. I didn’t dare believe them. I received you out of respect for your father. Now I would like you to leave. House Glover will not abandon its ancestral home to fight alongside wildlings.

ROBETT turns around and heads up the stairs towards a door attended by his men.

JON SNOW: Lord Glover.

ROBETT: There’s nothing else to say.

SANSA: I would remind you that House Glover is pledged to House Stark. Sworn to answer when called upon.

JON SNOW glares at SANSA. ROBETT turns on his heel and walks up close to SANSA.

ROBETT: Yes, my family served House Stark for centuries. We wept when we heard of your father’s death. When my brother was lord of this castle, he answered Robb’s call and hailed him King in the North.

ROBETT gets closer to SANSA.

ROBETT: And where was King Robb when the Ironborn attacked this castle? When they threw my wife and children in prison and brutalized and killed our subjects? Taking up with a foreign whore. Getting himself and those who followed him killed.

ROBETT looks at JON SNOW and then back at SANSA.

ROBETT: I served House Stark once, but House Stark is dead.

ROBETT turns, climbs the stairs to the door, and walks through it. SANSA and JON SNOW look down.

EXT. LONG BRIDGE OF VOLANTIS - BAY
Many boats bearing the sigil of House Greyjoy on their sails are docked in the bay near the Long Bridge. Chatter and laughter can be heard from the Long Bridge.

CUT TO: LONG BRIDGE OF VOLANTIS - BAR

Many Ironborn men are communing with prostitutes. THEON sits at a table alone, looking back at forth at them. YARA sits down at his table accompanied by a prostitute. She and the prostitute kiss at length. THEON does not look at them.

THEON: Why did we have to come here?

YARA: Some of us still like it. Have a drink at least.

THEON: I don’t want one.

YARA sighs and turns back to the prostitute..

YARA: Don’t go far, love.

YARA kisses the prostitutes breast.

YARA: I’ll find you in a bit.

The prostitute stands. YARA kisses her backside and then slaps it. The prostitute giggles and runs away. YARA laughs and grabs a drink.

YARA: Nothing on the Iron Islands has an ass like that. Doesn’t interest you anymore?

THEON scrunches up his face.

YARA: I’m sorry. I won’t joke about it. I’ll never hurt you, little brother. Don’t you know that?

YARA pours herself another drink.

THEON: You think Uncle Euron’s hunting for us?

YARA: Of course he is. As long as we’re alive, we’re a threat.

THEON: He’ll find us.

YARA: It’s a great big world and we have fast ships. Drink.

THEON: I don’t want any.

YARA: I don’t care what you want. Drink.

THEON takes a small sip of his drink.

YARA: Drink it all.

THEON drinks deeper.

YARA: You’re Ironborn, Theon. I know you’ve had some bad years.

THEON: Some bad years?

YARA: But I’m tired of watching you cower like a beat dog. Drink the goddamn ale.

THEON takes another deep drink.

YARA: Now listen to me. I need you. The real Theon Greyjoy, not this rat shit pretender. Can you find him for me? Drink.

THEON drinks more deeply..

YARA: You escaped, do you hear me? You got away and you’re never going back. We’ll get justice for you.

THEON: If I got justice, my burnt body would hang over the gates of Winterfell.

YARA: Fuck justice, then. We’ll get revenge. Drink.

THEON downs the rest of his ale. YARA moves closer to THEON.

YARA: Listen to me. If you’re so broken that there’s no coming back, take a knife and cut your wrists. End it. But if you’re staying, Theon, I need you. We’re gonna sail to Meereen. We’re gonna make a pact with this Dragon Queen. And we’re gonna take back the Iron Islands.

YARA places her hand on the back of THEON’s neck.

YARA: Are you with me? Are you really with me?

THEON slowly raises his head up and locks eyes with YARA. He nods. YARA smiles and kisses his forehead.

YARA: Now, since it’s my last night ashore for a long while, I’m gonna go fuck the tits off this one.

YARA stands, pats THEON on the back, walks over to the prostitute she was communing with earlier, and takes her hand. THEON stares blankly to the side.

EXT. NORTHERN WILDERNESS - STARK ENCAMPMENT
JON SNOW, SANSA, and DAVOS are riding horses through the encampment.

DAVOS: Stannis camped here on his way to Winterfell.

SANSA: And that’s a good thing?

DAVOS: He was the most experienced commander in Westeros. He chose this place for a reason. Those mountains are a natural fortification. There’s a stream down there for the horses.

JON SNOW: We’re not staying here long. Another storm could hit any day..

DAVOS: Aye, the snows defeated Stannis as much as the Boltons did.

JON SNOW: We have to march on Winterfell now while we still can.

They all dismount their horses and begin walking side by side.

DAVOS: 2,000 Wildlings. 200 Hornwoods, 143 Mazins- -

SANSA: 62 Mormonts.

DAVOS: It’s not what we’d hoped for. But we still have a chance if we’re careful and smart.

DAVOS spots two men fighting.

DAVOS: For fuck’s sake.

DAVOS hurries over to the men. JON SNOW and SANSA watch him go and then continue walking.

SANSA: So he’s your most trusted advisor now? Because he secured 62 men from a ten year old?

JON SNOW: Ser Davos is the reason I’m standing here talking to you and he served Stannis for years.

SANSA: Stannis who lost the Blackwater, who murdered his own brother, who doesn’t have a head?

SANSA stops walking. JON keeps walking a few paces and then turns to face her.

SANSA: It’s not enough. We need more men.

JON SNOW: There’s no time.

SANSA: If we went down to Castle Cerwyn, I know that Lord- -

JON SNOW moves close to SANSA.

JON SNOW: We fight with the army we have.

JON SNOW looks over SANSA’s shoulder at DAVOS. He is standing in front of the fighting men, who are wrestling on the ground.

DAVOS: Friends, this is not worth fighting over!

JON SNOW walks past SANSA and away.

DAVOS: This’ll be it, now. Right now, we don’t need to be fighting.

One of the men gets in DAVOS’ face.

MAN: Who the fuck are you?

DAVOS: Hold on.

MAN #2: Yeah, who the fuck are you?

SANSA spies the maester of Bear Island handling some crates containing ravens. He holds up one of the crates to LYANNA MORMONT.

CUT TO: NORTHERN WILDERNESS - STARK ENCAMPMENT TENT

SANSA is writing a letter. She signs her name, pours wax, and presses the wax with the direwolf sigil of House Stark. She picks up the letter and rereads it, then stares ahead.

EXT. RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT
All of RAY’s followers are gathered together in a circle. RAY is standing in the center, speaking to them all. SANDOR stands at the far end of the flock, behind everyone else. The church framing stands on a hill in the background.

RAY: I was a soldier once. All my superiors thought I was brave. I wasn’t. I mean, I never ran from a fight. Only because I was afraid my friends would see I was afraid. That’s all I was, a coward. We followed orders no matter the orders. Burn that village. Fine, I’m your arsonist. Steal that farmer’s crops. Good, I’m your thief. Kill those young lads so they won’t take up arms against us. I’m your murderer. I remember once a woman screaming at us, calling us animals as we dragged her son from their hut. But we weren’t animals. Animals are true to their nature and we had betrayed ours. I cut that young boy’s throat myself as his mother screamed and my friends held her back.

RAY sits down on a stump next to one of the men and rests his arm on the man’s shoulder.

RAY: That night...I felt such shame. Shame was so heavy on me, I couldn’t eat, I couldn’t sleep.

SANDOR looks down.

RAY: All I could do was stare into that dark sky and listen to that mother screaming her son’s name. I’ll hear her screaming the rest of my life.

RAY stands and walks back to the center of the circle.

RAY: Now, I know I can never bring that lad back. All I can do with time I’ve got left is bring a little goodness into the world. That’s all any of us can do, isn’t it? Never too late to stop robbing people, to stop killing people. Start helping people.

RAY stares at SANDOR.

RAY: It’s never too late to come back.

SANDOR returns RAY’s gaze but is distracted by three horsemen coming up the way. RAY turns to look at them. SANDOR walks a few paces into the midst of RAY’s followers and stares at the riders.

RAY: And it’s not about waiting for the gods to answer your prayers. It’s not even about the gods. It’s about you. Learning you have to answer your prayers yourself.

The three riders reach the group and stop. RAY walks out to meet them. All of RAY’s followers stand. The riders are FLYNN, MORGAN, and LEM LEMONCLOAK.

RAY: Seven save you, friends. How can we help you?

LEM: What are you doing here?

RAY: Well, we’re talking about life. You?

LEM: Protecting the people.

RAY: Well, we thank you for your protection. Who are you protecting us from?

LEM: Do you have any horses?

RAY: No horses. No gold. No steel.

LEM: Food, then. Protecting the people is hungry work.

RAY: I’m sure it is. You’re welcome to stay for supper, but we have hungry mouths here.

LEM: Stay safe. The night is dark and full of terrors.

LEM smiles. The three riders turn the horses around and ride off. SANDOR watches them leave.

CUT TO: RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT OUTSKIRTS

SANDOR is splitting wood with an ax on a chopping block. RAY walks up the path. SANDOR sees him coming but continues chopping.

SANDOR: “Seven save you, friends.”

RAY: I’m a fucking septon. What was I supposed to say?

SANDOR: They don’t believe in your Seven. They’re from the Brotherhood. They follow the Red God.

RAY: Aye, well, all are welcome here. Anyway, we got nothing for them.

SANDOR stops chopping.

SANDOR: Sure, you do. You’ve got food, you’ve got steel even if you say you don’t. And you’ve got women.

RAY: What do you want to do? Fight them? Kill them?

SANDOR shrugs and sighs.

RAY: It’d be you against all of them. I mean, these people don’t know how to fight.

SANDOR: You do.

RAY: I’m done with fighting.

SANDOR: Even if it’s to protect yourself?

RAY: Violence is a disease. You don’t cure a disease by spreading it to more people.

SANDOR: You don’t cure it by dying, either.

SANDOR resumes chopping.

RAY: You’ve done enough work for one day. Come on up for some supper.

RAY starts back up the path.

SANDOR: It’s gonna be a cold night. We’ll need firewood.

RAY: I’ll save you a bowl of stew. Might even have some ale hidden away.

EXT. BRAAVOS - MARKETPLACE
People of all sorts line the streets. ARYA walks among them with her hands behind her back. She encounters two men sitting across from each other at a small table.

MAN: He’s not a lying man. He says the Iron Fleet’s in Slaver’s Bay. I’m inclined to believe him. I’m not going anywhere near those mad fuckers.

ARYA walks up beside the men and addressing the one who was speaking.

ARYA: You’re Westerosi.

MAN: What do you care?

ARYA: I want to book passage home.

The man laughs.

MAN: You? Can’t afford it.

ARYA tosses a bag of coins on the table in front of the man. The man opens it and pulls out some coins.

MAN: Where’d you steal this from?

ARYA: Why do you care?

MAN: We leave in two days. You can have a hammock in steerage.

ARYA throws another bag of coins on the table.

ARYA: I want a cabin. And we’ll leave at dawn.

ARYA walks past the man and grabs the coin purses off the table on the way.

ARYA: See you at sunrise.

ARYA walks onto a bridge and stops to stare out at the Titan. An old woman approaches her.

WOMAN: Sweet girl.

ARYA turns to face the old woman. The old woman draws a blade and slashes ARYA across the stomach. She grabs ARYA by the neck and holds her tight to her body, the stabs ARYA severl times in the stomach and twists the blade. With her free hand, she reaches up and pulls off her face, revealing she is the WAIF in disguise. ARYA headbutss the WAIF, pushes her, and then runs and jumps off the opposite side of the bridge, plummeting into the water. The WAIF rushes to the side of the bridge ARYA jumped off and stares into the water. Bubbles and blood rise to the surface. The WAIF straightens her shirt and walks away.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS - MARKETPLACE SHORE

ARYA bursts through the surface of the water, gasping. She pulls herself up onto some steps , turns onto her back, and clutches her bleeding stomach.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS - MARKETPLACE

ARYA stumbles through the crowd, clutching her bleeding stomach and shivering. She looks from face to face. Everyone stares at her blankly.

EXT. RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT WOODS
SANDOR is chopping a branch with a machete. He tosses the machete down and takes a drink of water, then hears people screaming and runs through the woods.

CUT TO: RIVERLANDS - BROTHER RAY’S ENCAMPMENT

The dead bodies of RAY’s followers are strewn all over the ground. SANDOR walks among them. He approaches the church framing. RAY is hanging by the neck from the framing, dead. SANDOR looks up at him and sighs. He walks to a nearby stump and retrieves an
EXT. SHEELBA SQUARE - STAGE
LADY CRANE and CLARENZO are performing JOFFREY’s death scene in The Bloody Hand. Portraying CERSEI, LADY CRANE is kneeling, cradling CLARENZO’s head. The audience watches silently.

LADY CRANE: My son. My firstborn son. My child king, hush. Listen to the gods, for you they sing. Fight no more, sweet child. Your wars are won. The wolves are buried and the false stag done. Shut your blue eyes, my love. Let the crown fall. The Father above beckons you into his hall. In Seventh Heaven I’ll see you once more. But now I seek vengeance on Sansa the whore and my brother the Imp who killed his own king. Born amongst lions, our curse from within. I will slay him, I swear. With noose or with knife, though it take me a fortnight, a moon, or my life.
The crowd cheers. LADY CRANE and CLARENZO stand and bow. LADY CRANE makes her way backstage. She takes off her wig and sits down at her table in the actors’ break room, wiping her eyes. She takes her bottle of rum and begins to pour herself a glass but stops when she hears a rustling from behind a clothing rack. She stands and walks over to the clothing rack, then parts the clothes. ARYA is lying on the ground behind the rack, bleeding from her stomach.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS - LADY CRANE’S APARTMENT

ARYA is lying in bed. LADY CRANE sits beside her, treating her wounds.

ARYA: You’re good at that. Where did you learn?

LADY CRANE: I’m a jealous woman. I’ve always liked bad men and they’ve always liked me. They’d come home wherever home was that night stinking of some whore’s perfume.

LADY CRANE stands and carries her tray of medical supplies into the abutting room.

LADY CRANE: So we’d fight and I’d put a hole in them. And then I’d feel terrible, so I’d patch them up. I got good at patching them up.

ARYA: And good at putting holes in them.

LADY CRANE chuckles. ARYA smiles.

LADY CRANE: And that.

ARYA: What happened to the actress? The one who wanted you dead.

LADY CRANE: Bianca.

LADY CRANE spoons soup into a bowl and carries it back to ARYA.

LADY CRANE: She’ll have a hard time finding work as an actress after what I did to her face.

LADY CRANE hands ARYA the bowl. ARYA takes it and slurps, then scrunches up her face.

ARYA: Mmm.

LADY CRANE: I never did learn to cook. But eat. Eat. You need it. The company is moving on to Pentos soon. You should come with us.

ARYA: I can’t.

LADY CRANE: Why not? Got a feeling you’d be good at this sort of work. And besides, we need a new actress.

ARYA: I don’t think I could remember all of the lines.

LADY CRANE: Come with us. What’s left for you here?

ARYA: You wouldn’t be safe. Not while she’s looking for me.

LADY CRANE: Who?

ARYA: She doesn’t have a name.

LADY CRANE: Where will you go?

ARYA: Essos is east and Westeros is west. But what’s west of Westeros?

LADY CRANE: I don’t know.

ARYA: Nobody does. That’s where all the maps stop.

LADY CRANE: The edge of the world, maybe.

ARYA: I’d like to see that.

ARYA is afflicted with pain from her wound. LADY CRANE stands and pours a milky white liquid into a glass.

ARYA: What’s that?

LADY CRANE: Milk of the poppy.

ARYA: I don’t want any.

LADY CRANE hands ARYA the glass.

LADY CRANE: Sleep is the only way you’ll heal. Trust me, if my soup didn’t kill you, nothing will.

ARYA takes the glass, stares into it, and then drinks it down. She lays back and LADY CRANE tucks her in. ARYA falls asleep. LADY CRANE touches her hand and dims the candlelight.
EXT. RIVERLANDS - WOODS
Four men are sitting around a small campfire, two young and two middle-aged. One of the middle-aged men is named GATINS.

MAN: Thing about Gatins, right, is he used to be pretty.

GATINS: I was a famous kisser. You lads know how to kiss proper?

The young men look at each other.

YOUNG MAN: Course we do.

GATINS: This is for masters, this technique. You’re not ready.

YOUNG MAN #2: I’m ready.

MAN: He says he’s ready.

GATINS: All right.

GATINS stands and walks over to YOUNG MAN #2. YOUNG MAN #2 stands.

GATINS: Now, pay attention. You put your left hand on the back of the lady’s head.

GATINS puts his left hand on the back of YOUNG MAN #2’s head.

GATINS: Your right hand holds the small of the lady’s back like so.

GATINS puts his right hand on the small of YOUNG MAN #2’s back.

GATINS: Very romantic. Take your middle finger, yeah, and you jam it right up her bunghole.

GATINS shoves his hand down the back of YOUNG MAN #2’s pants. YOUNG MAN #2 flails and pulls away. The other middle-aged man bursts out laughing. GATINS smells his finger.

MAN: So fucking close!

GATINS: Ah, it smells like pussy to me.

MAN: Look at him. You get hard, boy?

YOUNG MAN #2: Fuck you! Disgusting old twats.

GATINS sits back down next to the fire. YOUNG MAN #2 remains standing, fixing his pants. SANDOR appears, carrying an ax. He is walking towards YOUNG MAN #2. YOUNG MAN #2 has his back turned to him.

YOUNG MAN #2: Got off on that, did you, you old fuck?

The other three men spot SANDOR coming. They stand. YOUNG MAN #2 turns around to see what’s coming. SANDOR growls and decapitates him. SANDOR approaches the second young man and drives his ax into his chest. The middle-aged man approaches SANDOR from behind with a sword. SANDOR spins around and slices his throat open. SANDOR lunges at GATINS and drives his axe into his groin, then rips it away. Blood spills out and GATINS falls to his knees, whimpering. SANDOR puts his hand on GATINS’ head, forcing him to look up.

SANDOR: Where’s the other one? The one with the yellow cloak.

GATINS: Fuck you!

SANDOR: Those are your last words, fuck you? Come on, you can do better.

GATINS: Cunt!

SANDOR: You’re shit at dying, you know that?

SANDOR raises the ax above his head, growls, and buries it into GATINS.

EXT. MEEREEN - MARKETPLACE
The courtyard is filled with people of all types. People are buying, selling, and renovating. In one area, a red priestess is preaching to a crowd.

RED PRIESTESS (speaking Valyrian): From the fire she was reborn to remake the world. Daenerys is a gift from the Lord of Light to her children. If we are steadfast in our love for the Queen and her faithful advisors, no man will ever lock us in chains again.

TYRION and VARYS enter, walking together through the courtyard. TYRION smiles.

TYRION: I’d call that a successful gambit.

VARYS: Would you?

TYRION: Look around. The city has come back to life.

VARYS: You made a pact with fanatics.

TYRION: I did and it worked.

VARYS: If you shaved your beard with a straight razor, you’d say the razor worked. That doesn’t mean it won’t cut your throat.

TYRION: Spoken like a man who has never had to shave.

TYRION and VARYS stop walking and stare out through an archway at the harbor.

TYRION: I’m going to miss you.

VARYS: I know.

TYRION: I hope you’re right about this expedition of yours.

VARYS: If I don’t return, you’ll know I was wrong.

TYRION broods. VARYS looks at him.

VARYS:We need friends in Westeros. And we need ships.

TYRION: Most of all, we need our queen.

VARYS: She’ll come back. She has to. My heart’s been broken too many times already.

VARYS pats TYRION on the shoulder.

VARYS: I’ll walk the rest of the way myself. I can’t go off on a secret mission in the company of the most famous dwarf in the city.

TYRION smiles. VARYS walks on.

TYRION: Varys.

VARYS turns back and looks at TYRION.

TYRION: The most famous dwarf in the world.

VARYS smiles and nods, then walks out into the harbor. TYRION walks back through the courtyard.

INT. RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER
CERSEI is sitting at a table, drinking. There is a knock on the door. QYBURN enters. GREGOR is standing out in the hall.

QYBURN: Your Grace, several members of the Faith Militant have been permitted entry to the Red Keep.

CERSEI: Have been permitted? That’s rather a tortured way of putting it.

QYBURN: They demand to see you, Your Grace.

CERSEI: Who permitted them inside the Red Keep?

QYBURN says nothing.

CERSEI: The king is aware of their presence?

QYBURN: He is, Your Grace. He’s currently in his chambers at prayer.

CERSEI stands and walks past QYBURN out into the hall. QYBURN bows to her as she passes, then follows her out with GREGOR in tow. At the bottom of the steps, LANCEL and a group of Faith Militant are waiting. CERSEI, QYBURN, and GREGOR approach them. One of the Faith Militant stares up at GREGOR.

LANCEL: Your Grace, His Holiness the High Septon wishes to speak with you at the Great Sept of Baelor.

CERSEI: His Holiness the High Septon is welcome to see me here in the Red Keep.

LANCEL: Your Grace, this is not a request.

CERSEI: It is a request, Cousin Lancel. You are asking me for something, I’m refusing.

LANCEL: The High Septon commands you. Are you sure you want to refuse him?

CERSEI: He promised me I could stay in the Red Keep until my trial.

LANCEL: He made no such promises. If you refuse to come of your own free will- -

CERSEI: Get out.

LANCEL nods at the Faith Militant. Two of them advance with spikes clubs. GREGOR steps in front of CERSEI.

LANCEL (to GREGOR): Move aside, ser.

GREGOR silently stares out from behind his helmet.

LANCEL (to CERSEI): Order your man to step aside or there will be violence.

CERSEI: I choose violence.

One of the Faith Militant swings his club into GREGOR’s chestplate. GREGOR is unaffected. The club is stuck in the metal of the armor and the Faith Militant man struggles to wrench it free. He pulls it loose and reels back for another swing, but GREGOR takes him by the throat with one hand and lifts him up off the ground. LANCEL and the other Faith Militant regroup in the courtyard. The man in GREGOR’s grasp gasps and drops his club. GREGOR tosses him out into the courtyard, then follows him out. GREGOR kneels over the man, grabs him by the jaw, and rips his head off. LANCEL looks around at the other Faith Militant. CERSEI smiles.

CERSEI: Please tell His High Holiness he’s always welcome to visit.

CERSEI, QYBURN, and GREGOR turn to walk back up the steps.

EXT. RIVERRUN
BRIENNE and PODRICK arrive on horseback. They stare out at the Lannister/Frey encampment from an overlooking hill.

PODRICK: Looks like a siege, my lady.

BRIENNE: You have a keen military mind, Pod.

BRIENNE spots JAIME riding a white horse among his men.

PODRICK: My lady. My lady.

Several Lannister soldiers ride towards BRIENNE and PODRICK, and then encircle them.

MAN: Who goes there? State your business!

BRIENNE: My name is Brienne of Tarth. Please inform Ser Jaime Lannister I’ve come to speak with him. Tell him I have his sword.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - LANNISTER-FREY ENCAMPMENT

PODRICK watches Lannister soldiers riding through the encampment. His is choked from behind by an unknown man who reveals himself to be BRONN.

BRONN: Getting a bit old to be a squire, aren’t we?

BRONN releases PODRICK. PODRICK coughs. BRONN laughs and slaps PODRICK on the shoulder.

BRONN: Podrick fucking Payne. I thought you’d be dead by now.

PODRICK: Not yet.

BRONN laughs and motions to a nearby tent.

BRONN: Are they in there?

PODRICK: Mm-hmm.

BRONN: You think they’re fucking?

PODRICK: What? No.

BRONN: Why not? I’d fuck her. You’d fuck her, wouldn’t you?

PODRICK: I’m her squire.

BRONN: Oh. Well, he’d fuck her, that’s for sure. And she’s fuck him, don’t you think? The way she looks at him. The way all women look at him is frankly irritating. I preferred working with the little brother on that account. Come on, you’re the one with the magic cock.

BRONN grabs PODRICK’s crotch.

BRONN: You must have shown it to her by now.

PODRICK: She’s training me to fight.

BRONN: Is she? Oh.

PODRICK: An hour in the morning, and hour at night. Every day.

BRONN: Then how come an old cunt like me can still sneak up and murder you?

PODRICK: Well, that’s a different sort of fighting.

BRONN: Now, that’s the truth, isn’t it? You want to learn that sort of fighting?

PODRICK smiles and nods.

BRONN: All right, let’s start with your footwork.

BRONN stands across from PODRICK.

BRONN: Show me your stance.

PODRICK postures up.

BRONN: Now, listen to me, Pod. See how your feet are about a yard apart?

PODRICK looks down at his feet. BRONN slaps him across the face.

BRONN: Lesson number one, assume everyone wants to hit you. ‘Cause they do, Pod. Everyone wants to hit a fucking squire. Do it again. Come on, don’t sulk.

CUT TO: JAIME’S TENT

BRIENNE and JAIME stand across from each other.

JAIME: I never thought you’d find her. I just assumed Sansa was dead.

BRIENNE: Why would you assume that?

JAIME: In my experience, girls like her don’t live very long.

BRIENNE: I don’t think you know many girls like her.

JAIME: Well, I’m proud of you. I am. You fulfilled your oath to Catelyn Stark against all odds.

JAIME walks around the room and comes to a stop on BRIENNE’s other side. BRIENNE turns to face him.

JAIME: Of course my sister wants Sansa dead. The girl is still a suspect in Joffrey’s murder, so there is that complication. What the hell are you doing here?

BRIENNE: I’ve come for the Blackfish.

JAIME: You’re welcome to have him.

BRIENNE: Lady Sansa desires to take her ancestral seat back from the Boltons and assume her rightful position as Lady of Winterfell.

JAIME: With what army does she plan on taking Winterfell?

BRIENNE: The Tully army.

JAIME: They’re a bit occupied at the moment. I was sent here to reclaim Riverrun currently defended by the Tully rebels, so you can see the conundrum.

BRIENNE: The Tullys are rebels because they’re fighting for their home?

JAIME: Riverrun was granted to the Freys by royal decree.

BRIENNE: As a reward for betraying Robb Stark and slaughtering his family.

JAIME: Exactly.

JAIME and BRIENNE stare at each other.

JAIME: We shouldn’t argue about politics.

BRIENNE: You’re a knight, Ser Jaime. I know there is honor in you. I’ve seen it myself.

JAIME: I’m a Lannister. Don’t ask me to betray my own house.

BRIENNE: I do no such thing. Take Riverrun without bloodshed. Ride south with your mission complete and your army intact.

JAIME: What do you propose?

BRIENNE: Allow me to enter Riverrun under a flag of truce. Let me try to persuade the Blackfish to give up the castle.

JAIME: Why would he abandon his ancestral home?

BRIENNE: Because you’ll allow him to lead the Tully forces safely north.

JAIME: Have you ever met the Blackfish?

BRIENNE: No.

JAIME: He’s even more stubborn than you are.

BRIENNE looks down. JAIME walks back around the table to BRIENNE’s other side.

JAIME: All right. Try to talk some sense into the old goat. He won’t listen, but his men might. Not everybody wants to die for someone else’s home.

BRIENNE: I need your word. If I persuade him to abandon the castle, you’ll grant us safe passage north.

JAIME: You have my word. You have until nightfall.

BRIENNE nods and undoes her sword belt. She hands Oathkeeper to JAIME. JAIME sighs.

BRIENNE: You gave it to me for a purpose. I’ve achieved that purpose.

JAIME: It’s yours. It will always be yours.

BRIENNE stares into JAIME’s eyes, then ties Oathkeeper back on her waist and begins to walk out. JAIME follows her to the entrance of the tent. BRIENNE turns back.

BRIENNE: one last thing, Ser Jaime.

JAIME: Yes, Lady Brienne?

BRIENNE: Should I fail to persuade the Blackfish to surrender, and if you attack the castle, honor compels me to fight for Sansa’s kin.

JAIME: Of course it does.

BRIENNE: To fight you.

JAIME: Let’s hope it doesn’t come to that.

BRIENNE and JAIME stare into each other’s eyes. BRIENNE exits. JAIME watches her go.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - OUTER WALL

BRIENNE and PODRICK follow BRYNDEN holding a piece of parchment as he walks along the walls of Riverrun.

BRYNDEN: I’ve said no three times already.

BRIENNE: I have a signed letter from your niece Sansa Stark.

BRYNDEN: I haven’t seen her since she was a child. I don’t know her signature. I don’t know you. And I will not surrender.

BRYNDEN turns to one of his soldiers.

BRYNDEN: Double the guards tonight.

BRYNDEN looks out at the Lannister/Frey encampment.

BRYNDEL The Kingslayer wants to try us. I can feel it.

BRYNDEN turns on his heel and walks inside. BRIENNE and PODRICK follow him.

BRIENNE: As I have said, my name is- -

BRYNDEN: Yes, Brienne of Tarth. I know your father. A good man.

BRIENNE: He always spoke highly of you.

BRYNDEN: And if he were here now, I’d tell him the same I’m telling you.

BRYNDEN makes his way down a set of steps.

BRYNDEN: If you think I’m abandoning my family’s seat on the Kingslayer’s word of honor, you’re a bloody fool.

BRIENNE: Riverrun cannot stand against the Lannisters and the Freys.

BRYNDEN: We can stand longer than your one-handed friend thinks we can.

BRYNDEN, BRIENNE, and PODRICK emerge into Riverrun’s main courtyard.

BRIENNE: He’s not my friend.

BRYNDEN: No?

BRYNDEN stops and turns back to face BRIENNE.

BRYNDEN: Who gave you permission to cross the siege line and enter the castle? Who gave you that sword with the gold lion on the pommel?

BRIENNE: Ser Jaime kept his word to your niece Catelyn Stark. He sent me to find Sansa, to help her as Catelyn wanted. He gave me this sword to protect her. That is what I have done and I will continue to do until the day I die.

BRIENNE holds out the piece of parchment to BRYNDEN. BRYNDEN takes it, unfolds it, and reads its contents. He smiles and chuckles under his breath.

BRYNDEN: She’s exactly like her mother.

BRIENNE smiles. BRYNDEN turns back to face her.

BRYNDEN: I don’t have enough men to help her take Winterfell.

BRIENNE: You have more than she does.

BRYNDEN: She wants her home back. I understand that. But this is my home. And if Jaime Lannister wants it, he can bloody well take it the way everyone else does.

BRYNDEN hands the letter back to BRIENNE. She takes it. BRYNDEN walks away.

BRIENNE (to PODRICK): Find the maester. We need to get a raven north to Sansa.

PODRICK: What should I write?

BRIENNE: Tell her I failed.

INT. RED KEEP - THRONE ROOM
A crowd of nobles fills the throne room. CERSEI enters, followed by QYBURN and GREGOR. The crowd stares at them and parts to let them pass. They approach the throne. TOMMEN, KEVAN, and MAESTER PYCELLE stand atop the steps to the throne. KEVAN walks down the steps and confronts CERSEI.

CERSEI: There’s to be a royal announcement?

KEVAN: There is.

CERSEI: Why wasn’t I informed?

KEVAN: There is to be a royal announcement in the throne room at this very moment.

CERSEi starts up the steps but KEVAN blocks her with his arm.

KEVAN: Where are you going?

CERSEI: To stand by my son.

KEVAN: Your place is in the gallery with the other ladies of the court.

CERSEI stares at TOMMEN. TOMMEN looks away. MAESTER PYCELLE whispers to him. CERSEI, QYBURN, and GREGOR move to one of the nearby balconies. TOMMEN sits on the Iron Throne and addresses the crowd.

TOMMEN: Lords and ladies, the Faith and the Crown are the two pillars that hold up this world. One collapses, so does the other. The Father judges us all. If you break his laws...you will be punished. After conferring with His Holiness the High Septon, we have determined that Loras Tyrell and Cersei lannister’s trial will be held in the Great Sept of Baelor on the first day of the Festival of the Mother.

Members of the crowd murmur to one another.

TOMMEN: Furthermore, after much prayer and reflection, the Crown has decided that from this day forward, trial by combat will be forbidden throughout the Seven Kingdoms. The tradition is a brutish one, a scheme devised by corrupt rulers in order to avoid true judgment from the gods. Cersei Lannister and Loras Tyrell will stand trial before seven septons as it was in the earliest days of the Faith. Seven blessings to all.

CROWD: Seven blessings.

TOMMEN stands and makes his way out of the hall, accompanied by the goldcloaks. CERSEI watches him leave. QYBURN walks up beside CERSEi and whispers to her.

QYBURN: Your Grace...that old rumor you told me about. My little birds investigated.

CERSEI: And? Was it just a rumor or something more?

QYBURN: More. Much more.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID CONFERENCE ROOM
TYRION pours himself a glass of wine. GREY WORM and MISSANDEI sit across from him.

MISSANDEI: You seem happy.

TYRION: I am happy. You should both be as well. Not so long ago, this city was ready to devour itself.

TYRION puts down his glass of wine on a table and pours another glass of wine.

TYRION: Now it’s like a man reborn.

MISSANDEI: I will be happy when our queen returns.

TYRION: Why don’t you drink? Why don’t either of you ever drink?

TYRION pours a third glass of wine.

GREY WORM: Unsullied never drink.

TYRION: Why not?

GREY WORM: Rules.

TYRION: And who made these rules? Your former masters?

GREY WORM and MISSANDEI look at each other.

TYRION: Those miserable old shits didn’t want you to be human. Have a drink with me.

TYRION hands GREY WORM one of the glasses of wine. GREY WORM takes it.

TYRION (to MISSANDEI): And you? What’s your excuse?

GREY WORM sniffs his glass of wine and scrunches up his face. TYRION hands MISSANDEI the second glass of wine. She takes it.

MISSANDEI: I have tried wine before. It made me feel funny.

TYRION: That’s how you know it’s working.

TYRION returns to his glass of wine and raises it up.

TYRION: Here’s to our queen. Anyone not drinking is disrespecting our queen.

GREY WORM and MISSANDEI raise their glasses.

TYRION: To Daenerys Stormborn, Mother of Dragons, Breaker of Chains, long may she reign.

GREY WORM & MISSANDEI: Long may she reign.

GREY WORM and MISSANDEI sip from their glasses. TYRION drinks all of his.

TYRION: Do you like it?

GREY WORM: Tastes like it has turned.

TYRION walks to another decanter on the opposite side of the room and pours himself another glass of wine.

TYRION: Yes, yes. Fermentation. One day, after our queen has taken the Seven Kingdoms...I’d like to have my own vineyard. Make my own wine. The Imp’s Delight. Only my close friends could drink it.

TYRION sips his wine.

TYRION: Tell me a joke, Missandei of Naath.

TYRION walks back in front of GREY WORM and MISSANDEI.

MISSANDEI: I do not know any jokes.

TYRION: Grey worm?

GREY WORM stares and says nothing.

TYRION: Right. Three lords walk into a tavern- - a Stark, a Martell, and a Lannister. They order ale...

MISSANDEI sips her wine.

TYRION: ...but when the barkeep brings them over, each of them finds a fly in his cup. The Lannister, outraged, shoves the cup aside and demands another. The Martell plucks the fly out and swallows it whole. The Stark reaches into his cup, pulls out the fly and shouts, “Spit it out, you see shit. Spit it out.”

GREY WORM and MISSANDEI do not laugh.

TYRION: It’s funnier in Westeros.

GREY WORM: The Starks and the lannisters, i thought these were enemies.

TYRION: Yes.

MISSANDEI: A joke is like a story, Torgo Nudho. Not a true story, necessarily.

TYRION: A story that’s supposed to make you laugh, ideally. Not at the moment, perhaps.

MISSANDEI sips her wine again.

TYRION: Missandei, do you like the wine?

MISSANDEI: I do.

TYRION: Tell a joke.

MISSANDEI: Two translators are on a sinking ship.

TYRION smiles.

MISSANDEI: The first says, “Do you know how to swim?” The second says, “No, but I can shout for help in 19 languages.”

There is a pause.

TYRION Ah!

TYRION begins to laugh. MISSANDEI smiles and sips her wine.

GREY WORM: That is the worst joke I ever heard.

MISSANDEI: You don’t even know what a joke is.

GREY WORM: I am soldier all my life. You think I never hear joke?

TYRION: You lied to us.

GREY WORM: I make joke.

MISSANDEI and TYRION laugh. GREY WORM smiles.

MISSANDEI: More jokes.

TYRION: I once walked into a brothel with a honeycomb and a jackass. The madam says- -

Bells begin to ring. GREY WORM stands and runs out of the room, shouting in Valyrian.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID SHORELINE

A fleet of white-sailed ships approaches Meereen. TYRION and MISSANDEI stare at at the ships.

MISSANDEI: The Masters have come for their property.

EXT. RIVERRUN - LANNISTER/FREY ENCAMPMENT
JAIME rides horseback through the encampment, approaches a tent, dismounts, and enters.

JAIME: Lord Edmure.

EDMURE’s hands are behind his back, his wrists bound around a vertical pole in the center of the tent. He is kneeling.

JAIME: I apologize for the way the Freys treated you. A man of your birth deserved better. You have my word you’ll be properly fed and clothes from now on.

EDMURE stands.

EDMURE: I have your word?

EDMURE scoffs.

EDMURE: Oh, good. Good, that’s- - that’s a fine thing. My uncle will never surrender the castle, ser. Whatever game you’re playing.

JAIME: The Blackfish is an old man. A good death is all he can hope for. But you, you have a child now, I’ve heard. A son you sired on your wedding night. You’re a potent man.

EDMURE: A son I’ve never met born of a wife that I haven’t seen since our first night together.

JAIME: You should be with them both. I can arrange that, you realize? Comfortable rooms for you at Casterly Rock. A tutor for your boy, knights to train him to fight and to ride. And when he comes of age, he’ll have a keep of his own.

EDMURE: Do you imagine yourself a decent person? Is that it? After you’ve massacred my family. Kept me in a cell for years. Stolen our lands.

JAIME: I’ll remind you that our houses are at war. I’m sorry if this conflict has inconvenienced you, but rebelling against the Crown does have consequences.

EDMURE: Says the man who shoved his sword through his king’s back.

JAIME: Did I give you the impression that this was a negotiation? It’s not.

JAIME sits on a barrel in the corner of the room.

EDMURE: You understand. On some level you understand that you’re an evil man.

JAIME: I’ll leave the judgments to the gods.

EDMURE: Well, that is convenient for you. You’re a fine-looking fellow, aren’t you?

EDMURE chuckles.

EDMURE: Your square jaw, your golden armor. Tell me, I want to know. I truly do. How do you live with yourself? All of us have to believe that we’re decent, don’t we? You have to sleep at night. How do you tell yourself that you’re decent after everything that you’ve done?

JAIME: I was your sister’s prisoner once. She hit me on the head with a rock if I remember correctly.

EDMURE laughs.

EDMURE: Yeah. She should have killed you.

JAIME: Perhaps, but she didn’t. Catelyn Stark hated me just like you hate me. But I didn’t hate her. I admired her. Far more than her husband or her son.

EDMURE: Do you think I care whom you admire and whom you don’t?

JAIME: No, I don’t, but I’m telling you anyway because you’re my prisoner. You don’t have a choice. The love she had for her children, I was a little awed by it. Reminded me of my sister.

EDMURE: Oh. Oh, I see. You’re a madman.

JAIME: I’m not here to trade insults. Your sister was a strong- -

EDMURE: Don’t talk about Cat!

JAIME: I’ll talk about whomever I want.

EDMURE grunts and struggles against his bindings.

JAIME: She loved her children. I suppose all mothers do, but Catelyn and Cersei, there’s a fierceness you don’t often see.

JAIME stands and walks closer to EDMURE.

JAIME: They’d do anything to protect their babies.

JAIME gets in EDMURE’s face.

JAIME: Start a war. Burn cities to ash. Free their worst enemies. The things we do for love.

EDMURE: You didn’t come here to talk about our sisters.

JAIME: That’s exactly why I came here. I love Cersei. You can laugh at that if you want. You can sneer. It doesn’t matter. She needs me. And to get back to her, I have to take Riverrun. I’ll send for your baby boy.

EDMURE struggles against his bindings, pushing himself towards JAIME.

JAIME: And I’ll launch him into Riverrun with a catapult. Because you don’t matter to me, Lord Edmure. Your son doesn’t matter to me. The people in the castle don’t matter to me. Only Cersei. And if I have to slaughter every Tully who ever lived to get back to her, that’s what I’ll do.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - OUTER WALL

EDMURE crosses the bridge over Riverrun’s moat, carrying a torch. Several guards point crossbows down at him. He stops at the end of the bridge.

GUARD CAPTAIN: Who goes there?

EDMURE: Edmure Tully, son of Hoster Tully, and the rightful Lord of Riverrun. I demand entry.

BRYNDEN appears on the wall with the guards.

BRYNDEN: Don’t let him in.

GUARD CAPTAIN: He’s the Lord of Riverrun. I have to obey his commands.

BRYNDEN: He’s been their captive ever since they murdered his king at the Red Wedding. Why do you think the people who murdered his king at the Red Wedding would decide to let him come home? Because it’s a trap, you idiot. Don’t let him in.

BRYNDEN turns to walk away.

GUARD CAPTAIN: He’s my lord, my lord. I’ve sworn to serve the Lord of Riverrun and obey his commands.

BRYNDEN turns back.

BRYNDEN: You’re not obeying Edmure’s commands. You’re obeying the fucking Kinglsayer’s commands.

EDMURE (O.S.): I demand entry.

GUARD CAPTAIN: My lord has given an order.

BRYNDEN: WIth a knife to his throat. That is not a valid order.

The guard captain turns to his fellow guards.

GUARD CAPTAIN: Lower the drawbridge and open the gate for Lord Ed- -

BRYNDEN unsheathes his sword halfway. The guard captain and the other guards show their steel.

BRYNDEN: I’ll have your head before I surrender Riverrun.

GUARD CAPTAIN: You are not lord of this castle, my lord.

BRYNDEN looks around at the other guards, sheathes his sword, and walks away.

GUARD CAPTAIN: Lower the drawbridge!

GUARD: Aye, ser!

The drawbridge begins to open. EDMURE stares back across the Lannister/Frey encampment. JAIME waits on his horse. BLACK WALDER rides up beside JAIME. The drawbridge fully extends. EDMURE walks inside.

BLACK WALDER (to JAIME): If you’re wrong, we’re just surrendered our most valuable prisoner.

The drawbridge closes behind EDMURE. Riverrun soldiers are gathered to meet him. BRYNDEN appears in the rear of their ranks. EDMURE spots BRYNDEN, hands his torch to one of the soldiers, and walks up the stairs to the top of the outer wall.

GUARD CAPTAIN: Welcome home, my lord.

EDMURE: Command all the forces within the castle to lay down their arms. Open the gates.

GUARD CAPTAIN: My lord- -

EDMURE: Your lord has given a command.

The drawbridge opens. JAIME glances at BLACK WALDER and rides towards Riverrun. The Lannister and Frey forces follow him into Riverrun.

EDMURE: Find the Blackfish. Put him in irons and hand him over to the Freys.

GUARD CAPTAIN (to a guard): Find him.

The Riverrun soldiers lay down their arms in a pile as the Lannister forces enter the castle.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - RIVER EXIT

BRYNDEN, PODRICK, and BRIENNE emerge from a doorway. BRYNDEN places the torch in a sconce and stands in the doorway. PODRICK gets onto a small rowboat floating on the surface of the river. BRIENNE kneels to steady the rowboat for PODRICK, then turns back to look at BRYNDEN.

BRYNDEN: Go on.

BRYNDEN stands and faces him.

BRIENNE: Come with us.

BRYNDEN: I’ve run before from the Red Wedding. I’m not running again. This is my family home.

BRIENNE: Your family is in the North. Come with us. Don’t die for pride when you can fight for your blood.

BRYNDEN: You’ll serve Sansa far better than I ever could.

Some guards begin shouting in the background.

BRYNDEN: Go on, now.

BRYNDEN unsheathes his sword.

BRYNDEN: I haven’t had a proper sword fight in years. I expect I’ll make a damn fool of myself.

BRYNDEN heads through the doorway and back up the steps. BRIENNE watches him leave and then gets on the rowboat.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - COURTYARD

Lannister and Frey banners are being draped all over the courtyard. Lannister soldiers walk over the fallen Tully banners.

CUT TO: RIVERRUN - OUTER WALL

JAIME stands atop the outer wall. A Lannister guard enters and approaches him.

GUARD: We found the Blackfish, my lord.

JAIME: Good. Bring him to me.

GUARD: He died fighting, my lord.

JAIME nods to the guard. The guard exits. JAIME stares out at the river and sees BRIENNE and PODRICK rowing away from Riverrun. He looks around to see if anyone else is watching. BRIENNE looks over her shoulder and sees JAIME standing atop the wall. JAIME waves to her. BRIENNE waves back.

EXT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID SHORELINE
The Masters’ fleet is launching flaming projectiles at Meereen and the Great Pyramid, setting them ablaze.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID CONFERENCE ROOM

TYRION and MISSANDEI enter. GREY WORM is waiting for them. Many Unsullied stand guard around the room.

TYRION: I was wrong. I admit it.

MISSANDEI: That changes nothing.

TYRION: The Unsullied could mount a defense off the beachhead. If the slavers’ forces- -

GREY WORM: No more talking from you. Your talking gave us this.

TYRION: And I have acknowledged that. I’m trying- -

GREY WORM: You’re trying to tell me what the army should do. You do not know what the army should do.

TYRION: All right, what should the army do?

GREY WORM: We’ll not go to the beach. If we go to the beach, the Masters will take the pyramid. The pyramid is the only place in the city we can defend. We stay here.

TYRION: And then?

GREY WORM: We wait for them to come to us. Then we fight them.

Something thuds and rattles the roof of the pyramid. Footsteps can be heard. Everyone looks up. MISSANDEI grabs a knife from a table and stands beside TYRION. GREY WORM and the Unsullied form up in front of the door to the balcony. One Unsullied opens the door. Another inches out through it, shield and spear in hand. The Unsullied man looks side to side and sees nothing, but then sees something and kneels. The rest of the Unsullied follow suit. DAENERYS enters. A dragon screeches and flies away in the background.

EXT. RIVERLANDS - WOODS
SANDOR walks along the center of a path through the woods, carrying an ax and a satchel. He hears horses whinnying and the voices of men. He follows the sounds and happens upon BERIC DONDARRION, THOROS OF MYR, and other members of the Brotherhood Without Banners. They are preparing to hang LEM and two of his accomplices, who stand on blocks ith nooses tied around their necks. BERIC turns to see SANDOR. Some of the Brotherhood members brandish weapons.

BERIC: Clegane.

THOROS: What the fuck you doing here?

SANDOR: Chasing them. You?

THOROS: Hanging them.

SANDOR: Any particular reason?

BERIC: They’re our men. Or they were. They attacked a nearby sept and murdered the villagers. Why do you want them?

SANDOR: Same reason. I was helping build it. They killed a friend of mine.

THOROS: You’ve got friends?

SANDOR: Not anymore. They’re mine.

SANDOR advances. BERIC and another member of the Brotherhood block his path.

BERIC: It’s the Brotherhood’s good name they’ve dragged through the dirt.

SANDOR: Fuck your name. They’re mine. I killed you once before, Dondarrion. Happy to do it again.

One of the Brotherhood members notches an arrow and points his bow at SANDOR.

SANDOR: Drop that arrow, you bloody girl.

SANDOR points his ax at the man but keeps his eyes locked on BERIC.

SANDOR: Tougher girls than you have tried to kill me.

SANDOR walks towards the bowman.

BERIC: You can have one of them.

SANDOR turns back to face BERIC, glances at the men about to be hanged, then looks back at BERIC.

SANDOR: Two.

BERIC looks at THOROS. THOROS nods. BERIC nods to SANDOR. SANDOR approaches one of the men and raises his ax above his head to swing. THOROS catches the ax’s handle from behind.

THOROS: No, no, no.

SANDOR turns to face THOROS and tries to wrench his ax free.

THOROS: We’re not butchers. We hang them.

THOROS releases SANDOR’s ax.

SANDOR: hanging? All over in an instant. Where’s the punishment in that?

THOROS: They die.

SANDOR: We all bloody die.

SANDOR gestures to BERIC.

SANDOR: Except this one here. I’ll only gut one of them.

BERIC: No.

SANDOR: I’ll chop off one hand.

BERIC: We gave you two of the three out of respect for your loss. That’s generous.

SANDOR: Bunch of nancies.

SANDOR throws down his ax.

SANDOR: There was a time I would have killed all seven of you just to gut these three.

THOROS: You’re getting old, Clegane.

SANDOR: He’s not.

SANDOR kicks the box out from underneath one of the men, hanging him. He moves in front of LEM.

LEM: Please don’t. I’ll give you anything.

SANDOR kicks the box out from underneath LEM, hanging him. LEM gasps for air. BERIC hangs the third man. SANDOR pulls the boot off of LEM’s foot. BERIC and THOROS begin to walk away, but turn back to look at SANDOR. SANDOR takes off his own boot and sizes up LEM’s boot to his own foot. He shoves his foot into LEM’s boot and looks up at BERIC and THOROS.

SANDOR: Got anything to eat?

CUT TO: RIVERLANDS - BROTHERHOOD WITHOUT BANNERS’ ENCAMPMENT

Several members of the Brotherhood are sitting around small campfires. SANDOR, BERIC, and some other Brothers are sitting at one such campfire. SANDOR is eating a piece of meat. THOROS approaches and sits beside them.

THOROS (to SANDOR): Enjoying yourself?

SANDOR: I prefer chicken.

THOROS hands SANDOR a water skin. SANDOR drinks from it.

BERIC: You ought to join us. We could use you.

SANDOR: I tried joining. Didn’t work out for me.

THOROS: Clegane, we’re here for a reason. The Lord of Light is keeping Beric alive for a reason. He gave a failed, drunk priest the power to bring him back for a reason. We are part of something larger than ourselves.

SANDOR: Lots of horrible shit in this world gets done for something larger than ourselves.

SANDOR returns the water skin to THOROS, stands, walks to the river, and urinates into it.

BERIC: Cold winds are rising in the North.

SANDOR: And you’re going to go stop them?

BERIC: We need good men to help us.

SANDOR: Last time you saw me, you wanted to execute me.

BERIC: True enough. But the Lord of Light gave you the power to defeat me. Why?

SANDOR laughs.

SANDOR: I beat you because I’m better than you, Beric. I was better than you before you started yammering on about the Lord and I’m better than you now.

SANDOR returns to his spot by the campfire and sits.

BERIC: Aye, you’re probably right. You’re a fighter. You were born a fighter. You walked away from the fight. How did that go? Good and bad, young and old, the things we’re fighting will destroy them all alike. You can still help a lot more than you’ve harmed Clegane, it’s not too late for you.

INT. BRAAVOS - LADY CRANE’S APARTMENT
ARYA is sleeping. LADY CRANE enters the bedroom, sits down beside ARYA, and strokes her face. ARYA stirs and groans. LADY CRANE stands and walks back into the abutting room. She retrieves a stool and stands atop it, reaching for a bottle on top of a bureau. She turns around and sees a young man with blonde hair. Cut to ARYA’s perspective. There is a thud. ARYA awakens with a gasp and looks around. She sees a shadow moving in the abutting room.

ARYA: Lady Crane?

ARYA gets out of bed and winces. She walks towards the abutting room.

ARYA: Lady Crane?

ARYA enters the abutting room and sees LADY CRANE lying crumpled on top of the stool, dead. Blood is pooled on the ground beneath her.

WAIF: If you’d have done your job, she would have died painlessly.

ARYA turns to see the WAIF standing in the doorway with a knife. The WAIF approaches ARYA slowly and ARYA backs away, matching her pace.

WAIF: Instead…

The WAIF holds out her arms.

WAIF: The Many-Faced God was promised a name. He must always receive what is his. You can’t change that. I can’t change that. No one can. And now he’s been promised another name.

ARYA turns around, runs out onto the balcony, and jumps off. She grunts as her hands and feet connect with the ground. The sprints off through the streets, pushing people out of the way. The WAIF emerges from the door to LADY CRANE’s apartment, spies ARYA, and chases after her. ARYA runs through an alleyway. A man pushes a cart in her way. She slides underneath it and continues running. The WAIF jumps clean over the cart. ARYA turns a corner and runs down a set of stairs. A woman dumps a barrel of water on the ground outside the door to a room at the bottom of the steps. ARYA sees her and darts into the room. The WAIF turns the corner to the steps but stops when she does not see ARYA. The room ARYA has entered is a sauna. She moves through it. A number of men in towels are relaxing in the heat. ARYA emerges from the door on the opposite side of the sauna and looks around. She enters the crowd, walking through it. The WAIF appears on a high wall behind her, then jumps down into the crowd. ARYA turns back to see her and runs away. The WAIF pursues her. ARYA reaches the end of the marketplace and jumps off a high wall. She lands on a large set of steps where many fruit merchants have laid their baskets. She tumbles down the steps, knocking over the baskets as she goes and grunting with pain. The crowd clamors. ARYA comes to a stop at the bottom of the steps. She puts her hand to her stomach. Her hand comes away bloody. The WAIF appears at the top of the steps. ARYA sees her, stands, and throws herself over a small wall into an alleyway. The WAIF follows her. ARYA whimpers as she moves through the alleyway. She leaves blood stains on everything she touches. She enters a small, dark room, lit by a single candle. The WAIF follows her inside, knife in hand. ARYA kneels in the small living space she has made for herself. The WAIF enters and shuts the door behind her.

WAIF: It will all be over soon. On your knees or on your feet?

ARYA retrieves Needle from beneath a blanket and stands.

WAIF: Haven’t we been through this already? That won’t help you.

The WAIF advances. ARYA holds Needle up in front of her face, closes her eyes, and cuts the candle in half. The room goes dark.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS - HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

JAQEN enters the main hall. He notices a blood trail on the floor leading to the Hall of Faces. He follows the trail and enters the Hall. The trail leads to one of the columns bearing the faces. The WAIF’s bloody face rests in one of the sconces.

ARYA: You told her to kill me.

ARYA appears behind JAQEN, pointing Needle at him. JAQEN turns to face her.

JAQEN: Yes. But here you are. And there she is.

JAQEN pushes his chest against Needle’s point.

JAQEN: Finally a girl is no one.

ARYA: A girl is Arya Stark of Winterfell and I’m going home.

JAQEN smiles. ARYA turns and exits.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD SONG

EXT. MEEREEN - HARBOR
The Masters’ men are launching flaming projectiles at the Great Pyramid and surrounding city from their ships. DAENERYS watches from atop a balcony of the Great Pyramid. She returns to the interior, to the conference room where TYRION awaits. DAENERYS approaches him. An explosion occurs outside.

TYRION: Despite appearances, I think you’ll find the city’s on the rise.
An explosion occurs outside.

TYRION: Perhaps we should take shelter.

An explosion occurs outside.

DAENERYS: The city is on the rise?

TYRION: Meereen is strong. Commerce has returned to the markets. The people are behind you.

An explosion occurs outside.

TYRION: Well, not all the people, of course. No ruler that ever lived had the support of all the people. But the rebirth of Meereen is the cause of this violence. The Masters cannot let Meereen succeed. Because if Meereen succeeds, a city without slavery, a city without Masters…

An explosion occurs outside.

TYRION: ...it proves that no one needs a Master.

DAENERYS: Good. Shall we begin?

TYRION: Do we have a plan?

DAENERYS: I will crucify the Masters. I will set their fleets afire, kill every last one of their soldiers, and return their cities to the dirt. That is my plan.

TYRION tightens his jaw and looks away.

DAENERYS: You don’t approve?

TYRION: You once told me you knew what your father was. Did you know his plans for King’s Landing when the Lannister armies were at his gates?

An explosion occurs outside.

TYRION: Probably not. Well, he told my brother and Jaime told me. He had caches of wildfire hidden under the Red Keep, the Guildhalls, the Sept of Baelor, all the major thoroughfares. He would have burned every one of his citizens. The loyal ones and the trators. Every man, woman, and child. That’s why Jaime killed him.

DAENERYS: This is entirely different.

TYRION: You’re talking about destroying cities. It’s not entirely different. I’d like to suggest an alternate approach.

A blast causes the window across the room to explode inward, sending shards of wood flying everywhere. DAENERYS and TYRION duck, then turn to look at the window.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - PLATEAU

DAENERYS, TYRION, GREY WORM, MISSANDEI, and an assembly of Unsullied stand across from the three Masters, YEZZAN ZO QAGGAZ, RAZDAL MO ERAZ, and BELICHO PAENYMION, and a group of their soldiers.

RAZDAL (to DAENERYS): Once before, I offered you peace. If you had not been so arrogant, you could have returned to your homeland with a fleet of ships. Instead, you will flee Slaver’s Bay on foot like the beggar queen you are.

TYRION: We are here to discuss terms of surrender, not to trade insults.

YEZZAN: The terms are simple. You and your foreign friends will abandon the Great Pyramid and the city of Meereen. The Unsullied you stole from Kraznys mo Nakloz will remain to be sold again to the highest bidder. The translator you stole from Kraznys mo Nakloz will remain to be sold again to the highest bidder. The dragons beneath the Great Pyramid will be slaughtered.

DAENERYS: We obviously didn’t communicate clearly. We’re here to discuss your surrender, not mine.

RAZDAL: I imagine it’s difficult adjust to the new reality. Your reign is over.

DAENERYS: My reign has just begun.

A dragon screeches in the distance. YEZZAN turns to look in the direction of the screech. DROGON flies up over the plateau and lands on an overlooking structure. He roars and drops down beside DAENERYS. DAENERYS climbs on his back and they fly off over Meereen. When they pass over the entrance to the catacombs, RHAEGAL and VISERION bust down the door with flame and take flight to join them. The ensemble flies over the beach entrance to Meereen.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - BEACH ENTRANCE

A group of the Sons of the Harpy are slaughtering citizens of Meereen. Galloping footsteps can be heard in the distance. One of the Sons of the Harpy turns to look in the direction of the sound. The Dothraki horde led by DAARIO rounds the bend of a nearby cliff, yelling war cries and charging full force towards the Sons of the Harpy on horseback. DAARIO beheads a Son of the Harpy.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - HARBOR

DAENERYS and the dragons fly over the Masters’ ships. The soldiers on the ships stop what they’re doing and stare up at the dragons. DAENERYS and DROGON come to a halt and hover in front of one of the ships.

DAENERYS: Dracarys.

The dragons shoot stream of fire down at the the ship. The ship becomes engulfed in flame and the soldiers scream as they die. The ship incinerates and capsizes.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - PLATEAU

GREY WORM steps forward and addresses the Masters’ soldiers.

GREY WORM (speaking Valyrian): You men have a choice:

The Unsullied ready their spears. The Masters’ soldiers ready their swords.

GREY WORM: ...fight and die for the masters who would never fight and die for you, or go home to your families.

A dragon screeches in the distance. The Masters’ soldiers lay down their arms and run away.

TYRION: Thank you for the armada. Our queen does love ships. Now, last time we spoke, we made a pact. You violated that pact. You declared war upon us. Though our queen does have a forgiving nature, this cannot be forgiven.

MISSANDEI: Our queen insists that one of you must die as punishment for your crimes.

TYRION: It always seems a bit abstract, doesn’t it, other people dying?

RAZDAL grabs YEZZAN.

RAZDAL: Him. He should die.

BELICHO: Yes, him.

TYRION looks at GREY WORM.

RAZDAL: He’s not one of us. He’s an outsider, a lowborn. He does not speak for us.

GREY WORM approaches the YEZZAN and stares in his eyes.

YEZZAN: Please.

YEZZAN falls to his knees. GREY WORM unsheathes his dagger and slices RAZDAL and BELICHO’s throats. He sheathes his dagger and steps back. TYRION approaches YEZZAN and puts his hand on his shoulder.

TYRION: Tell your people what happened here. Tell them you live by the grace of Her Majesty. When they come forward with notions of retribution or ideas about returning the slave cities to their former glory, remind the what happened when Daenerys Stormborn and her dragons came to Meereen.

TYRION pats YEZZAN on the shoulder. He, GREY WORM, and MISSANDEI walk away.
EXT. WINTERFELL - OUTSKIRTS
JON SNOW, SANSA, DAVOS, TORMUND, LYANNA MORMONT, and some Stark bannermen sit on horseback, waiting. RAMSAY, HARALD KARSTARK, SMALLJON UMBER, and a group of Bolton soldiers approach on horseback. They come to a halt in front of JON SNOW and compnay.

JON SNOW: You don’t have to be here.

SANSA: Yes, I do.

RAMSAY: My beloved wife. I’ve missed you terribly.

RAMSAY looks at JON SNOW.

RAMSAY: Thank you for returning Lady Bolton safely. Now, dismount and kneel before me, surrender your army and proclaim me the true Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North. I will pardon you for deserting the Night’s Watch. I will pardon these treasonous lords for betraying my house. Come, bastard, you don’t have the men, you don’t have the horses, and you don’t have Winterfell. Why lead those pour souls into slaughter? There’s no need for a battle. Get off your hose and kneel. I’m a man of mercy.

JON SNOW: You’re right. There’s no need for a battle. Thousands of men don’t need to die. Only one of us. Let’s end this the old way. You against me.

RAMSAY chuckles.

RAMSAY: I keep hearing stories about you, bastard. The way people in the North talk about you, you’re the greatest swordsman who ever walked. Maybe you are that good. Maybe not. I don’t know if I’d beat you. But I know that my army will beat yours. I have 6,000 men. You have, what, half that? Not even?

JON SNOW: Aye, you have the numbers. Will your men want to fight for you when they hear you wouldn’t fight for them?

RAMSAY points at JON SNOW.

RAMSAY: He’s good. Very good. Tell me, will you let your little brother die because you’re too proud to surrender?

SANSA: How do we know you have him?

RAMSAY nods to SMALLJON. SMALLJON pulls SHAGGYDOG’s head out from a satchel and throws it on the ground.

RAMSAY: Now, if you want to save —

SANSA: You’re going to die tomorrow, Lord Bolton. Sleep well.

SANSA turns her horse and rides away.

RAMSAY (to JON SNOW): She’s a fine woman, your sister. I look forward to having her back in my bed. And you’re all fine-looking men. My dogs are desperate to meet you. I haven’t fed them for seven days. They’re ravenous. I wonder which parts they’ll try first. Your eyes? Your balls? We’ll find out soon enough. In the morning, then, bastard.

RAMSAY and company ride back towards Winterfell. JON SNOW looks down.

CUT TO: STARK ENCAMPMENT - CONFERENCE TENT

JON SNOW, DAVOS, TORMUND, and SANSA are standing around a planning table.

JON SNOW: If he was smart, he’d stay inside the walls of Winterfell and wait us out.

DAVOS: That’s not his way. He knows the North is watching. If the other houses sense weakness on his part, they’ll stop fearing him. He can’t have that. Fear is his power.

JON SNOW: It’s his weakness, too. His mean don’t want to fight for him. They’re forced to fight for him. If they feel the tide turning...

TORMUND: It’s not his men that worry me. It’s his horses. I know what mounted knights can do to us.

TORMUND looks at DAVOS.

TORMUND: You and Stannis cut through us like piss through snow.

JON SNOW: We’re digging trenches all along our flanks. They won’t be able to hit us the way that Stannis hit you, in a double envelopment.

TORMUND stares blankly at JON SNOW.

JON SNOW: A pincer move.

TORMUND stares blankly at JON SNOW. JON SNOW and DAVOS look at each other briefly.

JON SNOW: They won’t be able to hit us from the sides.

TORMUND: Good.

DAVOS: It’s crucial that we let them charge at us. They’ve got the numbers, we need the patience. If we let him buckle our center, he’ll pursue. Then we’ll have him surrounded on three sides.

TORMUND (to JON SNOW): Did you really think that cunt would fight you man to man?

JON SNOW: No. But I wanted to make him angry. I want him coming at us full tilt.

DAVOS: We should all get some sleep.

TORMUND: Rest, Jon Snow. We need you sharp tomorrow.

DAVOS, TORMUND, and any remaining attendants exit. JON SNOW sits down at the head of the table.

SANSA: So you’ve met the enemy, drawn up your battle plans.

JON SNOW: Aye, for what they’re worth.

SANSA: You’ve known him for the space of a single conversation, you and your trusted advisors, and you sit around and make your plans on how to defeat a man you don’t know. I lived with him. I know the way his mind works. I know how he likes to hurt people. Did it ever once occur to you that I might have some insight?

JON SNOW: You’re right.

SANSA: You think he’s going to fall into your trap. He won’t He’s the one who lays traps.

JON SNOW: He’s overconfident.

SANSA: He plays with people. He’s far better at it than you. He’s been doing it all his life.

JON SNOW stands.

JON SNOW: Aye, and what have I been doing all my life? Playing with broomsticks? I fought beyond the Wall against worse than Ramsay Bolton. I’ve defended the Wall from worse than Ramsay Bolton.

SANSA: You don’t know him.

JON SNOW: All right, tell me. What should we do? How do we get Rickon back?

SANSA: We’ll never get him back. Rickon is Ned Starks trueborn son, which makes him a greater threat to Ramsay than you, a bastard, or me, a girl. As long as he lives, Ramsay’s claim to Winterfell will be contested, which means he won’t live long.

JON SNOW: We can’t give up on our brother.

SANSA: Listen to me, please. He wants you to make a mistake.

JON SNOW: Of course he does. What should I do differently?

SANSA: I don’t know! I don’t know anything about battles! Just don’t do what he wants you to do.

JON SNOW: Aye, that’s good advice.

SANSA: You think that’s obvious?

JON SNOW: Well, it is a bit obvious.

SANSA: If you had asked for my advice earlier, I would have told you not to attack Winterfell until we have a larger force, or is that obvious, too?

JON SNOW: When will we have a larger force?! We’ve pleaded with every house that’ll have us! The Blackfish can’t help us! We’re lucky to have this many men!

SANSA: It’s not enough!

JON SNOW: Now, it’s not enough! It’s what we have! Battles have been won against greater odds.

SANSA: If Ramsay wins, I’m not going back there alive. Do you understand me?

JON SNOW I won’t ever let him touch you again. I’ll protect you, I promise.

SANSA: No one can protect me. No one can protect anyone.

SANSA exits. JON SNOW turns, looks at the table, and sighs.

CUT TO: STARK ENCAMPMENT

DAVOS and TORMUND are walking together through the encampment.

DAVOS: You think there’s hope?

TORMUND: I’ve never seen these Bolton fuckers fight. And they’ve never seen the free folk fight, so, yes, there’s hope. You want to avenge your king, don’t you?

DAVOS: It wasn’t the Boltons defeated Stannis. It was Stannis himself. I loved the man. He lifted me up and made me something. But he had demons in his skull whispering foul things.

TORMUND: You saw these demons?

DAVOS: What?

They stop walking. DAVOS looks at TORMUND.

DAVOS: No, it’s a manner of speaking. Not actual demons.

TORMUND: Oh. Well, you loved that cunt Stannis and I loved the man he burned. Mance didn’t have demons in his skull. He didn’t torch people or listen to some red witch. I believed in him. I thought he was the man to lead us through the Long Night. But I was wrong just like you.

DAVOS: Maybe that was our mistake, believing in kings.

TORMUND: Jon Snow’s not a king.

DAVOS: No, he’s not.

TORMUND and DAVOS smile at each other.

TORMUND: I need a good drink to help me sleep the night before a fight. You want some? I have a jug of sour goat’s milk stronger than any of that grape water you southern twats like sucking on.

DAVOS: No, thanks. It does sound delicious, but I better keep a clear head. I can never sleep the night before a battle.

TORMUND: So what do you do all night?

DAVOS: I walk. Think and walk. Think and walk until I’m far enough away from camp that no one can hear me shitting my guts out.

TORMUND laughs.

TORMUND: Happy shitting.

TORMUND walks away.

CUT TO: STARK ENCAMPMENT - MELISANDRE’S TENT

MELISANDRE is sitting at a desk with a mirror and candles on it, staring into a fire pit. JON SNOW enters and approaches her.

JON SNOW: My lady. You weren’t at the war council.

MELISANDRE: I’m not a soldier.

JON SNOW: Any advice?

MELISANDRE: Don’t lose.

JON SNOW: If I do, if I fall, don’t bring me back.

MELISANDRE: I’ll have to try.

JON SNOW: I’m ordering you not to bring me back.

MELISANDRE: I am not your servant, Jon Snow.

JON SNOW: You’re in my camp. I’m the commander.

MELISANDRE: I serve the Lord of Light. I do what he commands.

JON SNOW: How do you know what he commands?

MELISANDRE: I interpret his signs as well as I can. If the Lord didn’t want me to bring you back, how did I bring you back? I have no power. Only what he gives me and he gave me you.

JON SNOW: Why?

MELISANDRE: I don’t know. Maybe you’re only needed for this small part of his plan and nothing else. Maybe he brought you here to die again.

JON SNOW: What kind of god would do something like that?

MELISANDRE: The one we’ve got.

JON SNOW stares into the fire pit and then exits.

CUT TO: STARK ENCAMPMENT - OUTSKIRTS

DAVOS is walking alone through the snow. He happens upon a pile of wooden rubble and stops to inspect it. He sees a charred statuette of a stag in the wood and stops to pick it up. He looks back at the pile of wood. A horn blows in the distance. DAVOS looks in the direction of the horn, then hands his head.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID THRONE ROOM
DAENERYS is sitting on the throne. TYRION stands beside her. They are attending to THEON and YARA, who are standing on the steps in front of them.

TYRION (to THEON): Last time we saw each other was at Winterfell, yes? You were making jokes about my height, I seem to recall. Everyone who makes a joke about a dwarf’s height thinks he’s the only person ever to make a joke about a dwarf’s height. “The height of nobility,” “a man of your stature,” “someone to look up to.” You’re all making the same five or six jokes.

THEON: It was a long time ago.

TYRION: It was. And how have things been going for you since then? Not so well, I gather. Can’t imagine you would have murdered the Stark boys if things had been going well.

THEON: I didn’t murder the Stark boys. But I did things that were just as bad or worse.

YARA: And he paid for them.

TYRION: Doesn’t seem like it. He’s still alive. It was complicated for you, I’m sure, growing up at Winterfell. Never quite knowing who you were. But then, we all live complicated lives, don’t we?

DAENERYS: You’ve brought us 100 ships from the Iron Fleet with men to sail them. In return, I expect you want me to support your claim to the throne of the Iron Islands?

THEON: Not my claim. Hers.

DAENERYS: And what’s wrong with you?

THEON: I’m not fit to rule.

TYRION: We can agree upon that at least.

DAENERYS: Has the Iron Islands ever had a queen before?

YARA: No more than Westeros.

DAENERYS smiles.

THEON: Our Uncle Euron returned home after a long absence. He murdered our father and took the Salt Throne from yara. He would have murdered us if we had stayed.

DAENERYS: Lord Tyrion tells me your father was a terrible king.

YARA: You and I have that in common.

DAENERYS: We do. And both murdered by a usurper as well.

DAENERYS turns to TYRION.

DAENERYS: Will their ships be enough?

TYRION: With the former Masters’ fleet, possibly. Barely. There are more than 100 ships in the Iron Fleet.

THEON: There are and Euron is building more. He’s going to offer them to you.

DAENERYS: So why shouldn’t I wait for him?

THEON: The Iron Fleet isn’t all he’s bringing. He also wants to give you --

YARA: His big cock, I think he said. Euron’s offer is also an offer of marriage, you see. You won’t get one without the other.

DAENERYS: And I imagine your offer is free of any marriage demands?

YARA: I never demand, but I’m up for anything, really.

THEON: He murdered our father and would have murdered us. He’ll murder you as soon as you have what he wants.

TYRION: The Seven Kingdoms.

THEON: All of them.

DAENERYS: And you don’t want the Seven Kingdoms?

THEON: Your ancestors defeated ours and took the Iron Islands. We ask you to give them back.

DAENERYS: And that’s all?

YARA: We’d like you to help us murder an uncle or two who don’t think a woman’s fit to rule.

DAENERYS: Reasonable.

TYRION: What if everyone starts demanding their independence?

DAENERYS: She’s not demanding, she’s asking. The others are free to ask as well. Our father were evil men, all of us here. They left the world worse than they found it. We’re not going to do that. We’re going to leave the world better than we found it.

DAENERYS stands and approaches YARA.

DAENERYS: You will support my claim as queen of the Seven Kingdoms and respect the integrity of the Seven Kingdoms. No more reaving, roving, raiding, or raping.

YARA: That’s our way of life.

DAENERYS: No more.

YARA and THEON look at each other. THEON nods. YARA turns back to DAENERYS.

YARA: No more.

YARA extends her hand to DAENERYS. DAENERYS looks back at TYRION. TYRION makes a shaking motion with his hand. DAENERYS and YARA grab each other’s arms.

EXT. WINTERFELL - OUTSKIRTS
The Stark and Bolton armies sit across the battlefield from one another. DAVOS sits on horseback among the ranks of the Stark army. JON SNOW rides his own horse through the ranks, looking at the men. He rides up next to TORMUND and WUN WUN, at the front of the line. Across the battlefield, X-shaped pyres resembling the sigil of House Bolton are burning. Attached to each of them is the body of a flayed man, strapped upside down. RAMSAY rides through the ranks of the Bolton army on horseback with a rope in his hand. RAMSAY reaches the front of the line and dismounts. The rope is revealed to be tied around RICKON’s hands. RAMSAY ushers RICKON a little further out past the front line and stares at JON SNOW across the field. He unsheathes a dagger and raises it in the air. JON SNOW dismounts and walks a few paces out into the field. RAMSAY lowers the dagger and cuts RICKON’s bindings.

RAMSAY: Do you like games, little man? Let’s play a game. Run to your brother. The sooner you make it to him, the sooner you get to see him. That’s it. That’s the game. Easy. Ready? Go.

RICKON starts walking out into the field, then looks back at RAMSAY.

RAMSAY: No, you have to run, remember? Those are the rules.

A soldier approaches and hands RAMSAY his bow. RICKON starts running across the field. RAMSAY draws an arrow from his quiver. JON SNOW jumps on his horse and begins galloping across the field towards RICKON. RAMSAY notches an arrow and fires. The arrow lands in the ground next to RICKON. RAMSAY fires another arrow. It lands on the ground next to RICKON. JON SNOW and RICKON are getting closer. JON SNOW extends his hand out to RICKON. RAMSAY shoots another arrow. It misses. JON SNOW and RICKON are feet away from each other. An arrow pierces through RICKON’s chest from behind. RICKON falls to the ground. JON comes to a halt beside him and looks down at him. RICKON gasps and then dies. JON SNOW looks up at RAMSAY.

TORMUND (to himself): Don’t.

RAMSAY smiles and gives his bow back to the soldier.

DAVOS: Prepare to charge! Prepare to charge!

The Bolton archers draw and loose a volley of arrows. JON SNOW ushers his horse into a gallop straight towards the Bolton army.

DAVOS: Go! Go! Follow your commander!

TORMUND: Run and fight!

WUN WUN roars. The bulk of the Stark forces charge across the field towards the Boltons. JON SNOW continues to rush the Bolton forces alone. The Bolton arches released a volley of arrows, some of which land in the body of JON SNOW’s horse, causing him and his horse to tumble to the ground.

RAMSAY: Now.

KARSTARK: Cavalry, charge!

JON SNOW stands to face the Bolton cavalry, charging at him. He takes off his sword belt and draws his sword. The cavalry approaches. Just before it’s upon him, the Stark forces rush past JON SNOW and collide with the Bolton charge. Men on both sides die in the frenzy. Bodies and weaponry fly everywhere. Archers on both sides of the battlefield nock arrows and draw their bows.

DAVOS: We’ll just kill our own men. Stand down.

The Stark arches do not fire.

RAMSAY: Loose!

The Bolton archers fire. Their arrows rain down on Stark and Bolton men alike. In the fray, JON SNOW dodges several horses which gallop past him. One Bolton cavalryman charges with his horse, but JON SNOW cuts him down. JON SNOW rushes forward and kills a man on the ground, then slices the belly of a second man. A volley of arrows rains down around JON SNOW. He ducks. None of the arrows hit him. He returns to his feet and cuts down another man, dodges the strike of a passing Bolton cavalryman, and runs through another Bolton footsoldier. A Stark footsoldier helps him finish the Bolton man, and JON SNOW grabs him by the shirt.

JON SNOW: Get word --

The Stark footsoldier is taken in the head by an arrow. JON SNOW stares down at the man and then flies into a rage, killing two more Bolton soldiers. A third man runs at him but is knocked down by a galloping horse. JON SNOW runs over to where he landed and stabs him several times. A horseman gallops at JON SNOW with his ax ready, but a passing Stark cavalryman spears him. Another Bolton footsoldier approaches JON SNOW, but JON SNOW cuts him down. The bodies are beginning to pile up on the battlefield. RAMSAY’s archers loose several more volleys. JON SNOW goes into a frenzy, killing many Bolton men. The bodies have piled up high enough to create small mountains of bodies. Men continue to fight atop and around them.

DAVOS: We may as well be taking shits back here.

DAVOS dismounts his horse.

DAVOS: Follow!

DAVOS unsheathes his sword and charges across the field. The remainder of the Stark forces charge after him. On the other side of the battlefield, RAMSAY smiles and acknowledges SMALLJON.

RAMSAY: It’s time, go.

SMALLJON brandishes his sword and walks back and forth in front of his men.

SMALLJON: Who owns the North?

ALL: We do!

SMALLJON: Who owns the North?

ALL: We do!

SMALLJON: Show me!

SMALLJON and his men cheer and charge across the battlefield. JON SNOW continues fighting, but is knocked to the ground by a Bolton footsoldier. TORMUND appears and stabs the footsoldier through the back, then helps JON SNOW to his feet.

TORMUND: Hey!


WUN WUN and the Wildlings charge up behind TORMUND and JON SNOW. SMALLJON and his men are charging from the other side. WUN WUN points at them and grunts. A force of Bolton men appear bearing tall shields and spears. They create a half-circle around JON SNOW, TORMUND, DAVOS, WUN WUN, and the entire Stark forces. The other half of the circle is blocked by the piles of bodies on the battlefield. The shield soldiers set their shields firmly in the dirt, then point their spears inward towards the Stark forces.

MAN: Infantry, advance!

The shield soldiers grunt in unison, lift their shields, and move in towards the Stark forces. With each wave of movement, they stab more and more Stark soldiers with their spears. One Stark soldier tries to climb up over the piles of bodies but gets cut down by SMALLJON. SMALLJON and his men charge down over the bodies, taking the Stark forces from the rear.

DAVOS: With me, lads! Break their line!

WUN WUN rushes the shield wall and swipes at the spears. TORMUND jumps to the side of some spears and attacks a man behind the shield wall. Several other Stark men rush towards the shield wall. JON SNOW and other Stark soldiers defend against SMALLJON’s men. Many soldiers die on both sides, and the bodies begin to pile up again. WUN WUN rips a man in half. TORMUND pulls a shieldbearer down and kills him, but gets sliced across the arm and is fored to fall back among the Stark ranks.

MAN: Tormund!

MAN #2: Get him back!

The shieldbearers advance, pushing the Stark forces further in on themselves. More Stark men die.

TORMUND: Fuck this, come on!

TORMUND leads the Wildlings back towards the piles of bodies. JON SNOW and SMALLJON spot each other, but before they can engage, the Wildling charge overtakes them. In the fray, JON SNOW is pushes to the bottom of several bodies and starts getting crushed. He struggles to get out, but can’t get a hold. TORMUND faces off against SMALLJON. TORMUND punches SMALLJON in the face, and SMALLJON responds with an overhead swing of his sword. TORMUND blocks it. More and more bodies are piling on top of JON SNOW. He can see glimpses of clashes and flailing limbs above, but nothing else. He gasps for air. SMALLJON knocks TORMUND to the ground and punches him in the face multiple times. Men are dying all around JON SNOW as he is being trampled. JON SNOW grabs onto the clothes of a standing men and hoists himself up. He emerges in the center of a tightly packed group of his men and fills his lungs with air. He spots WUN WUN fighting off some shieldbearers. WUN WUN is stabbed in the side, grunts, and pulls the spear out. SMALLJON repeatedly headbutts TORMUND in the face. DAVOS and JON SNOW look at each other. A horn begins to sound in the distance. SMALLJON stops headbutting TORMUND. TORMUND seizes the opportunity and tears into the skin of SMALLJON’s neck with his teeth, then draws a small knife and stabs SMALLJON repeatedly. RAMSAY looks in the direction of the sounding horn. A force of cavalry appears across the battlefield carrying flags bearing the white falcon sigil of House Arryn. SANSA and PETYR BAELISH sit on horseback beside the charging Arryn cavalry. TORMUND kills SMALLJON and screams. The Arryn cavalry takes the Bolton shieldbearers from the rear, then circles around and knocks them all down. SANSA smiles. JON SNOW climbs up to the top of the piles of bodies and spots RAMSAY on his horse. WUN WUN and TORMUND climb up beside JON SNOW. RAMSAY sees JON SNOW, turns his horse around, and rides back towards Winterfell. JON SNOW, TORMUND, and WUN WUN chase after him. SANSA watches them go.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - COURTYARD

RAMSAY and several Bolton soldiers enter the courtyard through Winterfell’s main gate. Some men close and bar the gate behind them and they dismount.

RAMSAY: Their army’s gone.

MAN: Our army’s gone.

RAMSAY: We have Winterfell. They don’t have the men for a siege. All we have to do is wait.

Something thuds against the gate. RAMSAY turns to look at it. Several Bolton archers nock arrows. Several more thuds occur against the other side of the gate. WUN WUN busts a hole in the gate. BOLTON archers shoot arrows at his hand and down at his body over the side of the castle wall. WUN WUN roars and punches another hole in the gate. RAMSAY moves farther away from the gate’s interior. WUN WUN reaches in and grabs the wooden bar holding the gate, but a Bolton soldier throws a spear through the back of his hand. WUN WUN rips his hand away and then bursts through the gate, opening it. He sprints into the courtyard, then falls to his knees. The Bolton archers continue shooting arrows into him. He roars. Stark soldiers flood the courtyard and beginning killing the Bolton soldiers, quickly overtaking them. JON SNOW enters the courtyard and runs up beside WUN WUN. They look at each other. TORMUND runs up beside WUN WUN, on his other side. JON SNOW reaches out to WUN WUN, but RAMSAY shoots WUN WUN in the eye with an arrow, killing him.

RAMSAY (to JON SNOW): You suggested one on one combat, didn’t you?

Stark archers aim their bows at RAMSAY.

RAMSAY: I’ve reconsidered. I think that sounds like a wonderful idea.

RAMSAY notches an arrow. JON SNOW drops his sword and picks up a shield. RAMSAY aims at JON SNOW and fires. JON SNOW raises his shield and blocks the arrow. JON SNOW advances. RAMSAY nocks another arrow and fires. JON SNOW raises his shield and blocks the arrow. JON SNOW advances. RAMSAY nocks a third arrow and fires. JON SNOW raises his shield and blocks the arrow. JON SNOW advances. Before RAMSAY can nock a fourth arrow, JON SNOW overtakes him. JON SNOW bashes RAMSAY with his shield twice, knocking him over. JON SNOW drops his shield and jumps on top of RAMSAY, then punches him in the raise over and over. RAMSAY’s faces becomes mangled and bleeds. SANSA enters the courtyard. JON SNOW sees her and stops punching RAMSAY. He stands and walks away. The Bolton flags fall away from the walls of Winterfell and are replaced by Stark flags. MELISANDRE watches from a balcony. DAVOS, holding the charred stag statuette, stares up at her. Some Stark men carry RICKON’s body into the courtyard on a stretcher and stop in front of JON SNOW, TORMUND, and SANSA.

JON SNOW: We’re going to bury my brother in the crypt next to my father.

The stretcher men continue on. JON SNOW turns to walk away.

SANSA: Jon.

JON SNOW turns back to face SANSA.

SANSA: Where is he?

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - KENNELS

RAMSAY is tied to a chair inside the kennel gates. He is mangled and bleeding. He groans and coughs, then raises his head to see SANSA standing outside the gate.

RAMSAY: Ah. Sansa. Hello, Sansa. Is this where I’ll be staying now? No. Our time together is about to come to an end. That’s all right. You can’t kill me. I’m part of you now.

SANSA: Your words will disappear. Your house will disappear. Your name will disappear. All memory of you will disappear.

The dogs growl in their cells and begin filtering out into the kennel.

RAMSAY: My hounds will never harm me.

SANSA: You haven’t fed them in seven days. You said it yourself.

RAMSAY: They’re loyal beasts.

SANSA: They were. Now they’re starving.

The dogs growl. One approaches RAMSAY from the front and puts its front paws up on his legs. It sniffs RAMSAY’s face.

RAMSAY: Sit. Down! Down! Down! Down! Down!

The dog bites RAMSAY’s face. RAMSAY screams. The dogs converge on RAMSAY and begin tearing him apart. SANSA turns as though she might leave, but lingers for a moment to watch. SANSA turns and walks away, then s
INT. GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

THREE-EYED RAVEN is tangled in the roots of the great weirwood. His eyes are pure white. BRAN is lying below the tangle, gripping a single root. His eyes are also pure white.
CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

YOUNG NED and YOUNG BENJEN are sparring with wooden swords in the commons. BRAN and THREE-EYED RAVEN are standing on a balcony above the courtyard, watching. YOUNG NED knocks YOUNG BENJEN to the ground.

YOUNG RODRIK: Give him another go, Ned.

YOUNG NED helps YOUNG BENJEN to his feet.

BRAN (to THREE-EYED RAVEN): That’s my father. And my Uncle Benjen.

YOUNG NED (to YOUNG BENJEN): Keep your shield up or I’ll ring your head like a bell.

YOUNG NED and YOUNG BENJEN begin sparring again. BRAN looks around the commons at the citizens of Winterfell going about their business.

BRAN: They were all so happy.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: So were you once.

YOUNG LYANNA rides into the courtyard on a horse. She circles around YOUNG NED and YOUNG BENJEN.

YOUNG NED: Stop showing off.

YOUNG BENJEN: Lyanna!

BRAN: My Aunt Lyanna. I’ve seen her statue in the crypt. My father never talked about her.

Closeup on THREE-EYED RAVEN. He turns to look at BRAN, but BRAN has already walked away. BRAN walks closer to the group. YOUNG LYANNA is being helped off her horse by YOUNG HODOR.

YOUNG BENJEN: Would you get out of here? We’re sparring.

YOUNG LYANNA: Who are you gonna spar with when Ned goes off to the Eyrie?

YOUNG BENJEN: I don’t know.

YOUNG LYANNA turns and looks at YOUNG HODOR.

YOUNG LYANNA: What about him?

YOUNG NED: Wylis, come here.

BRAN turns to look at YOUNG HODOR. THREE-EYED RAVEN reaches BRAN’s side.

BRAN: Hodor?

YOUNG LYANNA walks over to YOUNG HODOR with a wooden sword and shield.

YOUNG BENJEN: But he’s got giant’s blood.

YOUNG NED: And you’ve got training. Sounds like a fair match to me.

YOUNG LYANNA: Benjen always lifts his chin when he’s about to charge.

YOUNG HODOR takes the sword and shield.

YOUNG HODOR: And lowers it when he’s going to dodge, my lady.

BRAN: Hodor talks?

YOUNG HODOR walks over to YOUNG BENJEN. They both ready to commence sparring, but stop when NAN appears.

NAN: You leave the fighting to the little lords, Wylis. Come along, now. It’s no place for you.

NAN takes YOUNG HODOR by the ear and leads him away.

YOUNG NED: Oh, Nan, look at the size of him. If he ever learned to fight, he’d be unstoppable.

NAN: Well, he’s never going to learn to fight because he’s a stable boy. So leave him be.

THREE-EYED RAVEN (to BRAN): It is time to go.

BRAN: Please, a little longer.

THREE-EYED RAVEN touches BRAN on the shoulder.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

BRAN is released from the vision. He gasps, then lets go of the root. The white fades from his eyes. A CHILD OF THE FOREST is sitting nearby, staring at him. He props himself up on his wrists and looks at THREE-EYED RAVEN.

BRAN: You finally show me something I care about and then you drag me away.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: It is beautiful beneath the sea, but if you stay too long, you’ll drown.

BRAN: I wasn’t drowning. I was home.

CHILD OF THE FOREST and THREE-EYED RAVEN exchange a glance. BRAN turns to HODOR, who is sitting with his back against a wall.

BRAN: Wylis.

HODOR: Hodor.

BRAN: I saw you as a boy. You could talk. What happened?

HODOR: Hodor.

BRAN: Where’s Meera?

HODOR: Hodor.

HODOR carries BRAN outside and sets him down in the snow. MEERA is sitting in the snow at the base of the great weirwood, staring out at the tundra.

BRAN: You shouldn’t be here. It’s not safe outside the cave.

MEERA: It’s not safe anywhere.

BRAN: I saw that Hodor wasn’t always Hodor.

HODOR: Hodor.

BRAN: His real name is Wylis. And he could talk and fight and -- and then --

MEERA turns and looks at BRAN.

BRAN: What’s wrong?

MEERA casts her eyes down and looks away.

BRAN: The Three-Eyed Raven says there’s a war coming.

MEERA: And we’re going to fight it in there.

MEERA scoffs and turns away. HODOR picks BRAN up and carries him back inside. A side view of MEERA reveals the same CHILD OF THE FOREST who was watching BRAN, sitting among some stones and frozen shrubbery..

CHILD OF THE FOREST: Brandon Stark needs you.

MEERA: For what? I sit in there and I watch him have his visions and nothing ever happens.

CHILD OF THE FOREST: He isn’t going to stay there forever. And out there he needs you.
EXT. CASTLE BLACK COURTYARD - NIGHT
The Night’s Watch members allied to ALLISER THORNE are poised with crossbows pointed at the room DAVOS and the other Night’s Watch members faithful to JON SNOW are in. ALLISER THORNE is outside the door to the room, accompanied by several others who are loyal to him. Inside the room, JON SNOW’s body remains on the table. DAVOS, the faithfuls, and GHOST are all standing.

ALLISER THORNE: It’s time, Ser Davos. Open the door and the men inside can rejoin their brothers in peace. We’ll even set the wolf free north of the Wall where it belongs. Nobody needs to die tonight.

DAVOS turns to address the Night’s Watch faithfuls.

DAVOS: I’ve never been much of a fighter.

DAVOS walks over to Longclaw, JON SNOW’s sword, and picks it up.

DAVOS: Apologies for what you’re about to see.

DAVOS unsheathes Longclaw. The faithfuls follow suit, drawing their own blades.ALLISER THORNE turns to address a Night’s Watchman.

ALLISER THORNE: Come on.

The Night’s Watchman lifts and large hammer and walks over to the door. He begins slamming the hammer against the door repeatedly. GHOST begins to growl and bark. DAVOS and company ready themselves for battle. After a number of swings, the Night’s Watchman with the hammer breaks a hole in the door. A loud thudding can be heard somewhere behind ALLISER THORNE and company. They turn to see what the noise is. The thudding is coming from one of the courtyard’s main gates. WUN WUN breaks down the gate and the Wildlings led by TORMUND and DOLOROUS EDD rush into the courtyard. The Night’s Watch loyal to ALLISER THORNE have bows drawn at the Wildlings but do not fire. They back up slowly.

ALLISER THORNE: Attack!

ALLISER THORNE draws his sword. A Night’s Watchman charged TORMUND. TORMUND cuts him down. The other Night’s Watch members do not retaliate.

ALLISER THORNE: Fight, you cowards!

A Night’s Watchman on a balcony shoots WUN WUN in the shoulder with a crossbow bolt. WUN WUN turns to face the man, then grabs him by the legs, slams him against a wall, and tosses his body to the ground in front of ALLISER THORNE. The Night’s Watch members allied to ALLISER THORNE begin dropping their weaponry. TORMUND and DOLOROUS EDD approach ALLISER THORNE, swords drawn.

ALLISER THORNE (to DOLOROUS EDD): You fucking traitor.

DOLOROUS EDD: The only traitors here are the ones who shoved their knives into their Lord Commander’s heart.

ALLISER THORNE: For thousands of years the Night’s Watch has held Castle Black against the Wildlings.

TORMUND: Until you.

OLLY shouts and charges at TORMUND with his sword. TORMUND grabs OLLY and disarms him, then tosses him to another man who restrains him. Two men take ALLISER THORNE by the arms.

DOLOROUS EDD: Throw them into the cells where they belong.

The men drag ALLISER THORNE, OLLY, and the Night’s Watch betrayers away. TORMUND, DOLOROUS EDD, and DAVOS enter the room where JON SNOW’s body is. They stare down at him and his wounds.

TORMUND: Took a lot of knives. I’ll have my men get the wood for a fire. Bodies to burn.

EXT. KING’S LANDING COMMONS - DAY
Many male commoners are gathered together at a place for eating. They are all watching one commoner man tell a story.

STORYTELLER: Right, so there she is, high and mighty Queen Cersei, tits and ass jiggling in the breeze.

The commoners laugh.

STORYTELLER: All of a sudden she looks my way. Gives me a little smile like, “Well?” So, all right, you know, I’ve never been shy and I’m blessed down south, so I put it right out. She’s never seen anything like it. I mean, she’s used to her brother, and from what I hear, Jaime Lannister’s half an inch shy of an inch. She sees it and I swear to the gods she licks her lips. Well, you all know me. You know I wouldn’t lie about this.

The STORYTELLER walks into a dark alleyway to relieve himself. He is drunk. GREGOR walks up behind him. The STORYTELLER looks up at GREGOR. GREGOR bounces his head off the wall, killing him, then walks away.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER

CERSEI is standing in the center of the room,. She pulls a loose thread from the sleeve of her dress and examines it. GREGOR enters. CERSEI walks past him and exits her chamber. GREGOR follows. When they reach the bottom of the steps, they are confronted by a group of the king’s soldiers.

CERSEI: Get out of my way.

KING’S SOLDIER: King’s orders, Your Grace.

CERSEI: What are the king’s orders?

KING’S SOLDIER: He would like you to remain in the Red Keep, Your Grace, for your own protection.

CERSEI: You’re barring me from attending my own daughter’s funeral?

KING’S SOLDIER: Forgive me, Your Grace, by the king’s command, I cannot let you pass.

CERSEI: I would like to speak to my son.

KING’S SOLDIER: He has left the Red Keep, Your Grace.

GREGOR grabs the hilt of his sword. The king’s soldiers also take hold of their weapons. GREGOR looks at CERSEI. CERSEI turns and walks back up the stairs. GREGOR follows.

CUT TO: KING'S LANDING - GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR

TOMMEN and JAIME are standing beside the body of MYRCELLA. She has funeral stones over her eyes, with painted eyes on them.

TOMMEN: She grew up.

JAIME: Almost.

TOMMEN: Have we caught Prince Trystane’s killers? I expect it was Mother.

JAIME: Your mother wouldn’t do that.

TOMMEN: Yes, she would.

JAIME: Are you angry with her?

TOMMEN: Of course not.

JAIME: Then why didn’t you let her come? She has every right to be here.

TOMMEN: They told me she wouldn’t be allowed in the sept. If she had tried --

JAIME: They’re not putting your mother in a cell ever again. Not while I’m here. Why haven’t you gone to see her? Everything she endured, she did it for you.

TOMMEN: Don’t you think I know that? I’m sorry. But I can’t.

JAIME: Why not?

TOMMEN: When the Faith Militant seized her and Margaery, what did I do? When they paraded her through the streets like a whore, what did I do?

JAIME: We all fail sometimes.

TOMMEN: The king is supposed to be the Protector of the Realm. If I can’t even protect my own wife or my own mother, what good am I?

The HIGH SPARROW enters the sept. JAIME takes TOMMEN by the shoulder.

JAIME: Go and see your mother and ask her to forgive you.

JAIME and TOMMEN to address the HIGH SPARROW.

HIGH SPARROW: Your Grace. Lord Commander.

TOMMEN: I want to see my wife.

HIGH SPARROW: The gods wait for Queen Margaery to confess her crimes and seek their mercy. The king must wait as well.

JAIME: Go and see your mother, Tommen.

TOMMEN exits.

JAIME: You’re a bold man.

HIGH SPARROW: On the contrary. I fear a great deal. The Father, the Mother, the Warrior.

The HIGH SPARROW approaches MYRCELLA’s body.

HIGH SPARROW: Do you know why we use these stones? To remind us not to fear death. We close our eyes on this world and open them on the next.

JAIME: You must long for the next life.

HIGH SPARROW: In truth, I fear that, too.

JAIME: You imprisoned and humiliated my sister.

HIGH SPARROW: Your sister sought the gods’ mercy and atoned for her sin.

JAIME: What about my sins?

JAIME approaches the HIGH SPARROW.

JAIME: I broke a sacred oath and stabbed my king in the back. I killed my own cousin. When the gods judged my brother guilty, I helped him escape their justice. What atonement do I deserve?

JAIME grips the hilt of his dagger and partially draws it.

HIGH SPARROW: You would spill blood in this holy place?

JAIME: Oh, the gods won’t mind. They’ve spilled more blood than the rest of us combined.

HIGH SPARROW: Go on, then. I deserve it. We all do. We are weak, vain creatures. We live only by the Mother’s mercy.

A great number of the Faith Militant encircle JAIME and the HIGH SPARROW on the steps of the sept.

JAIME: They should be closer if you mean for them to save you.

HIGH SPARROW: I don’t. They’d never reach me before you struck.

JAIME: I’ve fought against worse odds.

HIGH SPARROW: No doubt many of us would fall. But who are we, hmm? We have no names, no family. Every one of us is poor and powerless. And yet together, we can overthrow an empire.

The HIGH SPARROW walks slowly away from JAIME.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - CERSEI’S CHAMBER

CERSEI is looking over the balcony at King’s Landing. TOMMEN enters her chamber.

TOMMEN: Mother.

CERSEI walks in from the balcony.

CERSEI: Did they put her in the red gown or the gold?

TOMMEN: Gold.

CERSEI: Good. It was always her color.

CERSEI walks over to a side table and drinks a sip of wine. Her back is facing TOMMEN.

TOMMEN: I’m sorry for keeping you here. I shouldn’t have, but I was -- I didn’t want to lose you again.

CERSEI: I understand. I’m glad to see you.

TOMMEN: I know I should have come sooner. I wanted to. I was wrong.

CERSEI: It’s all right.

TOMMEN: No, it isn’t.

CERSEI turns to face TOMMEN.

TOMMEN: I should have executed all of them. I should have pulled down the sept onto the High Sparrow’s head before I let them do that to you, as you would have for me. You raised me to be strong...and I wasn’t. But I want to be. Help me.

CERSEI: Always.

CERSEI and TOMMEN embrace.

EXT. MEEREEN GREAT PYRAMID - NIGHT
The golden statue previously knocked from the top of the pyramid lies in the sand at the foot of the pyramid.

CUT TO: GREAT PYRAMID - ROYAL CHAMBERS

TYRION, VARYS, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM are gathered together in council. TYRION pours himself a glass of wine. VARYS tsks at him.

TYRION: If I lost my cock, I’d drink all the time.

TYRION looks at GREY WORM.

TYRION: Meaning no offense. He makes dwarf jokes, I make eunuch jokes.

VARYS: I do not make dwarf jokes.

TYRION: You think them.

VARYS sighs.

VARYS: So, the fleet. It’s been burned.

GREY WORM: We are searching for the men who burned the ships, but nobody saw anything.

TYRION: Surely there’s some good news lurking somewhere.

VARYS: Astapor and Yunkai have stopped asking us for aid.

TYRION: Perhaps they can tell us their secret.

VARYS: The Masters have retaken both cities. Outside of Meereen, the whole of Slaver’s Bay has returned to the slavers.

TYRION: What about the dragons? We have two of them here beneath the pyramid.

MISSANDEI: They are not eating. They haven’t touched any food since Queen Daenerys left.

TYRION: Daenerys is the dragon queen. Can’t very well let the dragons starve, that’s obvious.

GREY WORM: If a dragon does not want to eat, how do you force him to eat?

TYRION: Dragons do not do well in captivity.

MISSANDEI: How do you know this?

TYRION: That’s what I do. I drink and I know things.

TYRION finishes his glass of wine and walks over to the pitcher to pour himself another glass.

TYRION: The dragons Aegon used to conquer Westeros ranged over hundreds of miles. Then Daenerys’s ancestors started chaining them up in pens. A few generations later, the last dragons were no larger than cats. They must be unchained or they’ll waste away. Missandei, how many times were you in the company of these dragons?

MISSANDEI: Many times.

TYRION: And did they ever harm you?

MISSANDEI: Never.

TYRION: Dragons are intelligent. More intelligent than men according to some maesters. They have affection for their friends and fury for their enemies. I am their friend.

VARYS: Do they know that?

TYRION: They will. It’s time they had their supper.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - CATACOMBS

TYRION and VARYS enter the dragons’ holding chamber bearing torches. TYRION begins walking slowly down the steps. VARYS remains at the top. When TYRION reaches the floor, he pauses and stares into the darkness. Faint growling can be heard. TYRION stops and looks back at VARYS momentarily. RHAEGAL and VISERION emerge from the shadows. VISERION lights a fire in his mouth and roars at TYRION. RHAEGAL approaches with a small roar.

TYRION (to RHAEGAL): I’m friends with your mother. I’m here to help. Don’t eat the help.

TYRION chuckles nervously. RHAEGAL growls at TYRION. TYRION approaches cautiously.

TYRION: When I was a child an uncle asked what gift I wanted for my name day. I begged him for one of you. “It wouldn’t even have to be a big dragon,” I told him. “It could be little, like me.”

TYRION sets down his torch and gets closer to RHAEGAL.

TYRION: Everyone laughed like it was the funniest thing they had ever heard. Then my father told me the last dragon had died a century ago. I cried myself to sleep that night.

TYRION touches RHAEGAL on the neck.

TYRION: But here you are.

TYRION takes hold of the piston keeping RHAEGAL’s shackle closed and pulls it free. The shackle falls the ground. TYRION turns around to see VISERION growling at him. VISERION exposes his neck to TYRION. TYRION approaches and releases the piston from VISERION’s shackle. RHAEGAL and VISERION return to the shadows. TYRION picks up his torch and hurries up the steps.

TYRION: Next time I have an idea like that, punch me in the face.

EXT. BRAAVOS COMMONS - DAY

ARYA is sitting on the ground against the wall of a street. The WAIF appears, staff in hand.

WAIF: What’s your name?

ARYA grabs her staff and rushes to her feet. The WAIF smacks ARYA in the face, drawing blood. ARYA approaches the sound of the WAIF’s voice, but the WAIF has already moved to the side.

WAIF: What’s your name?

ARYA: No one.

WAIF: I don’t believe that.

ARYA swings her staff at the WAIF, but misses. The WAIF hits ARYA in the side.

WAIF: You don’t believe that.

ARYA swings her staff at the WAIF again, but misses again. The WAIF hits ARYAoin the other side. ARYA rushes towards the WAIF and trips on some steps, falling to the ground. She grabs her staff and stands back up. The WAIF hits ARYA three more times, knocking her to the ground on the third. ARYA stands up and swings at the WAIF again, and misses for a third time. The WAIF hits ARYA in the face, knocking her to the ground again. ARYA is panting heavily. She returns to her feet, screams, and swings her staff around her many times. The WAIF has disappeared. The Faceless Man, taking on the visage of JAQEN H’GHAR, catches ARYA’s staff mid-swing.

JAQEN: Who are you?

ARYA: No one.

JAQEN: If a girl says her name, a man will let her sleep under a roof tonight.

ARYA: A girl has no name.

JAQEN: If a girl says her name, a man will feed her tonight.

ARYA: A girl has no name.

JAQEN: If a girl says her name, a man will give her eyes back.

ARYA: A girl has no name.

JAQEN releases ARYA’s staff.

JAQEN: Come.

ARYA turns around and walks to her beggar basket.

JAQEN: Leave it. A girl is not a beggar anymore.

ARYA follows JAQEN.

INT. WINTERFELL - DINING HALL

ROOSE, RAMSAY, and LORD KARSTARK are gathered at the dining table, talking. RAMSAY and LORD KARSTARK are standing, while ROOSE remains seated at the head of the table.

LORD KARSTARK: He came upon the bodies on our way here.

ROOSE: Half a dozen men? Your best hunters?

RAMSAY: They obviously had help.

ROOSE: I didn’t think lady Sansa killed them all by herself. Thank you for this report, Lord Kastark.

RAMSAY: We know where she’s going. Her brother’s at Castle Black.

LORD KARSTARK: Ned Stark’s last surviving son?

ROOSE: Jon Snow is a bastard, not a Stark.

RAMSAY: So was I, Father.

LORD KARSTARK: Your hold on the North will never be secure as long as a Stark can walk through that door.

RAMSAY: Castle Black isn’t defended on the southern side. And the few men left are barely men at all. Farm boys and thieves. With a small force we could storm the castle, kill Jon Snow --

ROOSE: Murder the Lord Commander of the Night’s Watch? You’d unite every house in the North against us.

RAMSAY: We don’t need every house in the North. The Umbers, the Manderlys, and the Karstarks. command more soldiers than all the other houses combined. With their support, none could challenge us.

LORD KARSTARK: The Starks lost my house the day King Rob cut off my father’s head. It’s time for new blood in the North.

ROOSE looks at both his son and lord Karstark. He gets up and stands in front of them.

ROOSE: If you acquire a reputation as a mad dog, you’ll be treated as a mad dog. Taken out back and slaughtered for pig feed.

MAESTER WOLKAN enters and interrupts them.

MAESTER WOLKAN: My lords. Lady Walda has given birth. A boy. Red-cheeked and healthy.

LORD KARSTARK: My congratulations, Lord Bolton.

RAMSAY steps towards his father. They hug.

RAMSEY: Congratulations, Father. I look forward to meeting my new brother.

ROOSE puts his hand on RAMSAY’s shoulder.

ROOSE: You’ll always be my firstborn.

RAMSAY: Thank you for saying that. It means a great deal to me.

RAMSAY stabs ROOSE in the gut with a knife. ROOSE falls to the ground. ROOSE dies. RAMSAY steps away from ROOSE and cleans his knife.

RAMSAY: Maester Wolkan, send ravens to all the Northern houses. Roose Bolton is dead. Poisoned by our enemies.

MAESTER WOLKAN does not respond.

RAMSAY: How did he die?

MAESTER WOLKAN: Poisoned by his enemies.

LORD KARSTARK: You're talking to your lord. Use respect.

MAESTER WOLKAN: Forgive me, my lord.

RAMSAY: Send for Lady Walda and the baby.

MAESTER WOLKAN: She’s resting, my lord.

RAMSAY glares at MAESTER WOLKAN.

MAESTER WOLKAN: At once, my lord.

RAMSAY looks down at ROOSE's body.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - COMMONS

RAMSAY is standing alone. LADY WALDA walks to RAMSAY carrying her newborn son.

RAMSAY: There he is.

LADY WALDA: Isn’t he wonderful?

LADY WALDA shows RAMSAY her son.

RAMSEY: May I hold him?

LADY WALDA: Of course.

RAMSAY takes the baby.

RAMSAY: Little brother.

LADY WALDA: Lord Bolton sent for us. Have you seen him?

LADY WALDA reaches for the baby. RAMSAY hands the baby to her.

RAMSAY: Of course. Follow me, Mother.

RAMSAY and LADY WALDA walk to the kennel and enter. RAMSAY opens the gate. The dogs bark. RAMSAY closes the gate and locks it. LADY WALDA looks around.

LADY WALDA: Where is Lord Bolton?

The dogs bark even louder.

RAMSAY (to the dogs): Down!

The baby starts crying. LADY WALDA tries to soothe the baby.

LADY WALDA: It’s all right. Come on, shh.

RAMSAY opens the door of a kennel.

LADY WALDA: It’s cold out here, Ramsay. I need to feed him.

RAMSAY opens the doors of all the kennels one by one.

LADY WALDA: Ramsay, where is your father? Ramsay? Where is Lord Bolton?

RAMSAY walks back over to LADY WALDA.

RAMSAY: I am Lord Bolton.

LADY WALDA looks at her baby.

LADY WALDA: Ramsay. Ramsay, please. I’ll leave Winterfell. I’ll go back to the Riverlands. Please. Ramsay. He’s your brother.

RAMSEY: I prefer being an only child.

RAMSEY whisles at the dogs. They exit their pens and attack LADY WALDA and the baby. LADY WALDA screams. The dogs kill them.

EXT. NORTHERN WILDERNESS - DAY

THEON is gathering wood. He glances at SANSA and BRIENNE, who are in conversation. PODRICK is making a fire.

BRIENNE: I saw her with a man. I don’t think he hurt her. She didn’t want to leave him, he didn’t want to leave her.

SANSA: You don’t know which way she went?

BRIENNE: I spent three days looking for her. She disappeared.

SANSA: How did she look?

BRIENNE: She looked good. She wasn’t exactly dressed like a lady.

SANSA smiles.

SANSA: No, she wouldn’t be.

BRIENNE: What happened at Winterfell?

SANSA pauses and tears up.

SANSA: I should’ve gone with you while I had the chance.

BRIENNE: It was a difficult choice, my lady.

BRIENNE looks at THEON.

BRIENNE: We’ve all had to make difficult choices.

THEON stands up and walks away from PODRICK. SANSA stands and walks to THEON.

THEON: We shouldn’t be lighting fires. It’s not safe. He won’t stop hunting us.

SANSA: We just have to make it to Castle Black. Once we’re with Jon, Ramsay won’t be able to touch us.

THEON: Jon will have me killed the moment I step through the gate.

SANSA: I won’t let him. I’ll tell him the truth about Bran and Rickon.

THEON: And the truth about the farm boys I killed in their place? The truth about Ser Roderick, who I beheaded?

SANSA looks to the ground.

THEON: And the truth about Rob, who I betrayed?

SANSA: When you take the black, all your crimes are forgiven.

THEON: I don’t want to be forgiven. I can never make amends to your family for all the things that I’ve done. They’ll keep you safer than I ever could.

SANSA: You’re not coming with us?

THEON: I would have taken you all the way to the Wall. I would have died to get you there.

SANSA hugs THEON. They both cry.

THEON: May I take one of the horses?

SANSA: Where will you go?

THEON: Home.

EXT. PYKE CASTLE - NIGHT

A storm is raging.

CUT TO: PYKE CASTLE - GREAT HALL

YARA and BALON are standing and speaking. BALON stands at the fireplace with his back to YARA.

YARA: The Glovers have retaken Deepwood Motte.

BALON: And the Ironborn who held it?

YARA: They died fighting to a man.

BALON: What is dead may never die.

YARA: What is dead may never die.

YARA places the piece of paper she was reading from on a table.

YARA: But they did and our invasion died with them. Deepwood Motte was our last stronghold on the mainland.

BALON: They we will take more.

YARA: Why? For more pinecones and rocks?

BALON turns around to face YARA.

BALON: Because I order it.

YARA: We can defeat anyone at sea, but we’ll never hold lands and castles against mainland armies.

BALON walks to YARA.

BALON: Not if our captains defy my orders, abandon their posts, and sacrifice our men on foolish mission.

YARA: I won’t apologize for trying to rescue Theon.

BALON: Then where is he?

YARA: Where is your kingdom? We took those castles because the northerners marched off to war. That war is over. The last time we provoked them too far, I watched from that window as they breached our walls and knocked down our towers. I lost two brothers that day.

BALON: And I lost three sons. The War of the Five Kings, they call it. Well, the other four are dead. When you rule the Iron Islands, you can wage all the peace you wan. But for now, shut your mouth and obey or I will make another heir who will.

BALON exits the hall.

CUT TO: PYKE CASTLE - BRIDGE

Rain is pouring down. BALON begins to cross the unsteady bridge. He leans on the ropes and looks down at the ocean, then sees a cloaked figure on the other side of the bridge.

BALON: Let me pass. You fool, move aside for your king.

HOODED FIGURE: Haven’t I always, brother?

The hooded figure takes off his hood, revealing his identity. He is EURON GREYJOY. BALON walks a few steps closer.

BALON: I thought you’d be rotting under some foreign sea by now.

EURON: What is dead may never die.

BALON does not respond.

EURON: Has the custom changed since I’ve been gone? Aren’t you supposed to repeat the words?

BALON: You can mock our god without my help.

EURON: I don’t mock the Drowned God. I am the Drowned God. From Oldtown to Qarth, when men see my sails, they pray.

The wind buffets the bridge back and forth. BALON tries to hold his balance. EURON chuckles.

EURON: You’re old, brother. You've had your time. Now let another rule.

BALON walks towards his brother.

BALON: I heard you lost your mind during the storm on the Jade Sea. They tied you to the mast to keep you from jumping overboard.

EURON: They did.

BALON: And when the storm passed, you cut out their tongues.

EURON: I needed silence.

BALON: What kind of an Ironborn loses his senses during a storm?

EURON: I am the storm, brother. The first storm and the last. And you’re in my way.

BALON draws a knife and slashes EURON across the face. EURON throws BALON off the bridge. BALON falls to his death.

CUT TO: PYKE ISLAND BEACH - DAY

Many Ironborn are in attendance for BALON's funeral. AERON GREYJOY and several Drowned Men are gathered around BALON's body. They are performing funeral rites, covering it with rocks, seaweed, and wood. YARA approaches. YARA and the Drowned Men walk BALON's body through the shallows.

AERON: Lord, take your servant Balon back beneath the waves. Feed the creatures of your kingdom on his flesh. Pull his bones down to your depths to rest beside his ancestors and his children.

ALL: What is dead may never die.

YARA: I’m going to find out who did this. I’m going to feed them to the sharks while they live. I swear it by the Salt Throne.

AERON: The Salt Throne is not yours to swear upon, not unless the kingsmoot chooses you.

YARA: My father would’ve wanted me to rule.

AERON: Your father does not get to choose. The law is clear. Perhaps you'll win. Perhaps you’ll be the first woman in history to rule the Ironborn. And perhaps not.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - MELISANDRE’S CHAMBER
MELISANDRE is sitting at the fireplace. Someone knocks on the door.

MELISANDRE: Come in.

DAVOS enters.

DAVOS: I'm sorry, my lady. I didn’t mean to interrupt.

MELISANDRE: You interrupt nothing.

DAVOS looks at the fireplace and then at MELISANDRE.

DAVOS: I assume you know why I’m here.

MELISANDRE: I will after you tell me.

DAVOS: It’s about the Lord Commander.

MELISANDRE: The former Lord Commander.

DAVOS: Does he have to be?

MELISANDRE looks at DAVOS.

MELISANDRE: What are you asking?

DAVOS: Do you know of any magic...that could help him? Bring him back?

MELISANDRE: If you want to help him, leave him be.

DAVOS: Can it be done?

MELISANDRE: There are some with his power.

DAVOS: How?

MELISANDRE: I don’t know.

DAVOS: Have you seen it done?

MELISANDRE: I met a man who came back from the dead, but the priest who did it -- It shouldn’t have been possible.

DAVOS: But it was. It could be now.

MELISANDRE: Not for me.

MELISANDRE stands and walks away from her chair. DAVOS walks towards her.

DAVOS: Not for you? I saw you drink poison that should’ve killed you. I saw you give birth to a demon made of shadows.

MELISANDRE: Everything I believed, the great victory I saw in the flames, all of it was a lie.

MELISANDRE looks at DAVOS.

MELISANDRE: You were right all along. The Lord never spoke to me.

DAVOS: Fuck him, then. Fuck all of them. I’m not a devout man, obviously. Seven Gods, drowned gods, tree gods, it's all the same.

DAVOS comes a step closer to MELISANDRE

DAVOS: I’m not asking the Lord of Light for help.I’m asking the woman who showed me that miracles exist.

MELISANDRE: I never had this gift.

DAVOS: Have you ever tried?

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - ROOM

DAVOS, TORMUND, DOLOROUS EDD, and MELISANDRE are gathered around JON SNOW's body. GHOST is sleeping on the floor. MELISANDRE is performing a ritual on JON SNOW's body. She wrings out a wet cloth with which she cleans out the wounds of JON SNOW. She cuts his hair and beard and throws the hairs in a firepit. Then she places her hands on JON SNOW's chest and utters an incantation in Valyrian. She sighs.

MELISANDRE: Please.

MELISANDRE lets her hands down slowly. She has tears in her eyes and looks to DAVOS. TORMUND scoffs and exits, followed by MELISANDRE and DOLOROUS EDD. DAVOS lingers and stares at JON SNOW's body, but eventually exits. GHOST suddenly wakes up and looks at JON SNOW. JON SNOW's eyes snap open and he gasps for breath.



TEXT
INT. CASTLE BLACK ROOM
DAVOS is staring at JON SNOW. JON SNOW slowly sits up on the table, breathing heavily. He turns his head to look at DAVOS. GHOST is standing in front of JON SNOW, also staring at him. JON SNOW looks down at his body and sees his stab wounds. He begins gasping and shaking. DAVOS takes off his cloak and rushes over to JON SNOW. JON SNOW attempts to stand but falters. DAVOS catches JON SNOW and wraps him in his cloak.

DAVOS: Easy, easy. Easy.
DAVOS ushers JON SNOW back into a sitting position. MELISANDRE enters and stares at JON SNOW.

DAVOS: What do you remember?

JON SNOW: They stabbed me. Olly...he put a knife in my heart. I shouldn’t be here.

DAVOS: The lady brought you back.

MELISANDRE approaches JON SNOW and kneels in front of him.

MELISANDRE: Afterwards, after they stabbed you, after you died, where did you go? What did you see?

JON SNOW: Nothing. There was nothing at all.

MELISANDRE: The Lord let you come back for a reason. Stannis was not the prince who was promised, but someone has to be.

DAVOS (to MELISANDRE): Could you give us a moment?

MELISANDRE rises and exits the room. DAVOS closes the door behind her, grabs a stool, and sits down in front of JON SNOW.

DAVOS: You were dead. And now you’re not. That’s completely fucking mad, seems to me. I can only imagine how it seems to you.

JON SNOW: I did what I thought was right. And I got murdered for it. And now I’m back. Why?

DAVOS: I don’t know. Maybe we’ll never know. What does it matter? You go on. You fight for as long as you can. You clean up as much of the shit as you can.

JON SNOW: I don’t know how to do that. I thought I did, but...I failed.

DAVOS: Good. Now go fail again.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - COURTYARD

DOLOROUS EDD, TORMUND, the faithful Night’s Watch members, and the Wildlings are all gathered in the courtyard, staring up at the entrance to the room JON SNOW was in. JON SNOW emerges on the balcony, supported by DAVOS. He stares out at the crowd, then walks down the steps with the help of DAVOS and begins walking through the crowd. The men on either side part to let him pass. TORMUND walks up the middle to confront JON SNOW.

TORMUND: They think you’re some kind of god. The man who returned from the dead.

JON SNOW: I’m not a god.

TORMUND: I know that.

TORMUND moves closer to JON SNOW and whispers in his ear.

TORMUND: I saw your pecker. What kind of god would have a pecker that small?

JON SNOW and TORMUND both chuckle and embrace. JON SNOW winces, then spies DOLOROUS EDD and begins walking towards him. They embrace, and JON SNOW winces again.

DOLOROUS EDD: Your eyes are still brown. Is that still you in there?

JON SNOW: I think so. Hold off on burning my body for now.

DOLOROUS EDD laughs.

DOLOROUS EDD: That’s funny. You sure that’s still you in there?

Both men laugh.
EXT. VESSEL ON NARROW SEA - NIGHT
A storm is raging, causing rough wind and water to buffet the vessel back and forth. GILLY peers out at the storm through a window in the hull of the ship and smiles.

CUT TO: VESSEL - HOLD

GILLY is sitting on the edge of a cot with LITTLE SAM. Various crewmembers are going about their business. SAMWELL is huddled over a bucket, quivering. He groans and gags. GILLY approaches him.

GILLY: You all right?

SAMWELL: Yes. Yes, I’m fine.

GILLY: Did I ever tell you I used to think the sea was called the see because it was nothing but water as far as the eye could see?

SAMWELL: I don’t think so.

GILLY: Sea, see. They’re spelled different, but they sound the same.

SAMWELL: Yeah, they do.

GILLY: It was before I learned how to read, obviously.

SAMWELL scrunches up his face.

GILLY: Sam, are you going to be sick?

SAMWELL shakes his head and then vomits into the bucket. GILLY retrieves a water skin and hands it to SAMWELL. He washes out his mouth with water.

GILLY: Won’t be long. We’ll be in the south soon. I’m excited to see Oldtown. Captain says it’s the most beautiful city in Westeros. Are you going to vomit again?

SAMWELL: No. No, no, no. The Citadel doesn’t admit women. There won’t be a place for you there or for Little Sam.

GILLY: I stayed at Castle Black. There’s no women allowed there.

SAMWELL: The Citadel isn’t Castle Black. I don’t have a Jon Snow or a Maester Aemon to help me bend the rules.

GILLY: I’ll stay in Oldtown, then.

SAMWELL: By yourself? With a baby and no money?

GILLY stands.

GILLY: So if we’re not going to Oldtown, where are you taking me?

SAMWELL: To my home. Horn Hill. My father’s -- well, my father, but my mother’s a kind woman and my sister’s lovely. They’ll take care of you both.

GILLY: “Wherever you go, I go, too.” That’s what you said.

GILLY returns to LITTLE SAM and sits down on the cot. SAMWELL rises and follows her.

SAMWELL: I said that because I want you and Little Same to be safe. That’s all I want -- to become a maester so I can help Jon when the time comes so you’ll be safe

GILLY: Us and everyone else in the world.

SAMWELL: I don’t care about them. Well, no, I do, but I don’t really. I care about you and him.

GILLY: I know that, Sam. And he does, too. You're the only one who ever has.

GILLY places her hand on SAMWELL’s back.

GILLY: If you think it’s for the best, we trust you.

SAMWELL: I’d feel better if you threw something at me and stormed off.

GILLY: I’d never do that to the father of my son.

SAMWELL smiles and looks at LITTLE SAM, then vomits into a bucket and coughs.

EXT. VISION OF THE PAST - TOWER OF JOY
NED STARK rides towards the Tower of Joy with six companions. One of the companions is HOWLAND REED. Two Kingsguard are sitting at the foot of the tower, one of which is ARTHUR DAYNE.When they see the horses approaching, they retrieve their gear and walk out to meet them. BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN are standing on an outcropping, watching events unfold. NED dismounts his horse.

BRAN: That’s my father.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: The man beside him is Howland Reed, Meera’s father.

The Kingsguard walk past BRAN and THREE-EYED RAVEN.

BRAN: Ser Arthur Dayne.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: The Sword of the Morning.

BRAN: Father said he was the best swordsman he ever saw.

NED and his companions confront the Kingsguard. ARTHUR stabs his sword into the dirt.

ARTHUR: Lord Stark.

NED: I looked for you on the Trident.

ARTHUR: We weren’t there.

KINGSGUARD: Your friend the usurper would lie beneath the ground if we had been.

NED: The Mad King is dead. Rhaegar lies beneath the ground. Why weren’t you there to protect your prince?

ARTHUR: Our prince wanted us here.

NED: Where’s my sister?

ARTHUR: I wish you good fortune in the wars to come.

ARTHUR and the other Kingsguard put on their helmets.

ARTHUR: And now it begins.

The Kingsguard draw their blades.

NED: No. Now it ends.

NED and his men draw their blades and attack. ARTHUR cuts down HOWLAND. The other Kingsguard runs one of NED’s men through with his sword. NED engages in single combat with the other Kingsguard and stabs him through the throat. NED and his three remaining men surround ARTHUR. NED and his men attack all at once, but ARTHUR deflects all of their blows repeatedly, then repositions himself. He kills one of NED’s men with a downward strike from both of his blades. NED and the two remaining men advance on ARTHUR. ARTHUR deflects their blows again and slices the throat of another man, then runs another through with his blade. NED engages ARTHUR in single combat.

BRAN: He’s better than my father.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Far better.

BRAN: But Father beat him.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Did he?

BRAN: I know he did. Heard the story a thousand times.

ARTHUR traps NED’s blade and wrenches it from his hands. ARTHUR makes a motion to strike NED down, but HOWLAND stabs ARTHUR in the back. ARTHUR falls to his knees.

BRAN: He stabbed him in the back.

NED retrieves a sword and slashes ARTHUR with it, killing him. A woman screams from the Tower and NED storms towards it.

BRAN: What’s in the tower?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: That’s enough for one day. We’ll visit again another time.

BRAN: I want to see where he’s going.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Time to go.

BRAN: Father!

NED stops on the stairs and turns around in the direction of BRAN’s yelling but sees nothing and proceeds up the stairs. BRAN chases after him but is intercepted by the THREE-EYED RAVEN, who touches him on the shoulder.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

The white leaves BRAN’s eyes as the vision fades. The THREE-EYED RAVEN is tangled in his roots. A child of the forest looks on. BRAN crawls towards the THREE-EYED RAVEN.

BRAN: Why did you do that? Take me back there. I want to go back.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: No.

BRAN: He heard me.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Maybe. Maybe he heard the wind.

BRAN: He heard me.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: The past is already written. The ink is dry.

BRAN: What’s in that tower? I want to go back there.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: I’ve told you many times, stay too long where you don’t belong and you will never return.

BRAN: Why do I want to return? So I can be a cripple again? So I can talk to an old man in a tree?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: You think I wanted to sit here for 1,000 years watching the world from a distance as the roots grew through me?

BRAN: So why did you?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: I was waiting for you.

BRAN: I don’t want to be you.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: I don’t blame you. You won’t be here forever. You won’t be an old man in a tree. But before you leave, you must learn.

BRAN: Learn what?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Everything.

EXT. VAES DOTHRAK - DAY
DAENERYS is entering Vaes Dothrak with the horde. A mounted Bloodrider ushers her onward with a nudge of his foot.

BLOODRIDER (speaking Dothraki): Hey, Great Khaleesi. Move your ass.

DAENERYS approaches a domed structure. KHAL MORO and two of his Bloodriders are waiting for atop their horses.

KHAL MORO: Welcome home, Khaleesi.

Another Bloodrider ushers DAENERYS into the building. Inside, DAENERYS stands in front of a platform atop which a middle-aged Dothraki woman is standing. A group of younger Dothraki women encircle DAENERYS. They speak in Dothraki.

DOTHRAKI WOMAN: Go.

The Bloodriders who ushered DAENERYS in exit. The older Dothraki woman nods to the younger women, who swarm DAENERYS and remove all of her clothing.

DAENERYS: What are you doing?! Take your hands off me! I will have your heads!

One of the younger woman approaches DAENERYS with a simple brown garment, which DAENERYS takes and wears.

DAENERYS: You have made a mistake. One you will regret. I am the wife of the Great Khal.

DOTHRAKI MATRON: We know who you are. I remember you eating the stallion’s heart. Why didn’t you come to us after Khal Drogo died?

DAENERYS: Because I am Daenerys Stormborn, the Breaker of Chains, the Queen of Meereen and the Mother of Dragons. My place is not here with you.

DOTHRAKI MATRON: You were the wife of the Great Khal. You thought he would conquer the world with you at his side. He didn’t. I was the wife of the Great Khal. Khal Savo. I thought he would conquer the world with me at his side. You’re young. We were all young once. But we all understand the way things are. You will learn as well, if you are fortunate enough to stay with us.

DAENERYS: Where else would I go? Every khaleesi becomes Dosh Khaleen.

DOTHRAKI MATRON: Yes. Immediately after the death of their khal. But you went out into the world. That is forbidden. All the khalasars have returned for the Khalar Vezhven. They will decide which cities will be sacked and which tribes will be enslaved. And now they must decide what to do with Khal Drogo’s silver-haired widow. With luck, your place will be here with us, Mother of Dragons. It is the best you can hope for, now.

INT. MEEREEN GREAT PYRAMID THRONE ROOM
VARYS is sitting on the steps of the throne, fanning himself. Several Unsullied stand around the perimeters of the room.

VARYS (to an Unsullied): I don’t know how you stand it in all that leather.

Two Unsullied usher a woman into the room.

VARYS: If we could have the room.

All the Unsullied guards exit.

VARYS: You look lovely today, my dear. You really do. How you climbed all those steps without breaking a sweat.

WOMAN: If you’re going to torture me, just call them back and get on with it.

VARYS: I am not a torturer.

VARYS stands.

VARYS: Though it so often is what people deserve.

VARYS approaches the woman.


VARYS: And it does provide answers. But they’re usually the wrong answers. My job is to find the right answers. Do you know how I do that? I do it by making people happy. I’d like to make you happy, Vala. That’s your name, isn’t it, Vala?

VALA looks away. VARYS chuckles.

VARYS: That’s all right. I know who you are and what you’ve done. You’ve done a lot. You’ve sacrificed your body for a cause, which is more than most people do. And you’ve helped the Sons of the Harpy murder the Unsullied and the Second Sons.

VALA: The Unsullied and the Second Songs are foreign soldiers brought here by a foreign queen to destroy our city and our history.

VARYS: I understand. Well, that makes perfect sense from your perspective. I have a different perspective, of course. I think it’s important that you try to see things from my perspective just as I will try to see them from yours. Because that is the only way that I can make you and Dom happy. That is how you pronounce it -- Dom? I’m afraid I don’t really speak the language. Such a handsome boy. Those big, brown eyes. Good luck keeping the ladies away.

VALA: Yes, you’re a true liberator, aren’t you? You won’t torture me, you’ll just threaten my son.

VARYS: Children are blameless. I have never hurt them. Your boy is in no immediate danger, this I swear to you. But between us, dear, you did conspire to kill the queen’s soldiers. We both know the penalty for that crime. How will poor Dom get on without his mother? And with his breathing problem.

VALA: If I tell you anything, they’ll kill me. So either you kill me or they do.

VARYS: Yes, from your perspective, this is a problem. There is a third option, though. A ship leaving tomorrow for Pentos. I’ve already booked passage for a woman and her young son. I’ll even throw in a bag of silver to help you start again.

VARYS kicks a large brown bag at his feet.

VARYS: Though I’m afraid we’ll have to ask one of our leather-clad friends back in to carry it. Far too heavy for me. The boat sails at dawn. You need to decide now. A new life for you and Dom or…

CUT TO: MEEREEN GREAT PYRAMID - COUNCIL CHAMBER

TYRION, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM are sitting together around a table. TYRION smiles at MISSANDEI, and MISSANDEI smiles back. TYRION smiles at GREY WORM, and GREY WORM remains expressionless.

TYRION: What should we do while we wait? To pass the time, what should we do? What should we talk about?

MISSANDEI and GREY WORM look at each other, then at TYRION.

TYRION (to MISSANDEI): You speak 19 languages. You must occasionally use some of them to talk about things.

MISSANDEI says nothing.

TYRION: You two, you spend a great deal of time together. What would you be talking about if I weren’t here?

GREY WORM: Patrol. When I am going on patrol with the Unsullied. What we see on patrol. Who we captured on patrol.

TYRION: That’s good. That’s very good.

TYRION stands and carries his wine glass over to the decanter to refill it.

TYRION: But that’s a report. I was thinking more of a conversation. A wise man once said the truth history of the world is the history of great conversation in elegant rooms.

MISSANDEI: Who said this?

TYRION: Me. Just now. All right, no conversations. Let’s play a game.

TYRION returns to the table. GREY WORM and MISSANDEI say nothing.

TYRION: You don’t play games, either one of you, ever?

GREY WORM: Games are for children.

MISSANDEI: My master Kraznys would sometimes make us play games.

TYRION: There, that’s a start.

MISSANDEI: Only the girls.

TYRION: Oh no, no, no. Not that, of course not that. Innocent games, fun games, drinking games.

MISSANDEI: We do not drink.

TYRION: Until you do.

GREY WORM and MISSANDEI look interrogatively at TYRION.

TYRION: Alright. No drinking. We can play without drinking. It’s a wonderful game. I invented it. Here’s how it works. I make a statement about your past. If I’m wrong, I drink. And if I’m right -- Maybe we can’t play without drinking.

VARYS enters the room.

TYRION: Oh, you took your time.

VARYS: Sorry. I was busy learning who funds the Sons of the Harpy. Some things you can’t rush.

MISSANDEI: You found out?

VARYS: The good masters of Astapor. And the wise masters of Yunkai. With help from their friends in Volantis.

TYRION: You see? You don’t even have to worry about the local rebellion. We only have to worry about the three rich foreign cities paying for it.

GREY WORM: We conquered Asatapor and Yunkai once. We will do it again and execute the Masters.

TYRION: If the Unsullied march off to reconquer Asatapor and Yunkai, who remain to defend the free people of Meereen?

GREY WORM: If we do not fight them, how can we stop them?

MISSANDEI: We cannot. The Masters only speak one language. They spoke it to me for many years. I know it better than my mother tongue. If we want them to hear us, we must speak it back to them. May it be the last thing they ever hear.

TYRION nods.

TYRION: You may be right.

GREY WORM: So we will fight them?

TYRION: Possibly.

MISSANDEI: Possibly?

TYRION: It’s a conversation.

TYRION turns to VARYS.

TYRION: Tell me, can the little birds get a message to the good Masters of Astapor, the wise Masters of Yunkai, the benevolent enslavers of Volantis?

VARYS: Of course. Man can be fickle, but birds always trust.

INT. RED KEEP - VAULTS

A group of Varys' child spies are gathered together. One LITTLE BIRD picks up a model of a planet. Another child plays with an hourglass.

QYBURN: Your eye looks much better, Arthur. How’s your mother’s jaw?

ARTHUR: Better.

QYBURN: And your father?

ARTHUR: No one’s seen him.

QYBURN: And no one will. That worked out rather nicely.

LITTLE BIRD: Will Lord Varys ever come back?

QYBURN: I don’t think so. Do you miss him?

LITTLE BIRD: He was nice.

ARTHUR: He called us his little birds. He gave us sweets.

QYBURN stands up and walks to a table.

QYBURN: It’s funny you should mention that. Guess what I happened to find today. Candied plums from Dorne.

He nods at the boxes. Eeach child picks one. They nibble at the plums.

QYBURN: Now remember, if any of your friends like sweets or need help, they can always come to me. All I need in return are whispers.

The door opens. GREGOR walks in, followed by JAIME and CERSEI.

QYBURN: No need to be afraid. This is Ser Gregor. He’s friends with all my friends.

GREGOR looks at the children. They stare at him, motionless.

QYBURN: Run along now.

The children run up the stairs.

CERSEI: Varys's little birds?

QYBURN: Your little birds now, your Grace.

JAIME is admiring GREGOR.

JAIME: What did you do to him exactly? I haven't been able to get a clear answer.

QYBURN: Oh, a number of things.

JAIME: Does he understand what we’re saying? I mean, to the extent that he ever understood complete sentences in the first place.

GREGOR turns his head to JAIME. JAIME recoils.

QYBURNS: He understands well enough.

JAIME: So tell him to march into the sept and crush the High Sparrow’s head like a melon.

CERSEI: The High Sparrow has hundreds of Faith Militant surrounding him. Ser Gregor will can’t face them all. And he won’t have to. He’ll only have to face one.

JAIME: Has the Faith leveled official charges yet?

CERSEI: Not yet.

JAIME: That is one trial by combat I look forward to watching.

CERSEI (to QYBURN): Don’t stop at the city. I want little birds in Dorne, in Highgarden, in the North. If someone is planning on making our losses their gains I want to hear it. If someone is laughing at the queen who walk naked through the streets covered in shit, I want to hear. I want to know who they are. I want to where they are.

QYBURN bows his head to CERSEI.

CUT TO: RED KEEP - SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER

KEVAN LANNISTER chairs a meeting of the Small Council. MAESTER PYCELLE, MACE TYRELL and LADY OLENNA have all gathered around him.

MAESTER PYCELLE: As bad as Lord Varys was Varys was, Qyburn is worse. I told them all. I told them. He’s arrogant, dangerous. You don’t get thrown out of the Citadel without good reason. And no one listened to my advice, so here we are.

JAIME, CERSEI and SER GREGOR enter the room.

MAESTER PYCELLE: And what he's done to Gregor Clegane is an abomination. We never sanctioned this, this experiment. And I for one think it would be in our best interest to have the beast dest --

MAESTER PYCELLE notices the new guests. He farts.

KEVAN: Can I help you?

CERSEI (to LADY OLENNA): Why are you here?

MACE TYRELL: My mother...

LADY OLENNA: I was invited, my dear, o help deal with several troublesome issues, such as the queen’s imprisonment.

CERSEI: Thank you for bringing it up. It’s well past time we addressed the abuses I endured.

LADY OLENNA: Margaery is the queen. You are not the queen because you’re not married to the king. I do appreciate these things can get a bit confusing in your family.

KEVAN (to CERSEI & company): This is a Small Council meeting. You have no position on the Small Council.

JAIME: I’m Lord Commander of the Kingsguard. The Lord Commander of the Kingsguard does have a position on the Small Council.

CERSEI: Grand Maester Pycelle, would you sanction that statement?

MAESTER PYCELLE: Well, um...I would say Ser Gerold Hightower had a seat on the Mad King’s council. Of course, that was the Mad King. King Robert saw things differently.

JAIME pushes two chairs to the table. JAIME and CERSEI sit down. MAESTER PYCELLE keeps his mouth. The members of the Council look at JAIME and CERSEI.

CERSEI (to KEVAN): What about Myrcella’s death, Uncle? Do you consider the murder of your own blood a troublesome issue?

JAIME: The same women who murdered Myrcella have overthrown House Martell and taken control of Dorne. We've got a lot to discuss. All of us together.

CERSEI: And seeing as you cannot make us leave, we best get on with it.

KEVAN: No, we cannot make you leave. And you cannot make us stay. Not unless you're gonna have that thing murder us all.

One by one, KEVAN LANNISTER, LADY OLENNA and MACE TYRELL leave the room. MAESTER PYCELLE picks up his paperwork and shuffles slowly. He then runs out of the door when SER GREGOR looks at him threateningly. JAIME, CERSEI and SER GREGOR are left alone in the room.

CUT TO: GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR - PRAYER ROOM

The HIGH SPARROW is praying. TOMMEN enters the room with his guards. The HIGH SPARROW stands up.

HIGH SPARROW: Oh, your Grace.

TOMMEN: My mother would like to see her daughter’s final resting place.

HIGH SPARROW: Oh, I'm, sorry, your Grace. That’s not possible. Not yet.

TOMMEN: When will it be possible?

HIGH SPARROW: When she's fully atoned for her sins.

TOMMEN: You’ve cut off her hair and marched her naked through the streets in front of the whole city. That wasn’t a full atonement?

HIGH SPARROW: No. She must stand trial before seven septons, so we can learn the true extant of her sins.

TOMMEN: I want you to let her see Myrcella’s resting place.

Several Faith Militant gather behind the HIGH SPARROW.

TOMMEN: I am the king.

HIGH SPARROW: You are.

TOMMEN: And what does that mean to you?

HIGH SPARROW: It means a great deal to me. The crown and the faith are the twin pillars of the world. Do you know who told me that? Your mother.

TOMMEN walks closer to the HIGH SPARROW. He guards tense.

TOMMEN: My mother who is unclean? My mother who still needs to atone after all you’ve put her through?

The HIGH SPARROW signs that his guards need to leave. They leave. TOMMEN puts his hand in the air and points to his guards. They leave. HIGH SPARROW closes the book lying on the table behind him.

HIGH SPARROW: How do you think the Mother Above first came to us? How did men and women first come to feel the Mother’s presence? It was through their own mothers. There is a great deal of falsehood in Cersei, you know that. But when she speaks of you, the Mother’s love outshines it all. Her love for you is more real than anything else in this world. Because it doesn’t come from this world. But you know that. You’ve felt it. You’ve seen her when she talks to you.

TOMMEN: Yes.

HIGH SPARROW: It’s a great gift. One I never had. Envy. One more thing for me to atone for.

HIGH SPARROW points to a bench in the room.

HIGH SPARROW: You Grace, may I? Do you mind? It's my knees.

TOMMEN: Of course.

HIGH SPARROW sighs and sits down.

HIGH SPARROW: When your mother made her walk of atonement, she did it to get back to you.

TOMMEN: I still don’t understand why you want to put her through any more than she's already endured.

HIGH SPARROW: It’s not what I want. It’s what the gods want. They make their will known to us and it’s up to us to either accept or reject it.

The HIGH SPARROW palms the seat next to him.

HIGH SPARROW: Please.

TOMMEN sits down next to him.

HIGH SPARROW: If we’re to be just and good, then we accept it, all of us, even kings. A true leader avails himself of the wisest council he can. And no one is wiser than the gods.

TOMMEN: My grandfather once said something similar. Except for the part about the gods.

HIGH SPARROW: The gods worked through him whether he knew it or not. As they work through your mother. There’s so much good in all of us. The best we can do is to help each other bring it out.

INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE

The WAIF and ARYA are standing on a raised platform. The WAIF scrapes her staff on the floor around ARYA, then pushes the end of it against ARYA's head. ARYA turns around. The WAIF nudges her and she flinches. Cut to the WAIF and ARYA sitting on the ground across from each other.

WAIF: Who are you?

ARYA: No one.

The WAIF hits ARYA with a stick. ARYA falls on the ground but gets up.

WAIF: Who were you before you came here?

ARYA: Arya Stark.

Cut to ARYA and the WAIF on the combat platform. ARYA tries to fight but the WAIF beats her. ARYA falls to the ground. Her mouth's bleeding. Cut back to the WAIF and ARYA sitting across from each other.

WAIF: Tell me about Arya Stark’s family.

ARYA: Her father was Eddard Stark. Her mother was Catelyn Stark. She had one sister, Sansa, and four brothers.

The WAIF corrects her with a whip of the stick. Cut to the fighting platform. The WAIF kicks ARYA's staff back into her grasp. Cut back to the pair sitting across from each other.

ARYA: Three brothers.

Cut back to the fighting platform. As ARYA speaks each of her brothers' names, the WAIF strikes her.

ARYA (V.O.): Rob, Bran, Rickon. And a half-brother, Jon.

WAIF: And where are they now?

Cut to ARYA standing in front of a small table. Several bowls are filled with powder. A glass bottle stands behind each bowel.

ARYA (V.O.): They may be dead for all a girl knows.

ARYA sniffs one of the bowls of powder, then recoils. She sniffs another bowl and wafts the scent with her hand. Cut back to the pair sitting across from each other.

WAIF: Tell me about The Hound.

Cut back to the fighting platform.

ARYA (V.O.): Also dead.

ARYA deflects several of the WAIF's blows, but is pushed to the edge of the platform and falls when the WAIF smacks her across the face with her staff.

ARYA: Arya Stark left him to die. He was on her list.

Cut to the pair sitting across from each other. The WAIF smacks ARYA with the stick.

ARYA: He was not on her list anymore. She’d taken him off it.

WAIF: Why? Didn’t she want him dead any longer?

Cut back to the power table.

ARYA: She did and she did not.

ARYA lifts a spoon of the powder to the jar behind it. The Faceless Man, taking on the form of JAQEN H'GHAR, looks on. Cut back to the pair sitting across from each other.

WAIF: She sounds confused.

ARYA: Yes, she was.

Cut back to the powder table. ARYA dumps the spoonful of powder in the bottle. Cut back to the pair sitting across from each other.

WAIF: Who else was on Arya Stark’s funny little list?

Cut back to the fighting platform. The WAIF beats down ARYA repeatedly until ARYA can no longer get up.

ARYA (V.O.): Cersei Lannister, Gregor Clegane, Walder Frey.

The WAIF walks away from ARYA, but stops when ARYA begins to stand up. The WAIF turns back to face ARYA.

WAIF: That’s a short list. That can’t be everyone you want to kill.

ARYA stands up and holds her staff out at the WAIF. Cut back to the pair sitting across from each other.

WAIF: Are you sure you’re not forgetting someone?

ARYA: Which name would you like a girl to speak?

Cut back to the fighting platform. ARYA and the WAIF exchange blows, but ARYA knocks back the WAIF. JAQN H'GHAR looks on.The WAIF returns with a heavy blow, but ARYA blocks it. The WAIF walks away. ARYA turns to face JAQEN H'GHAR.

CUT TO: HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - MAIN CHAMBER

ARYA is sitting in front of a fireplace. JAQEN is standing in front of the well in the center of the room.

JAQEN: If a girl tells me her name, I will give her eyes back.

ARYA: A girl has no name.

JAQEN: Come.

ARYA walks to the well. JAQEN gives ARYA a bowl of water. ARYA hesitates to drink it.

JAQEN: If a girl is truly no one, she has nothing to fear.

ARYA drinks the water. She closes her eyes. She slowly opens them to reveal the blindness has left them. She looks to JAQEN.

JAQEN: Who are you?

ARYA: No one.

EXT. NORTHERN WILDERNESS

A horse and carriage are toting a few members of House Umber towards Winterfell.

CUT TO: WINTERFELL - DINING HALL

RAMSAY and LORD KARSTARK are seated at the dining table. A lady serves them drinks. SMALLJON is standing in front of them.

RAMSAY: The Umbers are a famously loyal house.

LORD KARSTARK: Famously loyal to the Starks.

SMALLJON: And you, Lord Karstark? Your people share blood with the Starks, don’t they? But here we are. Times change.

RAMSAY: When my father became Warden of the North, your house refused to pledge their banners.

SMALLJON: Your father was a cunt.

RAMSAY: My beloved father, the Warden --

SMALLJON: Your father was a cunt and that’s why you killed him. I might’ve done the same to my father, if he hadn’t have done me the favor of dying on his own.

RAMSAY: My father was poisoned by our enemies.

SMALLJON: Mmm.

RAMSAY: Why have you come to Winterfell, Lord Umber?

SMALLJON: The bastard Jon Snow led an army of wildlings past the Wall. We’re farther north than any of you fuckers. Wildlings come down, we always have to fight them first. I like fighting wildlings, been doing it all my life. But there are too many of them for us to beat back alone.

RAMSAY: So now you’ve come seeking help?

SMALLJON: We need to help each other. The colder it gets, the farther South those goat fuckers will roam. Won't take them long to get here.

LORD KARSTARK: You think a horde of wildlings can take Winterfell?

SMALLJON: If they get Jon Snow leading them, maybe. He knows this place better than we ever will.

RAMSAY: Pledge your banners to House Bolton. Swear loyalty to me as Warden of the North and we will fight together to destroy the bastard and all his wildling friends.

SMALLJON: I’m not kissing your fucking hand.

RAMSAY: Traditionally a bannerman kneels before his lord.

SMALLJON: I’m not doing that either.

RAMSAY: Why would I trust a man who won’t honor tradition?

SMALLJON: Your father honored tradition. Knelt for Robb Stark. Called him King of the North. Was Robb Stark right to trust your father?

RAMSAY: Then it appears we're at a bit of an impasse.

SMALLJON: Fuck kneeling and fuck oaths. I've got a gift for you.

RAMSAY: A girl, I hope. I prefer redheads.

Two hooded people are dragged into the hall.

SMALLJON: A girl, aye. A wild one.

SMALLJON pulls the hood off one of the people, revealing OSHA. RAMSAY stands up.

RAMSAY: I like them wild.

SMALLJON: And the boy, nice and young. The way Karstark likes them.

LORD KARSTARK stands up. SMALLJON pulls the hood off the other person, revealing RICKON STARK.

RAMSAY: Who’s this?

SMALLJON: Rickon Stark.

RAMSAY: How do I know that’s Rickon Stark?

SMALLJOY retrieves the severed head of Rickon's direwolf SHAGGYDOG and places it on the table. RAMSAY examines the head, looks at SMALLJON, and then smiles at RICKON.

RAMSAY: Welcome home, Lord Stark.

INT. CASTLE BLACK – JON SNOW’S CHAMBER

JON SNOW is sitting by the fireplace. He is looking to the ground. Someone knocks on the door. DOLOROUS EDD walks in.

DOLOROUS EDD: It’s time.

JON SNOW gets up, drops his vest with the stab holes in it on the table, and grabs his sword Longclaw.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK – COURTYARD

MELISANDRE is standing on a balcony overlooking the courtyard. TORMUND, DAVOS, the wildlings, and the Night's Watch are all in attendance. JON SNOW walks past them, going up the stairs towards the gallows. DOLOROUS EDD accompanies him. BOWEN MARSH, OTHELL YARWICK, ALLISER THORNE, and OLLY are standing on a platform with their hands tied and ropes around their necks. JON SNOW looks up at them.

JON SNOW: If you have any last words, now is the time.

BOWEN MARSH: You shouldn’t be alive. It’s not right.

JON SNOW: Neither was killing me.

OTHELL YARWICK: My mother's still living at White Harbor. Could you write her? Tell her I died fighting the wildings.

ALLISER THRONE: I had a choice, Lord Commander. Betray you or betray the Night’s Watch. You brought an army of wildlings into our lands. An army of muderers and raiders. If I had to do it all over knowing where I’d end up, I pray I’d make the right choice again.

JON SNOW: I’m sure you would, Ser Alliser.

ALLISER THRONE: I fought, I lost. Now I rest. But you, Lord Snow, you’ll be fighting their battles forever.

JON SNOW looks at OLLY. OLLY stares back at him, unwavering. JON SNOW turns his back and unsheathes Longclaw. He breathes heavily. JON SNOW cuts the rope. The platform is pulled out from under the traitors’ feet. They are hung. They choke and die. JON SNOW looks at OLLY again. OLLY's face is blue and swollen. JON SNOW sheathes his sword, then walks up to DOLOROUS EDD.

DOLOROUS EDD: We should burn the bodies.

JON SNOW: You should.

JON SNOW takes off his cape and hands it to DOLOROUS EDD.

DOLOROUS EDD: What do you want me to do with this?

JON SNOW: Wear it. Burn it. Whatever you want. You have Castle Black.

JON SNOW walks down the stairs.

JON SNOW: My watch is ended.

Everyone in attendance watches JON SNOW walk away.



TEXTS

FORUMS

ADD S
INT. CASTLE BLACK - JON SNOW’S ROOM

Longclaw is lying on a table. DOLOROUS EDD lifts and admires it, then turns to JON SNOW who is putting some items in a bag.
DOLOROUS EDD: Where you gonna go?

JON SNOW: South.

DOLOROUS EDD: What are you gonna do?

JON SNOW: Get warm.

JON SNOW smiles. DOLOROUS EDD places Longclaw on the table.

DOLOROUS EDD: I was with you at Hardhome. We saw what’s out there. We know it’s coming here. How can you leave us now?

JON SNOW: I did everything I could. You know that.

DOLOROUS EDD: You swore a vow.

JON SNOW: Aye, I pledged my life to the Night’s Watch. I gave my life.

DOLOROUS EDD: For all nights to come.

JON SNOW: They killed me, Edd! My own brothers. You want me to stay here after that?

A single horn sounds outside. JON SNOW and DOLOROUS EDD look to the doorway.

MAN (O.S.): Riders approaching!

MAN #2 (O.S.): Open the gate!

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - COURTYARD

The southern gates open. SANSA, BRIENNE, and PODRICK enter the courtyard on horseback. The Night’s Watch and the Wildlings all watfch them. TORMUND stares intently at BRIENNE. The trio dismount from their horses. JON SNOW and DOLOROUS EDD emerge onto a balcony overlooking the courtyard. SANSA slowly spins around until she and JON SNOW lock eyes. JON SNOW descends from the balcony and walks to SANSA. They stare at each other and then embrace.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - JON SNOW’S ROOM

JON SNOW and SANSA are sitting by the fire. SANSA lifts a bowl to her lips and drinks from it.

SANSA: This is good soup. Do you remember those kidney pies Old Nan used to make?

JON SNOW: With the peas and onions?

SANSA: Mmm.

JON SNOW: We never should have left Winterfell.

SANSA: Don’t you wish we could go back to the day we left? I want to scream at myself, “Don’t go, you idiot.”

JON SNOW: How could we know?

SANSA: I spent a lot of time thinking about what as ass I was to you. I wish I could change everything.

JON SNOW: We were children.

SANSA: I was awful, just admit it.

JON SNOW chuckles.

JON SNOW: You were occasionally awful. I’m sure I can’t have been great fun. Always sulking in the corner while the rest of you played.

SANSA: Can you forgive me?

JON SNOW: There’s nothing to forgive.

SANSA: Forgive me.

JON SNOW: All right. All right, I forgive you.

SANSA laughs, then holds out her hand for JON SNOW’s horn of ale. JON SNOW gives it to her. She sips, then coughs. JON SNOW laughs.

JON SNOW: You’d think after thousands of years, the Night’s Watch would have learned how to make a good ale.

SANSA: Where will you go?

JON SNOW: Where will we go? If I don’t watch over you, Father’s ghost will come back and murder me.

SANSA: Where will we go?

JON SNOW: I can’t stay here, not after what happened.

SANSA: There’s only one place we can go. Home.

JON SNOW: Should we tell the Boltons to pack up and leave?

SANSA: We’ll take it back from them.

JON SNOW: I don’t have an army.

SANSA: How many wildlings did you save?

JON SNOW: They didn’t come here to serve me.

SANSA: They owe you their lives.

SANSA stands and walks to a table. She places her bowl down on it.

SANSA: You think they’ll be safe here if Roose Bolton remains Warden of the North?

JON SNOW: Sansa.

SANSA: Winterfell is our home. It’s ours and Arya’s and Bran’s and Rickon’s. Wherever they are, it belongs to our family. We have to fight for it.

JON SNOW: I’m tired of fighting.

JON SNOW stands and turns to face SANSA.

JON SNOW: It’s all I’ve done since I left home. I’ve killed brothers of the Night’s Watch. I’ve killed wildlings. I’ve killed men that I admire. I hanged a boy younger than Bran. I fought and I lost.

SANSA: If we don’t take back the North, we’ll never be safe. I want you to help me. But I’ll do it myself if I have to.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - BALCONY

MELISANDRE is looking out over the edge of the balcony. DAVOS approaches her.

DAVOS: My lady.

MELISANDRE: Ser Davos.

DAVOS: Will you stay here at Castle Black?

MELISANDRE: I will do as Jon Snow commands.

DAVOS: You serve Jon Snow now?

MELISANDRE: He’s the prince that was promised.

DAVOS: Forgive me, my lady, I thought that was Stannis.

MELISANDRE walks away from DAVOS and down into the courtyard. DAVOS follows her.

DAVOS: What happened down there?

MELISANDRE: There was a battle. Stannis was defeated.

MELISANDRE continues to walk away, but DAVOS grabs her arm to stop her.

DAVOS: And Shireen? What happened to the princess?

BRIENNE approaches.

BRIENNE: I saw what happened. I saw Stannis’ forces defeated in the field.

DAVOS: My lady, I’m Ser Davos Seaworth.

BRIENNE: We’ve met before. I was Kingsguard to Renly Baratheon. Before Renly was assassinated with bloodmagic.

BRIENNE stares at MELISANDRE.

DAVOS: That’s in the past now.

BRIENNE: Yes, it’s in the past. It doesn’t mean I forget. Or forgive. He admitted it, you know.

DAVOS: Who did?

BRIENNE: Stannis. Just before I executed him.

BRIENNE walks away. MELISANDRE walks in the opposite direction. DAVOS stares at BRIENNE.
EXT. EYRIE TRAINING GROUNDS - DAY
ROBIN is aiming at a target with a bow and arrow. He shoots, but the arrow falls short. YOHN ROYCE sighs to himself. ROBIN looks to YOHN ROYCE for approval. YOHN ROYCE smiles. A carriage approaches, accompanied by several knights. The knight driving the carriages dismouts and extends the carriage steps. LITTLEFINGER emerges from the carriage.

LITTLEFINGER (to ROBIN): The Defender of the Vale!

ROBIN: Uncle Petyr!

ROBIN drops the bow and arrow and runs to LITTLEFINGER. They embrace.

LITTLEFINGER: My lord. Come and see.

LITTLEFINGER ushers ROBIN to the rear of the carriage.

LITTLEFINGER: I missed your name day. Go on.

ROBIN and LITTLEFINGER pull a sheet from the back of the carriage, revealing a cage with a falcon inside. The falcon squawks. ROBIN gasps.

ROBIN: A falcon!

LITTLEFINGER: A gyrfalcon. The greatest and rarest of birds.

YOHN ROYCE: Last time I saw you, Baelish, you told me you were taking Sansa Stark home with you to the Fingers.

LITTLEFINGER: Indeed I was.

YOHN ROYCE: And yet not long ago, we received reports that she has been married to Ramsay Bolton in Winterfell.

LITTLEFINGER: On our way to the Fingers, we were set upon by a large force of Bolton men. Seemed to know exactly when we were traveling and exactly whom we were transporting.

YOHN ROYCE: Do you take me for a fool?

LITTLEFINGER: Tell me, Lord Royce, how many people knew of my travel plans with Sansa Stark? I shared my intentions with you and no one else.

The ensuing conversation momentarily distracts ROBIN from admiring the falcon. YOHN ROYCE approaches LITTLEFINGER slowly.

YOHN ROYCE: Slander a man in his own home, you might find yourself crossing swords with him.

LITTLEFINGER: Your home is the Vale. The Lord of the Vale stands before us. And only his judgment concerns me.

YOHN ROYCE looks to ROBIN.

ROBIN: Shall we throw him through the Moon Door?

The surrounding knights begin to approach YOHN ROYCE. YOHN ROYCE walks closer to ROBIN.

YOHN ROYCE: My lord. My lord, I have always been faithful to House Arryn. To your father, to your mother, and now to you.

ROBIN: Do you believe him, Uncle Petyr?

YOHN ROYCE turns back to look at LITTLEFINGER.

LITTLEFINGER: Lord Royce has served the Vale well. He;s enjoyed a distinguished military career. If we could trust his absolute loyalty, he would make a capable commander in the wars to come.

YOHN ROYCE turns back to ROBIN.

YOHN ROYCE: You can trust my absolute loyalty, my lord.

LITTLEFINGER: I think he deserves one more chance. What do you say?

ROBIN: Fine.

YOHN ROYCE bows and walks a few feet away from the engagement.

LITTLEFINGER (to ROBIN): I bring good news. My friends in the North tell me Sansa has escaped Winterfell. I expect she’s headed to Castle Black where her brother serves as Lord Commander. But she won’t be safe there, not with the Boltons after her.

ROBIN: She’s my cousin. We should help her.

LITTLEFINGER: That was my instinct as well.

LITTLEFINGER turns and walks towards YOHN ROYCE.

LITTLEFINGER: Our lord has spoken. Gather the Knights of the Vale. The time has come to join the fray.

EXT. MEEREEN GREAT PYRAMID SEASIDE - DAY
A ship is entering the harbor. TYRION, VARYS, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM are standing on the shore watching its approach.

GREY WORM: You invite the enemy into our city?

TYRION: I did. As a clever man once told me, “We make peace with our enemies, not our friends.”

TYRION begins walking away. The others follow.

GREY WORM: I don’t make peace with the queen’s enemies. I kill the queen’s enemies.

TYRION: Yes, that’s the military approach. And how has that worked here in Meereen? I represent the diplomatic approach.

TYRION and VARYS begin ascending the stairs to the Great Pyramid.

MISSANDEI: Our queen tried to make peace with the Masters and they tried to murder her.

TYRION and VARYS turn back to face MISSANDEI and GREY WORM.

TYRION We enter these negotiations with open eyes. Trust me. My own recent experience with slavery has taught me the horrors of that institution.

MISSANDEI: How many days were you a slave?

TYRION stammers.

TYRION: Long enough to know.

MISSANDEI: Not long enough to understand.

TYRION and VARYS proceed up the steps. MISSANDEI and GREY WORM follow.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - COUNCIL CHAMBER

TYRION, VARYS, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM are sitting in attendance to three masters, YEZZAN ZO QAGGAZ, RAZDAL MO ERAZ, and BELICHO PAENYMION.

YEZZAN: I bought this dwarf for a single gold honor. And somehow you’ve risen to the top of the Great Pyramid of Meereen. It’s most impressive.

TYRION: And now you speak for the Good Masters of Astapor.Here’s to reversals of fortune.

RAZDAL: We came here to meet the queen and instead we’re greeted by a dwarf and a eunuch.

TYRION: Let’s make this simple, shall we? Tell me what you want.

BELICHO: We want you to leave Slaver’s Bay. Take your dragons and your mercenaries and go.

TYRION: Queen Daenerys won’t stay in Meereen forever. Her path takes her westward.

RAZDAL: When we last met, I offered her ships so she could return to Westeros where she belongs. She refused them.

MISSANDEI: She refused them because hundreds of thousands of men, women, and children still lived in chains.

RAZDAL: As they have since the dawn of time.

GREY WORM: Not anymore.

YEZZAN: You think you’re a free man now? You still follow orders. Just because your master has silver hair and tits doesn’t mean she’s not a master.

TYRION: Friends, friends, friends, please.

GREY WORM stares intently at YEZZAN.

TYRION: There have always been those with wealth and power and those with nothing. That is the way of the world. I’m not here to change the way of the world.

YEZZAN: Slavery is the way of our world.

TYRION: You don’t need slaves to make money. There haven’t been slaves in Westeros for hundreds of years and I grew up richer than any of you. But our queen recognizes that she erred by abolishing slavery without providing a new system to replace it. So here is the queen’s proposal. Slavery will never return to Meereen but she will give the other cities of Slaver’s Bay time to adjust to the new order.

YEZZAN: What does that mean?

TYRION: Instead of abolishing slavery overnight, we will give you seven years to end the practice.

The masters look at each others.

TYRION: Slaveholders will be compensated for their losses, of course, at fair prices. In exchange, you will cut off your support for the Sons of the Harpy.

YEZZAN: We do not support the Sons of the Harpy.

TYRION: Fine, fine, but you will cut it off all the same. I do hope you accept, my friends. You will not receive a better offer.

TYRION picks up a bell from the table beside him and rings it.

TYRION: Let us sail on the tide of freedom instead of being drowned by it. And as a parting gift to our honored guests…

Three women enter. Each one sits in the lap of one of the masters.

TYRION: Give freedom a chance. See if it doesn’t taste every bit as good as what came before.

TYRION exits. VARYS, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM follow.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID AUDIENCE CHAMBER

A group of commoner representatives are gathered together at the foot of the throne, whispering in Valyrian. TYRION, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM enter on the throne platform.

TYRION (speaking Valyrian): My friends! Large sorry...you wait so fat time.

MISSANDEI (to TYRION): Perhaps I should translate for you.

MAN #1: We speak the Common Tongue.

TYRION: Excellent.

MAN #2: You met with the slavers today.

TYRION: I did.

MAN #1: Our brothers and sister died fighting these scum. Now you invite them to our city and drink wine with them.

TYRION: I imagine this room was built so the rulers could intimidate the ruled.

TYRION begins to descend the steps towards the men. MISSANDEI and GREY WORM follow.

TYRION: But I am not your ruler. I’m not the Breaker of Chains. I’m not the Unburnt. And I am certainly not the Mother of Dragons.

TYRION and company reach the bottom of the steps so they are face to face with the men.

MAN #1: You are a stranger here. So why do you represent Meereen in these talks with our enemies?

TYRION: Because our queen chose me as her advisor. Until she returns from her travels --

MAN #2: When does she return?

TYRION: Soon. You have my word.

MAN #1: We don’t know you. We don’t trust you. We know Torgo Nudho. We fight with him against the Masters. We trust him.

TYRION: And that is exactly why Grey Worm took part in these negotiations. As commander of the Unsullied, he knows hot to defeat the slavers and he knows when it is time to make peace.

MAN #2: You have made peace with the slavers?

TYRION: We offered terms.

MAN #1 (speaking Valyrian): And you, Grey Worm? You want to drink wine with these men? The men who tore us from our mothers’ arms and sold us at auction like cattle?

GREY WORM (speaking Valyrian): I am a soldier, not a politician. But if there is a chance for peace -- a just peace -- we should take it.

MAN #2 (speaking Valyrian): Missandei, you know what these men are. How can you trust them?

MISSANDEI (speaking Valyrian): I do not trust them. I will never trust them.

MISSANDEI pauses and looks at TYRION.

MISSANDEI (speaking Valyrian): But as a wise man once said, “We make peace with our enemies, not our friends.”

TYRION smiles.

CUT TO: MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID SEASIDE

TYRION, GREY WORM, and MISSANDEI are walking together.

GREY WORM: Do not use me for your lies.

TYRION: Those men respect you.

GREY WORM: They respect me because they know who I am. They know I am loyal.

TYRION: As do I.

GREY WORM: I am loyal to my queen, not you. If you betray her work, you are my enemy.

TYRION: I am not betraying her work. I am trying to save her city.

MISSANDEI: You promised the slavers they could keep slavery.

TYRION: For a short time.

MISSANDEI: Seven years is not a short time for a slave.

TYRION: You’re right. Slavery is a horror that should be ended at once. War is a horror that should be ended at once. I can’t do both today.

GREY WORM: You are wrong to trust these men.

TYRION: I don’t trust the Masters. I trust their self-interest. They’re trustworthy if they’re convinced that working with me is in their self-interest.

GREY WORM: You don’t know them. You don’t understand them. We are not human in their eyes. They look at me and see a weapon. They look at her and see a whore.

TYRION: They look at me and they see a misshapen little beast. Their contempt is their weakness. They’ll underestimate us every time and we will use that to our advantage.

GREY WORM: You will not use them. They will use you. That is what they do.

EXT. ESSOS MOUNTAIN RANGE - DAY

JORAH and DAARIO are walking to the top of a mountain crag. JORAH lags behind and stops to catch his breath. DAARIO turns back to him.

DAARIO: You all right? Why don’t you sit and catch your breath?

JORAH: I’m fine.

DAARIO chuckles.

DAARIO: I don’t think you could ride the dragon. 20 years ago, maybe.

JORAH: What?

DAARIO: Our queen. She’s wild, you know. Don’t let her size fool you. It’s hard enough for me and I’m a young man. You, I don’t think your heart could take it.

JORAH stares at DAARIO for a few moments and then continues along the path.

DAARIO: Must make you angry that our queen chose me.

JORAH: Makes me sad. You’ll disappoint her before long. She’ll move on.

DAARIO: We’ll all disappoint her before long.

JORAH turns back to face DAARIO.

JORAH: We need each other right now. After we’re done needing each other --

DAARIO: Oh, I don’t want to fight you, Jorah the Andal. What do I have to gain? If I win, I’m the shit who killed an old man. If I lose, I’m the shit who was killed by an old man.

JORAH: You didn’t get much discipline as a child, did you?

DAARIO: None.

JORAH and DAARIO crawl to the edge of the ridge and look below. Vaes Dothrak sprawls across the valley floor.

JORAH: The road running through the Horse Gate, they call that the godsway.

JORAH points to the eastern division of Vaes Dothrak, and then to the western division.

JORAH: Eastern Market, Western Market. When Khal Drogo died, she was supposed to come here and join the Dosh Khaleen, the widows of the dead khals. That’s where they would have taken her, the Temple of the Dosh Khaleen.

JORAH stands and walks off to the side. He begins undoing his sword belt.

DAARIO: What are you doing?

JORAH: It’s forbidden to carry weapons in the sacred city.

DAARIO: Isn’t it forbidden to sneak into their city and steal their khaleesi?

JORAH: If they spot us and we’re unarmed, we’ll say we’re traders heading for the Western Market. But if they see weapons…

DAARIO: You’re asking a dog to hand over his teeth.

JORAH: There’s 100,000 of them down there. We can’t fight our way out. We wait till dark, and then we’ll find her.

DAARIO hands over his weapons, except for his dagger. JORAH holds his hand out for the dagger.

DARRIO: Uh…

DAARIO flips the knife around in his hand.

DAARIO: I’m very attached to this knife.

DAARIO kisses and strokes the knife, then motions to hand it to JORAH. He spots the patch of greyscale on JORAH’s arm through a hole in his sleeve. JORAH pinches the fabric of his sleeve together to cover up the greyscale.

JORAH: Don’t worry. it didn’t touch you.

DAARIO: You know what happens?

JORAH: I know what happens.

DAARIO gestures with the dagger.

DAARIO: I’ll do it myself.

JORAH walks to the side and stares into space.

CUT TO: VAES DOTHRAK - NIGHT

Dothraki men and women are celebrating in the streets. JORAH and DAARIO are sneaking through the stables. They crouch down in front of a railing and see a Dothraki man and woman fornicating.

DAARIO: I should have been born a Dothraki.

JORAH and DAARIO sneak into an alleyway. They move through the alley, but spot two Dothraki men coming their way. JORAH grabs DAARIO.

JORAH: Come on.

JORAN and DAARIO walk out to greet the Dothraki men. They proceed to speak in Dothraki.

JORAH: My friends...We wandered off from the Western Market and got lost. Could you show us the way back?

DOTHRAKI #1: What do you sell?

JORAH: Wine. Come down to my stall tomorrow, I’ll give you a cask of the Arbor’s finest.

DOTHRAKI #1: You’re not merchants.

The Dothraki man inclines his head towards his fellow man.

DOTHRAKI #1: Get the others.

The second Dothraki man runs down the alleyway. DAARIO darts after him. JORAH swings at the first Dothraki man, but misses. The Dothraki man knees him in the face, knocking him to the ground. DAARIO continues to pursue the other Dothraki man. JORAH strikes his foe twice, but both are blocked. The Dothraki man strikes back with a punch to the face that sends JORAH sprawling. In the alley, just before the other Dothraki man reaches the common area, DAARIO grabs him from behind, places his hand over his mouth, and then snaps his neck. JORAH is rebuffed by his foe a third time. He attempts to throw sand in the Dothraki man’s face, but he dodges out of the way. JORAH climbs to his knees, but the Dothraki man grabs him by the throat and begins choking him. DAARIO stabs the Dothraki man from behind, killing him.

DAARIO: Told you, I’m very attached to this knife.

DAARIO tucks the dagger away in his shirt. JORAH climbs to his feet.

DAARIO: You all right?

JORAH: If they find a body with a stab wound, the whole city will be looking for us.

DAARIO grabs a large rock and smashes the dead Dothraki man with it several times.

DAARIO: Huh.

CUT TO: VAES DOTHRAK - TEMPLE OF THE DOSH KHALEEN

DAENERYS is sitting among the Dosh Khaleen. The women whisper among themselves, but the leader sits beside DAENERYS. They begin to speak in Dothraki.

LEADER: Some of them don’t think Dothraki should breed with foreigners. They are stupid old women. They don’t realize that we have always diluted our blood. This one is Lhazareen. Her Khal found her hiding in a well after he burned her village. How old were you?

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: Twelve.

LEADER: A year later, she bore her Khal a daughter. How did he show his happiness?

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: He broke my ribs.

LEADER: We are not queens here, but the khals depend on us for our wisdom. Our lives have meaning.

DAENERYS: That is more than most have.

LEADER: When the khals meet for the Khalar Vezhven tomorrow night, I hope they let you live out your days with us. The other possibilities are not so pleasant.

DAENERYS: I need to make water.

LEADER: You can’t run from Dothraki. You know this.

DAENERYS: I will never run from Dothraki.

LEADER (to LHAZAREEN WOMAN): Go, show her.

The Lhazareen woman takes DAENERYS outside the temple. They walk together.

DAENERYS: I needed fresh air. The old women stink.

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: They do stink.

DAENERYS: You must have been very young when your Khal died.

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: Sixteen.

DAENERYS: Too bad he didn’t die sooner.

DAENERYS and the Lhazareen woman smile at each other.

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: Yes, too bad.

The pair round a bend to a secluded desert outcropping.

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: Is it true you have three dragons?

DAENERYS: Mm-hmm.

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: And they breathe fire?

DAENERYS: They do. Would you like to see them one day?

LHAZAREEN WOMAN: I am Dosh Khaleen. I can never leave Vaes Dothrak, until I rise as smoke from the pyre on the day I die.

DAARIO grabs the Lhazareen woman from behind, covers her mouth, and places his dagger against her neck. JORAH is standing behind DAARIO.

DAENERYS: No, don’t hurt her.

DAARIO: She’ll give us away.

JORAH: We have to go now.

DAENERYS grabs DAARIO’s dagger-carrying hand, and he drops it away from the Lhazareen woman’s neck.

DAENERYS: We will never get out of Vaes Dothrak alive.

JORAH: All we can do is try.

DAENERYS: No. We can do more than that. And you’re going to help me.

DAENERYS looks at the Lhazareen woman.

DAENERYS (speaking Dothraki): And you...Have faith in me, Khaleesi. Do not betray me.

The Lhazareen woman nods. DAENERYS looks at DAARIO. DAARIO slowly removes his hand from her mouth.

INT. GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR CELL
MARGAERY is sitting in the corner of her cell. SEPTA UNELLA enters, then guides MARGAERY out into the prayer room where the HIGH SPARROW waits. MARGAERY walks into the room and shields her eyes from the sunlight. SEPTA UNELLA pushes MARGAERY to her knees, then exits.

HIGH SPARROW: If I were to let you leave right now, where would you go? What would you seek out?

MARGAERY: I’d go to my brother, my husband, my family.

HIGH SPARROW: Of course, but for you, that means seeking out money, finery, power. Seeking out your family means seeking out sin. I’m not maligning you. I sought those things out, too. To the exclusion of all else. My father was a cobbler. He died with I was young and I took over his shop. He was a simple man and he made simple shoes. But I found that the more work I put into my shoes, the more people wanted them. Fine leather, ornamentation, detailing, and time. Time most of all. Dozens of hours spent on a single pair.

MARGAERY: Quality takes time.

HIGH SPARROW: Yes. I imagine you’ve worn a year of someone’s life on your back. The highborn liked to cover their feet with my time and they paid well for the privilege. I used their money to buy a taste of their lives for myself. Each time I indulged, I felt myself ascending to something better.

MARGAERY: And one day you walked through a graveyard and realized it was all for nothing and set out on the path to righteousness. Book of the Stranger, verse 25.

HIGH SPARROW: You know The Seven-Pointed Star.

MARGAERY: Septa Unella reads it to me. At me.

HIGH SPARROW: Yes, yes, she does enjoy reading at people. You’re close. But it wasn’t a graveyard. It was a feast. I bought old fine wine and young pretty girls and invited my friends to come share it all. We passed around the wine, passed around the women, and soon we fell into a stupor. I woke before dawn. I could barely stand. Everyone else was asleep on the couches or on the floor, lying in heaps next to their fine clothes. The truth of their bodies laid bare. I could smell them beneath the incense and the perfume and the fine food that had already started to turn. And I saw it with perfect clarity. I saw what my sins were. The gold I had, the wine I drank, the women I used, my ceaseless struggle to maintain my position. It was all part of a story. A story I was telling myself about who I was. A collection of lies that would disappear in the light. The people I was trying to climb away from, the beggars in the street, the poor, they were closer to the truth than I ever was.

MARGAERY: So what did you do?

HIGH SPARROW: I left to go and find them. I didn’t even put on my shoes. I walked out the door and never went back.

The HIGH SPARROW stands and extends his hand out to MARGAERY.

HIGH SPARROW: Come, let’s go and see him.

MARGAERY: Who?

HIGH SPARROW: Your brother.

CUT TO: GREAT SEPT OF BAELOR – LORAS’ CELL

MARGAERY enters her brother’s cell. The door closes and locks behind her. Loras is lying on the floor.

MARGAERY: Loras. Loras.

MARGAERY helps LORAS to his knees. He cries.

MARGAERY: Listen to me. You need to stay strong.

LORAS: I can’t stay strong. I never was strong.

MARGAERY: You are strong. You are the future of our house, the future of our family.

LORAS: I don’t care about that.

MARGAERY: Shh. Have you -- have you told them that? That you don’t care?

LORAS: I just want it to stop. Help me.

MARGAERY: They want me to help you. They want me told help tear you down. That’s why he’s letting me see you, I know it is. And if either of us give in to what they want, then they win.

LORAS: Let them win. Just make it stop. Please.

LORAS begins sobbing. MARGAERY embraces him.

MARGAERY: All right.

CUT TO: RED KEEP – TOMMEN'S CHAMBER

CERSEI is walking down the hall to TOMMEN’s chamber. She hears MAESTER PYCELLE talking.

MAESTER PYCELLE: And now, how to avert disaster with our current predicament. This High Sparrow. I have dealt with fanatics of every description, Your Grace. Not setting them off, that’s the most important thing. You are beset with enemies both within and without.

CERSEI enters the room

CERSEI: What are you doing here?

MAESTER PYCELLE: I am advising the king on our current predicament.

CERSEi: Leave.

MAESTER PYCELL: I am a member of the Small Council. The king’s small --

CERSEI: Is this a Small Council meeting?

MAESTER PYCELL: Obviously not. I’m here to lend my wisdom and my support.

TOMMEN: Thank you for your counsel, Grand Maester. That will be all for now.

MAESTER PYCELL: Your Grace.

MAESTER PYCELLE hobbles towards the door. As he leaves, he flashes CERSEI a smile. CERSEI closes the door.

CERSEI: Since I’ve missed the past several Small Coucil meetings, I wanted to speak to you about a few things.

TOMMEN: I’ve been thinking about the High Sparrow.

CERSEI: As have we all, unfortunately.

TOMMEN: We need to be careful in dealing with such a man. To prevent things from escalating any further. We have to be careful not to antagonize him. He has Margaery. We can’t put her at risk. He’s dangerous.

CERSEI takes TOMMEN by the chin.

CERSEI: Look at me. What did they do to me? To the king’s own mother?

TOMMEN looks down.

CERSEI: It’s all right. It's done. It’s in the past. And of course Margaery’s safety is paramount.

TOMMEN: You don’t like Margaery, do you?

CERSEI: Whether I like her or not is completely unimportant. Margaery is the queen. Queens must command respect. Kings even more so. Not just for their own sake, but for everyone’s. The High Sparrow has no respect for kings or queens. No respect for anything in this world. He has no use for the things of this world. He want to knock them down and replace them with what? With fantasies. With beggars in the street. With nothing.

TOMMEN: Mother...there’s something I want to tell you. Something the High Sparrow told me.

CERSEI: You’ve spoken with him?

TOMMEN: I promised him I wouldn’t tell anyone. If he found out I told --

CERSEI: It would be a breach of confidence which he would not take lightly, given his constant prattling about the truth. I am your mother. You can always trust me.

CUT TO: RED KEEP – SMALL COUNCIL CHAMBER

KEVAN and LADY OLENNA are waiting in the Small Council chamber for the meeting to start. CERSEI and JAIME enter.

CERSEI: The Small Council meeting has been postponed on the king’s orders.

KEVIN and LADY OLENNA stand up.

LADY OLENNA: I would have thought we were perfectly clear the first time. You’re not welcome.

CERSEI: You once spoke of your respect for our father because he understood the necessity of working with one’s rivals.

LADY OLENNA: My dear, you have been stripped of your dignity and authority, publicly shamed, and confined to the Red Keep. What’s left to work with?

JAIME: Cersei is the mother of the king. She has the king’s ear and his trust. And the king has been speaking regularly with the High Sparrow about Queen Margaery and Ser Loras.

CERSEI: The High Sparrow seized power knowing full well we'd bicker amongst ourselves instead of seizing it back. Here we are. Well done to us. Now the future of the Seven Kingdoms rest in his dirty, peasant hands. In a few days, he’ll have a trial for me. But before that, Queen Margaery will make her walk of atonement. Yes, Margaery will repent her sins before the good people of the city.

LADY OLENNA: Oh, no. That cannot happen. That will not happen.

CERSEi: I agree.

JAIME (to KEVAN): You’ve got the second largest army in Westeros. You'll bring them into the city, stop queen Margaery’s humiliation before it starts, and take her back into Crown custody.

KEVAN: The king has ordered me to take no action against the High Sparrow or the Faith Militant out of fear for the queen’s safety.

JAIME: You’ll take no action at all. When the Tyrell armies come, you will stand down. Are you expressly forbidden from standing down?

KEVAN: No, but if the king should call on me --

JAIME: The whole thing will be over before anyone can call on you to do anything. When the High Sparrow is in custody or dead, preferably, and Margaery's back at Tommen’s side, do you think the king will be angry at the outcome?

CERSEI: You hate these fanatics as much as we do. You hate what they’ve done to your son. Do you want Lancel back or have you given him up for good?

KEVAN: Of course I want him back.

CERSEI: Then stand aside and let the people that took him from you be destroyed.

KEVAN: If it doesn’t go as planned, the Sparrows have many friends in the city. We’ll have civil war. Many will die.

LADY OLENNA: Many will die no matter what we do. Better them than us.

EXT. IRON ISLANDS - HARBOR
THEON approaches Pyke Castle by boat.

CUT TO: PYKE CASTLE – GREAT HALL

THEON enters. YARA is sitting by the fire.

YARA: They told me you were home and I didn’t believe it. “Theon Greyjoy?” I said. “He’s dead. He’s been dead a long time." He let you go?

THEON: I escaped.

YARA turns and looks at THEON.

YARA: I can’t hear you.

THEON: I escaped.

YARA stands up and then walks towards THEON.

YARA: Look at me. Look at me! Men died trying to rescue you. Good men. My men.

THEON: I’m sorry.

YARA: You were my brother. You’re a spoiled little cunt, but you were my brother and I risked everything for you and you betrayed me.

THEON: I know. I know and I’m sorry.

YARA: Stop saying that.

THEON: He broke me. He broke me into a thousand pieces.

YARA: I know.

THEON: You don’t know.

YARA: He send us one of those pieces. That’s why I came for you.

THEON sobs.

YARA: Why did you come here?

THEON: Where else could I go?

YARA: You heard father was dead and thought you’d claim the crown?

THEON: No, no. I only heard he died after we docked.

YARA: You happen to show up on Pyke right before the Kingsmoot?

THEON: I didn’t know.

YARA: You think any Ironborn wants you to be king? After what you’ve done?

THEON: I don’t want to be king.

YARA: What do you want?

THEON: I should’ve listened to you. You’re the only one --

YARA: That doesn’t matter anymore. Stop crying. Look at me. Tell me what you want.

THEON: You should rule the Iron Islands. Let me help you.

INT. WINTERFELL – ROOM

RAMSAY peels an apple with a knife. The door opens. A guard ushers OSHA into the room. RAMSAY nods. The guard leaves and closes the door.

RAMSAY: They've cleaned you up nicely. You know who I am?

OSHA: A lord?

RAMSAY: Yes. A lord. You’ve seen my banners?

OSHA: The flayed man.

RAMSAY: Does that worry you at all?

OSHA: You eat them after?

RAMSAY: No.

OSHA: Then I’ve seen worse.

RAMSAY peels the skin of the apple and puts it on the table with the knife. OSHA looks at the knife. RAMSAY waves for OSHA to come to him. She walks towards him.

RAMSAY: You served the Starks?

OSHA: Aye. They put me in chains and put a sword at my throat, so I’ve served them.

RAMSAY: The Starks have been gone for a long time, but you kept protecting Rickon.

OSHA: He'd fetch a good price to the right buyer. I served his family a long time. Didn’t get no wages. Way I see it, I’m owed.

RAMSAY: Be that as it may, Rickon's not yours to sell anymore. He’s mine. So what use could I possibly have for you?

OSHA: I can give you what you want.

RAMSAY: Are you sure you know what that is?

OSHA comes closer and sits down on his lap. They kiss.

OSHA: Same thing men always want. And when they really want it, they give it a bath first.

OSHA slowly begins to reach for the knife on the table.

RAMSAY: You’re a good talker.

RAMSAY grabs OSHA by her hair and yanks her head back.

RAMSAY: I like that.

RAMSAY kisses OSHA'S neck. She reaches into his pants.

RAMSAY: You’re a much better talker than Theon Greyjoy.

OSHA: That so?

RAMSAY: I had to work hard to get him talking. But he talked. They all do.

OSHA's hand inches closer to the knife.

RAMSAY: He told me everything. All about the Stark boys. Who helped them escape, and how she did it.

OSHA gets up and tries to stab RAMSAY with the knife, but RAMSAY stabs her in the neck first. She falls on the ground, with blood running from her neck. She dies. RAMSAY cleans his knife and continues to peel the apple. He bites a piece.

EXT. CASTLE BLACK – COURTYARD

MAN: Open the gate!

The gate opens and a knight from the Bolton family enters.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK – MESS HALL

SANSA, JON SNOW, BRIENNE, TORMUND, and DOLOROUS EDD are eating at a table. SANSA looks at the meat on her fork. JON SNOW, DOLOROUS EDD, and TORMUND eat vigorously. BRIENNE looks around at the men eating. TORMUND stares intently at BRIENNE. BRIENNE looks away. TORMUND smiles. DOLOROUS EDD notices their interaction.

DOLOROUS EDD (to SANSA): Sorry about the food. It’s not what we’re known for.

SANSA: That’s all right. There are more important things.

A Night's Watchman enters the room and holds out a scroll to JON SNOW.

MAN: A letter for you, Lord Commander.

JON SNOW: I’m not Lord Commander anymore.

JON SNOW takes the letter. The man leaves. JON SNOW sees the seal of House Bolton. He opens the scroll and starts reading.

JON SNOW: "To the traitor and bastard Jon Snow. You allowed thousands of wildlings past the Wall. You have betrayed your own kind. You have betrayed the North. Winterfell is mine, bastard. Come and see. Your brother Rickon is in my dungeon.

JON SNOW looks at SANSA.

JON SNOW: His direwolf's skin is on my floor. Come and see. I want my bride back. Send her to me, bastard, and I will not trouble you or your wildling lovers. Keep her from me and I will ride north and slaughter every wildling man, woman, and babe living under your protection. You will watch as I skin them living. You --

SANSA: Go on.

JON SNOW: It's just more of the same.

JON SNOW puts the letter away, but SANSA takes it and continues reading.

SANSA: "You will watch as my soldiers take turns raping your sister. You will watch as my dogs your wild little brother. Then I will spoon your eyes from their sockets and let my dogs do the rest. Come and see. Ramsay Bolton, Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North.

JON SNOW: Lord of Winterfell and Warden of the North.

SANSA: His father's dead. Ramsay killed him. And now he has Rickon.

JON SNOW: We don’t know that.

SANSA: Yes, we do.

TORMUND: How many men does he have in his army?

SANSA: I heard him say 5,000 once when he was talking about Stannis’s attack.

JON SNOW (to TORMUND): How many do you have?

TORMUND: That can march and fight? 2,000. The rest are children and old people.

SANSA (to JON SNOW): You're the son of the last true Warden of the North. Northern families are loyal. They’ll fight for you if you ask.

SANSA takes JON SNOW's hand.

SANSA: A monster has taken our home and our brother. We have to go back to Winterfell and save them both.

JON SNOW nods.

INT. VAES DOTHRAK – TEMPLE OF THE DOSH KHALEEN

All the khals are gathered in council. They speak in Dothraki.

KHAL MORO: It is forbidden to spill blood in the sacred city. It is forbidden to carry weapons in the sacred city.

KHAL #1: So we don’t spill blood.

KHAL MORO: Well… there’s always a little blood.

KHAL #1: Someone crushed his head with a rock.

KHAL MORO: Aggo belonged to my khalaser. He served me well. He got his head smashed in by a rock. Fuck Aggo.

KHAL #1 sits down.

KHAL MORO: Bring in Drogo’s widow.

DAENARYS enters, ushered by the Lhazareen woman and the leader of the Dosh Khaleen. The khals bow their heads.

KHAL #2: Who cares about her? She’s a midget.

KHAL #1: I like her.

KHAL #2: She’s paler than milk.

KHAL #3: I’d like to know what a khaleesi tastes like.

KHAL #1: Good. You can suck my dick.

The Khals laugh.

KHAL MORO: She belongs with the Dosh Khaleen.

KHAL #4: The Wise Masters of Yunkai want her. They’re offering ten thousand horses In exchange. What's worth more, one pink little girl or ten thousand horses?

KHAL MORO: Fuck the Wise Masters in their perfumed asses. I’ll take their horses for myself.

DAENERYS: Don’t you want to know what I think?

All the khals raise their heads and stare at DAENERYS

KHAL MORO: You’d rather be sold to slavery? Or maybe you’d like to show Rhalko here what you taste like?

DAENERYS: No. I don’t want either of those things.

KHAL MORO: We don’t care what you want. This is the Temple of the Dosh Khaleen. You have no voice here, unless you are Dosh Khaleen. Which you are not, until we decide you are.

DAENERYS: I know where I am. I have been here before. This is where the Dosh Khaleen pronounced my child the Stallion Who Mounts the World.

KHAL MORO: And what happened? You trusted a sorceress, like a fool. Your baby is dead because of you. And so is Khal Drogo.

DAENERYS: This is where Drogo promised to take his khalasar west to where the world ends. To ride wooden horses across the Black Salt Sea as no khal has done before. He promised to kill the men in their iron suits and tear down their stone houses. He swore to me before the Mother of Mountains.

KHAL MORO: And you were dumb enough to believe him?

DAENERYS: And here, now, what great matters do the Great Khals discuss? Which little villages you’ll raid, how many girls you’ll get to fuck, how many horses you’ll demand in tribute. You are small men. None of you are fit to lead the Dothraki. But I am. So I will.

The khals laugh.

KHAL MORO: All right. No Dosh Khaleen for you. Instead we’ll take turns fucking you. And then we’ll let our bloodriders fuck you.

KHAL MORO stands.

KHAL MORO: And If there’s anything left of you, we’ll give our horses a turn. You crazy cunt. Did you really think we would serve you?

DAENERYS lays her hand on a fire pit.

DAENERYS: You’re not going to serve. You’re going to die.

DAENERYS knocks down all the fire pits one by one. The khals cower away from the flame. The flame begins to cover the entire temple. The khals run to the door and try to escape, but the door has been barred. JORAH and DAARIO watch the temple burning from the outside. The Dothraki people gather around the burning temple. DAENERYS grabs the final fire pit and knocks it in KHAL MORO's direction. The fire engulfs the entire temple and kills all the khals. DAENERYS walks out of the fire, unharmed and naked. All the Dothraki bow to DAENERYS. JORAH and DAARIO walk up to the steps burning temple. JORAH bows to DAENERYS. DAARIO stares at her and then bows.


INT. CASTLE BLACK - SANSA’S ROOM

SANSA is knitting. There is a knock at the door.
SANSA: Yes?

A man of the Night’s Watch enters.

MAN: For you, my lady.

The man hands SANSA a scroll. It bears the mockingbird sigil of House Baelish. SANSA unrolls the scroll and reads it.

SANSA: How far is Mole’s Town?

CUT TO: MOLE’S TOWN - SHACK

LITTLEFINGER is standing in the center of the room. SANSA and BRIENNE enter. LITTLEFINGER turns to greet them.

LITTLEFINGER: Sansa. Lady Brienne. When I heard you had escaped WInterfell, I feared the worst. You have no idea how happy I am to see you unharmed.

SANSA: Unharmed? What are you doing here?

LITTLEFINGER: I rode north with the Knights of the Vale to come to your aid. They’re encamped at Moat Cailin as we speak.

SANSA: To come to my aid? Did you know about Ramsay? If you didn’t know, you’re an idiot. If you did know, you’re my enemy.

SANSA steps closer to LITTLEFINGER.

SANSA: Would you like to hear about our wedding night? He never hurt my face. He needed my face, the face of Ned Stark’s daughter. But the rest of me, he did what he liked with the rest of me as long as I could still give him an heir. What do you think he did?

LITTLEFINGER: I can’t begin to contemplate --

SANSA: What do you think he did to me?

BRIENNE: Lady Sansa asked you a question.

LITTLEFINGER: He beat you.

SANSA: Yes, he enjoyed that. What else do you think he did?

LITTLEFINGER: Sansa, I --

SANSA: What else?

LITTLEFINGER: Did he cut you?

SANSA: Maybe you did know about Ramsay all along.

LITTLEFINGER: I didn’t know.

SANSA: I thought you knew everyone’s secrets.

LITTLEFINGER: I made a mistake, a horrible mistake. I underestimated a stranger.

SANSA: The other things he did, ladies aren’t supposed to talk about those things, but I imagine brothel keepers talk about them all the time. I can still feel it. I don’t mean in my tender heart it still pains me so. I can still feel what he did in my body standing here right now.

LITTLEFINGER: I’m so sorry.

SANSA: You said you would protect me.

LITTLEFINGER: And I will. You must believe me when I tell you that I will.

SANSA: I don’t believe you anymore. I don’t need you anymore. You can’t protect me. You won’t even be able to protect yourself if I tell Brienne to cut you down. And why shouldn’t I?

LITTLEFINGER: Do you want me to beg for my life? If that’s what you want, I will. Whatever you ask that is in my power, I will do.

SANSA: What if I want you to die here and now?

LITTLEFINGER: Then I will die.

SANSA: You freed me from the monsters who murdered my family and you gave me to other monsters who murdered my family. Go back to Moat Cailin. My brother and I will take back the North on our own. I never want to see you again.

LITTLEFINGER: I would do anything to undo what’s been done to you. I know that I can’t. Will you allow me to say one more thing before I go? Your great-uncle Brynden the Blackfish has gathered what remains of the Tully forces and retaken Riverrun. You might consider seeking him out. The time may come when you need an army loyal to you.

SANSA: I have an army.

LITTLEFINGER: Your brother’s army.

LITTLEFINGER walks beside SANSA.

LITTLEFINGER: Half-brother.

LITTLEFINGER exits.
INT. HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - TRAINING ROOM
ARYA and the WAIF are dueling with staves atop the sparring platform. They both strike many blows, all of them deflected by the other. The WAIF feigns and trips ARYA with a blow to the back of the legs. ARYA falls to the ground. The WAIF points her staff in ARYA’s face.

WAIF: You’re not ready. You should go home before it’s too late.

The WAIF begins to walk away. ARYA jumps to her feet. The WAIF turns around and drops her staff, then approaches ARYA. ARYA swings at the WAIF several times, but the WAIF dodges and redirects the blows. The WAIF kicks ARYA in her midsection, sending her off the platform. ARYA hops back on the platform and advances. The WAIF disarms ARYA and punches her multiple times, knocking her off the platform and onto the ground.

WAIF: You’ll never be one of us, Lady Stark.

The Faceless Man taking on the visage of JAQEN H’GHAR appears.

JAQEN: She has a point.

JAQEN walks away. ARYA follows. They enter the Hall of Faces.

JAQEN: None of the first Faceless Men were born to lords and ladies. They began as slaves in the mines of Valyria.

ARYA: Who was the first?

JAQEN: He was no one. The Many-Faced God taught him how to shed his face and how to give the gift. The man taught others in exchange for their service. Many served, many more gifts were given. Soon all the masters and overseers were gone and the Faceless Men fled.

ARYA: Where did they go?

JAQEN: Here. They founded the Free City of Braavos and built this house. These were the faces they wore in life when they were not wearing others. The first Faceless Men. And now a girl is one of them, if a girl desires.

ARYA: A girl has no desires.

JAQEN holds up a small bottle.

ARYA: Who?

ARYA takes the bottle.

JAQEN: An actress who calls herself Lady Crane. She performs at the theater in Sheelba Square. A girl has been given a second chance. There will not be a third. One way or another, a face will be added to the hall.

CUT TO: BRAAVOS - SHEELBA SQUARE

Actors are performing a play. An audience has gathered to watch. ARYA is among them. On stage, an actor named IZEMBARO dressed as ROBERT BARATHEON walks back and forth. Two prop men mirror his movements, carrying a tarp that displays a forest landscape. Another prop man carries a cut-out of a boar and rams it into the actor’s rear end. The sound man makes a farting noise.

IZEMBARO: Ahh!

ARYA laughs along with the crowd. The prop man strikes IZEMBARO with the boar prop again, this time in front. The actor recoils and the prop men replace the forest background with a black background.

IZEMBARO: Oh, murdered by a boar. The great big hairy whore. He dug in his tusks and dug out my guts and soon I am no more.

IZEMBARO produces an intestine prop from his garb. He staggers, but is supported by another actor, CLARENZO, portraying JOFFREY.

CLARENZO: Oh, come, Father, in bed you must lie. I love you, Father. Please don’t die.

IZEMBARO prop slaps CLARENZO. ARYA laughs with the crowd.

IZEMBARO: Shut up, you swine! Cersei, more wine.

The actor portraying Joffrey falls to his knees in the front of the stage. LADY CRANE, portraying CERSEI, appears on the stage and walks to him.

LADYC RANE: I feel the winds of winter as they lick across the land. And our son alone on that cold, cold throne without a guiding hand. Who will teach him strength? Who will teach him grace? To whom will he turn when it’s time to learn to look darkness in the face?

IZEMBARO: Ned stark will do fine. Now bring me more wine.

BOBONO, portraying TYRION, appears and fills his glass. CAMELLO, portraying NED, appears and adjusts his crotch.

CAMELLO: Ooh! Ooh, what’s happened here, then?

BOBONO: He brought you here, Ned Stark, ‘cause you’re the brightest fellow in the land. You should be king of us all and I should be your Hand.

CAMELLO: We men of the North are right good hands at keeping people lawful.

CAMELLO gestures to IZEMBARO.

CAMELLO: I’d ask him for permission, but he smells too bloody awful.

The crowd laughs. ARYA looks around at them. She does not laugh.

IZEMBARO: I die! I die! And here I now must lie. Oh, woe. Oh, no. Oh, I am about to go.

The sound man makes a farting noise.

LADY CRANE: Will you stay on as Joffrey’s Hand?

CAMELLO: The Iron Throne’s what I demand.

LADY CRANE: You cannot.

CAMELLO: I can.

LADY CRANE: You will not.

CAMELLO: I will.

LADY CRANE: You dare not.

CAMELLO: I dare yes.

LADY CRANE: The line of succession.

CAMELLO: What’s that mean?

LADY CRANE: The proper progression.

CAMELLO: What’s that mean?

LADY CRANE: The lawful ascension.

CAMELLO: What’s that mean?

The crowd laughs. Music plays. The crowd claps and cheers. The actors change scenes. CLARENZO is sitting on a cut-out of the Iron Throne. LADY CRANE and CAMELLO are standing next to him. BOBONO stands off to the side on a step stool.

CAMELLO: So move along, give me my chair and there won’t be no more trouble.

CLARENZO prop slaps CAMELLO. CAMELLO stumbles into the grasp of BOBONO, who sends him to his knees.

CAMELLO: But we had a deal all done and dusted.

Two prop men carrying spears lift CAMELLO to his feet.

CAMELLO: I’m starting to think you can’t be trusted.

The prop men usher CAMELLO offstage. As they change the scene, CLARENZO and LADY CRANE take center stage. LADY CRANE dons CLARENZO with a crown. In a new scene, CAMELLO is on a cut-out chopping block. CLARENZO and LADY CRANE stand to one side, and a prop man dressed as an executioner stands on the other. BIANCA, portraying Sansa, appears.

BIANCA: Save my father.

LADY CRANE: Truly you should. Killing the man will do you no good.

BIANCA: Save him, please.

LADY CRANE: Show him mercy. Show the people what a good king should be.

CLARENZO: Good people, you may all relax. My father’s friend shall be spared the —

The prop man portraying the executioner swings his axe. CAMELLO ducks behind the chopping block and tosses out a prop head.

BIANCA: Father! No! Oh, father.

BIANCA takes the prop head. The executioner prop man wrenches the head from her grasp and tosses it to the other prop men.

BOBONO: Worry not! All is well. I have here a decree from my father Tywin Lannister, the richest man you’ll see. He proclaims me Hand of the King. The position’s mine for life. And he’s give me permission to take Sansa as my wife.

He prop slaps CLARENZO in the face.

BOBONO: You’ll learn that what I lack in height I make up for in appetite.

He rips open her shirt, exposing her breasts.

BOBONO: So let’s forget about your plight, and go rehearse our wedding night.

CUT TO: BACKSTAGE

All the actors from the play are gathered together, taking a break and attending to their costumes. The director, IZEMBARO, joins them. CLARENZO is examining his penis.

CLARENZO: It’s a wart. Two warts. I’ve got two fucking warts on my cock.

CAMELLO: Well, don’t worry, love. They usually go away in five or six years.

CAMELLO approaches ARYA and tosses her his costume cloak.

CAMELLO: Oh, wash this, darling. It stinks of me.

IZEMBARO (to BIANCA): You can do better, Bianca, dear. You must do.

BIANCA: I had two lines.

IZEMBARO: There are no small parts. You rang very false.

BIANCA: I rang very false?

BOBONO: What you need, love, is for someone to ring you true.

BIANCA slaps BOBONO upside the head.

BIANCA (to IZEMBARO): You weren’t complaining about me last night.

BOBONO approaches LADY CRANE.

BOBONO: May I get you some wine, Lady Crane?

LADY CRANE: I’m a rum girl, Bobono. You need to know that if we’re going to be intimate.

BOBONO: Of course we’re going to be intimate.

LADY CRANE: It’s only a matter of time.

LADY CRANE uncorks her bottle of rum and pours herself a glass. The holds her drink up to BOBONO.

LADY CRANE: To our children.

BOBONO: May they have your talent.

LADY CRANE: And your filthy mind.

They clink their glasses together and drink.

CUT TO: HOUSE OF BLACK AND WHITE - WASHING ROOM

JAQEN is washing a body. ARYA is standing by.

ARYA: A girl will poison the rum. Lady Crane is the only one who drinks it.

JAQEN looks at ARYA and nods.

ARYA: If a girl could use one of the faces from the hall…

JAQEN: A girl is not ready.

ARYA: She’s a good actress.

JAQEN: So a man has heard.

ARYA: Seems like a decent woman.

JAQEN: Does death only come for the wicked and leave the decent behind?

ARYA: No. Who wants her dead?

JAQEN: That does not matter. The price was paid.

ARYA: The younger actress. She’s jealous because Lady Crane is better.

JAQEN: A girl must decide if she wants to serve the Many-Faced God.

ARYA: A girl has decided.

JAQEN: A servant does not ask questions.

INT. GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE
BRAN is clinging to the roots of the tree. His eyes are glazed white.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - UNKNOWN LAND

BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN are walking together. They approach a weirwood tree encircled by many stones. The stones form a spiral. A Child of the Forest runs between the stones. BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN follow her. They find a group of the Children crouching in a circle, whispering to each other. LEAF stands, carrying a shard of dragonglass. She approaches a man who is bound to the weirwood tree.

MAN: No! No! No!

LEAF slowly drives the shard into the man’s heart until it disappears inside his chest. The man’s eyes turn blue.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

LEAF is watching BRAN. BRAN releases the root of the tree and wakes up from his vision.

BRAN: It was you. You made the White Walkers.

LEAF: We were at war. We were being slaughtered. Our sacred trees cut down. We needed to defend ourselves.

BRAN: From whom?

LEAF: From you. From men.

LEAF exits. BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN stare at each other.

EXT. PYKE - SEASIDE CLIFFS
All the Ironborn are gathered together. YARA, THEON, and AERON stand among them.

AERON: We speak in the presence of the Drowned God. In his name we father today to choose a new king as our leader. Who makes a claim?

YARA walks out into the open.

YARA: I am Yara Greyjoy, daughter of Balon Greyjoy, King of the Iron Islands. I claim the Salt Throne.

MAN #1: We’ve never had a queen. Not once.

YARA: There are many things we’ve never done. We’ve never made our mark upon the world. The great lords of Westeros pay us no mind until our little raids buzz through their kingdoms long enough to become a nuisance. Then they swat us down. They conquer us, humiliate us, and go right back to forgetting we exist.

ALL: Aye!

YARA: We are a sea people.

ALL: Aye!

YARA: Our god is a sea god.

ALL: Aye!


YARA: When I am queen, we will build a fleet that —

MAN #2: You shall not be queen!

YARA: I am not finished!

MAN #2: Yes, you are! A woman will not lead us. Not when Balon’s own male heir has returned.

The man looks at THEON. THEON emerges from the crowd and turns to face them.

THEON: I am Theon Greyjoy...last living son of Balon Greyjoy.

THEON points at YARA.

THEON: And she is your rightful ruler. Those of you that have sailed under her, and there are many of you here, you know what she is.

ALL: Aye!

THEON: She is a reaver!

ALL: Aye!

THEON: She is a warrior!

ALL: Aye!

THEON: She is ironborn!

ALL: Aye!

THEON: We will find no better leader. This is our queen.

THEON and YARA stare at each other. The men cheer and chant YARA’s name.

EURON: I’m Euron Greyjoy.

The men fall silent. EURON appears and walks through the crowd towards YARA and THEON.

EURON: I claim the Salt Throne.

EURON emerges from the crowd and stands before YARA and THEON. He looks at YARA.

EURON: Niece.

EURON looks at THEON and then walks up to him.

EURON: Nephew. Little Theon.

EURON pats THEON on the cheek, then turns to face the crowd.

EURON: Heard you managed to fuck things right into the ground. Captured a castle you couldn’t keep. Got yourself taken prisoner. Even heard you have no cock.

The Ironborn laugh. EURON points at YARA.

EURON: Explains why you think a woman can be king.

YARA: When did you return, Uncle?

EURON: A few days ago. I had some things to take care of. Long overdue.

YARA: I’m glad you’re here. Now I know what my first act as queen will be. To execute the man who killed my father.

The men murmur to each other.

EURON: I did. I killed him. Threw him right over a rope bridge and watched him fall. He was leading us nowhere and we would still be heading there if it weren’t for me. No one loved him. No one wanted to follow him. He led ius into two wars we couldn’t win. I apologize to you all for not killing him years ago.

THEON: That would have been hard to do. You weren’t here. Last I heard, you were gallivanting around the world having a grand old time.

EURON: Gallivanting? That the sort of thing you start to say once your dick gets chopped off?

The Ironborn laugh.

EURON: Did the great lord of Westeros teach you words like that?

THEON: You were gone. Yara was here. Being Ironborn. Leading Ironborn. Getting ready to bring us back to glory.

EURON: And how will she do that?

YARA: I will build the largest fleet the world has ever seen.

EURON: Right idea, except I’m the one who’s going to build the Iron Fleet because I’m the one who knows how to use it. I’ve been all over the world. I’ve seen more of it than all of you combined. And across the sea there is a person who hates the great lords of Westeros just as much as we do. Someone with a large army, three large dragons, and no husband. I’m going to build that fleet and I’m going to gallivant right over and give it to Daenerys Targaryen along with my big cock.

The Ironborn laugh.

YARA: You’re going to seduce the Dragon Queen?


EURON: I’m not going to seduce her. The Iron Fleet will seduce her. And together we’re going to take the Seven Kingdoms. I wasn’t born to be king. I paid the iron price and here I stand.

The Ironborn cheer and chant EURON’s name. THEON and YARA exchange a glance.

CUT TO: PYKE - BEACH

Several Ironborn carrying flags stand on the shore. EURON is kneeling in the water. AERON pushes him underwater. Meanwhile, YARA, THEON, and some Ironborn run through a cave tunnel.

AERON: May Euron, your servant, be born again from the sea as you were. Bless him with salt. Bless him with stone. Bless him with steel.

THEON, YARA, and the men with them run out onto a beach and into awaiting rowboats.

AERSON: Listen to the waves. Listen to the god. He is speaking to us and he says we shall have no king but Euron Greyjoy. Let the sea wash your follies and your vanities away. Let the old Euron drown. Let his lungs fill with seawater.

EURON drowns.

AERON: Let the fish eat the scales off his eyes.

YARA, THEON, and the men board a large ship.

AERON: What is dead may never die, but rises again harder and stronger.

AERON releases his grip on EURON. Two Ironborn carrying EURON onto shore. AERON and the other Ironborn gathered in attendance all stare at EURON. EURON does not move.One man begins to walk closer to him. EURON gags and coughs. He props himself up on his arms and legs, then spits up water and gasps for air. AERON retrieves a crown made of driftwood and places it on EURON’s head.

AERON: What is dead may never die.

ALL: What is dead may never die.

The Ironborn cheer. EURON rises to his feet and looks around at the crowd.

EURON: Where are my niece and nephew? Let’s go murder them.

EURON leads AERON and the Ironborn up to a seaside cliff. They stare out at the ocean. A fleet of ships is sailing away from Pyke.

AERON: They stole our best ships.

EURON: Won’t be enough to save them.

EURON turns to face the Ironborn.

EURON: Go back to your homes. Chop down every tree you can find. Quarter-saw the timber and start building. I want every man bending planks. I want every woman spinning flax for sails. Build me a thousand ships and I will give you this world.

EXT. VAES DOTHRAK - CLIFFS
DAENERYS stands at the edge of the cliff, looking out at Vaes Dothrak. She turns to face JORAH and DAARIO, who are standing behind her.

DAENERYS (to JORAH): I banished you twice. You came back twice. And you saved my life. So I can’t take you back and I can’t send you away.

DAENERYS approaches JORAH, but he recoils.

JORAH: You must send me away.

JORAH rolls up his sleeve to reveal the greyscale covering his forearm.

DAENERYS: Is there a cure?

JORAH: I don’t know.

DAENERYS: How long does it take?

JORAH: I don’t know that either. But I’ve seen what happens when it goes far enough. I’ll end things before that.

DAENERYS begins to cry.

DAENERYS: I’m sorry. I’m so sorry.

JORAH: Don’t be. All I’ve ever wanted was to serve you. Tyrion Lannister was right. I love you. I’ll always love you. Goodbye, Khaleesi.

JORAH begins to walk away.

DAENERYS: Do not walk away from your queen, Jorah the Andal.

JORAH turns back to face DAENERYS. She approaches him.

DAENERYS: You have not been dismissed. You pledged yourself to me. You swore to obey my commands for the rest of your life.

JORAH nods.

DAENERYS: Well, I command you to find the cure wherever it is in this world. I command you to heal yourself and then return to me. When I take the Seven Kingdoms, I need you by my side.

CUT TO: VAES DOTHRAK - HORSE GATE

JORAH sits on a horse, watching DAENERYS and DAARIO lead the Dothraki horde out of Vaes Dothrak. He turns his horse around and starts off into the wilderness.

INT. MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID CONFERENCE ROOM
VARYS, MISSANDEI, and GREY WORM are gathered together. TYRION pours himself a glass of wine and joins them.

VARYS: In the last fortnight since our pact with the Masters, how many killings have been carried out by the Sons of the Harpy?

GREY WORM: None.

VARYS: And how many Masters have been butchered by the free men.

GREY WORM: Two, but that was the day of the pact. Since then, nothing.

VARYS: So it’s safe to say that a fragile peace has taken hold.

GREY WORM: For now.

VARYS: For now is the best we get in our profession.

TYRION: It’s not enough.

VARYS: Considering the city was on the brink of civil war, I’d say it’s a good start.

TYRION: It’s not enough for Meereen to have peace. They need to know Daenerys is responsible for it. The Sons of the Harpy have a good story. Resist the foreign invaders. Our queen has an even better story. Mother of Dragons, Breaker of Chains and...all that.

MISSANDEI: The people know who brought them freedom.

TYRION: Yes, but do they know who brought them security? Who brought about an end to the violence? We need someone the people trust, someone they know who cannot be bought or influenced.

VARYS: Sounds like quite the hero. Where would we find him?

TYRION: Who said anything about “him”?

CUT TO: MEEREEN - GREAT PYRAMID AUDIENCE CHAMBER

TYRION and VARYS stand on the plateau above the audience chamber. A woman stans at the bottom of the steps, and a man stand a few steps in front of her.

MAN (speaking Valyrian): You stand in the presence of Kinvara, High Priestess of the Red Temple of Volantis, the Flame of Truth, the Light of Wisdom, the First Servant of the Lord of Light.

The man steps aside. KINVARA walks up a few steps.

TYRION (speaking Valyrian): Welcome to Meereen.

KINVARA stops on the middle plateau.

TYRION: That’s about the extent of my Valyrian.

KINVARA says nothing.

TYRION: Thank you for travelling all this way. I know from personal experience how uncomfortable the journey can be.

TYRION looks at VARYS. KINVARA says nothing.

TYRION: The truth is we need your help. We had hoped that we could somehow persuade you to --

KINVARA: You don’t need to persuade me. I came to help.

KINVARA continues up the steps.

KINVARA: Daenerys Stormborn is the one who was promised. From the fire she was reborn to remake the world.

TYRION: Yes.

KINVARA: She has freed the slaves from their chains and crucified the Masters for their sins.

TYRION: She did indeed.

KINVARA: Her dragons are fire made flesh, a gift from the Lord of Light. But you heard all this before, haven’t you? On the Long Bridge of Volantis. The dragons will purify nonbelievers by the thousands, burning their sins and flesh away.

TYRION: Ideally we’d avoid purifying too many nonbelievers. The Mother of Dragons has followers of many different faiths.

KINVARA: You want your queen to be worshipped and obeyed. And while she’s gone, you want her advisors to be worshipped and obeyed.

TYRION: I’d settle for obeyed.

KINVARA: I will summon my most eloquent priests. They will spread the word. Daenerys has been sent to lead the people against the darkness in this war and in the great war still to come.

TYRION: That sounds most excellent --

VARYS: A man named Stannis Baratheon was anointed as the chosen one by one of your priestesses. He, too, had a glorious destiny. He attacked King’s Landing and was soundly defeated by the man standing beside me. Last I had heard, he’d been defeated again, this time at Winterfell and this time for good.

TYRION: We’d be most grateful for any support you could provide the queen.

VARYS: I suppose it’s hard for a fanatic to admit a mistake. Isn’t that the whole point of being a fanatic? You’re always right. Everything is the Lord’s will.

KINVARA: Everything is the Lord’s will. But men and women make mistakes. Even honest servants of the Lord.

VARYS: And you, an honest servant of the lord, why should I trust you to know any more than the priestess who counseled Stannis?

TYRION: My friend has a healthy skepticism of religion, but we are all loyal supporters of the queen.

VARYS nods. KINVARA takes two more steps. She is one step away from TYRION and VARYS.

KINVARA: Everyone is what they are and where they are for a reason. Terrible things happen for a reason. Take what happened to you, Lord Varys, when you were a child. If not for your mutilation at the hand of a second-rate sorcerer, you wouldn’t be here helping the Lord’s Chosen bring his light into the world. Knowledge has made you powerful. But there’s still so much you don’t know. Do you remember what you heard that night when the sorcerer tossed your parts in the fire? You heard a voice call out from the flames. Do you remember? Should I tell you what the voice said?

KINVARA approaches VARYS and places her hand on his arm.

KINVARA: Should I tell you the name of the one who spoke?

VARYS scrunches up his face and stares at KINVARA. KINVARA smiles.

KINVARA: We serve the same queen. If you are her true friend, you have nothing to fear from me.

KINVARA turns and walks back down the steps.

INT. GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE
BRAN lets a handful of sand run through his fingers. He lays back and then looks SUMMER, HODOR, and the THREE-EYED RAVEN. SUMMER and HODOR are sleeping, but the THREE-EYED RAVEN has his eyes open. BRAN picks up a wood chip and throws it at the THREE-EYED RAVEN. The THREE-EYED RAVEN does not stir. BRAN drags himself over to the roots of the tree and takes hold of them. His eyes turn white.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - UNKNOWN LAND

BRAN walks among the spiraling stones surrounding the weirwood tree from before, only now everything is covered in snow. He stares at the tree, then turns around. The army of the undead stands in attendance.

BRAN: What?

BRAN walks towards them, and then among their ranks. They do not react. He inspects several of them as he walks by. On the other side of the army, he finds the Night King and four White Walkers on horseback. The Night King stares at him. BRAN turns around to find the entire army of the undead staring at him. When he turns back around, the Night King is standing right behind him. He recoils, but the Night King grabs his forearm. He screams.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

BRAN screams as he releases the tree root and the vision ends. MEERA jumps to her feet.

BRAN: He saw me, the Night King! He saw me!

THREE-EYED RAVEN: He touched you.

LEAF and another Child of the Forest enter.

BRAN: I don’t know. He was close, but --

THREE-EYED RAVEN: He touched you.

BRAN pulls back his sleeve. There is a handprint on his forearm.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: He knows you are here. He’ll come for you.

BRAN: But he can’t get in.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: He can now. His mark is on you. You must leave, all of you.

MEERA: Come on, Hodor. Help me with the sledge.

HODOR: Hodor.

BRAN: I’m sorry. I didn’t mean to.

THREE-EYED RAVEN: The time has come.

BRAN: The time for what?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: For you to become me.

BRAN: But am I ready?

THREE-EYED RAVEN: No.

BRAN’s eyes turn white.

INT. CASTLE BLACK - DINING HALL
JON SNOW, SANSA, BRIENNE, DOLOROUS EDD, DAVOS, TORMUND, and MELISANDRE are gathered around a table. A map is spread out on the table with tokens indicating houses laid on its surface.

JON SNOW: We can’t defend the north from the Walkers and the south from the Boltons. If we want to survive, we need Winterfell, and to take Winterfell, we need more men.

DAVOS: Aside from the Starks and the Boltons, the most powerful houses in the North are the Umbers, the Karstarks, and the Manderlys.

DAVOS stands and moves some of the tokens to Winterfell.

DAVOS: The Umbers and the Karstarks have already declared for the Boltons, so we’re not doing so well there.

SANSA: The Umbers gave Rickon to our enemies. They can hang. But the Karstarks declared for Ramsay without knowing they had another choice.

DAVOS: I beg your pardon, my lady, but they know that a Stark beheaded their father. I don’t think we can count on them either.

SANSA: How well do you know the North, Ser Davos?

DAVOS: Precious little, my lady.

SANSA: My father always said Northerners are different. More loyal, more suspicious of outsiders.

DAVOS: They may well be loyal, but how many rose up against the Boltons when they betrayed your family? I may not know the North, but I know men. They’re more or less the same in any corner of the world and even the bravest of them don’t want to see their wives and children skinned for a lost cause. If Jon’s going to convince them to fight alongside him, they need to believe it’s a fight they can win.

JON SNOW: There are more than three other houses in the North -- Glover, Mormont, Cerwyn, Mazin, Hornwood. Two dozen more. Together they equal all the others. We can start small and build.

SANSA: The North remembers. They remember the Stark name. People will still risk everything for it, from White Harbor to Ramsay’s own door.

DAVOS: I don’t doubt it. But Jon doesn’t have the Stark name.

SANSA: No, but I do.

JON SNOW stares at SANSA.

SANSA: Jon is every bit as much Ned Stark’s son as Ramsay is Roose Bolton’s. Ant there are also the Tullys. They’re not Northern, but they will back us against the Boltons without question.

DAVOS: I didn’t know the Tullys still had an army.

SANSA: My uncle the Blackfish has reformed it and retaken Riverrun.

JON SNOW: How do you know that?

SANSA: Ramsay received a raven before I escaped Winterfell.

DAVOS: That’s good. The Blackfish is a legend. His support would mean a great deal. Stark, Tully, a few more houses, almost starts to look like a winning side.

SANSA smiles.

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - BALCONY

BRIENNE follows SANSA down the stairs and along a walkway.

BRIENNE: I’ve sworn to protect you, my lady.

SANSA: You heard them. We need more men and my uncle has an army.

BRIENNE: We can send the Blackfish a raven.

SANSA: Can’t risk Ramsay intercepting it. It has to be you.

BRIENNE and SANSA enter SANSA’s chamber. BRIENNE closes the door behind them.

SANSA: Ride for Riverrun. My uncle will talk to you and you’ll know how to talk to him.

SANSA sits down on her bed.

SANSA: What is it?

BRIENNE: I don’t like leaving you here alone.

SANSA: With Jon?

BRIENNE: Not him. He seems trustworthy. A bit brooding, perhaps. I suppose that’s understandable, considering. The others, though. Davos and the Red Woman helped a man murder his own brother with blood magic. And when Stannis paid for his crime, where were they? Already out looking for a leader with better prospects. And that wildling fellow with the beard --

SANSA: Jon isn’t Tormund. Jon isn’t Davos, the Red Woman, or Stannis for that matter. Jon is Jon. He’s my brother. He’ll keep me safe. I trust him.

BRIENNE: Then why did you lie to him when he asked you how you learned about Riverrun?

CUT TO: CASTLE BLACK - COURTYARD

Several men of the Night’s Watch are readying horses. JON SNOW stands beside them. MELISANDRE sits on her horse behind them. BRIENNE walks past. SANSA approaches JON SNOW, carrying a bundled cloak.

JON SNOW: New dress?

SANSA: I made it myself. Do you like it?

JON SNOW: Year, it’s -- I like the wolf bit.

SANSA: Good, because I made this for you.

SANSA hands JON SNOW the cloak. JON SNOW looks at it. The direwolf sigil of House Stark is pressed into the leather straps.

SANSA: I made it like the one Father used to wear. As near as I can remember.

JON SNOW: Thank you, Sansa.

SANSA: You’re welcome.

SANSA walks away. BRIENNE is sitting on horseback beside TORMUND. TORMUND stares at her. She catches him staring and looks away. He grins. DOLOROUS EDD approaches JON SNOW, who is donning his new cloak.

JON SNOW: Don’t knock it down while I’m gone.

DOLOROUS EDD: I’ll do my best.

They embrace.

DOLOROUS EDD: Good luck.

JON SNOW walks to his horse and climbs atop it. He leads SANSA, MELISANDRE, PODRICK, BRIENNE, TORMUND, and the rest of the party out through the southern gates. A man of the Night’s Watch approaches DOLOROUS EDD, who is watching them leave.

MAN: Should we close the gate, Lord Commander?

DOLOROUS EDD: I’m not the Lord Comman --

The men of the Night’s Watch gather around DOLOROUS EDD.

DOLOROUS EDD: Yeah, ahem, close the bloody gate.

INT. GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE
BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN are both having a vision. MEERA and HODOR are preparing for travel.

MEERA: We can go home now, Hodor. Well, maybe not home home, but somewhere that isn’t a cave.

HODOR chuckles.

HODOR: Hodor.

MEERA: Eat something that isn’t moss. I want an egg. How do you like ‘em? Boiled? Fried up with some butter?

HODOR laughs.

HODOR: Hodor.

MEERA: With a rasher of bacon and some blood sausage.

HODOR: Hodor.

MEERA notices she can see her breath. She looks at BRAN and then runs to the entrance of the cave. LEAF and the other Children of the Forest are gathered outside. Across the field, the Night King, three White Walkers, and the army of the dead are gathered. The Night King steps forward, kneels, and places his hand on the ground. A rift cracks through the ice all across the field and into the Great Weirwood Tree.

LEAF: Get Bran and run!

MEERA runs back into the cave, retrieving a sword on the way back. The Night King unsheathes his blade and leads the White Walkers and the army of the dead towards the Great Weirwood. Inside, MEERA runs to BRAN and shakes him.

MEERA: Bran. Bran, wake up. Bran.

HODOR sits in the corner, rocking back and forth.

HODOR: Hodor. Hodor.

MEERA: Bran, wake up.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN watch YOUNG NED and YOUNG BENJEN embrace. BRAN smiles.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

MEERA hauls the sledge over to BRAN and tries to drag him onto it.

MEERA: Hodor.

HODOR: Hodor. Hodor.

MEERA: Help me!

Outside, LEAF and the Children of the Forest throw magic spheres at the army of the undead. The spheres explode upon contact, killing some of the wights. With one of the last bombs, LEAF lights a half-circle of flame in front of the entrance to the cave. She and the Children of the Forest run inside. The Night King and the White Walkers approach the flame. The flame parts to let them pass, then reforms. The army of the dead cannot pass through the flame. They go around it and climb the crag to the top of the Great Weirwood. Inside, MEERA places BRAN on the sledge.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

BRAN and the THREE-EYED RAVEN continue to watch.

RICKARD (to YOUNG NED): Remember that you are a Stark. Comport yourself with dignity at the Vale and try to stay out of fights.

NAN walks over to YOUNG HODOR and takes his arm.

YOUNG NED: Yes, Father.

RICKARD takes YOUNG NED by the chin.

RICKARD: But if you have to fight, win.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

MEERA continues shaking BRAN.

MEERA: Bran! Bran, wake up!

A wight falls through the ceiling. It advances on MEERA. MEERA grabs her sword and cuts it down. Another wight falls from the ceiling. MEERA recoils. SUMMER tackles it. MEERA drops her blade and returns to BRAN.

MEERA: Bran! Bran! Bran, wake up.

HODOR: Hodor. Hodor.

LEAF enters and runs up to BRAN and MEERA. A third wight falls from the ceiling, suspended upside down by its feet. LEAF rushes over to it and beheads it with her knife.

MEERA: You have to wake up. We need Hodor.

HODOR: Hodor. Hodor.

Another wight rushes, but LEAF shoots it with an arrow. A Child of the Forest enters to combat another wight, but the wight knocks her down and kills her. LEAF shoots it with an arrow.

HODOR: Hodor.

A number of wights begin piling in. LEAF and the Children of the Forest try to fight them off. One wight kills another Child of the Forest.

MEERA: Bran, we’re all going to die!

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

BRAN hears MEERA shouting at him from the other side.

MEERA (V.O.): Bran, wake up! We’re all going to die! Bran! Bran!

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

MEERA: Bran, you have to wake up! We need Hodor!

HODOR: Hodor. Hodor.

MEERA: Warg into Hodor now!

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

BRAN looks at YOUNG HODOR and NAN.

MEERA (V.O.): Bran, wake up. We need Hodor. We need Hodor. Warg into Hodor now! Now!

THREE-EYED RAVEN: Listen to your friend, Brandon.

HODOR (V.O.): Hodor. Hodor. Hodor. Hodor.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - CAVE

HODOR’s eyes flash white. More wights enter the cave. One of them kills another Child of the Forest. MEERA cuts it down. Another Child of the Forest jumps forward and stabs another wight with a spear. HODOR stands and walks over to BRAN. A White Walker enters. The spear-bearing Child of the Forest lunges at it and stabs it in the chest, but the blow has no effect. The White Walker pushes the spear aside and stabs the Child of the Forest, killing her. HODOR lifts the sledge with BRAN atop it. MEERA grabs a dragonglass spear and launches it into the White Walker’s neck. The White Walker shatters and dies. MEERA and LEAF follow HODOR towards the back entrance. SUMMER growls and bares his teeth at the wights entering the cave.

MEERA: Summer!

LEAF: Go. Go!

LEAF and MEERA run into the back tunnel. SUMMER attacks the wights. The wights encircle him and stab him to death. LEAF, MEERA, and HODOR hurry down the back tunnel. BRAN is still engaged in a vision on the sledge. A slew of wights pursues them. Back in the cave, the Night King enters and approaches the THREE-EYED RAVEN.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

THREE-EYED RAVEN: The time has come. Leave me.

Back in the Great Weirwood tree, the Night King slashes the THREE-EYED RAVEN. The THREE-EYED RAVEN dissolves into a black mist in front of BRAN.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - BACK TUNNEL

The undead army is advancing. LEAF stops running.

MEERA: What are you doing?

LEAF: Go!

LEAF turns to face the undead. She brandishes a magic bomb and primes it. The wights overtake her and knock her to the ground, stabbing her repeatedly. LEAF detonates the bomb, killing herself and the wights surrounding her. HODOR reaches the rear door. He puts down the sledge and begins ramming the door. More wights appear and begin advancing.

MEERA: Hodor, hurry!

HODOR heaves the door open and drags the sledge outside. He drops the sledge and returns to the door, holding it closed. MEERA lifts the sledge and begins dragging it away.

MEERA: Hold the door!

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

BRAN turns and stares at YOUNG HODOR, who stares back at him.

MEERA (V.O.): Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door!

YOUNG HODOR’s eyes turn white. He falls to the ground and convulses.

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - BACK ENTRANCE

HODOR puts his weight against the door.

MEERA: Hold the door!

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

YOUNG HODOR continues convulsing.

MEERA (V.O.): Hold the door!

NAN: Wylis! What’s the matter?

NAN kneels down beside YOUNG HODOR. BRAN walks over to them.

MEERA (V.O.): Hold the door!

YOUNG HODOR: Hold the door!

In the present day, HODOR struggles against the door.

YOUNG HODOR: Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door!

CUT TO: GREAT WEIRWOOD TREE - BACK ENTRANCE

The wights begin to break through the door. They clutch HODOR’s clothing and begin tearing at his flesh.

CUT TO: VISION OF THE PAST - WINTERFELL

YOUNG HODOR: Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold the door! Hold door! Hold door! Hold door! Hold door! Hodor! Hodor! Hodor! Hodor! Hodor! Hodor! Hodor!

